UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☑ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the Fiscal Year Ended December 31, 2019
or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from      to
Commission file number:
1-6523
Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter:
Bank of America Corporation
State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization:
Delaware
IRS Employer Identification No.:
56-0906609
Address of principal executive offices:
Bank of America Corporate Center
100 N. Tryon Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28255
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code:
(704) 386-5681
Securities registered pursuant to section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share BAC New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrE New York Stock Exchange
 of Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series E
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrC New York Stock Exchange
of 6.200% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series CC
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrA New York Stock Exchange
of 6.000% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series EE
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrB New York Stock Exchange
 of 6.000% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series GG
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrK New York Stock Exchange
 of 5.875% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series HH
7.25% Non-Cumulative Perpetual Convertible Preferred Stock, Series L BAC PrL New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrG New York Stock Exchange
of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 1
1     Bank of America
 
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange on which registered
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrH New York Stock Exchange
 of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 2
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrJ New York Stock Exchange
 of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 4
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrL New York Stock Exchange
 of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 5
Floating Rate Preferred Hybrid Income Term Securities of BAC Capital BAC/PF New York Stock Exchange
 Trust XIII (and the guarantee related thereto)
5.63% Fixed to Floating Rate Preferred Hybrid Income Term Securities BAC/PG New York Stock Exchange
 of BAC Capital Trust XIV (and the guarantee related thereto)
Income Capital Obligation Notes initially due December 15, 2066 of MER PrK New York Stock Exchange
Bank of America Corporation
Senior Medium-Term Notes, Series A, Step Up Callable Notes, due BAC/31B New York Stock Exchange
 November 28, 2031 of BofA Finance LLC (and the guarantee
of the Registrant with respect thereto)
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrM New York Stock Exchange
 of 5.375% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series KK
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrN New York Stock Exchange
of 5.000% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series LL
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☐ No ☑
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant: (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to
such filing requirements for the past 90 days.  Yes ☑ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405
of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit
such files).  Yes ☑ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company or
an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth
company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☑ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any
new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes ☐ No ☑
As of June 30, 2019, the aggregate market value of the registrant’s common stock (“Common Stock”) held by non-affiliates was approximately
$270,935,450,750. At February 18, 2020, there were 8,728,530,308 shares of Common Stock outstanding.
Documents incorporated by reference: Portions of the definitive proxy statement relating to the registrant’s 2020 annual meeting of stockholders are
incorporated by reference in this Form 10-K in response to Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of Part III.
  Bank of America    2
Table of Contents
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Part I  Page
Item 1. Business 2
Item 1A .Risk Factors 5
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 19
Item 2. Properties 19
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 19
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 19
Part II   
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities20
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 20
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 21
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 85
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 85
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 164
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 164
Item 9B. Other Information 164
Part III   
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 164
Item 11. Executive Compensation 164
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 165
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 165
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 165
Part IV   
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 166
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 170
1     Bank of America
 
Part I
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 1. Business
Bank of America Corpor ation is a Delaware corporation, a bank
holding company (BHC) and a financial holding company . When
used in this report, “the Corporation,” “we,” “us” and “our” may
refer to Bank of America Corporation individually , Bank of
America Corporation and its subsidiaries, or certain of Bank of
America Corporation’ s subsidiaries or affiliates. As part of our
efforts to streamline the Corporation’ s organizational structure
and reduce complexity and costs, the Corporation has reduced
and intends to continue to reduce the number of its corporate
subsidiaries, including through intercompany mergers.
Bank of America is one of the world’ s largest financial
institutions, serving individual consumers, small- and middle-
market busin esses, institutional investors, large corporations and
governments with a full range of banking, investing, asset
management and other financial and risk management products
and services. Our princ ipal executive offices are located in the
Bank of America Corporate Center , 100 North Tryon Street,
Charlotte, North Carolina 28255.
Bank of America’ s website is www .bankofamerica.com and
the Investor Relations portion of our website is
http://investor .bankofamerica.com. We use our website to
distribute company information, including as a means of
disclosing material, non-public information and for complying
with our disclosure obligations under Regulation FD. We
routinely post and make accessible finan cial and other
information regarding the Corporation on our website.
Accordingly , investors should monitor the Investor Relations
portion of our website, in addition to our press releases, U.S.
Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC ) filings, public
conference calls and webcasts. Our Annual Reports on Form 10-
K, Quarterly  Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-
K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant
to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
(Exchange Act) are available on the Investor Relations portion of
our website under the heading Financial Information (accessible
by clicking on the SEC Filings link) as soon as reasonably
practicable after we electronically file such reports with, or
furnish them to, the SEC and at the SEC’ s website,
www .sec.gov . Notwithstanding the foregoing, the information
contained on our website as referenced in this paragraph is not
incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Also, we make available  on the Investor Relations portion of our
website under the heading Corporate Governance: (i) our Code
of Conduct; (ii) our Corporate Governance Guidelines
(accessible by clicking on the Governance Highlights link); and
(iii) the charter of each active committee of our Board of
Directors (the Board) (accessible by clicking on the committee
names under the Committee Composition link). W e also intend to
disclose any amendmen ts to our Code of Cond uct and waivers
of our Code  of Conduct required to be disclosed by the rules of
the SEC and the New York Stock Exchange on the Investor
Relations portion of our website. All of these corporate
governance materials are also available free of charge in print to
shareholders who request them in writing to: Bank of America
Corporation, Attention: Office of the Corporate Secretary , Bank of
America Corporate Center , 100 North Tryon Street, NC1-007-56-
06, Charlotte, North Carolina 28255.
Segments
Through our banking  and various nonba nk subsidiaries
throughout the U.S. and in international marke ts, we provide a
diversified range of banking and nonbank financial services and
products through four business segments: Consumer Banking ,
Global Wealth & Investment Management (GWIM), Global Banking and
Global Markets,  with the remaining operations recorded in All
Other . Additional information related to our business  segments
and the products and services they provide is included in the
information set forth on pages 32 throu gh 41 of Item 7.
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations (MD&A) and Note 24 – Business
Segment Information  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Competition
We operate in a highly competitive environment. Our competitors
include banks, thrifts, credit unions, investment banking firms,
investment advisory firms, brokerage firms, investment
companies, insurance companies, mortgage banking companies,
credit card issuers, mutual fund companies, hedge funds, private
equity firms, and e-commerce and other internet-based
companies. We compete with some of these competitors globally
and with others on a regional or product specific basis.
Competition is based on a number of factors including,
among others, customer service, quality and range of products
and services offered, price, reputation, interest rates on loans
and deposit s, lending limits and customer convenience. Our
ability to continue to compete effectively also depends in large
part on our ability to attract new employees and retain and
motivate our existing employees, while managing compensation
and other costs.
Employees
At December 31, 2019 , we had approxima tely 208,000
employees. None of our domestic employees are subject to a
collective bargaining agreement. Managemen t considers our
employee relations to be good.
Government Supervision and Regulation
The followi ng discuss ion describes, among other things,
elements of an extens ive regulatory framework applicable to
BHCs, finan cial holding  companies, banks and broker-dealers,
including specific information about Bank of America.
We are subject to an extensive regulatory framework
applicable to BHCs, financial holding companies and banks and
other financial services entities. U.S. federal regulation of banks,
BHCs and financial holding companies is intended primarily for
the protection of depositors and the Deposit Insurance Fund
(DIF) rather than for the protection of shareholders and creditors.
As a registered financial holding company and BHC, the
Corporation is subject to the supervision of, and regular
inspection by, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve
System (Federal Reserve). Our U.S. bank subsidiaries (the
Banks), organized as national banking associations, are subject
to regulation , supervision and examination by the Office of the
Comptroller of the Currency (OCC), the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation (FDIC) and the Federal Reserve. U.S.
financial holding compa nies, and the companies under their
control, are permitted to engage in activities considered “financial
in nature” as defined by the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and related
Federal Reserve interpretations. The Corporation's status as a
financial holding company is conditioned upon maintaining
certain eligibility requirements for both the Corporation and its
U.S. depos itory institution subsidiaries, including minimum
capital ratios, supervisory ratings and, in the case of the
depository institutions,  at least satisfactory Community
Reinvestment Act ratings. Failure to be an eligible financial
holding company could result in the
  Bank of America    2
Federal Reserve limiting Bank of America's activities, including
potential acquisitions.
The scope of the laws and regulations and the intensity of the
supervision to which we are subject have increased over the
past several years, beginning with the response to the financial
crisis, as well as other factors such as technolo gical and market
changes. In addition, the banking and financial services sector is
subject to substantial regulatory enforcement and fines. Many of
these changes have occurred as a result of the 2010 Dodd-
Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (the
Financial Reform Act). We cannot assess whether there will be
any additional major changes in the regulatory environment and
expect that our business will remain subject to continuing and
extensive regulation and supervision.
We are also subject to various other laws and regulations, as
well as supervision and examination by other regulatory
agencies, all of which directly or indirectly affect our operations
and management and our ability to make distributions to
shareholders. For instance, our broker-dealer subsidiaries are
subject to both U.S. and international regulation, including
supervision by the SEC, Financial Industry Regulatory Authority
and New York Stock Exchange, among others; our commodities
businesses in the U.S. are subject to regulation by and
supervision of the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission
(CFTC); our U.S. deriva tives activity is subject to regulation and
supervision of the CFTC, National Futures Association and SEC,
and in the case of the Banks, certain banking  regulators; our
insurance activities are subject to licensing and regulation by
state insurance regulatory agencies; and our consumer financial
products and services are regulated by the Consumer Financial
Protection Bureau (CFPB).
Our non-U.S. businesses are also subject to extensive
regulation by various non-U.S. regula tors, including
governments, securities exchanges, prudential regulators,
central banks and other regulatory bodies, in the jurisdictions in
which those  businesse s operate. For example, our financial
services operations in the United Kingdom (U.K.), Ireland and
France are subject to regulation by the Prudential Regulatory
Authority and Financial Conduct Authority (FCA ), the European
Central Bank and Central Bank of Ireland, and the Autorité de
Contrôle Prudentiel et de Résolution and Autorité des Marchés
Financiers, respectively .
Source of Strength
Under the Financial Reform Act and Federal Reserve policy ,
BHCs are expected to act as a source of financial strength to
each subsidiary bank and to commit resources to support each
such subsidiary . Similarly , under the cross-guarantee provisions
of the Fede ral Deposit Insurance Corporation Improvement Act
of 1991 (FDICIA), in the event of a loss suffered or anticipated by
the FDIC, either as a result of default of a bank subsidiary or
related to FDIC assistance provided to such a subsidiary in
danger of default, the affiliate banks of such a subsidiary may be
assessed for the FDIC’ s loss, subject to certain exceptions.
Transactions with Affiliates
Pursuant to Section 23A and 23B of the Federal  Reserve Act, as
implemented by the Federal Reserve’ s Regulation W, the Banks
are subject to restriction s that limit certain types of transactions
between the Banks and their nonbank affiliates.  In general, U.S.
banks are subject to quantitative and qualitative limits on
extensions of credit, purchases of assets and certain other
transactions involving its nonbank affiliates. Additionally ,
transactions between U.S. banks and their nonbank affiliates are
required to be on arm’s length terms and must be consistent with
standards of safety and soundness. Deposit Insurance
Deposits placed at U.S. domiciled banks are insured by the
FDIC, subje ct to limits and conditions of applica ble law and the
FDIC’ s regulations. Pursuant to the Financial Reform Act, FDIC
insurance coverage limits are $250,000 per customer . All insured
depository institutions are required to pay assessments to the
FDIC in order to fund the DIF .
The FDIC is required to maintain at least a designated
minimum ratio of the DIF to insured deposits in the U.S. The
FDIC adopted regulations that establish a long-term target DIF
ratio of greater than two percent. As of the date of this report, the
DIF ratio is below this required target and the FDIC has adopted
a restoration plan that may result in increased deposit insurance
assessments. Deposit insurance assessment rates are subject to
change by the FDIC and will be impacted by the overall economy
and the stability of the banking industry as a whole. For more
information regarding deposit insurance, see Item 1A. Risk
Factors – Regulatory , Compliance and Legal  on page 14.
Capital, Liquidity and Operational Requirements
As a financial holding company , we and our bank subsidiaries
are subject to the regulatory capital and liquidity guidelines
issued by the Federal Reserve and other U.S. banking
regulators, including the FDIC and the OCC. These rules are
complex and are evolving as U.S. and international regulatory
authorities propose and enact enhanced capital and liquidity
rules. The Corporation seeks to manage its capital position to
maintain sufficient capit al to meet these regulatory guidelines
and to supp ort our business activities. These evolving rules are
likely to influence our planning processes and may require
additional regulatory capital and liquidity , as well as impose
additional operational and compliance costs on the Corporation.
In addition, the Federal Reserve and the OCC have adopted
guidelines that establis h minimum standards for the design,
implementation and board oversight of BHCs’  and national
banks’  risk governance frameworks. The Federal Reserve also
issued a final rule, which  became effective Janu ary 1, 2019, that
includes minimum external total loss-absorbing capacity (TLAC)
and long-term debt requirements.
For more information on regulatory capital rules, capital
composition and pending or proposed regulatory capital
changes, see Capital Management – Regulatory Capital  in the
MD&A  on page 46, and Note 17 – Regulatory Requirements and
Restrictions  to the Consolidated Financial Statements , which are
incorporated by reference in this Item 1.
Distributions
We are subject to various regulatory policies and requirements
relating to capital actions, including payment of dividends and
common stock repurchases. For instance, Federal Reserve
regulations require major U.S. BHCs to submit a capital plan as
part of an annual Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
(CCAR). The purpose of the CCAR for the Fede ral Reserve is to
assess the capital plann ing process of the BHC, including any
planned capital actions, such as payment of dividends and
common stock repurchases.
Our ability to pay dividends is also affected by the various
minimum capital requirements and the capital and non-capital
standards established under the FDICIA. The right of the
Corporation, our shareholders and our creditors to participate in
any distribut ion of the assets or earnings of our subsidiaries is
further subje ct to the prior claims of creditors of the respective
subsidiaries.
If the Feder al Reserve finds that any of our Banks are not
“well-capitalized” or “well-managed,” we would  be required to
enter into an agreement with the Federal Reserve to comply with
all
3     Bank of America
 
applicable capital and management requireme nts, which may
contain additional limitations or conditions relating to our
activities. Additionally , the applicable federal regulatory authority
is authorized  to determine, under certain circum stances relating
to the financ ial condition  of a bank or BHC, that the payment of
dividends would be an unsafe or unsound practice and to
prohibit payment thereof.
For more information regarding the requiremen ts relating to
the paymen t of dividends, including the minimum capital
requirements, see Note 14 – Shareholders’  Equity  and Note 17 –
Regulatory Requirements and Restrictions  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements .
Many of our subsidiaries, including our bank and broker-
dealer subsidiaries, are subject to laws that restrict dividend
payments, or authorize regulatory bodies to block or reduce the
flow of funds from those subsidiaries to the parent company or
other subsidiaries.
Resolution Planning
As a BHC with greater than $50 billion of assets, the Corporation
is required by the Feder al Reserve and the FDIC to periodically
submit a plan for a rapid and orderly resolution in the event of
material financial distress or failure.
Such resolution plan is intended to be a detailed roadmap for
the orderly resolution of the BHC and its material entities
pursuant to the U.S. Bankruptcy Code and other applicable
resolution regimes under one or more hypoth etical scenarios
assuming no extraordinary government assistance.
If both the Federal Reserve and the FDIC determine that the
BHC’ s plan is not credible, the Federal Reserve and the FDIC
may jointly impose more stringent capital, leverage or liquidity
requirements or restrictions on growth, activities or operations. A
summary of our plan is available on the Federal Reserve and
FDIC websites.
The FDIC also requires  the submission of a resolution plan
for Bank of America, National Association, which must describe
how the insured depository institution would be resolved under
the bank resolution provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance
Act. A description of this plan is available on the FDIC’ s website.
We continue to make substantial progress to enhance our
resolvability , including simplifying our legal entity structure and
business operations, and increasing our preparedness to
implement our resolution plan, both from a financial and
operational standpoint.
Across international jurisdictions, resolution planning is the
responsibility of national resolution authoritie s (RA). Among
those, the jurisdictions of most impact to the Corporation are the
requirements associated with subsidiaries in the U.K., Ireland
and France, where rules have been issued requiring the
submission of significant information about locally-incorporated
subsidiaries (including information on intra-grou p dependencies,
legal entity separation and barriers to resolution ) as well as the
Corporation’ s banking branches located in those jurisdictions
that are deemed to be material for resolution planning purposes.
As a result of the RA's review of the submitted information, we
could be required to take certain actions over the next several
years which could increase operating costs and potentially result
in the restructuring of certain businesses and subsidiaries.
For more information regarding our resolution plan, see Item
1A. Risk Factors – Liquidity  on page 7.
Insolvency and the Orderly Liquidation Authority
Under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, the FDIC may be
appointed receiver of an insured depository institution if it is
insolvent or in certain other circumstances. In addition, under the Financial Reform Act, when a systemically important financial
institution (SIFI) such as the Corporation is in default or danger
of default, the FDIC may be appointed receiver in order to
conduct an orderly liquid ation of such institution . In the event of
such appointment, the FDIC could, among other things, invoke
the orderly liquidation authority , instead of the U.S. Bankruptcy
Code, if the Secretary of the Treasury makes certain financial
distress and systemic risk determinations. The orderly liquidation
authority is modeled in part on the Federal Deposit Insurance
Act, but also adopts certain concepts from the U.S. Bankruptcy
Code.
The orderly liquidation authority contains certain differences
from the U.S. Bankruptcy Code. For example, in certain
circumstances, the FDIC could permit payment of obligations it
determines to be systemically significant (e.g., short-term
creditors or operating creditors) in lieu of paying other obligations
(e.g., long-term creditors) without the need to obtain creditors’
consent or prior court review . The insolvency and resolution
process could also lead to a large reduction or total elimination of
the value of a BHC’ s outstanding equity , as well as impairment or
elimination of certain debt.
Under the FDIC’ s “single point of entry” strategy for resolving
SIFIs, the FDIC could replace a distressed BHC with a bridge
holding company , which could continue operations and result in
an orderly resolution of the underlying bank, but whose equity is
held solely for the benefit of creditors of the original BHC.
Furthermore, the Federal Reserve requires that BHCs
maintain minimum levels of long-term debt required to provide
adequate loss absorbing capacity in the event of a resolution.
For more information regarding our resolution, see Item 1A.
Risk Factors – Liquidity  on page 7.
Limitations on Acquisitions
The Riegle-N eal Intersta te Banking and Branching Efficiency Act
of 1994 permits a BHC to acquire banks located in states other
than its home state without regard to state law, subject to certain
conditions, including the condition that the BHC , after and as a
result of the acquisition, controls no more than 10 percent of the
total amount of deposits  of insured depository institutions in the
U.S. and no more than 30 percent or such lesser or greater
amount set by state law of such deposits in that state. At June
30, 2019, we held greater than 10 percent of the total amount of
deposits of insured depository institutions in the U.S.
In addition, the Financial Reform Act restricts acquisitions by
a financial institution if, as a result of the acqu isition, the total
liabilities of the financia l institution would exceed 10 percent of
the total liabilities of all financial institutions in the U.S. At June
30, 2019, our liabilities did not exceed 10 percent of the total
liabilities of all financial institutions in the U.S.
The Volcker Rule
The Volcker  Rule prohibits insured depository  institutions and
companies affiliated with insured depository institutions
(collectively , banking entities) from engaging  in short-term
proprietary trading of certain securities, derivatives, commodity
futures and options for their own account. The Volcker Rule also
imposes limits on banking entities’  investments in, and other
relationships with, hedge funds and private equity funds. The
Volcker Rule provides exemptions for certain activities, including
market-making, underwriting, hedging, trading in government
obligations, insurance company activities and organizing and
offering hedge funds and private equity funds. The Volcker Rule
also clarifies that certain activities are not prohibited, including
acting as agent, broker or custodian. A banking entity with
significant trading operations, such as the Corporation, is
required
  Bank of America    4
to maintain a detailed compliance program to comply with the
restrictions of the V olcker Rule.
Derivatives
Our derivatives operations are subject to extensive regulation
globally . These operations are subject to regulation under the
Financial Reform Act, the European Union (EU) Markets in
Financial Instruments Directive and Regulation, the European
Market Infrastructure Regulation  and similar regulatory regimes
in other jurisdictions, that regulate or will regulate the derivatives
markets in which we operate by, among other things: requiring
clearing and exchange trading of certain deriv atives; imposing
new capital, margin, reporting, registration and business conduct
requirements for certain market participants; imposing position
limits on certain over-the-counter (OTC) derivatives; and
imposing derivatives trading transparency requirements.
Regulations of derivatives are already in effect in many markets
in which we operate.
In addition, many G-20 jurisdictions, including the U.S., U.K.,
Germany and Japan, have adopted resolution stay regulations to
address concerns that the close-out of derivatives and other
financial contracts in resolution could impede orderly resolution
of global systemically important banks (G-SIBs), and additional
jurisdictions are expected to follow suit. Generally , these
resolution stay regulations require amendm ent of certain
financial contracts to provide for contractual recognition of stays
of termination rights under various statutory resolution regimes
and a stay on the exercise of cross-default rights based on an
affiliate’ s entry into insolvency proceedings. As resolution stay
regulations of a particu lar jurisdiction applicable to us go into
effect, we amend impacted financial contracts in compliance with
such regulations either as a regulated entity or as a counterparty
facing a regulated entity in such jurisdiction.
Consumer Regulations
Our consum er business es are subject to extensive regulation
and oversight by federal and state regulators. Certain federal
consumer finance laws to which we are subje ct, including the
Equal Credi t Opportunit y Act, Home Mortgage Disclosure Act,
Electronic Fund Transfer Act, Fair Credit Reporting Act, Real
Estate Settlement Procedures Act, Truth in Lending Act and
Truth in Savings Act, are enforced by the CFPB. Other federal
consumer finance laws, such as the Servicemembers Civil Relief
Act, are enforced by the OCC.
Privacy and Information Security
We are subject to many U.S. federal, state and international laws
and regulations governing requirements for maintaining policies
and procedures regarding the disclosure, use and protection of
the non-public confidential information of our customers and
employees. The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act requires us to
periodically disclose Bank of America’ s priva cy policies and
practices relating to sharing such information and enables retail
customers to opt out of our ability to share information with
unaffiliated third parties, under certain circumstances. The
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and other laws also require us to
implement a comprehen sive information security program that
includes administrative, technical and physical safeguards to
provide the security and confidentiality of customer records and
information. Security and privacy policies and procedures for the
protection of personal and confidential information are in effect
across all businesses and geographic locations.
Other laws and regulations, at the international, federal and
state level, impact our ability to share certain information with
affiliates and non-af filiates for marketing and/o r non-marketing
purposes, or contact customers with marketing offers and
establish certain rights of consumers in connection with their
personal information. For example, Californ ia’s Consumer
Privacy Act (CCP A), which went into effect in January 2020, provides
consumers with the right to know what person al data is being
collected, know whether their personal data is sold or disclosed
and to whom and opt out of the sale of their personal data,
among other rights. In addition, in the EU, the General Data
Protection Regulation (GDPR) replaced the Data Protection
Directive and related implementing national laws in its member
states. The CCPA's and GDPR’ s impact on the Corporation was
assessed and addressed through comprehen sive compliance
implementation program s. These existing and evolving legal
requirements in the U.S. and abroad, as well as court
proceedings with respect to the validity of cross-border data
transfer mechanisms from the EU, continue to lend uncertainty to
privacy compliance globally .
Item 1A. Risk Factors
In the course of conducting our business operations, we are
exposed to a variety of risks, some of which are inherent in the
financial services industry and others of which are more specific
to our own businesses. The discussion below addresses the
most significant factors, of which we are currently aware, that
could affect our businesses, results of operations and financial
condition. Additional factors that could affect our businesses,
results of operations and financial condition are discussed in
Forward-looking Statements  in the MD&A  on page 22. However ,
other factors  not discussed below or elsewhere in this Annual
Report on Form 10-K could also adversely affect our businesses,
results of operations and financial condition. Therefore, the risk
factors below should not be considered a complete list of
potential risks that we may face. For more information on how
we manage risks, see Managing Risk  in the MD&A  on page 42.
Any risk factor described in this Annual Report on Form 10-K
or in any of our other SEC filings could by itself, or together with
other factors, materially adversely affect our liquidity , competitive
position, business, reputation, results of operations, capital
position or financial condition, including by materially increasing
our expenses or decrea sing our revenues, which could result in
material losses.
Market
Our business and results of operations may be adversely
affected by the U.S. and international financial markets, U.S.
and non-U.S. fiscal, monetary , and regulator y policies, and
economic conditions generally .
General economic, political and social conditions in the U.S.
and in one or more countries abroad affect markets in the U.S.
and abroad and our business. In particular , markets in the U.S.
or abroad may be affected by the level and volatility of interest
rates, availability and market conditions of financing, unexpected
changes in gross domestic product (GDP), economic growth or
its sustainability , inflation, consumer spending, employment
levels, wage  stagnation,  federal government shutdowns, energy
prices, home prices, bankruptcies, a default by a significant
market participant, fluctuations or other significant changes in
both debt and equity capital markets and currencies, liquidity of
the global financial markets, the growth of global trade and
commerce, trade policies, the availability and cost of capital and
credit, disruption of communication, transportation or energy
infrastructure and investor sentiment and confidence.
Additionally , global markets may be adversely affected by natural
disasters, the emergence of widespread health emergencies or
pandemics, cyber attacks or campaigns, military conflict,
terrorism or other geopolitical events. Market fluctuations may
impact our margin requirements and affect our business liquidity .
Also, any sudden or prolonged market downturn in the U.S. or
abroad, as a result of the above factors or otherwise could result
in a decline in revenue and adversely
5     Bank of America
 
affect our results of operations and financial condition, including
capital and liquidity levels.
In the U.S. and abroad, uncertainties surrounding fiscal and
monetary policies present economic challenges. Actions taken
by the Federal Reserve , including changes in its target funds
rate and balance sheet management, and other central banks
are beyond our control  and difficult to predict and can affect
interest rates and the value of financial instruments and other
assets and liabilities, and impact our borrowers. A continued
protracted period of lower interest rates, or a move to negative
interest rates in the U.S., could result in lower revenue, and
maintain or increase pressure on net-interest income, which may
adversely affect our results of operations. Uncertainty or ongoing
developments in connection with the future relationship between
the U.K. and the EU, and the resulting impact  on the financial
markets and regulations  in relevant jurisdictions, could negatively
impact our revenues and ongoing operations in Europe and
beyond.
Changes to existing U.S. laws and regulatory policies,
including those relate d to financial regul ation, taxation,
international trade, fiscal policy and healthcare, may adversely
impact U.S. or global economic activity and our customers',
counterparties' and the Corporation's earnings and operations.
For example , significan t fiscal policy initiatives may increase
uncertainty surrounding the formulation and direction of U.S.
monetary policy and volatility of interest rates. Higher U.S.
interest rates relative to other major economies could increase
the likelihood of a more volatile and apprecia ting U.S. dollar .
Changes, or proposed changes, to certain U.S. trade policies,
particularly with important trading partners, including China and
the EU, have negatively impacted and may continue to
negatively impact financial markets, disrupt world trade and
commerce and lead to trade retaliation, including through the use
of tariffs, foreign exchan ge measures or the large-scale sale of
U.S. Treasury Bonds. Further, the use of tariffs among countries
not directly involving the U.S. could spread and could damage
our customers directly and indirectly .
Any of these developments could adversel y affect our
consumer and commercial businesses, our customers, our
securities and derivatives portfolios, our level of charge-of fs and
provision for credit losses, the carrying value of our deferred tax
assets, our capital levels, liquidity and our results of operations.
Additionally , events and ongoing uncertainty related to the U.K.'s
exit from the EU and the uncertainty related to the transition from
Interbank Offered Rates (IBORs) and other benchmark rates to
alternative reference rates (ARRs) could negatively impact
markets in the U.S. and abroad and our business and/or magnify
any negative impact of the above referenced developments on
our business, customers and results of operations.
Increased market volat ility and adverse changes in other
financial or capital market conditions may increase our
market risk.
Our liquidity , competitive position, business , results of
operations and financial condition are affected by market risks
such as changes in interest and currency exchange rates,
fluctuations in equity and futures prices, lower trading volumes
and prices of securitized  products, the implied volatility of interest
rates and credit spreads and other economic and business
factors. These market risks may adversely affect, among other
things, (i) the value of our on- and off-balance sheet securities,
trading asse ts and other financial instruments, (ii) the cost of
debt capital and our access to credit markets, (iii) the value of
assets under management (AUM), (iv) fee income relating to
AUM, (v) customer allocation of capital among investment
alternatives, (vi) the volume of client activity in our trading
operations, (vii) investment banking fees, (viii) the general
profitability and risk level of the transactions in which we engage
and (ix) our competitiveness with respect to deposit pricing. For example, the value of certain of our assets is
sensitive to changes in market interest rates. If the Federal
Reserve or a non-U.S. central bank changes or signals a change
in monetary policy , market interest rates could be affected, which
could adversely impact the value of such assets. In addition, the
low interest rate environment and a flat or inverted yield curve
could negatively impact our financial condition or results of
operations, including future revenue and earnings growth.
We use various models and strategies to assess and control
our market risk exposures but those are subject to inherent
limitations. For more information regarding  models and
strategies, see Item 1A. Risk Factors – Other  on page 17. In
times of market stress or other unforeseen circumstances,
previously uncorrelated indicators may become correlated and
vice versa. These types of market movement s may limit the
effectiveness of our hedging strategies and cause us to incur
significant losses. These changes in correlation can be
exacerbated where other market participants are using risk or
trading models with assu mptions or algorithms similar to ours. In
these and other cases,  it may be difficult to reduce our risk
positions due to activity of other market participants or
widespread market dislocations, including circumstances where
asset values are declining significantly or no market exists for
certain assets. To the extent that we own securities that do not
have an established liquid trading market or are otherwise
subject to restrictions on sale or hedging, we may not be able to
reduce our positions and therefore reduce our risk associated
with such positions. In addition, challenging market conditions
may also adversely af fect our investment banking fees.
For more information about market risk and our market risk
management policies and procedures, see Market Risk
Management  in the MD&A  on page 71.
We may incur losses  if the value of certain assets
declines, including due to changes in interest rates and
prepayment speeds.
We have a large portfolio of financial instruments, including
certain loans and loan commitments, loans held-for-sale,
securities financing agreements, asset-backed secured
financings, long-term deposits, long-term debt, trading account
assets and liabilities, derivative assets and liabilities, available-
for-sale (AFS) debt and marketable equity securities, other debt
securities, equity method investments and certain other assets
and liabilities that we measure at fair value and other accounting
values, subje ct to impairment assessments. We determine these
values base d on applicable accounting guidance, which for
financial instruments measured at fair value, requires an entity to
base fair value on exit price and to maximize the use of
observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs
in fair value measurem ents. The fair values of these financial
instruments include adjustments for market liquidity , credit
quality , funding impact on certain derivatives and other
transaction-specific factors, where appropriate.
Gains or losses on these instruments can have a direct
impact on our results of operations, including higher or lower
mortgage banking income and earnings, unless we have
effectively hedged our exposures. Increases in interest rates
may result in a decrease in residential mortgage loan
originations. In addition, increases in interest rates may
adversely impact the fair value of debt securities and,
accordingly , for debt securities classified as AFS, may adversely
affect accumulated other comprehensive income and, thus,
capital levels.
Fair values may be impacted by declining values of the
underlying assets or the prices at which observable market
transactions occur and the continued availability of these
transactions or indices. The financial strength of counterparties,
with whom we have economically hedged some of our exposure
to these assets, also will af fect the fair value of these assets.
  Bank of America    6
Sudden declines and volatility in the prices of assets may curtail
or eliminate trading activities in these assets, which may make it
difficult to sell, hedge or value these assets. The inability to sell
or effectively hedge assets reduces our ability to limit losses in
such positions and the difficulty in valuing asse ts may increase
our risk-weighted assets, which requires us to maintain
additional capital and increases our funding costs. Asset values
also directly impact revenues in our wealth management and
related advisory businesses. We receive asset-based
management fees based on the value of our clients’  portfolios or
investments in funds managed by us and, in some cases, we
also receive performance fees based on increases in the value
of such investments. Declines in asset values can reduce the
value of our clients’  portfolios or fund assets, which in turn can
result in lower fees earned for managing such assets.
For more information on fair value measurements, see Note
21 – Fair Value Measurements  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements . For more information  on our asset management
businesses, see GWIM  in the MD&A on page 35. For more
information on interest rate risk management, see Interest Rate
Risk Management for the Banking Book  in the MD&A  on page
74.
Liquidity
If we are unable to access the capital markets  or continue to
maintain deposits, or our borrowing costs increase, our
liquidity and competitive position will be negatively affected.
Liquidity is essential to our businesses. We fund our assets
primarily with globally sourced deposits in our bank entities, as
well as secu red and unsecured liabilities transacted in the capital
markets. We rely on certain secured funding sources, such as
repo markets, which are typically short-term and credit-sensitive
in nature. We also engage in asset securitization transactions,
including with the government-sponsored enterp rises (GSEs), to
fund consumer lending activities. Our liquidity could be adversely
affected by any inability to access the capital markets, illiquidity
or volatility in the capital markets, the decrease in value of
eligible collateral or increased collateral requirements, including
as a result of credit concerns for short-term borrowing, changes
to our relationships with our funding providers based on real or
perceived changes in our risk profile, prolonged federal
government shutdowns,  or changes in regulations, guidance or
GSE status that impact our funding avenues or ability to access
certain funding sources. Additionally , the unwillingness or
inability of the Federal Reserve to act as lender of last resort,
unexpected simultaneou s draws on lines of credit, restricted
access to the assets of prime brokerage clients , the withdrawal
of customer deposits, which could result from customer attrition
for higher yields or the desire for more conservative alternatives,
increased regulatory liquidity , capital and marg in requirements
for our U.S. or international banks and their nonbank
subsidiaries, changes in patterns of intraday liquidity usage
resulting from a counterparty or technology failure or other
idiosyncratic event, failure by a significant market participant or
third party, such as a clearing agent or custodian, reputational
issues, or negative perceptions about our short- or long-term
business prospects, including downgrades of our credit ratings
may adversely af fect our liquidity .
Several of these factors may arise due to circumstances
beyond our control, such as general market volatility , disruption,
shock or stress, Federal Reserve policy decisions, including
fluctuations in interest rates or Federal Reserve balance sheet
composition, negative views about the Corporation or financial
services industry generally or due to a spec ific news event,
changes in the regulatory environment or governmental fiscal or
monetary policies, actions by credit rating agencies or an
operational problem that affects third parties or us. The impact of
these events, whether within our control or not, could include an inability to sell assets or redeem
investments, unforeseen outflows of cash, the need to draw on
liquidity facilities, the reduction of financing balances and the
loss of equit y secured funding, debt repurchases to support the
secondary market or meet client requests and the need for
additional funding for commitments and contingencies, as well as
unexpected collateral calls, among other things, the result of
which could be a liquidity shortfall and/or impact on our liquidity
coverage ratio.
Our cost of obtaining funding is directly related to prevailing
market cond itions, including changes in interest and currency
exchange rates, and to our credit spreads. Credit spreads are
the amount  in excess of the interest rate of U.S. Treasury
securities, or other benchmark securities, of a similar maturity
that we need to pay to our funding providers. Increases in
interest rates and our credit spreads can increas e the cost of our
funding and result in mark-to-market or credit valuation
adjustment exposures. Changes in our credit spreads are
market-driven and may be influenced by market perceptions of
our creditworthiness. Changes to interest rates and our credit
spreads occur continuously and may be unpredictable and highly
volatile. We may also experience spread compression as a result
of offering higher than expected deposit rates in order to attract
and mainta in deposits due to increased marketplace rate
competition. Additionall y, concentrations within our funding
profile, such  as maturities, currencies or counterparties, can
reduce our funding ef ficiency .
For more information about our liquidity position and other
liquidity matters, including credit ratings and outlooks and the
policies and procedures we use to manage our liquidity risks,
see Liquidity Risk  in the MD&A  on page 50.
Adverse changes to our credit ratings from the major
credit rating agencies could significantly limit our access to
funding or the capital markets, increase our borrowing
costs or trigger additional collateral  or funding
requirements.
Our borrowing costs and ability to raise funds  are directly
impacted by our credit ratings. In addition, credit ratings may be
important to customers or counterparties when we compete in
certain markets and seek to engage in certain transactions,
including OTC derivatives. Credit ratings and outlooks are
opinions expressed by rating agencies on our creditworthiness
and that of our obligation s or securities, including  long-term debt,
short-term borrowings, preferred stock and asset securitizations.
Our credit ratings are subject to ongoing review by rating
agencies, which consider a number of factors, including our own
financial strength, perfo rmance, prospects and operations as
well as factors not under our control such as the current
economic and geopolitical environment, and to a lesser extent,
the likelihood of the U.S. government providing meaningful
support to us or our subsidiaries in a crisis.
Rating agencies could make adjustments to our credit ratings
at any time, and there can be no assurance as to when and
whether downgrades will occur . A reduction in certain of our
credit ratings  could result in a wider credit spread and negatively
affect our liquidity , acce ss to credit markets, the related cost of
funds, our businesses and certain trading revenues, particularly
in those businesses where counterparty creditworthiness is
critical. If the short-term credit ratings of our parent company , or
bank or broker-dealer subsidiaries, were downgraded by one or
more levels, we may suffer the potential loss of access to short-
term funding sources such as repo financing, and/or incur
increased cost of funds and increased collateral requirements.
Under the terms of certain OTC derivative contracts and other
trading agreements, if our or our subsidiaries’  credit ratings are
downgraded, the counterparties may require additional collateral
or terminate these contracts or agreements.
7     Bank of America
 
While certa in potenti al impacts are contractual and
quantifiable, the full consequences of a credit rating downgrade
to a financial institution are inherently uncertain, as they depend
upon numer ous dynami c, complex and inter-related factors and
assumptions, including whether any downgrade of a firm’s long-
term credit ratings precipitates downgrades to its short-term
credit ratings, and assumptions about the potential behaviors of
various customers, investors and counterparties.
For more information on the amount of additional collateral
required and derivative liabilities that would be subject to
unilateral termination at December 31, 2019 , if the rating
agencies had downgraded their long-term senior debt ratings for
the Corporation or certain subsidiaries by each of two
incremental notches, see Credit-related Contingent Features and
Collateral in Note 3 – Derivatives  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
For more information about our credit ratings and their
potential effects to our liquidity , see Liquidity Risk – Credit
Ratings  in the MD&A  on page 52 and Note 3 – Derivatives  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
Bank of America Corporation is a holding company and
we depend upon our subsidiaries for liquidity , including the
ability to pay dividends to shareholders and to fund
payments on other obligations. Applica ble laws and
regulations, including capital and liquidity requirements,
and actions taken pursuant to our resolution plan could
restrict our ability to transfer funds from subsidiaries to
Bank of America Corporation or to other subsidiaries, which
could adversely affect our cash flow and financial condition.
Bank of America Corporation, as the parent company , is a
separate and distinct legal entity from our banki ng and nonbank
subsidiaries. We evaluate and manage liquidity on a legal entity
basis. Legal  entity liquidity is an important consideration as there
are legal, regulatory , contractual and other limitations on our
ability to utilize liquidit y from one legal entity to satisfy the
liquidity requirements of another , including the parent company ,
which could result in adverse liquidity events. The parent
company depends on dividends, distributions, loans, advances
and other payments from our banking and nonbank subsidiaries
to fund dividend payme nts on our common stock and preferred
stock and to fund all payments on our other obligations, including
debt obligations. Any inability of our subsidiaries to pay dividends
or make payments to us may adversely affect our cash flow and
financial condition.
Many of our subsidiaries, including our bank and broker-
dealer subsidiaries, are subject to laws that restrict dividend
payments, or authorize regulatory bodies to block or reduce the
flow of funds from those subsidiaries to the parent company or
other subsidiaries. Our bank and broker-dealer subsidiaries are
subject to restrictions on their ability to lend or transact with
affiliates and to minimum regulatory capita l and liquidity
requirements, as well as restrictions on their ability to use funds
deposited with them in bank or brokerage accounts to fund their
businesses. Intercompa ny arrangements we entered into in
connection with our resolution planning submissions could
restrict the amount of funding available to the parent company
from our subsidiaries under certain adverse conditions.
Additional restrictions on related party transactions, increased
capital and liquidity requirements and addition al limitations on
the use of funds on deposit in bank or brokera ge accounts, as
well as lower earnings, can reduce the amount of funds available
to meet the obligations of the parent company and even require
the parent company to provide additional funding to such
subsidiaries. Also, regulatory action that requires additional
liquidity at each of our subsidiaries could impede access to funds
we need to pay our obligations or pay dividends. In addition, our
right to participate in a distribution of assets upon a subsidiary’ s liquidation or
reorganization is subject to prior claims of the subsidiary’ s
creditors. For more information regarding our ability to pay
dividends, see Capital Management  in the MD& A on page 45
and Note 14 – Shareholders’  Equity  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements .
In the event of a resolution, whether in a bankruptcy
proceeding or under the orderly liquidation authority of the
FDIC, such resolution could materially adversely affect our
liquidity and financial condition, and the ability to pay
dividends to shareholders and to pay obligations.
Bank of America Corporation, our parent holding company , is
required to periodically submit a plan to the FDIC and Federal
Reserve describing its resolution strategy under the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code in the event of material financial distress or
failure. In the current plan, Bank of America Corporation’ s
preferred resolution strategy is a “single point of entry” strategy .
This strategy provides that only the parent holding company files
for resolution under the U.S. Bankruptcy Code and contemplates
providing certain key operating subsidiaries with sufficient capital
and liquidity to operate through severe stress and to enable such
subsidiaries to continue operating or be wound down in a solvent
manner following a bankruptcy of the parent holding company .
Bank of America Corp oration has entered into intercompany
arrangements resulting in the contribution of most of its capital
and liquidity to key subsidiaries. Pursu ant to these
arrangements, if Bank of America Corporation’ s liquidity
resources deteriorate so severely that resolution becomes
imminent, Bank of Amer ica Corporation will no longer be able to
draw liquidit y from its key subsidiaries, and will be required to
contribute its remaining financial assets to a wholly-owned
holding company subsidiary , which could materially and
adversely affect our liquidity and financial condition and the
ability to pay dividends to shareholders and meet our payment
obligations.
If the FDIC and Federal Reserve jointly determine that Bank
of America Corporation’ s resolution plan is not credible, they
could impose more stringent capital, leverage or liquidity
requirements or restrictions on our growt h, activities or
operations. Further , we could be required to take certain actions
that could impose operating costs and could potentially result in
the divestit ure or restructuring of certain businesses and
subsidiaries.
Additionally , under the Financial Reform Act, when a G-SIB
such as Bank of America Corporation is in default or danger of
default, the FDIC may be appointed receiver in order to conduct
an orderly liquidation of such institution. In the event of such
appointment, the FDIC could, among other things, invoke the
orderly liquidation authority , instead of the U.S. Bankruptcy
Code, if the Secretary of the Treasury makes certain financial
distress and systemic risk determinations. In 2013, the FDIC
issued a notice describing its preferred “single point of entry”
strategy for resolving a G-SIB. Under this approach, the FDIC
could replac e Bank of America Corporation with a bridge holding
company , which could continue operations and result in an
orderly resolution of the underlying bank, but whose equity would
be held solely for the benefit of our creditors. The FDIC’ s “single
point of entry” strateg y may result in our security holders
suffering greater losses than would have been the case under a
bankruptcy proceeding or a dif ferent resolution strategy .
For more information about resolution planning, see Item 1.
Business  – Resolution Planning  on page 4. For more information
about the FDIC’ s orderly liquidation, see Item 1. Business –
Insolvency and the Orderly Liquidation Authority  on page 4.
  Bank of America    8
Credit
Economic or market disruptions, insufficie nt credit loss
reserves or concentrations of credit risk may result in an
increase in the provision for credit losses, which could have
an adverse  effect on our financial condition and results of
operations.
A number of our produc ts expose us to credit risk, including
loans, letter s of credit, derivatives, debt securities, trading
account assets and assets held-for-sale. A deterioration in the
financial condition of our consumer and comme rcial borrowers,
counterparties or underlying collateral could adversely affect our
financial condition and results of operations.
Global and U.S. economic conditions and macro economic or
market events and disru ptions, including a continuing slowdown
in global GDP  growth, a decline in consumer spending, a decline
in property values or an asset price correction, increasing
consumer and corporate leverage, as well as rising
unemployment, fluctuatio ns in foreign exchange or interest rates,
widespread health emergencies or pandemics  and/or natural
disasters, may impact our credit portfolios. In addition, significant
economic or market stresses and disruptions could have a
negative impact on the business environmen t and financial
markets, increasing the risk that borrowers or counterparties
would defau lt or become delinquent in their obligations to us,
which could lead to recessionary conditions and/or increase our
credit losses and provision for credit losses, which could have a
negative impact on our results of operations.
In particular , increases in delinquencies and default rates
could adversely affect our consumer credit card, home equity
and residen tial mortgag e portfolios through increased charge-
offs and provision for credit losses. A deteriorating economic
environment in the U.S. or globally could also adversely affect
our consumer and commercial loan portfolios with weakened
client and collateral positions. Simultaneous drawdowns on lines
of credit and/or an increase in a borrower ’s leverage in a
weakening economic environment could result in deterioration in
our credit portfolio, should borrowers be unable to fulfill
competing financial obligations. The impact of this could also be
magnified by lending to leveraged borrowers, elevated asset
prices and/or declining property or collateral values unrelated to
macroeconomic stress.
We estimate and establ ish an allowance for credit losses for
losses inherent in our lending activities (including unfunded
lending commitments), excluding those measur ed at fair value,
through a charge to earnings. The process for determining the
amount of the allowance requires us to make difficult and
complex judgments, including forecasting how borrowers will
react to changing economic conditions. The ability of our
borrowers or counterparties to repay their obligations will likely
be impacted by changes  in future economic conditions, which in
turn could impact the accuracy of our loss forecasts and
allowance estimates. There is also the possibility that we will fail
to accurately identify the appropriate economic indicators or that
we will fail to accurately estimate their impacts to our borrowers
and the reserves that we hold.
We may suffer unexpected losses if the models and
assumptions we use to establish reserves and make judgments
in extending credit to our borrowers or counterparties prove
inaccurate in predicting future events. In addition, external
factors, such as the macroeconomic or market events disclosed
above can also negative ly impact our recognition of credit losses
in our portfo lios and impact our allowance for credit losses. As of
January 1, 2020, we implemented a new accoun ting standard to
estimate our allowance for credit losses. For more information,
see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements . Although we believe that the
allowance for credit losses is in compliance  with the new
accounting standard at January 1, 2020, there is no guarantee that it will be sufficient
to address credit losses, particularly if economic conditions
deteriorate quickly and/o r significantly . In such an event, we may
increase the size of our allowance which would reduce our
earnings.
In the ordinary course of our business, we also may be
subject to concentrations of credit risk because of a common
characteristic or common sensitivity to economic, financial or
business developments. For example, concentrations in credit
risk may result in a particular industry , geographic location,
product, asset class, counterparty , individual exposure or within
any pool of exposures  with a common risk characteristic. A
deterioration in the financial condition or prospects of a particular
industry , geographic location, product or asset class, or a failure
or downgrade of, or default by, any particular entity or group of
entities could negatively affect our businesses and it is possible
our limits and credit monitoring exposure controls will not
function as anticipated.
While our activities expose us to many different industries
and counterparties, we routinely execute a high volume of
transactions with counterparties in the financial services industry ,
including broker-dealers, commercial banks, investment banks,
insurers, mutual funds and hedge funds, central counterparties
and other institutional clients. This has resulted in significant
credit concentration with respect to this industry . Financial
services institutions and other counterparties are inter-related
because of trading, funding, clearing or other relationships. As a
result, defaults by, or even market uncertainty about the financial
stability of one or more financial services institutions, or the
financial services indust ry generally , could lead to market-wide
liquidity disruptions, losses and defaults.
Many of these transacti ons expose us to credit risk and, in
some cases, disputes and litigation in the event of default of a
counterparty . In addition, our credit risk may be heightened by
market risk when the collateral held by us cannot be liquidated or
is liquidated  at prices not sufficient to recover the full amount of
the loan or derivatives exposure due to us, which may occur as a
result of fraud or other events that impact the value of the
collateral. Further , disputes with obligors as to the valuation of
collateral could increase in times of significant market stress,
volatility or illiquidity , and we could suffer losses during such
periods if we are unable  to realize the fair value  of the collateral
or manage declines in the value of collateral.
In the ordinary course of business, we also enter into
transactions with sovereign nations, U.S. states and U.S.
municipalities. Unfavorable economic or political conditions,
disruptions to capital markets, currency fluctuat ions, changes in
oil prices, social instability and changes in government or
monetary policies could impact the operating budgets or credit
ratings of these government entities and expose us to credit risk.
We also have concentra tions of credit risk with respect to our
consumer real estate, auto, consumer credit card and
commercial real estate portfolios, which repres ent a significant
percentage of our overall credit portfolio. Additionally , decreases
in home price valuations or commercial real estate valuations in
certain mark ets where we have large concentr ations, including
as a result of climate change or natural disasters  (e.g., rising sea
levels, hurric anes and fires), as well as more broadly within the
U.S. or globally , could result in increased defaults, delinquencies
or credit loss. For more information, see Consumer Portfolio
Credit Risk Management  in the MD&A  on page 54.
Furthermore, our commercial portfolios include exposures to
certain industries, including asset managers and funds, real
estate, capital goods and finance compan ies. For more
information, see Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management
in
9     Bank of America
 
the MD&A  on page 60. Economic  weaknesses, adverse
business conditions, market disruptions, rising interest or
capitalization rates, the collapse of speculative bubbles, greater
volatility in areas where we have concentrated credit risk or
deterioration in real estate values or household incomes may
cause us to experience a decrease in cash flow and higher credit
losses in either our cons umer or commercial portfolios or cause
us to write down the value of certain assets.
Liquidity disruptions in the financial markets may result in our
inability to sell, syndicate or realize the value of our positions,
leading to increased concentrations, which could increase the
credit and market risk associated with our positions, as well as
increase our risk-weighted assets.
For more information on our credit risk and credit risk
management policies and procedures, see Credit Risk
Management  in the MD& A on page 53, Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles , Note 5 – Outstanding Loans
and Leases  and Note 6 – Allowance for Credit Losses  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
If the U.S. housing market weakens or home prices
decline, our consumer loan portfolios, credi t quality , credit
losses, representation s and warranties exposures and
earnings may be adversely affected .
While U.S. home prices continued to generally increase in
2019, the rate of incre ase has slowed compared to recent
periods. We remain conscious of geographic  markets where
housing price growth has slowed or decreased and other
geographic markets where housing prices have declined, as
further declines in future periods may negatively impact the
demand for many of our products. Additionally , our mortgage
loan production volume is generally influenced  by the rate of
growth in residential mortgage debt outstanding and the size of
the residential mortgage market, both of which may be adversely
affected by rising intere st rates. Conditions in the U.S. housing
market durin g the most recent financial crisis resulted in both
significant write-downs of asset values in several asset classes,
notably mortgage-backed securities, and exposure to monolines.
If the U.S. housing market were to weaken, the value of real
estate could decline, which could result in increased credit
losses and delinquent servicing expenses and negatively affect
our representations and warranties exposures, which could have
an adverse  effect on our financial condition and results of
operations.
Our deriv atives businesses may expose us to
unexpected risks and potential losses.
We are party to a large  number of derivatives transactions
that may expose us to unexpected market, credi t and operational
risks that could cause us to suffer unexpected losses. Severe
declines in asset values, unanticipated credit events or
unforeseen circumstan ces that may cause previously
uncorrelated factors to become correlated and vice versa, may
create losses resulting from risks not appropriately taken into
account or anticipated in the development, structuring or pricing
of a derivative instrument. Certain OTC derivative contracts and
other trading agreements provide that upon the occurrence of
certain specified events, such as a change in the credit rating of
a particular Bank of America entity or entitie s, we may be
required to provide additional collateral or take other remedial
actions and could experience increased difficulty obtaining
funding or hedging risks. In some cases our counterparties may
have the right to termina te or otherwise diminish  our rights under
these contracts or agreements.
We are also a member of various central counterparties
(CCPs) in part due to regulatory requirements for mandatory
clearing of derivative transactions, which potentially increases
our credit risk exposures  to CCPs. In the event that one or more
members of the CCP  defaults on its obligations, we may be
required to pay a portion of any losse s incurred by the CCP  as a result of that default. A
CCP  may modify , in its discretion, the margin we are required to
post, which could mean unexpected and increased exposure to
the CCP. As a clearing member , we are exposed to the risk of
non-performance by our clients for which we clear transactions,
which may not be covered by available collateral. Additionally ,
any default by a significant market participant may result in
further risk and potential losses.
For more information on our derivatives exposure, see Note 3
– Derivatives  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Geopolitical
We are subject to numerous political, economic, market,
reputational, operation al, legal, regulatory and other risks in
the jurisdictions in which we operate.
We do business throughout the world including in emerging
markets. Economic or geopolitical stress in one or more
countries could have a negative impact regionally or globally ,
resulting in, among other things, market volatility , reduced market
value and economic output. Our businesses  and revenues
derived from non-U.S. jurisdictions are subject to risk of loss
from currency fluctuations, financial, social or judicial instability ,
changes in government leadership, including as a result of
electoral outcomes or otherwise, changes in governmental
policies or policies of central banks, expropriation, nationalization
and/or confiscation of assets, price controls , high inflation,
natural disasters, the emergence of widespread health
emergencies or pandemics, capital controls, currency
redenomination risk, exchange controls, unfavor able political and
diplomatic developments, oil price fluctuations and changes in
legislation. Additionally , protectionist trade policies and continued
trade tensions between the U.S. and important trading partners,
particularly China and the EU, including the risk that tariffs
continue to rise and other restrictive actions are taken that weigh
heavily on regional trade volumes and domestic demand through
falling business sentiment and lower consumer confidence, could
adversely affect our businesses and revenues. These risks are
especially elevated in emerging markets.
A number of non-U.S. jurisdictions in which we do business
have been or may be negatively impacted by slowing growth or
recessionary conditions, market volatility and/or political unrest.
In Europe, the politica l and economic enviro nment remains
challenging due to slowing GDP  growth, debt concerns of certain
EU countries and elevated recessionary risks, including in
Germany and the U.K. The current degree of European political
and economic uncertainty could increase and create additional
market volatility and negatively impact our business and results
of operations. Significant market volatility and geopolitical unrest
could also result from ongoing uncertainty related to the U.K.'s
exit from the EU and the transition period during which the terms
of such exit will be negotiated, which could adversely af fect us.
Potential risks of default  on or devaluation of sovereign debt
in some non-U.S. jurisdictions could expose us to substantial
losses. Risks in one nation can limit our opportunities for portfolio
growth and negatively affect our operations in other nations,
including our U.S. operations. Market and econ omic disruptions
of all types may affect consumer confidence levels and
spending, corporate investment and job creation, bankruptcy
rates, levels of incurrence and default on consumer and
corporate debt, economic growth rates and asset values, among
other factors . Any such unfavorable conditions or developments
could have an adverse impact on the Corporation.
We also invest or trade in the securities of corporations and
governments located in non-U.S. jurisdictions, including
emerging markets. Revenues from the trading of non-U.S.
securities may be
  Bank of America    10
subject to negative fluctuations as a result of the above factors.
Furthermore, the impact of these fluctuations could be magnified
because non-U.S. trading markets, particula rly in emerging
markets, are generally smaller , less liquid and more volatile than
U.S. trading markets.
Our non-U.S. businesses are also subject to extensive
regulation by governmen ts, securities exchanges and regulators,
central banks and other regulatory bodies. In many countries, the
laws and regulations applicable to the financial services and
securities industries are uncertain and evolving , and it may be
difficult for us to determine the exact requirements of local laws
in every market or manage our relationships with multiple
regulators in various jurisdictions. Our potential inability to
remain in compliance with local laws in a partic ular market and
manage our relationships with regulators could result in
increased expenses and changes to our organizational structure
and have an adverse effect on our businesse s and results of
operations in that market, as well as our reputation in general.
In addition  to non-U.S. legislation, our international
operations are also subject to U.S. legal requirements. For
example, our operations are subject to U.S. and non-U.S. laws
and regulati ons relating  to bribery and corruption, anti-money
laundering, and economic sanctions, which can vary by
jurisdiction. The increasi ng speed and novel ways in which funds
circulate could make it more challenging to track the movement
of funds and heightens financial crimes risk. Our ability to comply
with these legal requirements depends on our ability to
continually improve detection and reporting  and analytic
capabilities.
In the U.S., debt ceiling  and budget deficit concerns, which
have increas ed the possibility of U.S. government defaults on its
debt and/or downgrades to its credit ratings, and prolonged
government shutdowns  could negatively impact the global
economy and banking system and adversely affect our financial
condition, including our liquidity . Additionally , changes in fiscal,
monetary or regulatory policy could increase our compliance
costs and adversely  affect our busine ss operations,
organizational structure and results of operations. We are also
subject to geopolitical risks, including acts or threats of terrorism,
actions taken by the U.S. or other governme nts in response
thereto, state-sponsore d cyber attacks or campaigns and/or
military conflicts, which could adversely affect business and
economic conditions abroad, as well as in the U.S.
For more information on our non-U.S. credit and trading
portfolios, see Non-U.S. Portfolio  in the MD&A  on page 66.
The U.K. Referendum, and the planned exit of the U.K.
from the EU, could adversely affect us.
We conduct business in Europe, the Middle East and Africa
primarily through our subsidiaries in the U.K. France and Ireland.
For the year ended December 31, 2019 , our opera tions in
Europe, the Middle East and Africa, including the U.K.,
represented approximately six percent  of our total revenue, net
of interest expense.
On January 31, 2020, the U.K. formally exited the EU. Upon
exit, a transition period began during which time the U.K. and the
EU expect to negotiate  a trade agreement and other terms
associated with their future relationship. The transition period is
scheduled to end on December 31, 2020. The ultimate impact
and terms of such negotiation and any trade or other agreements
remain unclear , and short- and long-term global economic and
market volatility and disruptions to regional and global financial
markets may occur , including as a result of currency fluctuations
and trade relations. There can be no guarantee that the U.K. and
EU will reach an agreem ent on trade or any other matters during
the transition period or that the transition period will be extended
if agreements are not reached. Additionally , there may be heightened geopolitical uncertainty and/or market volatility if a
trade and other agreements are not reached by the end of the
transition period, including with regard to cross-border conduct of
financial services and the treatment of existing financial
transactions and contracts. If uncertainty resulting from the
U.K.’ s exit or the end to the transition period negatively impacts
economic conditions, financial markets, including currency
markets and consumer  confidence, or clients , counterparties,
and financia l markets are not prepared for the trade and other
agreements that are ultimately agreed upon or the transition
period ends without a trade or other agreement s, our business,
results of operations, financial position and/or operational model
could be adversely af fected.
We are also subject to different laws, regulations and
regulatory authorities and may incur additional costs and/or
experience negative tax consequences as a result of
establishing our principal EU banking and broker-dealer
operations outside of the U.K., which could adve rsely impact our
EU business, results of operations and operational model.
Additionally , changes to the legal and regula tory framework
under which our subsidiaries will continue to provide products
and services  in the U.K. and in the EU followi ng the transition
period may result in additional compliance costs and have
negative tax consequences or an adverse impact on our results
of operations. For more information on our EU operations
outside of the U.K., see Executive Summary – Recent
Developments – U.K. Exit from the EU  in the MD&A  on page 23.
Business Operations
A failure in or breach of our operational or security systems
or infrastructure, or those of third parties, including their
downstream service providers and the financial services
industry , could disrupt our critical business operations and
customer services, result in regulatory , market, privacy ,
liquidity and operational risk exposures, and adversely
impact our results of operations and financial condition, as
well as cause legal or reputational harm.
The potential for operational risk exposure exists throughout
our organization and as a result of our interactions with, and
reliance on, third parties, including their downstream service
providers, and the financial services industry infrastructure.
Our operatio nal and security systems infrastructure, including
our comp uter systems, emerging technologies, data
management and internal processes, as well as those of third
parties, are integral to our performance. We rely on our
employees and third parties in our day-to-day and ongoing
operations, who may, as a result of human error, misconduct,
malfeasance or a failure or breach of systems or infrastructure,
expose us to risk.
Additionally , our financial, accounting, data processing and
transmission, storage, backup or other operating or security
systems and infrastructure or those of third partie s with whom we
interact or upon whom we rely may fail to operate properly or
become disabled or damaged as a result of a number of factors
including events that are wholly or partially beyond our or such
third party’ s control, which could adversely affect our ability to
process transactions or provide services. We could also
experience prolonged computer and network outages resulting in
disruptions to our critical business operations and customer
services, including abus e or failure of our electr onic trading and
algorithmic platforms. We may experie nce electrical,
telecommunications or other major physical infrastructure
outages, newly identified vulnerabilities in key hardware or
software, failure of aging infrastructure, technology project
implementation challenges, natural disasters such as
earthquakes, tornadoes, hurricanes and floods, widespread
health emergencies or pandemics and events arising from local
or larger
11     Bank of America
 
scale political or social matters, including terrorist acts, which
could result in prolonged operational outages.
Regardless of the measures we have taken to implement
training, procedures, backup systems and other safeguards to
support our operations and bolster our operational resilience, our
ability to conduct business may be adversely affected by any
significant disruptions to us or to third parties , including their
downstream service providers, with whom we interact or upon
whom we rely, including a systematic cyber campaign that
results in system outage s and unavailability of part or all of the
financial services industry infrastructure. Our ability to implement
backup systems and other safeguards with respect to third-party
systems and the financial services industry infrastructure is more
limited than with respect to our own systems.
In the event that backup systems are available and utilized,
they may not process data as quickly as our primary systems
and some data might not have been backed up. We continuously
update the systems on which we rely to suppor t our operations
and growth and to remain compliant with all applicable laws,
rules and regulations globally . This updating entails significant
costs and creates risks associated with implementing new
systems and integrating them with existing ones, including
business interruptions. A failure or breach of our operational or
security systems or infrastructure resulting in disruption to our
critical busin ess operations and customer servic es could expose
us to regula tory, market,  privacy and liquidity risk, and adversely
impact our results of operations and financial condition, as well
as cause legal or reputational harm.
A cyber attack, information or security breach, or a
technology failure of ours or of a third party could adversely
affect our ability to conduct our business, manage our
exposure to risk or expand our businesses, result in the
disclosure or misuse of confidential or proprietary
information, increase our costs to maintain and update our
operational and security systems and infrastructure, and
adversely impact our results of operations , liquidity and
financial condition, as well as cause legal or reputational
harm.
Our business is highly dependent on the security , controls
and efficacy of our infrastructure, compu ter and data
management systems, as well as those of our customers,
suppliers, counterparties  and other third parties, including their
downstream service providers, the financial services industry
and financial data aggre gators, with whom we interact, on whom
we rely or who have access to our customers' personal or
account information. Our business relies on effective access
management and the secure collectio n, processing,
transmission, storage and retrieval of confidential, proprietary ,
personal and other information in our computer and data
management systems and networks, and in the computer and
data management systems and networks of third parties. In
addition, to access our network, products and services, our
employees, customers, suppliers, counterparties and other third
parties incre asingly use personal mobile devices or computing
devices that are outside of our network and control environments
and are subject to their own cybersecurity risks.
We, our employees and customers, regulators and other third
parties are regularly the target of cyber attacks and are likely to
continue to be the target of cyber attacks. These cyber attacks
are pervasive and evolving and include computer viruses,
malicious or destructive code (such as ransomware), phishing
attacks, denial of service or information or other security breach
tactics that could result in the unauthorized release, gathering,
monitoring, misuse, loss or destruction or theft of confidential,
proprietary and other information, including intellectual property ,
of ours, our employee s, our customers or of third parties,
damages to systems, or otherwise material disruption to our or
our customers’  or other third parties’  network access or business operations, both domestically and internatio nally. As cyber
threats continue to evolve, we may be required to expend
significant additional resources to modify or enhance our
protective measures, investigate and remediate any information
security vulnerabilities or incidents and develop  our capabilities
to respond and recover . Cyber threats are rapid ly changing, and
despite substantial efforts to protect the integrity of our systems
and implement controls, processes, policies and other protective
measures, we may not be able to anticipate cyber attacks or
information or security breaches, nor may we be able to
implement effective preventive or defensive  measures to
address such attacks or breaches. Even the most advanced
internal control environment is vulnerable to compromise.
Internal access management failures could result in the
compromise or unauthorized exposure of confidential data.
Targeted social engineering attacks are becoming more
sophisticated and are extremely dif ficult to prevent.
Our cybersecurity risk and exposure remains heightened
because of, among other things, the evolving nature and
pervasiveness of cyber threats, our prominent size and scale,
our role in the financial services industry and the broader
economy . The financial services industry is particularly at risk
because of the proliferation of new and emerging technologies,
including third-party financial data aggregators, and the use of
the Internet and telecommunications technologies to conduct
financial transactions. For example, our plans to continue our
use of automation, artificial intelligence and robotics, increase
our internet and mobi le banking products, including mobile
payment and other web- and cloud-based products and
applications, and develop additional remote connectivity
solutions to serve our customers when and how they want to be
served, increase our cybersecurity risks and exposure.
Additionally , our continuous transmission of sensitive
information to, and storage of such information by, third parties,
including our vendors and regulators, our geographic footprint
and international presence, the outsourcing of some of our
business operations, threats of cyber terrorism, external
extremist parties, including state-sponsored actors, in some
circumstances as a means to promote political ends, and system
and customer account updates and conversions result in
heightened risk exposure. As a result, cybersecurity and the
continued development  and enhancement of our controls,
processes and practices designed to protect our systems,
computers, intellectual property and propriet ary information,
software, data and networks from attack, damage or
unauthorized access remain a critical priority . Cybersecurity risks
have also significantly increased in recent years in part due to
the increasingly sophisticated activities of organized crime
groups, hackers, terrorist organizations, hostile foreign
governments, disgruntle d employees or vendo rs, activists and
other external parties, including those involved in corporate
espionage. The techniques used in cyber attacks change
frequently , and these attacks or ensuing security breaches could
persist for an extended period of time before being detected. It
could take considerable  additional time for us to determine the
scope, extent, amount, and type of information compromised, at
which time the impact on the Corporation and measures to
recover and restore to a business as usual state may be difficult
to assess.
We also face indirect technology , cybersecurity and
operational risks relating to the customers, client s and other third
parties, including their downstream service providers and the
financial services industry , with whom we do business, upon
whom we rely to facilita te or enable our business activities or
upon whom our custom ers rely. Such third parties also include
financial counterparties , financial data aggregators, financial
intermediaries, such as clearing agents, exchanges and clearing
  Bank of America    12
houses, vendors, regula tors, providers of critical infrastructure,
such as internet access and electrical power , and retailers for
whom we process transactions. As a result of increasing
consolidation, interdepe ndence and complexity of financial
entities and technology systems, a technology failure, cyber
attack or other information or security breach that significantly
degrades, deletes or compromises the systems or data of one or
more financial entities or third-party or their downstream service
providers could have a material impact on counterparties or
other market participants, including us. This consolidation,
interconnectivity and complexity increases the risk of operational
failure, on both individual and industry-wide bases, as disparate
systems need to be integrated, often on an accelerated basis.
Any technology failure, cyber attack or other information or
security breach, termination or constraint of any third party ,
including their downstream service provider s, the financial
services industry infras tructure or financial data aggregators,
could, amon g other things, adversely affect our ability to conduct
day-to-day business activities, effect transactions, service our
clients, manage our exposure to risk or expand  our businesses,
result in the misappropriation or destruction of the personal,
proprietary or confidential information of our employees,
customers, suppliers, counterparties and other  third parties or
result in fraudulent or unauthorized transactio ns. Further , any
such event may not be disclosed to us in a timely manner .
Although to date we have not experienced any material
losses or other material consequences relating to technology
failure, cyber attacks or other information or security breaches,
whether directed at us or third parties, there can be no
assurance that our controls and procedures in place to monitor
and mitigate the risks of cyber threats will be sufficient and that
we will not suffer material losses or consequences in the future.
Cyber attacks or other information or security breaches, whether
directed at us or third parties, may result in significant lost
revenue, give rise to losses or have other negative
consequences. Furthermore, the public perception that a cyber
attack on our systems has been successful, whether or not this
perception is correct, may damage our reputation with customers
and third parties with whom we do business. Although we
maintain cyber insurance, there can be no assurance that
liabilities or losses we may incur will be cove red under such
policies or that the amount of insurance will be adequate.
Also, successful penetration or circumvention of system
security could result in negative consequences, including loss of
customers and business opportunities, the withdrawal of
customer deposits, prolonged computer and network outages
resulting in disruptions to our critical business operations and
customer services, misappropriation or destruction of our
intellectual property , proprietary information or confidential
information and/or the confidential, proprieta ry or personal
information of certain parties, such as our employees,
customers, suppliers, counterparties and other third parties, or
damage to their compu ters or systems. This could result in a
violation of applicable privacy and other laws in the U.S. and
abroad, litigation exposure, regulatory fines , penalties or
intervention, loss of confidence in our security measures,
reputational damage, reimbursement or other compensatory
costs, additional compliance costs and our internal controls or
disclosure controls being  rendered ineffective. The occurrence of
any of these events could adversely impact our results of
operations, liquidity and financial condition.
Our mortgage loan repurchase obligations or claims
from third parties could result in additional losses.
We and our legacy companies have sold significant amounts
of residential mortgage loans. In connection with these sales, we
or certain of our subsidiaries or legacy companies made various representations and warranties, breaches of which may result in
a requirement that we repurchase the mortgage loans, or
otherwise make whole or provide other remedies to
counterparties. At December 31, 2019 , we had $10.7 billion  of
unresolved repurchase claims, net of duplicate claims and
excluding claims where the statute of limitations has expired
without litigation being commenced.
At December 31, 2019, our liability for obligations under
representations and warranties exposures was $1.8 billion. We
also have an estimated range of possible loss (RPL) for
representations and warranties exposures that is combined with
the litigation RPL, which we disclose in Note 13 – Commitments
and Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
The recorded liability and estimated RPL are based on currently
available information, significant judgment and a number of
assumptions that are subject to change. There can be no
assurance that the Corporation will reach future settlements or, if
it does , that the terms of past settlements can be relied upon to
predict the terms of future settlements. Future representations
and warranties losses may occur in excess of our recorded
liability and estimated RPL, and such losses could have a
material adverse ef fect on our results of operations.
Additionally , our recorded liability for representations and
warranties exposures and the corresponding estimated RPL do
not consider certain losses related to servicing, including
foreclosure and related costs, fraud, indemnity or claims
(including for residential  mortgage-backed securities) related to
securities law. Losses with respect to one or more of these
matters could be material to our results of operations.
For more information about our representations and
warranties exposure, see Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements and
Contractual Obligations – Representations and Warranties  in the
MD&A  on page 42 and Note 13 – Commitments and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Failure to satisfy our obligations as servicer for
residential mortgage securitizations and residential
mortgage loans owned by other entities, along with other
losses we could incur in our capacity as servicer , could
harm our reputation, increase servicing costs or adversely
impact our results of operations.
We and our legacy companies service mortgage loans on
behalf of third-party securitization vehicles and other investors. If
we commit a material breach of our obligation s as servicer or
master servicer , we may be subject to termination if the breach is
not cured within a specified period of time following notice, which
could cause us to lose servicing income. In addition, we may
have liability for any failure by us, as a servicer or master
servicer , for any act or omission on our part that involves willful
misfeasance, bad faith, gross negligence or reckless disregard of
our duties. If any such breach was found to have occurred, it
may harm our reputation, increase our servicing costs or
adversely impact our results of operations. Additionally , with
respect to foreclosures, we may incur costs or losses due to
irregularities in the unde rlying documentation, or if the validity of
a forec losure action is challenged by a borrower or overturned by
a court because of errors or deficiencies in the foreclosure
process. We may also incur costs or losses relating to delays or
alleged deficiencies in processing documents necessary to
comply with state law governing foreclosure.
Changes in the structure of the GSEs and the
relationship among the GSEs, the government and the
private markets could result in changes to our business
operations and may adversely impact our business.
During 2019 , we sold approximately $3.5 billion of loans to
Fannie Mae (FNMA) and Freddie Mac (FHLMC). Each is
currently in a conservatorship with its primary regulator , the
Federal Housing
13     Bank of America
 
Finance Agency (FHF A), acting as conservator . In September
2019, the Treasury Department published a proposal to
recapitalize FNMA  and FHLMC and remo ve them from
conservatorship as well as reduce GSEs' role in the marketplace.
There can be no assur ance that these propos als will be fully
adopted, and it is not possible to predict when the
conservatorships will end. If GSEs were to take a reduced role in
the marketplace, including by limiting the mortgage products they
offer, we could be required to seek alternative funding sources,
retain additional loans on our balance sheet, secure funding
through the Federal Home Loan Bank system, or securitize the
loans throug h Private Label Securitization. Althou gh the Treasury
Department has released an administrative proposal and the
FHFA has taken steps to unify underwriting parameters and
create a common securitization platform, we cannot predict the
prospects for the enactment, timing of the recapitalization or
release from conservatorship or content of legislative or
rulemaking proposals regarding the future status of the GSEs in
the housing market. Accordingly , uncertainty regarding their
future continues to exist.
Any of these developments could adversely affect the value
of our securities portfolio s, capital levels and liquidity and results
of operations.
Our risk management framework may not be effective in
mitigating risk and reducing the potential for losses.
Our risk management framework is designed to minimize risk
and loss to us. We seek to effectively and consistently identify ,
measure, monitor , report and control the types of risk to which
we are subject, including strategic, credit, market, liquidity ,
compliance, operational and reputational risks. While we employ
a broad and diversifie d set of controls and risk mitigation
techniques, including modeling and foreca sting, hedging
strategies and techniques that seek to balance our ability to profit
from trading positions with our exposure to potential losses, our
ability to control and mitigate risks that result in losses is
inherently limited by our ability to identify all risks, including
emerging and unknown risks, anticipate the timing of risks, apply
effective hedging strateg ies, make correct assum ptions, manage
and aggregate data correctly and efficiently , and develop risk
management models to assess and control risk.
Our ability to manage risk is limited by our ability to
consistently execute all elements of our risk management
program and develop and maintain a culture of managing risk
well throughout the Corporation and manage risks associated
with third parties, their downstream service providers, and
vendors, to enable effective risk management and ensure that
risks are appropriately considered, evaluated and responded to
in a timely manner . Uncertain economic conditions, heightened
legislative and regulatory scrutiny of and change within the
financial services industry , the pace of techno logical changes,
accounting and market developments, the failure of employees
to comply with policies, values and our risk framework and the
overall complexity of our operations, among other developments,
may result in a heightened level of risk for us. Accordingly , we
could suffer losses as a result of our failure to manage change or
properly anticipate, manage, control or mitigate risks.
For more information about our risk management policies and
procedures, see Managing Risk  in the MD&A  on page 42.
Regulatory , Compliance and Legal
We are subject to comprehensive governm ent legislation
and regulations, both domestically and internationally ,
which impact our operating costs and could require us to
make chan ges to our operations. Additionally , we are
subject to certain settlements, orders and agreements with
government authorities from time to time, which  could increase our compliance and operational
risks and costs.
We are subject to comprehensive regulation under federal
and state laws in the U.S. and the laws of the various
jurisdictions in which we operate, including increasing and
complex economic sanctions regimes. These laws and
regulations significantly affect and have the potential to restrict
the scope of our existing businesses, limit our ability to pursue
certain business opportunities, including the products and
services we offer, reduce certain fees and rates or make our
products and services more expensive for clients and customers.
We continue to make adjustments to our business and
operations, legal entity structure and capit al and liquidity
management policies, procedures and controls to comply with
currently effective laws and regulations, as well as final
rulemaking, guidance and interpretation by regulatory authorities,
including the Department of Treasury , Federal Reserve, OCC,
CFPB, Financial Stability Oversight Council, FDIC, Department
of Labor , SEC and CFTC in the U.S. and foreig n regulators and
other government authorities. Further , we could become subject
to future regulatory requirements beyond those currently
proposed, adopted or contemplated, including rulemaking related
to the Financial Reform Act and the U.K.'s exit from the EU. The
cumulative effect of all of the legislation and regulations on our
business, operations and profitability remains uncertain. This
uncertainty necessitates that in our business planning we make
certain assumptions with respect to the scope and requirements
of the propo sed rules. If these assumptions prove incorrect, we
could be subject to increased regulatory and compliance risks
and costs as well as potential reputational harm. In addition, U.S.
and internati onal regulat ory initiatives may overlap, and non-U.S.
regulations and initiatives may be inconsistent or may conflict
with current or propose d U.S. regulations, which could lead to
compliance risks and increased costs.
Our regulators’  prudential and supervisory authority gives
them broad power and discretion to direct our actions, and they
have assumed an active oversight, inspection and investigatory
role across the financial services industry . However, regulatory
focus is not limited to laws and regulations applicable to the
financial services industry specifically , but also extends to other
significant laws and regulations that apply across industries and
jurisdictions,
including those related to data management and privacy , anti-
money laundering, anti-corruption and econ omic sanctions.
Additionally , we are subject to laws, rules and regulations in the
U.S. and abroad, including GDPR and CCPA, regarding
compliance with our privacy policies and the disclosure,
collection, use, sharing and safeguarding of personal identifiable
information of certain parties, such as our employees,
customers, suppliers, counterparties and other third parties, the
violation of which could  result in litigation, regulatory fines and
enforcement actions. Additionally , we will likely be subject to new
and evolving data priva cy laws in the U.S. and abroad, which
could result in additi onal costs of compli ance, litigation,
regulatory fines and enforcement actions.
As part of their enforcement authority , our regulators and
other government authorities have the authority to, among other
things, assess significant civil or criminal monetary penalties or
restitution and issue cease and desist or removal orders and
initiate injunctive actions. The amounts paid by us and other
financial institutions to settle proceedings or investigations have,
in some instances, been  substantial and may increase. In some
cases, gove rnmental authorities have required criminal pleas or
other extraordinary terms as part of such resolutions, which
could have significant consequences, including reputational
harm, loss of customer s, restrictions on the ability to access
capital markets, and the
  Bank of America    14
inability to operate certain businesses or offer certain products
for a period of time.
The Corporation and the conduct of its employees and
representatives are subject to regulatory scrutiny across
jurisdictions. Additionally , the complexity of the federal and state
regulatory and enforcement regimes in the U.S., coupled with the
global scope of our operations and the aggres siveness of the
regulatory environment worldwide also means that a single event
or practice or a series of related events or practices may give
rise to a significant number of overlapping investigations and
regulatory proceedings, either by multiple federal and state
agencies in the U.S. or by multiple regula tors and other
governmental entities in different jurisdictions. Additionally ,
actions by other members of the financial services industry
related to business activities in which we participate may result in
investigations by regulators or other government authorities.
Responding to inquiries, investigations, lawsuits and
proceedings, regardless of the ultimate outcome  of the matter , is
time-consuming and expensive and can divert the attention of
our senior management from our business. The outcome of such
proceedings, which may last a number of years , may be difficult
to predict or estimate until late in the proceedings.
We are currently subject to the terms of settlements, orders
and agreements that we have entered into with government
entities and regulatory authorities and may become subject to
additional settlements, orders or agreements in the future. Such
settlements, orders or agreements can impose significant
operational and compliance costs on us as they typically require
us to enhanc e our procedures and controls, expand our risk and
control functions within our lines of business, invest in
technology and hire significant numbers of additional risk, control
and complia nce person nel. Moreover , if we fail to meet the
requirements of the regulatory settlements, orders or
agreements to which we are subject, or, more generally , fail to
maintain risk and control procedures and processes that meet
the heightened standards established by our regulators and
other government authorities, we could be required to enter into
further settlements, orders or agreements and pay additional
fines, penal ties or judgments, or accept material regulatory
restrictions on our businesses.
While we believe that we have adopted appropriate risk
management and compliance programs to identify , assess,
monitor and report on applicable laws, policies and procedures,
compliance risks will continue to exist, particularly as we adapt to
new and evolving laws, rules and regulatio ns. Additionally ,
changing U.S. fiscal, monetary and regulatory  policies arising
from potenti al changes to the U.S. presidentia l administration
and Congress result in ongoing regulatory uncertainties. There is
no guarantee that our risk management and compliance
programs will be consis tently executed to successfully manage
compliance risk. We also rely upon third parties who may expose
us to compliance and legal risk. Future legislative or regulatory
actions, and any required changes to our busine ss or operations,
or those of third parties, including their downstream providers,
upon whom we rely, resulting from such developments and
actions could result in a significant loss of revenue, impose
additional compliance and other costs or otherwise reduce our
profitability , limit the products and services that we offer or our
ability to pursue certain business opportunities, require us to
dispose of or curtail certain businesses, affect the value of
assets that we hold, require us to increase our prices and
therefore reduce demand for our products, or otherwise
adversely affect our businesses. In addition, legal and regulatory
proceedings and other contingencies will arise from time to time
that may result in fines, regulatory sanctions, penalties, equitable
relief and changes to our business practices. As a result, we are
and will continue to be subject to heightened compliance and operating costs that could adversely affect our
results of operations.
We are subject to significant financial and reputational
risks from potential liability arising from lawsuits and
regulatory and government action.
We face significant legal risks in our busine ss, and the
volume of claims and amount of damages, penalties and fines
claimed in litigation and other disputes, and regulatory and
government proceedin gs against us and other financial
institutions continue to be high. Greater than expected litigation
and investig ation costs,  substantial legal liability or significant
regulatory or government action against us could have adverse
effects on our business, financial condition, including liquidity ,
and results of operation s, and/or cause signific ant reputational
harm to us. We continu e to experience a significant volume of
litigation and other disputes, including claims for contractual
indemnification with counterparties regarding relative rights and
responsibilities. Consum ers, clients and other counterparties
continue to be litigious. Among other things, financial institutions,
including us, continue to be the subject of claims alleging anti-
competitive conduct with respect to various products and
markets, including U.S. antitrust class actions claiming joint and
several liability for treble damages. In addition, regulatory
authorities have had a supervisory focus on enforcement,
including in connection with alleged violations of law and
customer harm. For example, U.S. regulators and government
agencies have pursued claims against financial institutions under
the Financia l Institution s Reform, Recovery , and Enforcement
Act, False Claims Act, Equal Credit Opportunity Act, Fair
Housing Act and antitrust laws. Such claims may carry significant
and, in certain cases, treble damages. The global environment of
extensive regulation, regulatory compliance burdens, litigation
and regulatory and government enforcement,  combined with
uncertainty related to the continually evolving regulatory
environment, may affect operational and comp liance costs and
risks, which may limit or cease our ability to continue providing
certain products and services.
Additionally , misconduct  by employees, including  improper or
illegal conduct, or other unfair , deceptive, abusive or
discriminatory business practices, can cause significant
reputational harm as well as litigation and regulatory government
enforcement action.
For more information on litigation and regulatory matters, see
Note 13 – Commitments and Contingencies  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements .
U.S. federal banking agencies may require us to increase
our regulatory capital, TLAC, long-term debt or liquidity
requirements, which could result in the need to issue
additional qualifying securities or to take other actions,
such as to sell company assets.
We are subject to U.S. regulatory capital and liquidity rules.
These rules, among  other things, establish minimum
requirements to qualify as a well-capitalized institution. If any of
our subsidiary insured depository institutions fails to maintain its
status as well capitalized under the applicable regulatory capital
rules, the Federal Rese rve will require us to agree to bring the
insured depo sitory institution back to well-capitalized status. For
the duration  of such an agreement, the Feder al Reserve may
impose restrictions on our activities. If we were to fail to enter
into or comply with such an agreement, or fail to comply with the
terms of such agreement, the Federal Reserve may impose
more severe restrictions on our activities, including requiring us
to cease and desist activities permitted under the Bank Holding
Company Act of 1956.
Capital and liquidity requirements are frequently introduced
and amended. It is possible that regulators may increase
regulatory capital requirements including TLAC and long-term
debt requirements, change how regulatory capital is calculated
or
15     Bank of America
 
increase liquidity requirements. Our G-SIB surcharge may
increase from current estimates, and we are also subject to a
countercyclical capital buffer which, while currently set at zero,
may be increased by regulators. In 2018, the Federal Reserve
issued a proposal to implement a stress capit al buffer into its
capital requirements, which may increase our regulatory capital
requirements, if adopted. A significant compone nt of regulatory
capital ratios is calculating our risk-weighted assets and our
leverage exposure, which may increase. The Basel Committee
on Banking Supervision has also revise d several key
methodologies for measuring risk-weighted assets, including a
standardized approach for credit risk, standardiz ed approach for
operational risk and constraints on the use of internal models, as
well as a capital floor based on the revised standardized
approaches. U.S. banking regulators may update the U.S. Basel
3 rules to incorporate the Basel Committee revisions.
Additionally , Net Stable Funding Ratio requirements have
been propo sed, which would apply to us and our subsidiary
depository institutions, and target longer term liquidity risk. While
the impact of these proposals remains uncertain, they could
have a negative impact on our capital and liquidity positions. In
2019, U.S. banking regulators published a final rule outlining a
standardized approach  for counterparty credit risk, which
updates the calculation of the exposure amount for derivative
contracts under the regulatory capital rule. The final rule will be
effective on April 1, 2020, with a mandatory compliance date of
January 1, 2022. This rule could have a negative impact on our
capital position upon final implementation.
As part of its annual CCAR, the Federal Reserve conducts
stress testing on parts of our business using hypothetical
economic scenarios prepared by the Federal Reserve. Those
scenarios may affect our CCAR stress test results, which may
have an effect on our projected regulatory capital amounts in the
annual CCAR submission, including the CCAR capital plan
affecting our dividends and stock repurchases. Such ability to
return capital to our shareholders substantially depends on the
Federal Reserve's response to our annual CCAR submission. To
the extent that the Fede ral Reserve objects to our annual CCAR
submission or objects to the amount of dividends or stock
repurchases proposed, our shareholder returns could decrease.
Changes to and compliance with the regulatory capital and
liquidity requirements may impact our operations by requiring us
to liquidate assets, incre ase borrowings, issue additional equity
or other securities, cease or alter certain operations, sell
company assets or hold highly liquid assets, which may
adversely affect our results of operations. We may be prohibited
from taking capital actions such as paying or increasing
dividends, or repurchasing securities if the Federal Reserve
objects to our CCAR capital plan.
For more information, see Capital Management – Regulatory
Capital  in the MD&A on page 46 and Note 17 – Regulatory
Requirements and Restrictions  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Changes in accounting standards or assumptions in
applying accounting policies could adversely affect us.
Our accounting policies and methods are fundamental to how
we record and report our financial condition and results of
operations. Some of these policies require use of estimates and
assumptions that may affect the reported value of our assets or
liabilities and results of operations and are critical because they
require management to make difficult, subjective and complex
judgments about matters that are inherently uncertain. If those
assumptions, estimates or judgments were incorrectly made, we
could be required to correct and restate prior-period financial
statements. Accounting standard-setters and those who interpret
the accounting standards, the SEC, banking regulators and our independent registered public accounting firm may also amend
or even reverse their previous interpretations or positions on how
various standards should be applied. These changes may be
difficult to predict and could impact how we prepare and report
our financial statements. In some cases, we could be required to
apply a new or revised standard retrospectively , resulting in us
revising prior-period financial statements. For more information
on some of our critical accounting policies and recent accounting
changes, see Complex Accounting Estimates  in the MD&A  on
page 77 and Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
We may be adversely affected by changes in U.S. and
non-U.S. tax laws and regulations.
In Decembe r 2017, the President signed into law the Tax
Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Act) which made significant changes
to federal income tax law including, among other things, reducing
the statutory  corporate income tax rate to 21 percent from 35
percent and changing the taxation of our non-U.S. business
activities.
In addition, we have U.K. net deferred tax assets which
consist primarily of net operating losses that are expected to be
realized by certain subsidiaries over an extended number of
years. Adver se developments with respect to tax laws or to other
material factors, such as prolonged worsening of Europe’ s
capital markets or changes in the ability of our U.K. subsidiaries
to conduct business in the EU, could lead our management to
reassess and/or change its current conclusion that no valuation
allowance is necessary with respect to our U.K. net deferred tax
assets.
It is possible  that governmental authorities in the U.S. and/or
other countr ies could further amend tax laws in a way that would
adversely affect us, including the possibility that aspects of the
Tax Act could be amended in the future.
Reputation
Damage to our repu tation could harm our businesses,
including our competitive position and business prospects.
Our ability to attract and retain customers, clients, investors
and employ ees is impacted by our reputation. Harm to our
reputation can arise from various sources, including officer,
director or employee misconduct, unethical behavior , security
breaches, litigation or regulatory outcomes, compensation
practices, the suitability or reasonableness of recommending
particular trading or investment strategies, includ ing the reliability
of our research and models, and prohibiting clients from
engaging in certain trans actions and sales practi ces. Additionally ,
our reputati on may be harmed by failing to deliver products,
subpar standards of service and quality expected by our
customers, clients and the community , compliance failures, the
inability to manage technology change or maintain effective data
management, cyber incidents, inadequacy of responsiveness to
internal controls, uninten ded disclosure of personal, proprietary
or confidential information, perception of our environmental,
social and governance practices and disclosures, conflicts of
interest and breach of fiduciary obligations, and the activities of
our clients, customers, counterparties and third parties, including
vendors. Actions by the financial services industry generally or
by certain members or individuals in the industry also can
adversely affect our reputation. In addition, adverse publicity or
negative information posted on social media by employees, the
media or otherwise, whether or not factually correct, may
adversely impact our business prospects or financial results.
We are subject to complex and evolving laws and regulations
regarding privacy , know-your-customer requirements, data
protection, including the GDPR and CCPA, cross-border data
movement and other matters. Principles concerning the
appropriate scope of consumer and commercial privacy vary
  Bank of America    16
considerably in different jurisdictions, and regulatory and public
expectations regarding the definition and scope of consumer and
commercial privacy may remain fluid. It is possible that these
laws may be interpreted  and applied by various jurisdictions in a
manner inconsistent with our current or future practices, or that is
inconsistent with one another . If personal, confidential or
proprietary information of customers or clients in our possession,
or in the possession of third parties, including their downstream
service providers or financial data aggregators , is mishandled,
misused or mismanaged, or if we do not timely or adequately
address such information, we may face regulat ory, reputational
and operational risks which could have an adverse effect on our
financial condition and results of operations.
We could suffer reputatio nal harm if we fail to properly identify
and manag e potential conflicts of interest. Management of
potential conflicts of interests has become incre asingly complex
as we expand our business activities through more numerous
transactions, obligations and interests with and among our
clients.
The failure to adequately address, or the perceived failure to
adequately address, conflicts of interest could affect the
willingness of clients to use our products and services, or give
rise to litigation or enforcement actions, which could adversely
affect our business.
Our actual or perceived failure to address these and other
issues, such as operatio nal risks, gives rise to reputational risk
that could harm us and our business prosp ects. Failure to
appropriately address any of these issues could also give rise to
additional regulatory restrictions, legal risks and reputational
harm, which  could, among other consequence s, increase the
size and number of litigation claims and dama ges asserted or
subject us to enforcement actions, fines and penalties, and
cause us to incur related costs and expenses. For more
information on reputational risk, see Reputational Risk
Management  in the MD&A  on page 77.
Other
We face significant and increasing competition in the
financial services industry .
We operate in a highly competitive environment and
experience intense competition from local and global financial
institutions as well as new entrants, in both domestic and foreign
markets, in which we compete on the basis of a number of
factors, including customer service, quality and range of products
and services offered, technology , price, reputatio n, interest rates
on loans and deposits, lending limits and customer convenience.
Additionally , the changing regulatory environm ent may create
competitive disadvantages for us given geography-driven capital
and liquidity requirements. For example, U.S. regulators have in
certain instances adopted stricter capital and liquidity
requirements than those applicable to non-U.S . institutions. To
the extent we expand into new business areas and new
geographic regions, we may face competitors with more
experience and more established relationships with clients,
regulators and industry participants in the relevant market, which
could adversely af fect our ability to compete.
In addition, emerging technologies and advan ces and the
growth of e-commerce have lowered geograph ic and monetary
barriers of other financ ial institutions, made it easier for non-
depository institutions to offer products and services that
traditionally were banking products and allowed non-traditional
financial service providers and technology companies to
compete with traditional financial service compa nies in providing
electronic and internet-based financial solutions and services,
including electronic securities trading, marketplace lending,
financial data aggregat ion and payment proce ssing, including
real-time payment platforms. Further , clients may choose to conduct business with
other market participants who engage in business or offer
products in areas we deem speculative or risky, such as
cryptocurrencies. Increa sed competition may negatively affect
our earnings by creating pressure to lower prices or credit
standards on our products and services requiring additional
investment to improve the quality and delivery of our technology
and/or reduc ing our market share, or affecting the willingness of
our clients to do business with us.
Our inability to adapt our products and services to
evolving industry standards and consum er preferences
could harm our business.
Our business model is based on a divers ified mix of
businesses that provide a broad range of financ ial products and
services, delivered through multiple distribution channels. Our
success depends on our, and our third-party vendors', ability to
adapt and develop products, services and technology to rapidly
evolving industry standards and consumer prefe rences. There is
increasing pressure by competitors to provide products and
services on more attractive terms, including higher interest rates
on deposits, and offer lower cost investment strategies, which
may impact our ability to grow revenue and/or effectively
compete. Additionally , legislative and regulatory developments
may affect the competit ive landscape. Further , the competitive
landscape may be impacted by the growth of non-depository
institutions that offer traditional banking products at higher rates
or with no fees, or otherwise offer alternative products. This can
reduce our net interest margin and revenues from our fee-based
products and services, either from a decrease in the volume of
transactions or through a compression of spreads.
In addition, the widespread adoption and rapid evolution of
new techno logies, including analytic capabilities, self-service
digital trading platforms, internet services, distributed ledgers,
such as the blockchain system, cryptocurrenci es and payment
systems, could require substantial expenditure s to modify or
adapt our existing products and services as we grow and
develop our online and mobile banking channel strategies in
addition to remote connectivity solutions. We may not be as
timely or successful in developing or introducing new products
and services, integrating new products or services into our
existing offerings, responding or adapting to changes in
consumer behavior , preferences, spending, investing and/or
saving habits, achieving market acceptance of our products and
services, reducing costs in response to pressures to deliver
products and services at lower prices or sufficiently developing
and maintaining loyal customers. Our or our third-party vendors'
inability to adapt products and services to evolving industry
standards and consumer preferences could harm our business
and adversely af fect our results of operations and reputation.
Our ability to attract and retain qualified employees is
critical to the success  of our business and failure to do so
could hurt our business prospects and competitive position.
Our performance is heavily dependent on the talents and
efforts of highly skilled  individuals. Competition for qualified
personnel within the financial services industry and from
businesses outside the financial services industry is intense. Our
competitors include non-U.S. based institutions and institutions
subject to different compensation and hiring regulations than
those imposed on U.S. institutions and financial institutions.
In order to attract and retain qualified personn el, we must
provide market-level compensation. As a large financial and
banking institution, we may be subject to limitations on
compensation practices (which may or may not affect our
competitors) by the Federal Reserve, the OCC, the FDIC and
other regulators around the world. EU and U.K. rules limit and
subject
17     Bank of America
 
to clawback certain forms of variable compensation for senior
employees. Current and potential future limitatio ns on executive
compensation imposed  by legislation or regulation could
adversely affect our ability to attract and maintain qualified
employees. Furthermor e, a substantial portion  of our annual
incentive compensation paid to our senior employees has in
recent years taken the form of long-term equity-based awards.
Therefore, the ultimate value of this compensation depends on
the price of our common  stock when the awards vest. If we are
unable to continue to attract and retain qualified individuals, our
business prospects and competitive position could be adversely
affected.
We could suffer operational, reputational and financial harm if
our models and strategie s fail to properly anticipate and manage
risk.
We use proprietary models and strategies extensively to
forecast losses, project revenue, measure and assess capital
requirements for credit, country , market, operational and
strategic risks and assess and control our operations and
financial condition. These models require oversight, including
independent validation before initial use, ongoing monitoring
through outcomes analysis and benchmarking, and periodic
revalidation.  Models are subject to inherent limitations due to
the use of historical trends and simplifying assumptions,
uncertainty regarding economic and financial outcomes, and
emerging risks from the use of applications that rely on artificial
intelligence. 
Our models and strategies may not be sufficiently predictive
of future results due to limited historical patterns, extreme or
unanticipated market movem ents or customer beha vior and
illiquidity , especially during severe market downturns or stress
events, which could limit their effectiveness. The models that we
use to assess and control our market risk exposures also reflect
assumptions about the degree of correlation among prices of
various asset classes or other market indicators, which may not
be represen tative of the next downturn and would magnify the
limitations inherent in using historical data to manage risk. Our
models may not be effective if we fail to proper ly oversee them
and detect their flaws during our review and monitoring
processes, they contain erroneous data, assumptions,
valuations, formulas or algorithms or our applications running the
models do not perform as expected. Regardless of the steps we
take to ensure effective controls, governance,  monitoring and
testing, and impleme nt new technology and automated
processes, we could suffer operational, reputatio nal and financial
harm if models and strategies fail to properly anticipate and
manage current and evolving risks.
Failure to properly manage and aggregat e data may
result in our inability to manage risk and business needs,
errors in our day-to-d ay operations, critical reporting and
strategic decision-making and inaccurate financial,
regulatory and operational reporting.
We rely on our ability to manage, aggregate, interpret and
use data in an accurate, timely and complete manner for
effective risk reporting and management. Our policies, programs,
processes and practices govern how data is managed,
aggregated, interpreted and used. While we continuously update
our policies, programs, processes and practices and implement
emerging technologies, such as automation, artificial intelligence
and robotics, our data management and aggregation processes
are subject to failure, including human error, system failure or
failed controls. Failure to maintain and manage data and
information effectively and to aggregate data and information in
an accurate, timely and complete manner may impact its quality
and reliability and limit our ability to manage current and
emerging risk, to produce accurate financial,  regulatory and
operational reporting, as well as to manage changing business
needs, strate gic decision -making and day-to-day operations. The
failure to establish and maintain effective, efficient and controlled data management could have
an adverse impact on our ability to develop our products and
relationships with our customers and damage our reputation.
Reforms to and uncertainty regarding IBORs, including
the London  Interbank  Offered Rate (LIBOR), and certain
other rates or indices may adversely affect our business,
financial condition and results of operations and could
result in reputational harm to the Corporation.
In 2017, the U.K. FCA announced that it will no longer
persuade or require participating banks to submit rates for
LIBOR after 2021. The continuation of LIBOR on the current
basis cannot be guaranteed after 2021, and there is substantial
risk that LIBOR will be modified by 2021 or discontinued
thereafter . This announcement, in conjunctio n with financial
benchmark reforms and changes in short-term interbank lending
markets more generally , have resulted in significant uncertainty
about the potential or actual discontinuation of IBORs, including
LIBOR, and certain other rates or indices that serve as
“benchmarks.” Such benchmarks are used extensively in the
global financ ial markets and in our business. In particular , LIBOR
is used in many of our products and contracts, including
mortgages, consumer , commercial and corporate loans,
derivatives, floating-rat e notes and other adjustable-rate
products and financial instruments. The aggregate notional
amount of these products and contracts is material to our
business. These reforms and actions may result in significant
uncertainty as to future rules or methodologies used to calculate
benchmarks, cause new or reformed benchm arks to perform
differently from the disco ntinued benchmarks they are replacing,
cause existin g benchmarks to disappear or become unavailable
or unrepresentative, or have other consequences that cannot be
fully anticipated, which expose us to various financial,
operational and legal risks.
Certain ARRs have been proposed to replace LIBOR and
other IBORs. For exam ple, the Alternative Reference Rates
Committee, a group of private-market participa nts and official-
sector entitie s convened by the Federal Reserve Board and the
Federal Reserve Bank of New York, has recommended that the
Secured Overnight Financing Rate (SOFR) replace U.S. dollar
LIBOR. However , the market transition from IBORs to ARRs is
complex and pervasive throughout a number of different types of
products and global financial markets. There can be no
assurance that ARRs will be adequate alternatives to IBORs,
that existing assets and liabilities based on or linked to IBORs
will transition  successfully to ARRs, of the timing  of adoption and
degree of integration and acceptance of such ARRs in the global
financial markets, or of the future availability or
representativeness of such ARRs. Our products and contracts
that reference IBORs, in particular LIBOR, may contain language
that determines when a successor rate including the ARR and/or
the applicable spread adjustment to the designated rate
(including IBORs) would be selected or determined. If a trigger is
satisfied, our products and contracts may give the calculation
agent (which  may be us) discretion over the successor rate to be
selected. The considerable uncertainty as to how the financial
services industry will address the discontinuation of IBORs
and/or such IBORs ceasing to be acceptable reference rates in
financial instruments could ultimately result in client disputes and
litigation surrounding the proper interpretation of our IBOR-
based produ cts and contracts. Accordingly , uncertainty regarding
ARRs may continue to impact our business, operations and
financial condition repeatedly and indefinitely .
The discontinuation of IBORs, including LIBOR, will require
us to remediate IBOR-based products and contracts, including
related hedging arrangements, that mature after the
discontinuation date of the IBOR. These changes may adversely
affect the yield on loans  or securities held by us, amounts paid
on securities we have
  Bank of America    18
issued, amounts received and paid on derivatives we have
entered into, the value of such loans, securiti es or derivative
instruments, the trading market for such products and contracts,
and our ability to effectively use hedging instrum ents to manage
risk. While some of these outstanding IBOR-based products and
contracts include fallback provisions to ARRs, some of our
outstanding IBOR-based products and contracts do not include
fallback provisions or adequate fallback mechanisms requiring
remediation to modify their terms. Additionally , some outstanding
IBOR-based products and contracts are particularly challenging
to modify due to the requirement that all impacted parties
consent to such modification.
In light of the extensive use of IBOR-based products and
contracts by us and other market participants, there can be no
assurance that we and other market participants will be able to
successfully modify all outstanding IBOR-base d products and
contracts or be adequat ely prepared for a discontinuation of an
IBOR at the time such IBOR may cease to be published or
otherwise discontinued. Also, there can be no assurance that
existing or new provision s for successor rates in our IBOR-based
products and contracts will include adequate methodologies for
adjustments between the applicable IBOR and the
corresponding successor rate or that the characteristics of the
successor rates will be similar to or produce  the economic
equivalent of the benchmarks they seek to replace. For example,
SOFR and other ARRs have compositions and characteristics
that differ significantly from the benchmarks they may replace,
have limited  history , and may demonstrate less predictable
performance over time than the benchmarks they replace.
Changes or uncertainty  resulting from the market transition
from IBORs to ARRs could adversely affect the return on and
pricing, liquidity and value of outstanding IBOR-based products
and contracts, cause significant market dislocations and disruptions that are relevant to our business segments,
particularly Global Banking  and Global Markets , potentially
increase the cost of and access to capital, increase the risk of
litigation or other disputes, including in connection with the
interpretation and enforceability of, or our historical marketing
practices or disclosures with respect to, outstanding IBOR-based
products and contracts with counterparties, and/or increase
expenses related to the transition to ARRs, among other adverse
consequences. Additiona lly, the process of transitioning to ARRs
may result in increased costs and may also divert management
time and attention from other areas of our business.
The market transition from IBORs to ARRs may also alter our
risk profile and risk mana gement strategies, including derivatives
and hedging strategies, modeling and analytics,  valuation tools,
product design and systems, controls, procedures and
operational infrastructure . This may prove challenging given the
limited histo ry of many of the proposed ARRs and may increase
the costs and risks related to potential regulatory compliance,
requirements or inquiries. Among other risks, various products
and contrac ts may transition to ARRs at different times or in
different manners, with the result that we may face significant
unexpected interest rate, pricing or other exposures across
business or product lines. Reforms to and uncertainty regarding
market trans ition from current IBORs to ARRs and other factors,
including the pace of the transition to ARRs, the specific terms
and parameters for market acceptance of any ARRs, prices of
and liquidity of trading markets for products base d on ARRs, and
our ability to transition and develop appropriate systems and
analytics for one or more ARRs, may adve rsely affect our
business, including the ability to serve customers and maintain
market share, financial condition or results of operations and
could result in reputational harm to the Corporation.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None  
Item 2. Properties
As of December 31, 2019 , certain principal of fices and other materially important properties consisted of the following:
Facility Name LocationGeneral Character of the Physical
Property Primary Business Segment  Property
Status Property
Square Feet (1)
Bank of America
Corporate CenterCharlotte, NC 60 Story Building Principal Executive Offices  Owned 1,212,177
Bank of America Tower
at One Bryant ParkNew York, NY 55 Story BuildingGWIM, Global Banking and
 Global Markets  Leased (2) 1,836,575
 Bank of America
Financial CentreLondon, UK 4 Building Campus Global Banking and Global Markets Leased 562,595
Cheung Kong Center Hong Kong 62 Story Building Global Banking and Global Markets Leased 149,790
(1) For leased properties, property square feet represents the square footage occupied by the Corporation.
(2) The Corporation has a 49.9 percent joint venture interest in this property .
We own or lease appro ximately 76.3 million square feet in
over 20,000 facility and ATM locations globally, including
approximately 70.7 million square feet in the U.S. (all 50 states
and the District of Columbia, the U.S. Virgin Islands, Puerto Rico
and Guam) and approximately 5.6 million squa re feet in more
than 35 countries.
We believe our owned and leased properties are adequate
for our business needs and are well maintained. We continue to
evaluate our owned and leased real estate and may determine
from time to time that certain of our premises and facilities, or
ownership structures, are no longer necessary for our
operations. In connection therewith, we are evaluating the sale
or sale/lease back of certain properties and we may incur costs in
connection with any such transactions. Item 3. Legal Proceedings
See Litigation and Regulatory Matters in Note 13 –
Commitments and Contingencies  to the Cons olidated Financial
Statements , which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
None
19     Bank of America
 
Part II
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities
The principal market on which our common stock is traded is the
New York Stock Excha nge under the symbo l “BAC.” As of
February 18, 2020 , there  were 161,882  regist ered shareholders
of common stock.
The table below presents share repurchase activity for the
three months ended December 31, 2019 . The primary source of
funds for cash distributions by the Corporation to its
shareholders is dividends received from its bank subsidiaries. Each of the bank
subsidiaries is subject to various regulatory policies and
requirements relating to the payment of dividends, including
requirements to maintain capital above regulato ry minimums. All
of the Corporation’ s preferred stock outstanding  has preference
over the Corporation’ s common stock with respect to payment of
dividends.
(Dollars in millions, except per share information; shares in thousands)Total Common
Shares
Purchased (1) Weighted-
Average Per
Share Price Total Shares
Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced
ProgramsRemaining
Buyback
Authority
Amounts (2)
October 1 - 31, 2019 97,540 $ 29.50 97,538 $ 20,442
November 1 - 30, 2019 74,649 32.75 74,649 17,997
December 1 - 31, 2019 70,943 34.19 70,940 15,571
Three months ended December 31, 2019 243,132 31.87 243,127  
(1) Includes shares of the Corporation’ s common stock acquired by the Corporation in connection with satisfaction of tax withholding obligations on vested restricted stock or restricted stock units and
certain forfeitures and terminations of employment-related awards and for potential re-issuance to certain employees under equity incentive plans.
(2) On June 27, 2019, following the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System's non-objection to the Corporation's 2019 Comprehens ive Capital Analysis and Review capital plan, the
Corporation's Board of Directors (Board) authorized the repurchase of approximately $30.9 billion in common stock from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, which includes approximately $900
million to offset shares awarded under equity-based compensation plans during the same period. During the three months ended December 31, 2019, pursuant to the Board’ s authoriza tion, the
Corporation repurc hased $7.7 billion of common stock, which included common stock to offset equity-based compensation awards. For more information, see Capital Management - CCAR and
Capital Planning  in the MD&A  on page 45 and Note 14 – Shareholders’  Equity  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
The Corporation did not have any unregistered sales of equity securities during the three months ended December 31, 2019 .
Item 6. Selected Financial Data
See Tables 6 and 7 in the MD&A  beginning on page 28, which are incorporated herein by reference.
  Bank of America    20
Item 7. Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Table of Contents  
  Page
Executive Summary  22
Recent Developments  23
Financial Highlights  23
Balance Sheet Overview  25
Supplemental Financial Data  26
Business Segment Operations  32
Consumer Banking  33
Global W ealth & Investment Management  34
Global Banking  36
Global Markets  39
All Other  40
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements and Contractual Obligations  41
Managing Risk  42
Strategic Risk Management  45
Capital Management  45
Liquidity Risk  50
Credit Risk Management  53
Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Management  54
Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management  60
Non-U.S. Portfolio  66
Provision for Credit Losses  68
Allowance for Credit Losses  68
Market Risk Management  70
Trading Risk Management  72
Interest Rate Risk Management for the Banking Book  74
Mortgage Banking Risk Management  76
Compliance and Operational Risk Management  76
Reputational Risk Management  77
Complex Accounting Estimates  77
Non-GAAP  Reconciliations  79
Statistical Tables  81
21     Bank of America
 
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations
Bank of America Corporation (the “Corpor ation”) and its
management may make certain statements that constitute
“forward-looking stateme nts” within the meanin g of the Private
Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements can
be identified by the fact that they do not relate strictly to historical
or current facts. Forward-looking statements often use words
such as “anticipates,” “targets,” “expects,” “hopes,” “estimates,”
“intends,” “plans,” “goals,” “believes,” “continue” and other similar
expressions or future or conditional verbs such as “will,” “may ,”
“might,” “should,” “would” and “could.” Forward-looking
statements represent the Corporation’ s current expectations,
plans or forecasts of its future results, revenues, expenses,
efficiency ratio, capital measures, strategy and future business
and economic conditions more generally , and other future
matters. These statements are not guarantees of future results
or performance and involve certain known and unknown risks,
uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict and are
often beyond the Corporation’ s control. Actual outcomes and
results may differ mater ially from those expressed in, or implied
by, any of these forward-looking statements.
You should not place undue reliance on any forward-looking
statement and should consider the following uncertainties and
risks, as well as the risks and uncertainties more fully discussed
under Item 1A. Risk Factors of this Annual Report on Form 10-K:
the Corporation’ s potential claims, damages, penalties, fines and
reputational damage resulting from pending or future litigation,
regulatory proceedings and enforcement actions; the possibility
that the Corporation's future liabilities may be in excess of its
recorded liability and estimated range of possible loss for
litigation, regulatory and representations and warranties
exposures; the possibility that the Corporation could face
increased servicing, fraud, indemnity , contribution or other claims
from one or more count erparties, including trustees, purchasers
of loans, underwriters, issuers, monolines, private-label and
other investors, or other parties involved in securitizations; the
Corporation’ s ability to resolve representations  and warranties
repurchase and related claims, including claims brought by
investors or trustees seeking to avoid the statute of limitations for
repurchase claims; the risks related to the discontinuation of the
London Interbank Offered Rate and other reference rates,
including increased expenses and litigation and the effectiveness
of hedging strategies; uncertainties about the financial stability
and growth rates of non-U.S. jurisdictions, the risk that those
jurisdictions may face difficulties servicing their sovereign debt,
and related stresses on financial markets, currencies and trade,
and the Corporation’ s exposures to such risks, including direct,
indirect and operational; the impact of U.S. and global interest
rates, inflatio n, currency  exchange rates, econ omic conditions,
trade policies and tensions, including tariffs , and potential
geopolitical instability; the impact of the interest rate environment
on the Corporation’ s business, financial condition and results of
operations; the possibility that future credit losses may be higher
than currently expected due to changes  in economic
assumptions, customer behavior , adverse developments with
respect to U.S. or global economic conditions and other
uncertainties; the Corporation’ s ability to achie ve its expense
targets and expectations  regarding net interest income, provision
for credit losses, net charge-offs, effective tax rate, loan growth
or other projections; adverse changes to the Corporation’ s credit
ratings from the major credit rating agencies ; an inability to
access capital markets or maintain deposits or borrowing costs;
estimates of the fair value and other accounting  values, subject
to impairment assessments, of certain of the Corporation’ s
assets and liabilities; the estimated or actual impact of changes
in accounting standards or assumptions in applying those
standards; uncertainty regarding the content, timing and impact of regulatory capital and liquidity requirements; the impact
of adverse  changes  to total loss-abso rbing capacity
requirements and/or global systemically important bank
surcharges; the potential impact of actions of the Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System on the Corporation’ s
capital plans; the effect of regulations, other guidance or
additional information on the impact from the Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act; the impact of implementation and compliance with U.S. and
international laws, regulations and regulatory interpretations,
including, but not limited to, recovery and resolution planning
requirements, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
assessments, the Volcker Rule, fiduciary standards and
derivatives regulations; a failure or disruption in or breach of the
Corporation’ s operationa l or security systems or infrastructure, or
those of third parties, including as a result of cyber attacks or
campaigns; the impact on the Corporation’ s business, financial
condition and results of operations from the United Kingdom's
exit from the European Union; the impact of any future federal
government shutdown and uncertainty regard ing the federal
government’ s debt limit; the impact of natural disasters, the
emergence of widespread health emergencies  or pandemics,
military conflict, terrorism or other geopolitical events; and other
matters.
Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they
are made, and the Corporation undertakes no obligation to
update any forward-looking statement to reflect the impact of
circumstances or events that arise after the date the forward-
looking statement was made.
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements referred to in
the Manag ement’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations (MD&A) are incorporated by
reference into the MD&A. Certain prior-year amounts have been
reclassified to conform to current-year presentation. Throughout
the MD&A, the Corporation uses certain acronyms and
abbreviations which are defined in the Glossary .
Executive Summary
Business Overview
The Corporation is a Delaware corporation, a bank holding
company (BHC) and a financial holding company . When used in
this report, “the Corpora tion,” “we,” “us” and “our” may refer to
Bank of America Corp oration individually , Bank of America
Corporation and its subsidiaries, or certain of Bank of America
Corporation’ s subsidiari es or affiliates. Our principal executive
offices are located in Charlotte, North Carolina. Through our
banking and various nonbank subsidiaries throughout the U.S.
and in international markets, we provide a diversified range of
banking and nonbank financial services and products through
four busines s segments : Consumer Banking , Global Wealth &
Investment Managemen t (GWIM) , Global Bank ing and Global
Markets , with the remaining operations recorded in All Other . We
operate our banking activities primarily under the Bank of
America, National Association (Bank of America, N.A. or BANA)
charter . At December 31, 2019 , the Corpor ation had $2.4 trillion
in assets and a headcount of approximately 208,000  employees.
As of December 31, 2019 , we served clients through
operations across the U.S., its territories and approximately 35
countries. Our retail banking footprint covers approximately 90
percent  of the U.S. population,  and we serve approximately 66
million  consumer and small business clients with approximately
4,300  retail financial centers, approximately 16,800  ATMs, and
leading digital banking platforms (www .bankofamerica.com) with
more than 38 million  active users, including over 29 million  active
mobile users. W e offer industry-leading support to approximately
  Bank of America    22
three million  small business owners . Our wealth managem ent
businesses, with client balances of $3.0 trillion , provide tailored
solutions to meet client  needs through a full set of investment
management, brokerage , banking, trust and retirement products.
We are a global leader in corporate and investm ent banking and
trading across a broad range of asset classes serving
corporations, governme nts, institutions and individuals around
the world.
Recent Developments
Capital Management
During 2019, we repurchased $28.1 billion  of common stock
pursuant to the Corporation's Board of Directors’  (the Board)
repurchase authorizations. For more information, see Capital
Management on page 45.
Merchant Services Joint Venture
A significant portion of our merchant processing activity is
performed by a joint venture, formed in 2009, in which we own a
49 percent ownership interest. The joint venture is accounted for
as an equity method investment. As previously disclosed in the
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June  30, 2019, we gave notice on July 29, 2019 to the
joint venture  partner of the termination of the joint venture upon
the conclusion of its current term, after which we expect to
pursue our own merchant services strategy . In addition, the
Corporation and the joint venture partner have an agreement to
provide uninterrupted delivery of products and services to the
joint venture merchants through at least June 2023. As a result
of the above  actions, we incurred a non-cash, pretax impairment
charge of $2.1 billion  included in other general operating
expense in the three months ended September 30, 2019. As
stated above, the Corporation expects to pursue its own
merchant services strategy , which is expected to begin in the
third quarter  of 2020. Under this strategy , we will begin to record
the revenues and expenses from those operations in the
Consolidated Statement of Income instead of recognizing our
proportionate share of the joint venture's income  under the equity
method. For more information, see Note 13 – Commitments and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
U.K. Exit from the EU
On January  31, 2020, the U.K. formally exited the European
Union (EU). Upon exit, a transition period began during which
time the U.K. and the EU expect to negotiate a trade agreement
and other terms associated with their future relationship. The
transition period is scheduled to end on December 31, 2020.
We conduct business in Europe, the Middle East and Africa
primarily through our subsidiaries in the U.K., Ireland and
France. For information on the changes we have  implemented to
enable us to continue to operate in the region, including
establishing a bank and broker-dealer in the EU, see the
Corporation’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2019. While we have taken measures to
minimize operational disruption and prepare for various potential
outcomes of the U.K.’ s withdrawal from the EU, the
preparedness of our counterparties and the relevant financial
markets infrastructure remain outside our control. The global
economic impact of the U.K.’ s withdrawal from
the EU remains uncertain and could result in regional and global financial market disruptions. We continue to assess potential
risks, including operational, regulatory and legal risks.
LIBOR and Other Benchmark Rates
Following the 2017 announcement by the U.K.’ s Financial
Conduct Authority (FCA) that it will no longer persuade or require
participating banks to submit rates for the London Interbank
Offered Rate (LIBOR) after 2021, central banks and regulators
around the world have commissioned working groups to find
suitable replacements for Interbank Offered Rates (IBOR),
including LIBOR, and other benchmark rates and to implement
financial benchmark reforms more generally . The future
discontinuance of IBORs is a complex process that has resulted
in significant uncertainty regarding the trans ition to suitable
alternative reference rates (ARRs) and could cause disruptions
in a variety  of global financial markets, as well as adversely
impact our business, operations and financial results.
IBORs, including LIBOR, are used in many of the
Corporation’ s products and contracts, including mortgages,
consumer , commercial and corporate loans, derivatives, floating-
rate notes and other adjustable-rate product s and financial
instruments. The aggregate notional amount of these products
and contracts is material to our business. As previously
disclosed, to facilitate an orderly transition from IBORs and other
benchmark rates to ARRs, the Corporation has established an
enterprise-wide initiative led by senior management. As part of
this initiative, the Corporation continues to identify , assess and
monitor risks associate d with the expected discontinuation or
unavailability of LIBOR and other benchmarks and evaluate and
address documentatio n and contractual mechanics of
outstanding IBOR-base d products and contra cts that mature
after 2021 and new and potential future ARR-based products
and contracts to achieve operational readiness.  Additionally , the
Corporation is continuing to evaluate potential regulatory , tax and
accounting impacts of the transition, including guidance
published and/or proposed by the Internal Revenue Service and
Financial Accounting Standards Board, engage impacted clients
in connection with the transition to ARRs and work actively with
global regulators, industry working groups and trade associations
to develop strategies for an ef fective transition to ARRs.
The Corporation is also modifying its operati onal models,
systems, procedures and internal infrastructure to transition to
ARRs. In 2019, the Corporation launched capabilities to support
issuance and trading in products indexed to the new Secured
Overnight Financing Rate (SOFR), which is the alternative
benchmark rate to U.S. dollar LIBOR recommended by the
Alternative Reference Rates Committee, a group of private-
market participants and official-sector entities convened by the
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (Federal
Reserve) and the Fede ral Reserve Bank of New York, and a
broad measure of the cost of borrowing cash overnight
collateralized by U.S. Treasury securities. Also, in 2019, the
Corporation issued debt linked to SOFR, and the Corporation co-
arranged one of the first credit facilities linked to SOFR and has
implemented fallback provisions into certain new IBOR-based
products and contracts. The Corporation conti nues to monitor
the development and usage of ARRs, including SOFR. For more
information on the expected replacement of LIBOR and other
benchmark rates, see Item 1A. Risk Factors - Other on page 17.
23     Bank of America
 
Financial Highlights
In the Consolidated Statement of Income, amounts related to
certain asse t and liability management (ALM)  activities have
been reclassified from other income to market making and
similar activities, which was previously referred to as trading
account income. All prior periods presented reflect this change,
which has no impact on the Corporation's total noninterest
income or net income, and has no impact on business segment
results. For more information, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Table 1Summary Income Statement and Selected
Financial Data
(Dollars in millions, except per share information) 2019  2018
Income statement  
Net interest income $ 48,891 $ 48,162
Noninterest income 42,353 42,858
Total revenue, net of interest
expense 91,244 91,020
Provision for credit losses 3,590 3,282
Noninterest expense 54,900 53,154
Income before income taxes 32,754 34,584
Income tax expense 5,324 6,437
Net income 27,430 28,147
Preferred stock dividends 1,432 1,451
Net income applicable to common
shareholders $ 25,998 $ 26,696
Per common share information    
Earnings $ 2.77 $ 2.64
Diluted earnings2.75 2.61
Dividends paid0.66 0.54
Performance ratios  
Return on average assets1.14% 1.21%
Return on average common
shareholders’ equity 10.62 11.04
Return on average tangible common
shareholders’ equity (1) 14.86 15.55
Efficiency ratio60.17 58.40
Balance sheet at year end   
Total loans and leases$ 983,426 $ 946,895
Total assets2,434,079 2,354,507
Total deposits1,434,803 1,381,476
Total liabilities2,169,269 2,089,182
Total common shareholders’ equity241,409 242,999
Total shareholders’ equity264,810 265,325
(1)Return on average tangible common shareholders’  equity is a non-GAA P financial measure.
For more information and a corresponding reconciliation to the most closely related financial
measures defined by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America, see Non-GAAP  Reconciliations  on page 80.
Net income was $27.4 billion  or $2.75  per diluted share in
2019 compared to $28.1 billion , or $2.61  per diluted  share in
2018. The decrease in net income was primarily driven by an
increase in noninterest expense as a result of the $2.1 billion
pretax impairment charge related to the notice of termination of
the merchant services joint venture at the conclusion of its
current term. Also contributing to the decrease in net income
were higher provision for credit losses and lower noninterest
income, partially of fset by an increase in net interest income.
For discussion and analysis of our consolidated and business
segment results of operations for 2018 compared to 2017, see the Financial Highlights and Business Segment Operations
sections in the MD&A  of the Corporation's 2018 Annual Report
on Form 10-K.
Net Interest Income
Net interest income increased  $729 million  to $48.9 billion  in
2019 compa red 2018. Net interest yield on a fully taxable-
equivalent (FTE) basis decreased  two basis points (bps) to 2.43
percent  for 2019. The increase in net interest income was
primarily driven by loan and deposit growth, partially offset by
lower long-end rates. Assuming a stable economic and interest
rate environment compared to December 31, 2019, we expect
quarterly net interest income for the first two quarters of 2020 to
be lower compared to the fourth quarter of 2019 driven by the
impact of rates and one fewer day of interest accruals. Quarterly
net interest income is expected to rise modestly in the second
half of 2020 due to one additional day of intere st accruals and
expected loan and deposit growth. For more information on net
interest yield and the FTE basis, see Supplemental Financial
Data  on page 27, and for more informati on on interest rate risk
management, see Interest Rate Risk Management for the
Banking Book  on page 74.
Noninterest Income
Table 2Noninterest Income  
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Fees and commissions:  
Card income $ 5,797$ 5,824
Service charges 7,674 7,767
Investment and brokerage services 13,902 14,160
Investment banking fees 5,642 5,327
Total fees and commissions 33,015 33,078
Market making and similar activities 9,034 9,008
Other income 304 772
Total noninterest income $ 42,353$ 42,858
Noninterest income decreased  $505 million  to $42.4 billion  in
2019 compared to 2018. The following highlights the significant
changes.
●Service charges decreased  $93 million  primarily driven by
lower fees due to policy changes in 2018 and lower ATM
volume in Consumer Banking.
●Investment and brokera ge services income decreased  $258
million  primarily due to lower transactional revenue and a
decrease in assets under management (AUM) pricing,
partially offset by the positive impact of AUM flows and higher
market valuations.
●Investment banking fees increased  $315 million  due to
increases in advisory fees and equity and debt underwriting
fees.
●Other income decreased  $468 million  primarily due to lower
gains on sales of non-core consumer loans and higher
partnership losses associated with an increase in tax-
advantaged investments , partially offset by higher gains on
sales of debt securities.
  Bank of America    24
Provision for Credit Losses
The provision for credit  losses increased  $308 million  to $3.6
billion  in 2019 compared to 2018. The increase was primarily
due to the energy reserve releases in the comm ercial portfolio in
2018, partially offset by the impact of recoveries recorded in
connection with sales of previously charged-of f non-core
consumer real estate loans. For more information on the
provision for credit losses, see Provision for Credit Losses  on
page 68.
Noninterest Expense
Table 3Noninterest Expense  
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Compensation and benefits $ 31,977 $ 31,880
Occupancy and equipment 6,588 6,380
Information processing and communications 4,646 4,555
Product delivery and transaction related 2,762 2,857
Marketing 1,934 1,674
Professional fees 1,597 1,699
Other general operating 5,396 4,109
Total noninterest expense $ 54,900$ 53,154
Noninterest expense increased  $1.7 billion  to $54.9 billion  in
2019 compared to 2018. The increase was primarily due to the aforementioned impairment charge related to our merchant
services joint venture of $2.1 billion as well as increased costs
associated with investment in the businesses, including brand-
related mark eting costs , and higher litigation expense. These
were partially offset by efficiency savings, lower Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation (FDIC) expense and lower amortization of
intangibles expense.
Income Tax Expense
Table 4Income Tax Expense   
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Income before income taxes $ 32,754 $ 34,584
Income tax expense 5,324 6,437
Effective tax rate 16.3% 18.6%
The effective  tax rates for 2019 and 2018 reflect the impact of
our recurring tax preference benefits. The 2019 effective rate
also included net tax benefits primarily related to the resolution of
various tax controversy matters.
We expect the effective tax rate for 2020 to be approximately
18 percent, absent unusual items.
Balance Sheet Overview
Table
5 Selected Balance Sheet Data    
  December 31  
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  % Change
Assets     
Cash and cash equivalents $ 161,560 $ 177,404 (9)%
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell 274,597 261,131 5
Trading account assets 229,826 214,348 7
Debt securities 472,197 441,753 7
Loans and leases 983,426 946,895 4
Allowance for loan and lease losses (9,416) (9,601) (2)
All other assets 321,889 322,577 —
Total assets $ 2,434,079 $ 2,354,507 3
Liabilities    
Deposits $ 1,434,803 $ 1,381,476 4
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase 165,109 186,988 (12)
Trading account liabilities 83,270 68,220 22
Short-term borrowings 24,204 20,189 20
Long-term debt 240,856 229,392 5
All other liabilities 221,027 202,917 9
Total liabilities 2,169,269 2,089,182 4
Shareholders’ equity 264,810 265,325 —
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 2,434,079 $ 2,354,507 3
Assets
At December 31, 2019 , total assets were approximately $2.4
trillion , up $79.6 billion  from December 31, 2018 . The increase in
assets was primarily due to higher loans and leases and debt
securities primarily funded by deposit growth.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivalents decreased  $15.8 billion  driven by
investment of short-term excess cash into secu rities purchased
under agreements to resell, debt securities and growth in loans
and leases . Federal Funds Sold and Securities Borrowed or
Purchased Under Agreements to Resell
Federal funds transactions involve lending reserve balances on a
short-term basis. Securities borrowed or purchased under
agreements to resell are collateralized lending transactions
utilized to accommodate customer transactions, earn interest
rate spreads, and obtain securities for settlement and for
collateral. Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell increased  $13.5 billion
due to investment of excess cash levels.
25     Bank of America
 
Trading Account Assets
Trading account assets consist primarily of long positions in
equity and fixed-income securities including U.S. government
and agency securities, corporate securities and non-U.S.
sovereign debt. Trading account assets increased  $15.5 billion
primarily driven by additional inventory in Global Markets  to
facilitate client demand.
Debt Securities
Debt securi ties primarily include U.S. Treasury and agency
securities, mortgage-backed securities (MBS), principally agency
MBS, non-U.S. bonds, corporate bonds and municipal debt. We
use the debt securities portfolio primarily to manage interest rate
and liquidity risk and to take advantage of market conditions that
create econ omically attractive returns on these investments.
Debt securities increased  $30.4 billion  primarily driven by the
deployment of deposit inflows. For more information on debt
securities, see Note 4 – Securities  to the Conso lidated Financial
Statements .
Loans and Leases
Loans and leases increased  $36.5 billion  prima rily due to net
loan growth driven by client demand for commercial loans and
increases in residential mortgage. For more information on the
loan portfolio, see Credit Risk Management  on page 53.
Allowance for Loan and Lease Losses
The allowance for loan and lease losses decrea sed $185 million
primarily due to the impact of improvements in credit quality from
a stron ger economy and continued runof f and sales in the non-
core consumer real estate portfolio. For more information, see
Allowance for Credit Losses  on page 68.
Liabilities
At December 31, 2019 , total liabilities were approximately $2.2
trillion , up $80.1 billion  from December 31, 2018 , primarily due to
deposit growth.
Deposits
Deposits increased  $53.3 billion  primarily due to increases in
both retail and wholesale deposits.
Federal Funds Purchased and Securities Loaned or
Sold Under Agreements to Repurchase
Federal funds transactio ns involve borrowing reserve balances
on a short-term basis. Securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase are collateralized borrowing
transactions utilized to accommodate customer transactions,
earn interes t rate spreads and finance assets on the balance
sheet. Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold
under agreements to repurchase decreased  $21.9 billion
primarily driven by balance sheet efficiencies within Global
Markets . Trading Account Liabilities
Trading account liabilities consist primarily of short positions in
equity and fixed-income securities including U.S. Treasury and
agency securities, corporate securities and non-U.S. sovereign
debt. Trading account liabilities increased  $15.1 billion  primarily
due to higher levels of short positions in government and
corporate bonds driven by client demand within Global Markets .
Short-term Borrowings
Short-term borrowings provide an additional funding source and
primarily consist of Federal Home Loan Bank (FHLB) short-term
borrowings, notes payable and various other borrowings that
generally have maturities of one year or less. Short-term
borrowings increased  $4.0 billion  primarily due to an increase in
short-term FHLB advances to manage liquidity needs. For more
information on short-term borrowings, see Note 11 – Federal
Funds Sold or Purchased, Securities Financing Agreements,
Short-term Borrowings and Restricted Cash  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements .
Long-term Debt
Long-term debt increased  $11.5 billion  primarily driven by debt
issuances and valuation adjustments, partially offset by
maturities and redempti ons. For more information on long-term
debt, see Note 12 – Long-term Debt  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements .
All Other Liabilities
All other liabilities increa sed $18.1 billion primarily driven by an
increase in broker-dealer payables within Global Markets due to
timing of unsettled trade s and an increase in lease liabilities due
to implementation of the new lease accounting standard.
Shareholders’ Equity
Shareholders’  equity decreased  $515 million  driven by returns of
capital to shareholders through share repurchases, common and
preferred stock dividends of $35.7 billion, as well as redemption
of preferred stock, largely offset by earnings, market value
increases on debt securities and issuances of preferred stock.
Cash Flows Overview
The Corporation’ s operating assets and liabilities support our
global markets and lending activities. We believe that cash flows
from operations, available cash balances and our ability to
generate cash through short- and long-term debt are sufficient to
fund our operating liquidity needs. Our investing activities
primarily include the debt securities portfolio and loans and
leases. Our financing activities reflect cash flows primarily
related to customer deposits, securities financing agreements
and long-term debt. For more information on liquidity , see
Liquidity Risk  on page 50.
  Bank of America    26
Supplemental Financial Data
In this Form 10-K, we present certain non-GAAP  financial
measures. Non-GAAP  financial measures exclude certain items
or otherwise include components that differ from the most
directly comparable measures calculated in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America (GAAP). Non-GAAP  financial measures are provided as
additional useful information to assess our financial condition,
results of operations (including period-to-p eriod operating
performance) or compliance with prospective regulatory
requirements. These non-GAAP  financial measures are not
intended as a substitute  for GAAP  financial measures and may
not be defined or calculated the same way as non-GAAP
financial measures used by other companies.
We view net interest income and related ratios and analyses
on an FTE basis, which when presented on a consolidated basis
are non-GAA P financial measures. To derive the FTE basis, net
interest income is adjusted to reflect tax-exempt income on an
equivalent before-tax basis with a correspond ing increase in
income tax expense. For purposes of this calculation, we use the
federal statutory tax rate of 21 percent for 2019 and 2018 (35
percent for 2017) and a representative state tax rate. Net interest
yield, which measures the basis points we earn over the cost of
funds, utilize s net interest income on an FTE basis. We believe
that presentation of these items on an FTE basis allows for
comparison of amounts from both taxable and tax-exempt
sources and is consistent with industry practices.
We may present certain key performance indicators and
ratios excluding certain items (e.g., debit valuation adjustment
(DVA) gains (losses)) which result in non-GAAP  financial
measures. We believe that the presentation of measures that
exclude these items
is useful because such measures provide addit ional information
to assess the underlying operational performance and trends of
our businesses and to allow better comparison of period-to-
period operating performance.
We also evaluate our business based on certain ratios that
utilize tangible equity , a non-GAAP  financial measure. Tangible
equity represents shareholders’  equity or common shareholders’ equity reduc ed by goodwill and intangible assets (excluding
mortgage servicing rights (MSRs)), net of related deferred tax
liabilities ("adjusted" shareholders' equity  or common
shareholders' equity). These measures are used to evaluate our
use of equity . In addition, profitability , relationship and investment
models use both return on average tangible common
shareholders’  equity and return on average tangible
shareholders’  equity as key measures to support our overall
growth goals. These ratios are as follows:
●Return on average tangible common shareholders’  equity
measures our net income applicable to common
shareholders as a perce ntage of adjusted average common
shareholders’  equity . The tangible common equity ratio
represents adjusted ending common shareholders’  equity
divided by total tangible assets.
●Return on average tangible shareholders' equity measures
our net income as a percentage of adjusted average total
shareholders’  equity . The tangible equity ratio represents
adjusted ending shareholders’  equity divided by total tangible
assets.
●Tangible book value per common share represe nts adjusted
ending common shareholders’  equity divided by ending
common shares outstanding.
We believe that the use of ratios that utilize tangible equity
provides additional useful information becaus e they present
measures of those assets that can generate income. Tangible
book value per comm on share provides additional useful
information about the level of tangible asset s in relation to
outstanding shares of common stock.
The aforementioned supplemental data and performance
measures are presented in Tables 6 and 7.
For more information on the reconciliation of these non-
GAAP  financial measures to the corresponding  GAAP  financial
measures, see Non-GAAP  Reconciliations  on page 80.
27     Bank of America
 
Table 6Five-year Summary of Selected Financial
Data      
(In millions, except per share information) 2019  2018  2017  2016  2015
Income statement        
Net interest income $ 48,891 $ 48,162 $ 45,239 $ 41,486 $ 38,958
Noninterest income 42,353 42,858 41,887 42,012 44,007
Total revenue, net of interest expense 91,244 91,020 87,126 83,498 82,965
Provision for credit losses 3,590 3,282 3,396 3,597 3,161
Noninterest expense 54,900 53,154 54,517 54,880 57,617
Income before income taxes 32,754 34,584 29,213 25,021 22,187
Income tax expense 5,324 6,437 10,981 7,199 6,277
Net income 27,430 28,147 18,232 17,822 15,910
Net income applicable to common shareholders 25,998 26,696 16,618 16,140 14,427
Average common shares issued and outstanding 9,390.5 10,096.5 10,195.6 10,248.1 10,462.3
Average diluted common shares issued and outstanding 9,442.9 10,236.9 10,778.4 11,046.8 11,236.2
Performance ratios          
Return on average assets 1.14% 1.21% 0.80% 0.81% 0.74%
Return on average common shareholders’ equity 10.62 11.04 6.72 6.69 6.28
Return on average tangible common shareholders’ equity (1) 14.86 15.55 9.41 9.51 9.16
Return on average shareholders’ equity 10.24 10.63 6.72 6.70 6.33
Return on average tangible shareholders’ equity (1) 13.85 14.46 9.08 9.17 8.88
Total ending equity to total ending assets 10.88 11.27 11.71 12.17 11.92
Total average equity to total average assets 11.14 11.39 11.96 12.14 11.64
Dividend payout 23.65 20.31 24.24 15.94 14.49
Per common share data          
Earnings $ 2.77 $ 2.64 $ 1.63 $ 1.57 $ 1.38
Diluted earnings 2.75 2.61 1.56 1.49 1.31
Dividends paid 0.66 0.54 0.39 0.25 0.20
Book value 27.32 25.13 23.80 23.97 22.48
Tangible book value (1) 19.41 17.91 16.96 16.89 15.56
Market capitalization $ 311,209 $ 238,251 $ 303,681 $ 222,163 $ 174,700
Average balance sheet          
Total loans and leases $ 958,416 $ 933,049 $ 918,731 $ 900,433 $ 876,787
Total assets 2,405,830 2,325,246 2,268,633 2,190,218 2,160,536
Total deposits 1,380,326 1,314,941 1,269,796 1,222,561 1,155,860
Long-term debt 201,623 200,399 194,882 204,826 240,059
Common shareholders’ equity 244,853 241,799 247,101 241,187 229,576
Total shareholders’ equity 267,889 264,748 271,289 265,843 251,384
Asset quality (2)         
Allowance for credit losses (3) $ 10,229 $ 10,398 $ 11,170 $ 11,999 $ 12,880
Nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties (4) 3,837 5,244 6,758 8,084 9,836
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total loans and leases
outstanding (4) 0.97% 1.02% 1.12% 1.26% 1.37%
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming
loans and leases (4) 265 194 161 149 130
Net charge-offs $ 3,648 $ 3,763 $ 3,979 $ 3,821 $ 4,338
Net charge-offs as a percentage of average loans and leases outstanding (4) 0.38% 0.41% 0.44% 0.43% 0.50%
Capital ratios at year end (5)          
Common equity tier 1 capital 11.2% 11.6% 11.5% 10.8% 9.8%
Tier 1 capital 12.6 13.2 13.0 12.4 11.2
Total capital 14.7 15.1 14.8 14.2 12.8
Tier 1 leverage 7.9 8.4 8.6 8.8 8.4
Supplementary leverage ratio 6.4 6.8 n/a n/a n/a
Tangible equity (1) 8.2 8.6 8.9 9.2 8.9
Tangible common equity (1) 7.3 7.6 7.9 8.0 7.8
(1) Tangible equity ratios and tangible book value per share of common stock are non-GAAP  financial measures. For more information on these ratios and corresponding reconciliations to GAAP
financial measures, see Supplemental Financial Data  on page 27 and Non-GAAP  Reconciliations  on page 80.
(2) Asset quality metrics include $75 million of non-U.S. consumer credit card net charge-of fs in 2017 and $243 million of non-U.S. consumer credit card allowance for loan and lease losses, $9.2
billion of non-U.S. consumer credit card loans and $175 million of non-U.S. consumer credit card net charge-of fs in 2016. The non-U.S. consumer credit card business was sold in 2017.
(3) Includes the allowance for loan and leases losses and the reserve for unfunded lending commitments.
(4) Balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option. For additional exclusions from nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties, see Consumer
Portfolio Credit Risk Management – Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity  on page  59 and corresponding Table 29 and Commercial Portfo lio Credit Risk
Management – Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity  on page 63 and corresponding Table 36 .
(5) Basel 3 transition provisions for regulatory capital adjustments and deductions were fully phased-in as of January 1, 2018. Prior periods are presented on a fully phased-in basis. For more
information, including which approach is used to assess capital adequacy , see Capital Management  on page 45.
n/a = not applicable
  Bank of America    28
Table 7Selected Quarterly Financial Data          
  2019 Quarters  2018 Quarters
(In millions, except per share information) Fourth  Third Second  First  Fourth  Third  Second First
Income statement            
Net interest income $12,140  $12,187 $12,189  $12,375  $12,504  $12,061  $11,828 $11,769
Noninterest income 10,209  10,620 10,895  10,629  10,173  10,663  10,721 11,301
Total revenue, net of interest expense 22,349  22,807 23,084  23,004  22,677  22,724  22,549 23,070
Provision for credit losses 941  779 857  1,013  905 716 827 834
Noninterest expense 13,239  15,169 13,268  13,224  13,074  13,014  13,224 13,842
Income before income taxes 8,169  6,859 8,959  8,767  8,698  8,994  8,498 8,394
Income tax expense 1,175  1,082 1,611  1,456  1,420  1,827  1,714 1,476
Net income 6,994  5,777 7,348  7,311  7,278  7,167  6,784 6,918
Net income applicable to common shareholders 6,748  5,272 7,109  6,869  7,039  6,701  6,466 6,490
Average common shares issued and outstanding 9,017.1  9,303.6 9,523.2  9,725.9  9,855.8  10,031.6  10,181.7 10,322.4
Average diluted common shares issued and outstanding 9,079.5  9,353.0 9,559.6  9,787.3  9,996.0  10,170.8  10,309.4 10,472.7
Performance ratios              
Return on average assets 1.13% 0.95% 1.23% 1.26% 1.24% 1.23% 1.17% 1.21%
Four-quarter trailing return on average assets  (1) 1.14  1.17 1.24  1.22  1.21  1.00  0.93 0.86
Return on average common shareholders’  equity 11.00  8.48 11.62  11.42  11.57  10.99  10.75 10.85
Return on average tangible common shareholders’  equity  (2) 15.43  11.84 16.24  16.01  16.29  15.48  15.15 15.26
Return on average shareholders’  equity 10.40  8.48 11.00  11.14  10.95  10.74  10.26 10.57
Return on average tangible shareholders’  equity  (2) 14.09  11.43 14.88  15.10  14.90  14.61  13.95 14.37
Total ending equity to total ending assets 10.88  11.06 11.33  11.23  11.27  11.21  11.53 11.43
Total average equity to total average assets 10.89  11.21 11.17  11.28  11.30  11.42  11.42 11.41
Dividend payout 23.90  31.48 19.95  21.20  20.90  22.35  18.83 19.06
Per common share data              
Earnings $ 0.75  $ 0.57 $ 0.75  $ 0.71  $ 0.71  $ 0.67  $ 0.64 $ 0.63
Diluted earnings 0.74  0.56 0.74  0.70  0.70  0.66  0.63 0.62
Dividends paid 0.18  0.18 0.15  0.15  0.15  0.15  0.12 0.12
Book value 27.32  26.96 26.41  25.57  25.13  24.33  24.07 23.74
Tangible book value (2) 19.41  19.26 18.92  18.26  17.91  17.23  17.07 16.84
Market capitalization $311,209  $264,842 $270,935  $263,992  $238,251  $290,424  $282,259 $305,176
Average balance sheet              
Total loans and leases $973,986  $964,733 $950,525  $944,020  $934,721  $930,736  $934,818 $931,915
Total assets 2,450,005  2,412,223 2,399,051  2,360,992  2,334,586  2,317,829  2,322,678 2,325,878
Total deposits 1,410,439  1,375,052 1,375,450  1,359,864  1,344,951  1,316,345  1,300,659 1,297,268
Long-term debt 206,026  202,620 201,007  196,726  201,056  203,239  199,448 197,787
Common shareholders’  equity 243,439  246,630 245,438  243,891  241,372  241,812  241,313 242,713
Total shareholders’  equity 266,900  270,430 267,975  266,217  263,698  264,653  265,181 265,480
Asset quality              
Allowance for credit losses (3) $10,229  $10,242 $10,333  $10,379  $10,398  $10,526  $10,837 $11,042
Nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties (4) 3,837  3,723 4,452  5,145  5,244  5,449  6,181 6,694
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total
loans and leases outstanding (4) 0.97% 0.98% 1.00% 1.02% 1.02% 1.05% 1.08% 1.11%
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total
nonperforming loans and leases (4) 265  271 228  197  194 189 170 161
Net charge-of fs $ 959  $ 811 $ 887  $ 991  $ 924 $ 932 $ 996 $ 911
Annualized net charge-of fs as a percentage of average loans
and leases outstanding (4) 0.39% 0.34% 0.38% 0.43% 0.39% 0.40% 0.43% 0.40%
Capital ratios at period end              
Common equity tier 1 capital 11.2% 11.4% 11.7% 11.6% 11.6% 11.4% 11.4% 11.3%
Tier 1 capital 12.6  12.9 13.3  13.1  13.2  12.9  13.0 13.0
Total capital 14.7  15.1 15.4  15.2  15.1  14.7  14.8 14.8
Tier 1 leverage 7.9 8.2 8.4 8.4 8.4 8.3 8.4 8.4
Supplementary leverage ratio 6.4 6.6 6.8 6.8 6.8 6.7 6.7 6.8
Tangible equity  (2) 8.2 8.4 8.7 8.5 8.6 8.5 8.7 8.7
Tangible common equity (2) 7.3 7.4 7.6 7.6 7.6 7.5 7.7 7.6
Total loss-absorbing capacity and long-term debt
metrics (5)            
Total loss-absorbing capacity to risk-weighted assets 24.6% 24.8% 25.5% 24.8%       
Total loss-absorbing capacity to supplementary leverage
exposure 12.5 12.7 13.0 12.8       
Eligible long-term debt to risk-weighted assets 11.5 11.4 11.8 11.4       
Eligible long-term debt to supplementary leverage
exposure 5.8 5.8 6.0 5.9       
(1) Calculated as total net income for four consecutive quarters divided by annualized average assets for four consecutive quarters.
(2) Tangible equity ratios and tangible book value per share of common stock are non-GAAP  financial measures. For more information on these ratios and corresponding reconciliations to GAAP
financial measures, see Supplemental Financial Data  on page 27 and Non-GAAP  Reconciliations  on page 80.
(3) Includes the allowance for loan and lease losses and the reserve for unfunded lending commitments.
(4) Balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option. For additional exclusions from nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties, see Consumer
Portfolio Credit Risk Management – Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity  on page  59 and corresponding Table 29 and Commercial Portfo lio Credit Risk
Management – Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity  on page 63 and corresponding Table 36 .
(5) Effective January 1, 2019, we became subject to minimum total loss-absorbing capacity and long-term debt requirements. For more information, see Capital Management  on page 45.
29     Bank of America
 
Table
8 Average Balances and Interest Rates - FTE Basis    
 Average
Balance  Interest
Income/
Expense (1)Yield/
Rate  Average
BalanceInterest
Income/
Expense (1) Yield/
RateAverage
Balance  Interest
Income/
Expense (1) Yield/
Rate
(Dollars in millions)
2019  2018 2017
Earning assets               
Interest-bearing deposits with the Federal Reserve,
non-U.S. central banks and other banks $ 125,555  $ 1,823 1.45% $ 139,848 $ 1,926  1.38% $ 127,431  $ 1,122  0.88%
Time deposits placed and other short-term
investments 9,427  207 2.19  9,446 216 2.29 12,112  241 1.99
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell 279,610  4,843 1.73  251,328 3,176  1.26 222,818  1,806  0.81
Trading account assets 148,076  5,269 3.56  132,724 4,901  3.69 129,007  4,618  3.58
Debt securities 450,090  11,917 2.65  437,312 11,837  2.66 435,005  10,626  2.44
Loans and leases (2):               
Residential mortgage 220,552  7,651 3.47  207,523 7,294  3.51 197,766  6,831  3.45
Home equity 44,600  2,194 4.92  53,886 2,573  4.77 62,260  2,608  4.19
Credit card 94,488  10,166 10.76  94,612 9,579  10.12 91,068  8,791  9.65
Non-U.S. credit card (3) — — — — — — 3,929  358 9.12
Direct/Indirect and other consumer (4) 90,656  3,261 3.60  93,036 3,104  3.34 96,002  2,734  2.85
Total consumer 450,296  23,272 5.17  449,057 22,550  5.02 451,025  21,322  4.73
U.S. commercial 321,467  13,016 4.05  304,387 11,937  3.92 292,452  9,765  3.34
Non-U.S. commercial 103,918  3,547 3.41  97,664 3,220  3.30 95,005  2,566  2.70
Commercial real estate (5) 62,044  2,741 4.42  60,384 2,618  4.34 58,502  2,116  3.62
Commercial lease financing 20,691  718 3.47  21,557 698 3.24 21,747  706 3.25
Total commercial 508,120  20,022 3.94  483,992 18,473  3.82 467,706  15,153  3.24
Total loans and leases (3) 958,416  43,294 4.52  933,049 41,023  4.40 918,731  36,475  3.97
Other earning assets 69,089  4,478 6.48  76,524 4,300  5.62 76,957  3,224  4.19
Total earning assets 2,040,263  71,831 3.52  1,980,231 67,379  3.40 1,922,061  58,112  3.02
Cash and due from banks 26,193     25,830    27,995    
Other assets, less allowance for loan and lease
losses 339,374     319,185    318,577     
Total assets $2,405,830     $2,325,246    $2,268,633     
Interest-bearing liabilities               
U.S. interest-bearing deposits:               
Savings $ 52,020  $ 5 0.01% $ 54,226 $ 6 0.01% $ 53,783  $ 5 0.01%
NOW and money market deposit accounts 741,126  4,471 0.60  676,382 2,636  0.39 628,647  873 0.14
Consumer CDs and IRAs 47,577  471 0.99  39,823 157 0.39 44,794  121 0.27
Negotiable CDs, public funds and other deposits 66,866  1,407 2.11  50,593 991 1.96 36,782  354 0.96
Total U.S. interest-bearing deposits 907,589  6,354 0.70  821,024 3,790  0.46 764,006  1,353  0.18
Non-U.S. interest-bearing deposits:               
Banks located in non-U.S. countries 1,936  20 1.04  2,312 39 1.69 2,442  21 0.85
Governments and of ficial institutions 181 — 0.05  810 — 0.01 1,006  10 0.95
Time, savings and other 69,351  814 1.17  65,097 666 1.02 62,386  547 0.88
Total non-U.S. interest-bearing deposits 71,468  834 1.17  68,219 705 1.03 65,834  578 0.88
Total interest-bearing deposits 979,057  7,188 0.73  889,243 4,495  0.51 829,840  1,931  0.23
Federal funds purchased, securities loaned or sold
under agreements to repurchase, short-term
borrowings and other interest-bearing liabilities 276,432  7,208 2.61  269,748 5,839  2.17 274,975  3,146  1.14
Trading account liabilities 45,449  1,249 2.75  50,928 1,358  2.67 45,518  1,204  2.64
Long-term debt 201,623  6,700 3.32  200,399 6,915  3.45 194,882  5,667  2.91
Total interest-bearing liabilities 1,502,561  22,345 1.49  1,410,318 18,607  1.32 1,345,215  11,948  0.89
Noninterest-bearing sources:               
Noninterest-bearing deposits 401,269     425,698    439,956     
Other liabilities (6) 234,111     224,482    212,173     
Shareholders’  equity 267,889     264,748    271,289     
Total liabilities and shareholders’  equity $2,405,830     $2,325,246    $2,268,633     
Net interest spread    2.03%    2.08%     2.13%
Impact of noninterest-bearing sources    0.40     0.37     0.27
Net interest income/yield on earning assets
(7)   $49,486 2.43%  $48,772  2.45%   $46,164  2.40%
(1) Includes the impact of interest rate risk management contracts. For more information, see Interest Rate Risk Management for the Banking Book  on page 74.
(2) Nonperforming loans are included in the respective average loan balances. Income on these nonperforming loans is generally recognized on a cost recovery basis.
(3) Includes assets of the Corporation's non-U.S. consumer credit card business, which was sold during the second quarter of 2017.
(4) Includes non-U.S. consumer loans of $2.9 billion , $2.8 billion  and $2.9 billion  for 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
(5) Includes U.S. commercial real estate loans of $57.3 billion , $56.4 billion  and $55.0 billion , and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $4.7 billion , $4.0 billion  and $3.5 billion  for 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively .
(6) Includes $35.5 billion , $30.4 billion  and $30.3 billion  of structured notes and liabilities for 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
(7) Net interest income includes FTE adjustments of $595 million , $610 million  and $925 million  for 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
 
  Bank of America    30
Table 9Analysis of Changes in Net Interest Income - FTE Basis      
  Due to Change in (1)
Net Change Due to Change in (1) 
Net Change  Volume Rate  Volume Rate 
(Dollars in millions) From 2018 to 2019  From 2017 to 2018
Increase (decrease) in interest income          
Interest-bearing deposits with the Federal Reserve, non-U.S. central banks and other
banks $ (193)$ 90 $ (103) $ 109 $ 695 $ 804
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments — (9) (9) (53) 28 (25)
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell 347 1,320 1,667 230 1,140 1,370
Trading account assets 563 (195) 368 134 149 283
Debt securities 135 (55) 80 44 1,167 1,211
Loans and leases:        
Residential mortgage 447 (90) 357 329 134 463
Home equity (446) 67 (379) (350) 315 (35)
Credit card (17) 604 587 339 449 788
Non-U.S. credit card (2) — — — (358) — (358)
Direct/Indirect and other consumer (76) 233 157 (82) 452 370
Total consumer   722     1,228
U.S. commercial 665 414 1,079 402 1,770 2,172
Non-U.S. commercial 209 118 327 71 583 654
Commercial real estate 75 48 123 70 432 502
Commercial lease financing (28) 48 20 (5) (3) (8)
Total commercial   1,549     3,320
Total loans and leases   2,271     4,548
Other earning assets (417) 595 178 (18) 1,094 1,076
Total interest income   $ 4,452     $ 9,267
Increase (decrease) in interest expense          
U.S. interest-bearing deposits:          
Savings $ (1)$ — $ (1) $ — $ 1 $ 1
NOW and money market deposit accounts 254 1,581 1,835 74 1,689 1,763
Consumer CDs and IRAs 29 285 314 (13) 49 36
Negotiable CDs, public funds and other deposits 320 96 416 132 505 637
Total U.S. interest-bearing deposits   2,564     2,437
Non-U.S. interest-bearing deposits:          
Banks located in non-U.S. countries (6) (13) (19) (1) 19 18
Governments and official institutions — — — (2) (8) (10)
Time, savings and other 41 107 148 26 93 119
Total non-U.S. interest-bearing deposits   129     127
Total interest-bearing deposits   2,693     2,564
Federal funds purchased, securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase,
short-term borrowings and other interest-bearing liabilities 160 1,209 1,369 (71) 2,764 2,693
Trading account liabilities (145) 36 (109) 140 14 154
Long-term debt 41 (256) (215) 165 1,083 1,248
Total interest expense   3,738     6,659
Net increase in net interest income (3)   $ 714     $ 2,608
(1) The chan ges for each category of interest income and expense are divided between the portion of change attributable to the variance in volume and the portion of change attributable to the
variance in rate for that category . The unallocated change in rate or volume variance is allocated between the rate and volume variances.
(2) The Corporation sold its non-U.S. credit card business in the second quarter of 2017.
(3) Includes decreases in FTE basis adjustments of $15 million  from 2018 to 2019 and $315 million  from 2017 to 2018.
31     Bank of America
 
Business Segment Operations
Segment Description and Basis of Presentation
We report our results of operations through the following four business segments: Consumer Banking, GWIM, Global Banking and
Global Markets , with the remaining operations recorded in All Other . We manage our segments and report their results on an FTE
basis. The primary activities, products and businesses of the business segments and All Other  are shown below .
We periodically review capital allocated to our businesses and
allocate capital annually during the strategic and capital planning
processes. We utilize a methodology that considers the effect of
regulatory capital requirements in addition to internal risk-based
capital models. Our internal risk-based capital models use a risk-
adjusted methodology incorporating each segment’ s credit,
market, interest rate, business and operational risk components.
For more information on the nature of these risks, see Managing
Risk on page 42. The capital allocated to the business segments
is referred to as allocated capital. Allocated equity in the
reporting units is comprised of allocated capital plus capital for the portion
of goodwill and intangibles specifically assigned to the reporting
unit. For more information, including the definition of a reporting
unit, see Note 8 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
For more information on our presentation of financial
information on an FTE basis, see Supplemental Financial Data
on page 27, and for reconciliations to consolidated total revenue,
net income and year-en d total assets, see Note 24 – Business
Segment Information  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
  Bank of America    32
Consumer Banking
 Deposits  Consumer Lending  Total Consumer Banking 
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019 2018  2019 2018  % Change
Net interest income $ 16,904$ 15,939 $ 11,254$ 11,086 $ 28,158$ 27,025 4 %
Noninterest income:         
Card income (33) (33) 5,117 5,135 5,084 5,102 —
Service charges 4,217 4,298 2 2 4,219 4,300 (2)
All other income 832 762 294 429 1,126 1,191 (5)
Total noninterest income 5,016 5,027 5,413 5,566 10,429 10,593 (2)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 21,920 20,966 16,667 16,652 38,587 37,618 3
Provision for credit losses 269 195 3,503 3,469 3,772 3,664 3
Noninterest expense 10,682 10,657 6,936 7,015 17,618 17,672 —
Income before income taxes 10,969 10,114 6,228 6,168 17,197 16,282 6
Income tax expense 2,687 2,578 1,526 1,572 4,213 4,150 2
Net income $ 8,282$ 7,536 $ 4,702$ 4,596 $ 12,984$ 12,132 7
Effective tax rate (1)      24.5% 25.5% 
Net interest yield 2.40% 2.34% 3.80% 3.97% 3.81 3.77 
Return on average allocated capital 69 63 19 18 35 33 
Efficiency ratio 48.73 50.83 41.61 42.12 45.66 46.98 
Balance
Sheet         
Average         
Total loans and leases $ 5,373$ 5,233 $ 295,562$ 278,574 $ 300,935$ 283,807 6 %
Total earning assets (2) 703,444 682,592 296,051 279,217 738,770 717,189 3
Total assets (2) 735,232 710,925 306,169 290,068 780,676 756,373 3
Total deposits 702,908 678,640 5,368 5,533 708,276 684,173 4
Allocated capital 12,000 12,000 25,000 25,000 37,000 37,000 —
Year end         
Total loans and leases $ 5,472$ 5,470 $ 311,942$ 288,865 $ 317,414$ 294,335 8 %
Total earning assets (2) 724,536 694,672 312,684 289,249 760,137 728,813 4
Total assets (2) 758,385 724,019 322,717 299,970 804,019 768,881 5
Total deposits 725,598 691,666 5,080 4,480 730,678 696,146 5
(1) Estimated at the segment level only .
(2) In segments and businesses where the total of liabilities and equity exce eds assets, we allocate assets from All Other to match  the segments’  and businesses’  liabilities and allocated shareho lders’
equity . As a result, total earning assets and total assets of the businesses may not equal total Consumer Banking .
Consumer Banking,  which is comprised of Deposits and
Consumer Lending, offers a diversified range of credit, banking
and investment products and services to consumers and small
businesses.  Deposits and Consumer Lending include the net
impact of migrating customers and their related deposit,
brokerage asset and loan balances between Deposits,
Consumer Lending and GWIM , as well as other client-managed
businesses. Our customers and clients have access to a coast to
coast netwo rk including financial centers in 38 states and the
District of Columbia. Our network includes approximately 4,300
financial centers, approximately 16,800  ATMs, nationwide call
centers, and leading digital banking platforms with more than 38
million  active users, including over 29 million  active mobile users.
Consumer Banking Results
Net income for Consumer Banking  increased  $852 million  to
$13.0 billion  in 2019  compared to 2018  primarily driven by highe r
net interest income and lower noninterest expense, partially
offset by lower noninterest income. Net interest income
increased  $1.1 billion  to $28.2 billion  primarily due to growth  in
deposits and loans. Noninterest income decreased  $164 million
to $10.4 billion  driven by lower service charges and lower
mortgage banking income, largely offset by higher results from
ALM activities.
The provision for credit losses increased  $108 million  to $3.8
billion  driven  by overdrafts and portfolio seasoning in the credit
card portfolio. Noninterest expense decreased  $54 million  to $17.6 billion  primarily driven by lower FDIC expense and
operating efficiencies, partially offset by continued investment in
the business.
The return on average allocated capital was 35 percent, up
from 33 percent, driven by higher net income. For information on
capital allocated to the business segments, see Business
Segment Operations  on page 32.
Deposits
Deposits includes the results of consumer deposit activities
which consis t of a comp rehensive range of products provided to
consumers and small businesses. Our deposit products include
traditional savings accounts, money market savings accounts,
CDs and IRAs,  and noninterest- and interest-bearing checking
accounts,  as well as investment accounts and products . Net
interest income is allocated to the deposit products using our
funds transfer pricing process that matches assets and liabilities
with similar interest rate sensitivity and maturity  characteristics.
Deposits generates fees such as account service fees, non-
sufficient funds fees, overdraft charges and ATM fees, as well as
investment and brokerage fees from Merrill Edge accounts.
Merrill Edge is an integrated investing and banking service
targeted at customers with less than $250,000 in investable
assets. Merrill Edge provides investment advice and guidance,
client brokerage asset services, a self-directed online investing
platform and key banking capabilities including access to the
Corporation’ s network of financial centers and ATMs.
33     Bank of America
 
Net income for Deposits  increased  $746 million  to $8.3 billion
driven by higher net interest income. Net interest income
increased  $965 million to $16.9 billion  primarily due to growth in
deposits and pricing discipline. Noninterest income decreased
$11 million to $5.0 billion primarily driven by lower service
charges, largely of fset by higher results from ALM activities.
The provision for credit losses increased  $74 million to $269
million  in 2019 . Noninterest expense increased  $25 million  to
$10.7 billion  driven by continued investment in the business,
partially of fset by lower FDIC expense and operating ef ficiencies.
Average deposits increased  $24.3 billion  to $702.9 billion  in
2019  driven  by strong organ ic growth. Growth in checking and
time deposits of $27.0 billion was partially offset by a decline in
traditional savings and money market savings of $2.5 billion.
Key Statistics – Deposits   
 2019  2018
Total deposit spreads (excludes noninterest
costs) (1) 2.34% 2.14%
Year end   
Consumer investment assets (in millions) (2) $240,132 $185,881
Active digital banking users (units in thousands)
(3) 38,266 36,264
Active mobile banking users (units in thousands) 29,174 26,433
Financial centers 4,300 4,341
ATMs 16,788 16,255
(1) Includes deposits held in Consumer Lending.
(2) Includes client brokerage assets, deposit sweep balances and AUM in Consumer Banking .
(3) Active digital banking users represents mobile and/or online users.
Consumer investment assets increased  $54 billion  in 2019
driven by strong market performance and client flows. Active
mobile banking users increased  3 million reflec ting continuing
changes in our customers’  banking preferences. The number of
financial centers declined  by a net 41 reflecting changes in
customer preferences to self-service options as we continue to
optimize our consumer banking network and improve our cost to
serve.
Consumer Lending
Consumer Lending offers products to consum ers and small
businesses across the U.S. The products offered include credit
and debit cards, residential mortgages and home equity loans,
and direct and indirect loans  such as automotive, recreational
vehicle and consumer personal loans. In additio n to earning net
interest spread revenue on its lending activities, Consumer
Lending generates interchange revenue from credit and debit
card transactions, late fees, cash advance fees, annual credit
card fees, mortgage banking fee income and other
miscellaneous fees. Consumer Lending products  are available to
our customers through our retail network, direct telephone, and
online and mobile channels. Consumer Lending results also
include the impact of servicing residential mortgages and home
equity loans in the core portfolio , including loans held on the
balance sheet of Consumer Lending and loans serviced for
others. Net income for Consumer Lending increased  $106 million  to
$4.7 billion driven by higher net interest income and lower
noninterest expense, partially offset by lower noninterest income.
Net interest income increased  $168 million to $11.3 billion  driven
by loan growth. Noninterest income decreased  $153 million  to
$5.4 billion  primarily driven by lower mortgage banking income
and lower card income.
The provision for credit losses increased  $34 million  to $3.5
billion  primarily driven by portfolio seasoning in the credit card
portfolio. Noninterest expense decreased  $79 million  to $6.9
billion  primarily driven by operating ef ficiencies.
Average loans increased  $17.0 billion  to $295.6 billion
primarily driven by increases in residential mortgages and credit
card, partially of fset by lower home equity loans.
Key Statistics – Consumer Lending
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Total credit card (1)  
Gross interest yield 10.76% 10.12%
Risk-adjusted margin 8.28 8.25
New accounts (in thousands) 4,320 4,544
Purchase volumes $277,852 $264,706
Debit card purchase volumes $360,672 $338,810
(1) Includes GWIM's credit card portfolio.
During 2019 , the total credit card risk-adjusted margin
increased  3 bps compared to 2018 , primarily driven by a portfolio
shift away from promotional-rate loans. Total credit card
purchase volumes increased  $13.1 billion  to $277.9 billion , and
debit card purchase volumes increased  $21.9 billion  to $360.7
billion , reflecting higher levels of consumer spending.
Key Statistics – Loan Production (1)
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Total (2):   
First mortgage $ 72,467 $ 41,195
Home equity 11,131 14,869
Consumer Banking:   
First mortgage $ 49,179 $ 27,280
Home equity 9,755 13,251
(1) The loan productio n amounts represent the unpaid principal balance of loans and, in the case
of home equity , the principal amount of the total line of credit.
(2) In additio n to loan production in Consumer Bankin g, there is also first mortgage and home
equity loan production in GWIM.
First mortgage loan originations in Consumer Banking and for
the total Corporation increased  $21.9 billion  and $31.3 billion  in
2019  prima rily driven by a lower interest rate environment driving
higher first-lien mortgage refinances.
Home equity production in Consumer Banking  and for the
total Corporation decreased  $3.5 billion  and $3.7 billion  in 2019
primarily driven by lower demand.
  Bank of America    34
Global W ealth & Investment Management
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 % Change
Net interest income $ 6,504 $ 6,265 4 %
Noninterest income:   
Investment and brokerage services 11,870 11,959 (1)
All other income 1,163 1,229 (5)
Total noninterest income 13,033 13,188 (1)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 19,537 19,453 —
Provision for credit losses 82 86 (5)
Noninterest expense 13,823 14,015 (1)
Income before income taxes 5,632 5,352 5
Income tax expense 1,380 1,364 1
Net income $ 4,252 $ 3,988 7
Effective tax rate 24.5% 25.5%
Net interest yield 2.33 2.41
Return on average allocated capital 29 28
Efficiency ratio 70.75 72.04
Balance
Sheet   
Average   
Total loans and leases $ 168,910 $ 161,342 5 %
Total earning assets 279,684 259,808 8
Total assets 292,003 277,220 5
Total deposits 256,505 241,256 6
Allocated capital 14,500 14,500 —
Year end   
Total loans and leases $ 176,600 $ 164,854 7 %
Total earning assets 287,212 287,199 —
Total assets 299,756 305,907 (2)
Total deposits 263,103 268,700 (2)
GWIM  consists of two primary businesses: Merrill Lynch Global
Wealth Management (MLGWM) and Bank of America Privat e
Bank.
MLGWM’ s advisory business provides a high-touch client
experience through a network of financial advisors focused on
clients with over $250,000 in total investable assets. MLGWM
provides tailored solutio ns to meet clients’  needs through a full
set of investment management, brokerage, banking and
retirement products.
Bank of America Private Bank, together with MLGWM’ s
Private Wealth Management business, provides  comprehensive
wealth management solutions targeted to high net worth and
ultra high net worth clients, as well as customized solutions to
meet clients ’ wealth structuring, investment management, trust
and banking needs, including specialty asset management
services.
Net income for GWIM  increased  $264 million  to $4.3 billion
due to lower noninterest expense and higher revenue. The
operating margin was 29 percent compared to 28 percent in
2018. Net interest income incre ased $239 million  to $6.5 billion  due
to the impact of growth in deposits and loans.
Noninterest income, which primarily includes investment and
brokerage services income, decreased  $155 million  to $13.0
billion . The decrease was primarily driven by declines in AUM
pricing and transactional revenue, partially offset by the impact of
positive AUM flows and higher market valuations.
Noninterest expense decreased  $192 million  to $13.8 billion ,
as investme nts for business growth were more than offset by
lower amortization of intangibles and FDIC expense.
The return on average allocated capital was 29 percent, up
from 28 percent, due to higher net income.
MLGWM revenue of $16.1 billion  increased  one percent
primarily driven by higher net interest income and the impact of
positive AUM flows and higher market valuations, partially offset
by lower transactional volumes and AUM pricing.
Bank of America Private Bank revenue of $3.4 billion
decreased  one percent  primarily due to lower net interest
income.
35     Bank of America  
Key Indicators and Metrics   
(Dollars in millions, except as noted) 2019 2018
Revenue by Business   
Merrill Lynch Global Wealth Management $ 16,111 $ 15,998
Bank of America Private Bank 3,426 3,455
Total revenue, net of interest expense $ 19,537 $ 19,453
Client Balances by Business, at year end   
Merrill Lynch Global Wealth Management $ 2,558,102 $ 2,193,562
Bank of America Private Bank 489,690 427,294
Total client balances $ 3,047,792 $ 2,620,856
Client Balances by Type, at year end   
Assets under management $ 1,275,555 $ 1,072,234
Brokerage and other assets 1,372,733 1,162,997
Deposits 263,103 268,700
Loans and leases (1) 179,296 167,938
Less: Managed deposits in assets under management (42,895) (51,013)
Total client balances $ 3,047,792 $ 2,620,856
Assets Under Management Rollforward   
Assets under management, beginning of year $ 1,072,234 $ 1,121,383
Net client flows 24,865 44,607
Market valuation/other 178,456 (93,756)
Total assets under management, end of year $ 1,275,555 $ 1,072,234
Associates, at year end   
Number of financial advisors 17,458 17,518
Total wealth advisors, including financial advisors 19,440 19,459
Total primary sales professionals, including financial advisors and wealth advisors 20,586 20,586
Merrill Lynch Global Wealth Management Metric   
Financial advisor productivity (in thousands) $ 1,082 $ 1,034
Bank of America Private Bank Metric, at year end   
Primary sales professionals 1,766 1,748
(1) Includes margin receivables which are classified in customer and other receivables on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Client Balances
Client balances managed under advisory and/or discretion of
GWIM  are AUM and are typically held in diversified portfolios.
Fees earned on AUM are calculated as a percentage of clients’
AUM balances. The asset management fees charged to clients
per year depend on various factors, but are commonly driven by
the breadth of the client ’s relationship. The net client AUM flows
represent the net change in clients’  AUM balances over a specified period of
time, excluding market appreciation/deprecia tion and other
adjustments.
Client balances increased  $426.9 billion , or 16 percent , to
$3.0 trillion at December 31, 2019  compared to December 31,
2018 . The increase in client balances was primarily due to higher
market valuations and positive net flows over the last year .
  Bank of America    36
Global Banking
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 % Change
Net interest income $ 10,675 $ 10,993 (3)%
Noninterest income:    
Service charges 3,015 3,027 —
Investment banking fees 3,137 2,891 9
All other income 3,656 3,090 18
Total noninterest income 9,808 9,008 9
Total revenue, net of interest expense 20,483 20,001 2
Provision for credit losses 414 8 n/m
Noninterest expense 9,017 8,745 3
Income before income taxes 11,052 11,248 (2)
Income tax expense 2,984 2,923 2
Net income $ 8,068 $ 8,325 (3)
Effective tax rate 27.0% 26.0% 
Net interest yield 2.75 3.01 
Return on average allocated capital 20 20 
Efficiency ratio 44.02 43.72 
Balance
Sheet    
Average    
Total loans and leases $ 374,304 $ 354,236 6 %
Total earning assets 388,152 364,748 6
Total assets 443,083 425,675 4
Total deposits 362,731 336,337 8
Allocated capital 41,000 41,000 —
Year end    
Total loans and leases $ 379,268 $ 365,717 4 %
Total earning assets 407,180 377,812 8
Total assets 464,032 442,330 5
Total deposits 383,180 360,248 6
n/m = not meaningful
Global Bank ing, which includes Global Corporate Banking,
Global Commercial Banking, Business Bank ing and Global
Investment Banking, provides a wide range of lending-related
products and services, integrated working capital management
and treasury  solutions, and underwriting and advisory services
through  our network of offices and client relationship teams . Our
lending products and services include commerci al loans, leases,
commitment facilities, trade finance, commer cial real estate
lending and asset-based lending. Our treasury solutions
business includes treasu ry management, foreign exchange and
short-term investing options. We also provide investment
banking products to our clients such as debt and equity
underwriting and distribution, and merger-rel ated and other
advisory services. Under writing debt and equity issuances, fixed-
income and equity resea rch, and certain market -based activities
are execute d through our global broker-dealer  affiliates, which
are our primary dealers in several countries. Within Global
Banking, Global Com mercial Banking clients generally include
middle-market companie s, commercial real estate firms and not-
for-profit companies. Global Corporate Banking clients generally
include large global corporations, financial institutions and
leasing clients. Business Banking clients include  mid-sized U.S.-
based businesses requiring customized and integrated financial
advice and solutions.
Net income for Global Banking  decreased  $257 million  to
$8.1 billion in 2019  compared to 2018  primarily driven by higher
provision for credit losses and noninterest expense partially
offset by higher revenue. Revenue increased  $482 million  to $20.5 billion  driven by
higher  noninterest income, partially offset by lower net interest
income. Net interest income decreased  $318 million  to $10.7
billion  primarily due to the allocation of ALM results and credit
spread compression, partly offset by growth in loan and deposit
balances.
Noninterest income increased  $800 million  to $9.8 billion
primarily due to higher leasing-related revenue  and investment
banking fees. The provision for credit losses increased  $406
million  to $414 million  primarily driven by reserve releases in
2018 prima rily from energy exposures. Noninterest expense
increased  $272 million  primarily due to continued investment in
the business partially of fset by lower FDIC expense.
The return on average allocated capital was 20 percent  in
2019  and 2018 . For inform ation on capital allocated to the
business segments, see Business Segment Oper ations  on page
32.
Global Corporate, Global Commercial and
Business Banking
Global Corporate, Global Commercial and Business Banking
each include  Business Lending and Global Transaction Services
activities. Business Lending includes various lending-related
products and services, and related hedging activities, including
commercial loans, leases, commitment facilities , trade finance,
real estate lending and asset-based lending. Global Transaction
Services includes depo sits, treasury management, credit card,
foreign exchange and short-term investment products.
37     Bank of America
 
The table below and following discussion present a summary of the results, which exclude certai n investment banking activities in
Global Banking .
Global Corporate, Global Commercial and Business
Banking       
  Global Corporate Banking Global Commercial
Banking Business Banking  Total
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019  2018 2019 2018  2019  2018
Revenue         
Business Lending $ 3,994 $ 3,904 $ 4,132 $ 4,330 $ 363 $ 431 $ 8,489 $ 8,665
Global Transaction Services 3,994 3,832 3,499 3,346 1,064 987 8,557 8,165
Total revenue, net of interest expense $ 7,988 $ 7,736 $ 7,631 $ 7,676 $ 1,427 $ 1,418 $17,046 $16,830
        
Balance Sheet         
Average         
Total loans and leases $177,713 $163,516 $181,485 $174,279 $15,058 $16,432 $374,256 $354,227
Total deposits 177,924 163,559 144,620 135,337 40,196 37,462 362,740 336,358
Year end         
Total loans and leases $181,409 $174,378 $182,727 $175,937 $15,152 $15,402 $379,288 $365,717
Total deposits 185,352 173,183 157,322 149,118 40,504 37,973 383,178 360,274
Business Lending reven ue decreased $176 million  in 2019
compared to 2018. The decrease was primarily driven by the
allocation of ALM results, partly offset by higher leasing-related
revenue.
Global Transaction Services revenue increased  $392 million
in 2019 compared to 2018 driven by the impact of higher deposit
balances.
Average loans and leases increased  six percent  in 2019
compared to 2018 driven by growth in the commercial and
industrial portfolio. Average deposits increased  eight percent  due
to growth in domestic and international interest-bearing
balances.
Global Investment Banking
Client teams and product specialists underwrit e and distribute
debt, equity and loan products, and provide advisory services
and tailored risk management solutions. The economics of
certain inves tment banki ng and underwriting activities are shared
primarily between Global Banking and Global Markets  under an
internal revenue-sharing arrangement.  Global Bank ing originates
certain deal-related transactions with our corporate and
commercial clients that are executed and distributed by Global
Markets . To provide a complete discussion of our consolidated
investment banking fees, the following table presents total Corporation
investment banking fees and the portion attributable to Global
Banking.
Investment Banking
Fees     
  Global Banking Total Corporation
(Dollars in millions)  2019 2018 2019 2018
Products      
Advisory  $ 1,336 $ 1,153 $ 1,460 $ 1,258
Debt issuance  1,348 1,326 3,107 3,084
Equity issuance  453 412 1,259 1,183
Gross investment
banking fees  3,137 2,891 5,826 5,525
Self-led deals  (62) (68) (184) (198)
Total investment
banking fees  $ 3,075 $ 2,823 $ 5,642 $ 5,327
Total Corporation investment banking fees, excluding self-led
deals, of $5.6 billion , which are primarily included within Global
Banking  and Global Markets , increased  six percent  due to
increases in advisory fees as well as higher equity issuance
fees.
  Bank of America    38
Global Markets
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  % Change
Net interest income $ 3,915 $ 3,857 2 %
Noninterest income:   
Investment and brokerage services 1,738 1,780 (2)
Investment banking fees 2,288 2,296 —
Market making and similar activities 7,065 7,260 (3)
All other income 608 990 (39)
Total noninterest income 11,699 12,326 (5)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 15,614 16,183 (4)
   
Provision for credit losses (9) — n/m
Noninterest expense 10,722 10,835 (1)
Income before income taxes 4,901 5,348 (8)
Income tax expense 1,397 1,390 1
Net income $ 3,504 $ 3,958 (11)
Effective tax rate 28.5% 26.0% 
Return on average allocated capital 10 11 
Efficiency ratio 68.67 66.96 
Balance
Sheet   
Average   
Trading-related assets:   
Trading account securities $ 246,335 $ 215,112 15 %
Reverse repurchases 116,883 125,084 (7)
Securities borrowed 83,216 78,889 5
Derivative assets 43,271 46,047 (6)
Total trading-related assets 489,705 465,132 5
Total loans and leases 71,334 72,651 (2)
Total earning assets 476,225 473,383 1
Total assets 679,297 666,000 2
Total deposits 31,380 31,209 1
Allocated capital 35,000 35,000 —
Year end   
Total trading-related assets $ 452,496 $ 447,998 1 %
Total loans and leases 72,993 73,928 (1)
Total earning assets 471,701 457,224 3
Total assets 641,806 641,923 —
Total deposits 34,676 37,841 (8)
n/m = not meaningful
Global Markets  offers sales and trading services and research
services to institutional clients across fixed-income, credit,
currency , commodity and equity businesses . Global Markets
product coverage includes securities and deriva tive products in
both the primary and secondary markets.  Global Markets
provides market-making, financing, securities clearing,
settlement and custody services globally to our institu tional
investor clients in support of their investing and trading activities.
We also work with our commercial and corporate clients to
provide risk management products  using interest rate, equity ,
credit, curre ncy and commodity derivatives, foreign exchange,
fixed-income and mortgage-related products. As a result of our
market-making activities in these products, we may be required
to manage risk in a broad range of financial products  including
government securities, equity and equity-linked securities, high-
grade and high-yield corporate debt securities, syndicated loans,
MBS, commodities and asset-backed securities. The economics
of certain investment banking and underwritin g activities are
shared primarily between  Global Markets  and Global Bank ing
under an internal revenue-sharing arrangement . Global Banking
originates certain deal- related transactions with our corporate
and commercial clients that are executed and distributed by
Global Markets . For informa tion on investment banking fees on a
consolidated basis, see page 38. The following explanations for year-over-year changes in
results for Global Markets , including those disclosed under Sales
and Trading Revenue, exclude net DVA, but the explanations
would be the same if net DV A was included.
Net income for Global Markets  decreased  $454 million  to
$3.5 billion  in 2019  compared to 2018 . Net DVA losses  were
$222 million  compared to losses  of $162 million  in 2018 .
Excluding net DVA, net income decreased  $408 million to $3.7
billion . Thes e decreases were primarily driven by a decrease in
revenue, partially of fset by lower noninterest expense.
Revenue declined $569 million to $15.6 billion  as sales and
trading revenue decreased  $492 million , and excluding net DVA,
decreased  $432 million . These decreases were primarily driven
by a decline in Equities revenue. Noninterest expense decreased
$113 million to $10.7 billion , prima rily driven by lower revenue-
related expenses.
Average total assets increased  $13.3 billion  to $679.3 billion ,
primarily due to increased levels of inventory in fixed-income,
currencies and commodities (FICC) to facilitate expected client
demand. Year-end total assets were largely unchanged at
$641.8 billion .
The return on average allocated capital was 10 percent ,
down  from 11 percent , reflecting lower net income. For
information on
39     Bank of America
 
capital allocated to the business segments, see Business
Segment Operations  on page 32.
Sales and Trading Revenue
Sales and trading revenue includes unrealize d and realized
gains and losses on trading and other assets which are included
in market making and similar activities, net interest income, and
fees primarily from commissions on equity securities. Sales and
trading revenue is segregated into fixed-income (government
debt obligations, investment and non-investment  grade corporate
debt obligations, commercial MBS, residential mortgage-backed
securities, collateralized loan obligations, interest rate and credit
derivative contracts), currencies (interest rate and foreign
exchange contracts), commodities (primarily futures, forwards,
swaps and options) and equities (equity-linked  derivatives and
cash equity activity). The following table and related discussion
present sales and trading revenue, substantially  all of which is in
Global Markets,  with the remainder in Global Banking . In
addition, the following table and related discussion present sales
and trading revenue, excluding net DVA, which is a non-GAAP
financial measure. For more information on net DVA, see
Supplemental Financial Data  on page 27. 
Sales and Trading Revenue (1, 2, 3)
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Sales and trading revenue (2)  
Fixed-income, currencies and commodities $ 8,188$ 8,271
Equities 4,491 4,900
Total sales and trading revenue $ 12,679$ 13,171
Sales and trading revenue, excluding net DVA (4)  
Fixed-income, currencies and commodities $ 8,396$ 8,413
Equities 4,505 4,920
Total sales and trading revenue, excluding net
DVA $ 12,901$ 13,333
(1) For more information on sales and trading revenue, see Note 3 – Deriva tives to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
(2) Includes FTE adjustments of $189 million  and $248 million  for 2019 and 2018.
(3) Includes Global Banking  sales and trading revenue of $533 million  and $421 million  for 2019
and 2018.
(4) FICC and Equities sales and tradin g revenue, excluding net DVA, is a non-GAAP  financial
measure. FICC net DVA losses  were $208 milli on and $142 milli on for 2019 and 2018. Equities
net DV A losses  were $14 million  and $20 million  for 2019 and 2018.
FICC revenue decreased  $17 million . Equities revenue
decreased  $415 million  driven by under performance in equity
derivatives compared to a strong prior year which benefited from
higher client activity and a more volatile market environment.
All Other
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 % Change
Net interest income $ 234 $ 632 (63)%
Noninterest income (loss) (2,616) (2,257) 16
Total revenue, net of interest expense (2,382) (1,625) 47
Provision for credit losses (669) (476) 41
Noninterest expense 3,720 1,887 97
Loss before income taxes (5,433) (3,036) 79
Income tax benefit (4,055) (2,780) 46
Net loss $ (1,378) $ (256) n/m
Balance
Sheet     
   
Average    
Total loans and leases $ 42,933 $ 61,013 (30)%
Total assets (1) 210,771 199,978 5
Total deposits 21,434 21,966 (2)
Year end    
Total loans and leases $ 37,151 $ 48,061 (23)%
Total assets (1) 224,466 195,466 15
Total deposits 23,166 18,541 25
(1) In segme nts wher e the total of liabilities and equity exceeds assets, which are generally deposit-taking segments, we allocate assets from All Other  to those segments to match liabiliti es (i.e.,
deposits) and allocated shareholders’  equity . Average allocated assets were 544.2 billion  and $517.0 billion  for 2019 and 2018, and year-end allocated assets were $565.3 billion  and $540.8 billion  at
December 31, 2019  and 2018.
n/m = not meaningful
All Other consists of ALM activities, equity investments, non-core
mortgage loans and servicing activities, liquidating businesses
and certain expenses not otherwise allocated to a business
segment. ALM activities encompass certain residential
mortgages, debt securities, and interest rate and foreign
currency risk management activities. Substan tially all of the
results of ALM activities are allocated to our business segments .
For more information on our ALM activities, see Note 24 –
Business Segment Information  to the Cons olidated Financial
Statements . Equity investments include our merchant services
joint venture, as well as a portfolio of equity , real estate and other
alternative investments . For information on our merchant
services joint venture, see Note 13 – Commitments and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements . Residential mortgage loans that are held for ALM purposes,
including interest rate or liquidity risk management, are classified
as core and are presen ted on the balance sheet of All Other .
During 2019, residential mortgage loans held for ALM activities
decreased $3.2 billion to $21.7 billion primaril y as a result of
payof fs and paydowns. Non-core residential mortgage and home
equity loans, which are principally runof f portfolios, are also held
in All Other. Durin g 2019, total non-core loans decreased $7.8
billion to $15.7 billion due primarily to payof fs, paydowns and
sales, as well as Federal Housing Administration (FHA) loan
conveyances, partially offset by repurchas es. For more
information on the composition of the core and non-core
portfolios, see Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Management  on
page 54.
  Bank of America    40
The net loss for All Other  increased  $1.1 billion  to a net loss
of $1.4 billion , primarily driven by the $2.1 billion  preta x
impairment charge disclosed in Executive Summary – Recent
Developments – Merchant Services Joint Venture , as well as
lower revenu e, partially offset by a higher benefi t in the provision
for credit losses.
Revenue decreased  $757 million  due to lower net interest
income and an increase  in the loss in noninterest income. Net
interest income decreased  $398 million due to the impact of non-
core consumer real estate loan sales and portfolio run-of f. The
loss in noninterest income increased $359 million  primarily due
to lower gains on sales of non-core consumer loans and higher
partnership losses associated with an increase in tax-
advantaged investments, partially offset by a $729 million  charge
related to the redemption of certain trust preferred securities in
2018.
Noninterest expense increased  $1.8 billion to $3.7 billion
primarily due to the aforementioned $2.1 billion  pretax
impairment charge.
The income tax benefit was $4.1 billion  compared to a benefit
of $2.8 billion in 2018. The increase  in the tax benefit was
primarily driven by the tax effect of the higher pretax loss, the
positive impact from the resolution of various tax controversy
matters and a higher level of income tax credits. Both years
included income tax benefit adjustments to eliminate the FTE
treatment of certain tax credits recorded in Global Banking .
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements and
Contractual Obligations
We have contractual obligations to make future payments on
debt and lease agreements. Additionally , in the normal course of
business, we enter into contractual arrangeme nts whereby we
commit to future purchases of products or services from
unaffiliated parties. Purchase obligations are defined as
obligations that are legally binding agreements whereby we
agree to purchase products or services with a specific minimum
quantity at a fixed, minimum or variable price over a specified
period of time. Included in purchase obligations are vendor
contracts, the most significant of which include  communication
services, processing services and software contracts. Debt,
lease and other obligations are more fully discussed in Note 12 –
Long-term Debt  and Note 13 – Commitments and Contingencies
to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Other long-term liabilities include our contractual funding
obligations related to the Non-U.S. Pens ion Plans and
Nonqualified and Other Pension Plans (toget her, the Plans).
Obligations to the Plans  are based on the current and projected
obligations of the Plans , performance of the Plans’  assets, and
any particip ant contribu tions, if applicable. During 2019  and
2018 , we contributed $135 million  and $156 million  to the Plans,
and we expect to make $128 million  of contributions during 2020 .
The Plans are more fully discussed in Note 18 – Employee
Benefit Plans  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
We enter into commitments to extend credit such as loan
commitments, standby letters of credit (SBLCs) and commercial
letters of credit to meet  the financing needs of our customers.
For a summ ary of the total unfunded, or off-balance sheet, credit
extension commitment amounts by expiration date, see Credit
Extension Commitments in Note 13 – Commitments and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
We also utilize variable interest entities (VIEs) in the ordinary
course of business to support our financing and investing needs
as well as those of our customers. For more information on our
involvement with unconsolidated VIEs, see Note 7 –
Securitizations and Other Variable Interest Entities  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
Table 10 includes certain contrac tual obligations at Dece mber
31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table 10Contractual Obligations      
 December 31, 2019  December 31
2018
(Dollars in millions)Due in One
Year or Less Due After
One Year
Through
Three Years Due After
Three Years
Through
Five Years Due After
Five Years Total  Total
Long-term debt $ 24,151 $ 46,049 $ 47,096 $ 123,560 $ 240,856 $ 229,392
Operating lease obligations 1,966 3,265 2,338 4,225 11,794 15,770
Purchase obligations 1,272 1,126 401 731 3,530 4,048
Time deposits 68,351 4,612 1,463 247 74,673 61,039
Other long-term liabilities 1,670 1,056 714 659 4,099 3,933
Estimated interest expense on long-term debt and time deposits (1) 5,571 8,073 6,870 23,871 44,385 56,852
Total contractual obligations $ 102,981 $ 64,181 $ 58,882 $ 153,293 $ 379,337 $ 371,034
(1) Represents forecasted net interest expense on long-term debt and time deposits based on interest rates at December 31, 2019 and 2018. Forecas ts are based on the contractual maturity dates of
each liability , and are net of derivative hedges, where applicable.
41     Bank of America
 
Representations and Warranties Obligations
For information on repre sentations and warranties obligations in
connection with the sale of mortgage loans, see Note 13 –
Commitments and Contingencies  to the Cons olidated Financial
Statements .
Managing Risk
Overview
Risk is inherent in all our business activiti es. Sound risk
management enables us to serve our customer s and deliver for
our shareholders. If not managed well, risks can result in
financial loss, regulatory sanctions and penalties, and damage to
our reputatio n, each of which may adversely impact our ability to
execute our business strategies. We take a comprehensive
approach to risk management with a defined Risk Framework
and an articulated Risk Appetite Statement which are approved
annually by the Enterprise Risk Committee (ERC) and the Board.
The seven key types of risk faced by the Corporation are
strategic, credit, market, liquidity , compliance, operational and
reputational.
●Strategic risk is the risk resulting from incorrect assumptions
about external or internal factors, inappropriate business
plans, ineffective business strategy execution, or failure to
respond in a timely manner to changes in the regulatory ,
macroeconomic or competitive environme nts in the
geographic locations in which we operate.
●Credit risk is the risk of loss arising from the inability or failure
of a borrower or counterparty to meet its obligations.
●Market risk is the risk that changes in market conditions may
adversely impact the value of assets or liabilities, or
otherwise negatively impact earnings.
●Liquidity risk is the inability to meet expected or unexpected
cash flow and collateral needs while continuing to support our
businesses and customers under a range of economic
conditions.
●Compliance risk is the risk of legal or regulatory sanctions,
material financial loss or damage to the reputation of the
Corporation arising from the failure of the Corporation to
comply with the requirements of applicable laws, rules and
regulations and our internal policies and procedures.
●Operational risk is the risk of loss resulting from inadequate
or failed processes, people and systems, or from external
events.
●Reputational risk is the risk that negative perceptions of the
Corporation’ s conduct or business practices may adversely
impact its profitability or operations.
The following sections address in more detail the specific
procedures, measures and analyses of the major categories of
risk. This discussion of managing risk focuses on the current
Risk Framework that, as part of its annual review process, was
approved by the ERC and the Board.
As set forth in our Risk Framework, a culture of managing
risk well is fundamental to fulfilling our purpose and our values
and delivering responsible growth. It requires us to focus on risk
in all activities and encourages the necessary mindset and
behavior to enable effective risk management , and promotes
sound risk-taking within our risk appetite. Sustaining a culture of
managing risk well throughout the organization is critical to our success and is a
clear expectation of our executive management team and the
Board.
Our Risk Framework serves as the foundation for the
consistent and effective management of risks facing the
Corporation. The Risk Framework sets forth clear roles,
responsibilities and accountability for the management of risk
and provides  a blueprint for how the Board, through delegation of
authority to committees and executive officers, establishes risk
appetite and associated limits for our activities.
Executive management assesses, with Board oversight, the
risk-adjusted returns of each business. Management reviews
and approve s the strategic and financial operating plans, as well
as the capital plan and Risk Appetite Statement, and
recommends them annually to the Board for approval. Our
strategic plan takes into consideration return  objectives and
financial resources, which must align with risk capacity and risk
appetite. Management sets financial objectives for each
business by allocating capital and setting a target for return on
capital for each business. Capital allocations and operating limits
are regularly evaluated as part of our overall governance
processes as the businesses and the economic environment in
which we operate continue to evolve. For more information
regarding capital allocat ions, see Business Segment Oper ations
on page 32.
The Corporation’ s risk appetite indicates the amount of
capital, earnings or liquidity we are willing to put at risk to
achieve our strategic objectives and business plans, consistent
with applicable regulatory requirements. Our risk appetite
provides a common and comparable set of measures for senior
management and the Board to clearly indicate our aggregate
level of risk and to moni tor whether the Corporation’ s risk profile
remains in alignment with our strategic and capital plans. Our
risk appetite is formally articulated in the Risk Appetite
Statement, which includes both qualitative components and
quantitative limits.
Our overall capacity to take risk is limited; therefore, we
prioritize the risks we take in order to maintain a strong and
flexible financial position so we can withstand challenging
economic conditions and take advantage of organic growth
opportunities. Therefore, we set objectives and targets for capital
and liquidity that are intended to permit us to continue to operate
in a safe and sound manner , including during periods of stress.
Our lines of business operate with risk limits  (which may
include credit, market and/or operational limits , as applicable)
that align with the Corporation’ s risk appetite. Executive
management is responsible for tracking and reporting
performance measurem ents as well as any exceptions to
guidelines or limits. The Board, and its committees when
appropriate, oversee financial performance, execution of the
strategic and financial operating plans, adherence to risk
appetite limits and the adequacy of internal controls.
For a more detailed discussion of our risk management
activities, see the discussion below and pages 45 through 77.
Risk Management Governance
The Risk Framework describes delegations of authority whereby
the Board and its committees may delegate authority to
management-level committees or executive officers. Such
delegations may authorize certain decision-maki ng and approval
functions, which may be evidenced in, for example, committee
charters, job descriptions, meeting minutes and resolutions.
  Bank of America    42
The chart below illustrates the inter-relationship among the Board, Board committees and management committees that have the
majority of risk oversight responsibilities for the Corporation.
(1) Reports to the CEO and CFO with oversight by the Audit Committee
Board of Directors and Board Committees
The Board is composed  of 17 directors, all but one of whom are
independent. The Board authorizes managemen t to maintain an
effective Risk Framework, and oversees compliance with safe
and sound banking practices. In addition, the Board or its
committees conduct inquiries of, and receive reports from
management on risk-related matters to assess scope or
resource limitations that could impede the ability of Independent
Risk Management (IRM) and/or Corporate Audit to execute its
responsibilities. The Board committees discus sed below have
the principa l responsibi lity for enterprise-wide oversight of our
risk management activities. Through these activities, the Board
and applicable committees are provided with information on our
risk profile and oversee  executive management addressing key
risks we face. Other Board committees, as described below ,
provide additional oversight of specific risks.
Each of the committees shown on the above chart regularly
reports to the Board on risk-related matters within the
committee’ s responsibilities, which is intended to collectively
provide the Board with integrated insight about our management
of enterprise-wide risks.
Audit Committee
The Audit Committee oversees the qualifications, performance
and independence of the Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm, the performance of our corporate audit
function, the integrity of our consolidated finan cial statements,
our compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, and
makes inquiries of management or the Chief Audit Executive
(CAE) to determine whether there are scope or resource
limitations that impede the ability of Corporate Audit to execute
its responsibilities. The Audit Committee is also responsible for
overseeing compliance risk pursuant to the New York Stock
Exchange listing standards.
Enterprise Risk Committee
The ERC has primary responsibility for oversight of the Risk
Framework and key risks we face and of the Corporation’ s
overall risk appetite. It approves the Risk Fram ework and the
Risk Appet ite Statem ent and further recommends these
documents to the Board for approval. The ERC oversees senior
management’ s responsibilities for the identification,
measurement, monitorin g and control of key risks we face. The
ERC may consult with other Board committees on risk-related
matters. Other Board Committees
Our Corporate Governance, ESG, and Sustainability Committee
oversees our Board’ s governance processes , identifies and
reviews the qualifications of potential Board members,
recommends nominees for election to our Board, recommends
committee appointments for Board approval and reviews our
Environmental, Social and Governance and stockholder
engagement activities.
Our Compensation and Human Capital Committee oversees
establishing, maintaining and administering our compensation
programs and employee  benefit plans, including approving and
recommending our Chief Executive Officer’s (CEO)
compensation to our Board for further approval by all
independent directors; reviewing and approving all of our
executive officers’  compensation, as well as compensation for
non-management direct ors; and reviewing certa in other human
capital management topics.
Management Committees
Management committees may receive their authority from the
Board, a Board commit tee, another management committee or
from one or more executive officers. Our primary management-
level risk committee is the Management Risk Committee (MRC).
Subject to Board oversight, the MRC is responsible for
management oversight of key risks facing the Corporation. This
includes providing management oversight of our compliance and
operational risk programs, balance shee t and capital
management, funding activities and other liquidity activities,
stress testing, trading  activities, recovery and resolution
planning, model risk, subsidiary governance  and activities
between member banks and their nonbank affiliates pursuant to
Federal Reserve rules and regulations, among other things.
Lines of Defense
We have clear ownershi p and accountability across three lines of
defense: Front Line Units (FLUs), IRM and Corporate Audit. We
also have control functio ns outside of FLUs and IRM (e.g., Legal
and Global Human Resources). The three lines of defense are
integrated into our management-level governance structure.
Each of these functional roles is described in more detail below .
43     Bank of America
 
Executive Officers
Executive officers lead various functions representing the
functional roles. Authority for functional roles may be delegated
to executive officers from the Board, Board committees or
management-level comm ittees. Executive officers, in turn, may
further deleg ate respons ibilities, as appropriate, to management-
level committees, management routines or individuals. Executive
officers review our activities for consistency with our Risk
Framework, Risk Appetite Statement and applicable strategic,
capital and financial operating plans, as well as applicable
policies, standards, procedures and processes. Executive
officers and other employees make decisions individually on a
day-to-day basis, consistent with the authority they have been
delegated. Executive officers and other emplo yees may also
serve on committees and participate in committee decisions.
Front Line Units
FLUs, which  include the lines of business as well as the Global
Technology and Operations Group, are responsible for
appropriately assessing and effectively managing all of the risks
associated with their activities.
Three organizational units that include FLU activities and
control function activitie s, but are not part of IRM are first, the
Chief Financial Officer (CFO) Group; second, Environmental,
Social and Governance (ESG), Capital Deployment (CD) and
Public Policy (PP); and third, the Chief Administrative Officer
(CAO) Group.
Independent Risk Management
IRM is part of our control functions and includes Global Risk
Management. We have other control functions that are not part
of IRM (other control functions may also provide oversight to
FLU activitie s), including  Legal, Global Human Resources and
certain activities within the CFO Group; ESG, CD and PP; and
CAO Group. IRM, led by the Chief Risk Officer (CRO), is
responsible for independently assessing and overseeing risks
within FLUs and other control functions. IRM establishes written
enterprise policies and procedures that include concentration risk
limits, where appropriate. Such policies and procedures outline
how aggregate risks are identified, measured, monitored and
controlled.
The CRO has the stature, authority and independence to
develop and impleme nt a meaningful risk management
framework. The CRO has unrestricted access to the Board and
reports direc tly to both the ERC and to the CEO. Global Risk
Management is organized into horizontal risk teams that cover a
specific risk area and vertical CRO teams that cover a particular
front line unit or control function. These teams work
collaboratively in executing their respective duties.
Corporate Audit
Corporate Audit and the CAE maintain their independence from
the FLUs, IRM and other control functions by reporting directly to
the Audit Committee or the Board. The CAE administratively
reports to the CEO. Corporate Audit provid es independent
assessment and validation through testing of key processes and
controls across the Corp oration. Corporate Audit includes Credit
Review which periodically tests and examines  credit portfolios
and processes.
Risk Management Processes
The Risk Framework requires that strong risk management
practices are integrated in key strategic, capital and financial
planning processes and in day-to-day business processes
across the Corporation, with a goal of ensuring risks are
appropriately considered, evaluated and responded to in a timely
manner . We employ our risk management process, referred to as
Identify , Measure, Monitor and Control, as part of our daily
activities.
Identify – To be effectively managed, risks must be clearly
defined and proactively identified. Proper risk identification
focuses on recognizing and understanding key risks inherent
in our business activitie s or key risks that may arise from
external factors. Each employee is expected to identify and
escalate risks promptly . Risk identification is an ongoing
process, incorporating input from FLUs and control functions,
designed to be forward looking and capture relevant risk
factors across all of our lines of business.
Measure – Once a risk is identified, it must be prioritized and
accurately measured through a systematic risk quantification
process including quantitative and qualitative components.
Risk is measured at various levels including, but not limited
to, risk type, FLU, legal entity and on an aggregate basis.
This risk quantification process helps to capture changes in
our risk profile due to changes in strategic direction,
concentrations, portfolio  quality and the overall economic
environment. Senior management consider s how risk
exposures might evolve under a variety of stress scenarios.
Monitor – We monitor risk levels regularly to track adherence to
risk appetite, policies, standards, procedures and processes.
We also regularly update risk assessments and review risk
exposures. Through our monitoring, we can determine our
level of risk relative to limits and can take actio n in a timely
manner . We also can determine when risk limits are breached
and have processes to appropriately report and escalate
exceptions. This includes requests for approval to managers
and alerts to executiv e management, management-level
committees or the Board (directly or through an appropriate
committee).
Control – We establish and comm unicate risk limits and controls
through policies, standards, procedures and processes that
define the responsibilities and authority for risk-taking. The
limits and controls can be adjusted by the Board or
management when conditions or risk tolerances warrant.
These limits may be absolute (e.g., loan amount, trading
volume) or relative (e.g., percentage of loan book in higher-
risk categories). Our lines of business are held accountable
to perform within the established limits.
The formal processes used to manage risk represent a part of
our overall risk management process. We instill a strong and
comprehensive culture  of managing risk well through
communications, training, policies, procedures and
organizational roles and responsibilities. Establishing a culture
reflective of our purpose to help make our customers’  financial
lives better and delivering our responsible growth strategy is also
critical to effective risk management. We understand that
improper actions, behaviors or practices that are illegal, unethical
or contrary to our core values could result in harm to the
Corporation, our shareholders or our custome rs, damage the
integrity of the financial markets, or negatively impact our
reputation, and have established protocols and structures so that
such conduct risk is governed and reported across the
Corporation. Specifically , our Code of Conduct provides a
framework for all of our employees to conduct themselves with
the highest integrity . Additionally , we continue to strengthen the
link between  the employee performance management process
and individu al compens ation to encourage employees to work
toward enterprise-wide risk goals.
  Bank of America    44
Corporation-wide Stress Testing
Integral to our Capital Planning, Financial Planning and Strategic
Planning processes, we conduct capital scenario management
and stress forecasting on a periodic basis to better understand
balance sheet, earnings and capital sensitiv ities to certain
economic and business scenarios, including economic and
market conditions that are more severe than anticipated. These
stress forecasts provide an understanding of the potential
impacts from our risk profile on the balance sheet, earnings and
capital, and serve as a key component of our capital and risk
management practices. The intent of stress testing is to develop
a comprehensive understanding of potential impacts of on- and
off-balance sheet risks at the Corporation and how they impact
financial resiliency , which provides confidence to management,
regulators and our investors.
Contingency Planning
We have developed and maintain contingency plans that are
designed to prepare us in advance to respond in the event of
potential adverse econo mic, financial or market stress. These
contingency plans include our Capital Contingency Plan and
Financial Contingency and Recovery Plan, which provide
monitoring, escalation, actions and routines designed to enable
us to increase capital, access funding sources and reduce risk
through consideration of potential options that include asset
sales, business sales, capital or debt issuances, or other de-
risking strategies. We also maintain a Resolution Plan to limit
adverse systemic impacts that could be associated with a
potential resolution of Bank of America.
Strategic Risk Management
Strategic risk is embedd ed in every business and is one of the
major risk categories along with credit, market, liquidity ,
compliance, operational  and reputational risks. This risk results
from incorrect assumptions about external or internal factors,
inappropriate business plans, ineffective business strategy
execution, or failure to respond in a timely manner to changes in
the regulato ry, macroec onomic or competitive environments, in
the geographic locations in which we operate, such as
competitor actions, changing customer preferences, product
obsolescence and technology developments. Our strategic plan
is consisten t with our risk appetite, capital plan and liquidity
requirements, and specifically addresses strategic risks.
On an annual basis, the Board reviews and approves the
strategic plan, capital plan, financial operating plan and Risk
Appetite Statement. With oversight by the Board, executive
management directs the lines of business to execute our
strategic plan consistent with our core operating principles and
risk appetite. The executive management team monitors
business performance throughout the year and provides the
Board with regular progress reports on whether strategic
objectives and timelines are being met, including reports on
strategic risks and if additional or alternative actions need to be
considered or implemented. The regular executive reviews focus
on assessing forecasted earnings and returns on capital, the
current risk profile, current capital and liquidi ty requirements,
staffing levels and changes required to support the strategic
plan, stress testing results, and other qualitative factors such as
market growth rates and peer analysis.
Significant strategic actio ns, such as capital actions, material
acquisitions or divestitures, and resolution plans are reviewed
and approved by the Board. At the business level, processes are
in place to discuss the strategic risk implic ations of new,
expanded or modified businesses, products or services and
other strategic initiatives, and to provide formal review and
approval where required . With oversight by the Board and the
ERC, executive management performs similar analyses througho ut the year, and
evaluates changes to the financial forecast or the risk, capital or
liquidity positions as deemed appropriate to balance and
optimize achieving the targeted risk appetite, shareholder returns
and maintaining the targeted financial strength. Proprietary
models are used to measure the capital require ments for credit,
country , market, operational and strategic risks. The allocated
capital assigned to each business is based on its unique risk
profile. With oversight by the Board, executive management
assesses the risk-adjusted returns of each business in approving
strategic and financial operating plans. The businesses use
allocated capital to define business strategies, and price
products and transactions.
Capital Management
The Corporation manages its capital position so that its capital is
more than adequate to support its business activities and aligns
with risk, risk appetite and strategic planning. Additionally , we
seek to maintain safety and soundness at all times, even under
adverse scenarios, take advantage of organic growth
opportunities, meet obligations to creditors and counterparties,
maintain ready access to financial markets, continue to serve as
a credit intermediary , remain a source of strength for our
subsidiaries, and satisfy current and future regulatory capital
requirements. Capital management is integrated into our risk and
governance processes, as capital is a key consideration in the
development of our strategic plan, risk appetite and risk limits.
We conduct an Internal Capital Adequacy Assessment
Process (ICAAP) on a periodic basis. The ICAAP  is a forward-
looking assessment of our projected capital needs and
resources, incorporatin g earnings, balance sheet and risk
forecasts under baseline and adverse economic and market
conditions. We utilize periodic stress tests to assess the potential
impacts to our balance sheet, earnings, regulatory capital and
liquidity under a variety of stress scenarios. We perform
qualitative risk assessments to identify and assess material risks
not fully captured in our forecasts or stress tests. We assess the
potential capital impacts of proposed changes to regulatory
capital requirements. Management assesses ICAAP  results and
provides documented quarterly assessments of the adequacy of
our capital guidelines and capital position to the Board or its
committees.
We periodic ally review capital allocated to our businesses
and allocate capital annually during the strategic and capital
planning processes. For more information, see Business
Segment Operations  on page 32.
CCAR and Capital Planning
The Federal Reserve requires BHCs to submit a capital plan and
requests for capital actions on an annual basis, consistent with
the rules governing the Comprehensive Capital Analysis and
Review (CCAR) capital plan.
On June 27, 2019, following the Federal Reserve’ s non-
objection to our 2019 CCAR capital plan, the Board authorized
the repurchase of approximately $30.9 billion in common stock
from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, which includes
approximately $900 million to offset shares awarded under
equity-based compensation plans during the same period.
During 2019, pursuant to the Board’ s authorizations, including
those related to our 2018 CCAR capital plan that expired June
30, 2019, we repurchased $28.1 billion  of common  stock, which
includes common stock repurchases to offset equity-based
compensation awards. At December 31, 2019, our remaining
stock repurchase authorization was $15.6 billion .
Our stock repurchases are subject to various factors,
including the Corporati on’s capital position, liquidity , financial
performance and alternative uses of capital, stock trading price
and general
45     Bank of America
 
market cond itions, and may be suspended at any time. The
repurchases may be effected through open market purchases or
privately negotiated transactions, including repurchase plans that
satisfy the conditions of Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended (Exchange Act).
Regulatory Capital
As a financ ial services  holding company , we are subject to
regulatory capital rules, including Basel 3, issued by U.S.
banking regulators. Basel 3 established minimum capital ratios
and buffer requirements and outlined two methods of calculating
risk-weighted assets, the Standardized approach and the
Advanced approaches.  The Standardized approach relies
primarily on supervisory risk weights based on exposure type,
and the Advanced approaches determine risk weights based on
internal models.
The Corporation's depository institution subsidia ries are also
subject to the Prompt Corrective Action (PCA) framework. The
Corporation and its primary affiliated banking entity , BANA, are
Advanced approaches institutions under Basel 3 and are
required to report regulatory risk-based capital ratios and risk-
weighted assets under both the Standardized and Advanced
approaches. The approach that yields the lower ratio is used to
assess capital adequacy including under the PCA framework. As
of December 31, 2019 , the Common equity tier 1 (CET1) and
Tier 1 capital ratios for the Corporation were lower under the
Standardized approach  whereas the Advanced approaches
yielded a lower Total capital ratio.
Minimum Capital Requirements
Minimum capital requir ements and related buffers were fully
phased in as of January 1, 2019. The PCA framework
established categories of capitalization, including well
capitalized, based on the Basel 3 regulato ry ratio requirements. U.S. banking
regulators are required to take certain mandatory actions
depending on the category of capitalization, with no mandatory
actions required for well-capitalized banking organizations.
In order to avoid restrictions on capital distributions and
discretionary bonus payments, the Corporation must meet risk-
based capital ratio requirements that include a capital
conservation buffer greater than 2.5 percent, plus any applicable
countercyclical capital buffer and a global systemically important
bank (G-SIB) surcharge. The buffers and surcharge must be
comprised solely of CET1 capital.
The Corporation is also required to maintain a minimum
supplementary leverage ratio (SLR) of 3.0 percent plus a
leverage buffer of 2.0 percent in order to avoid certain
restrictions on capital distributions and discretionary bonus
payments. Our insured  depository institution subsidiaries are
required to maintain a minimum 6.0 perce nt SLR to be
considered well capitalized under the PCA framework. The
numerator of the SLR is quarter-end Basel 3 Tier 1 capital. The
denominator is total leverage exposure based on the daily
average of the sum of on-balance sheet exposures less
permitted Tier 1 deduct ions, as well as the simple average of
certain off-balance sheet exposures, as of the end of each month
in a quarter .
Capital Composition and Ratios
Table 11 presents Bank of America Corporation’ s capital ratios
and related information in accordance with Basel 3 Standardized
and Advanced approaches as measured at December 31, 2019
and 2018 . As of the periods presented herein, the Corp oration
met the definition of well capitalized under current regulatory
requirements.
  Bank of America    46
Table
11 Bank of America Corporation Regulatory Capital under Basel 3  
 Standardized
ApproachAdvanced
ApproachesRegulatory
Minimum (1)
(Dollars in millions, except as noted) December 31, 2019
Risk-based capital metrics:  
Common equity tier 1 capital$ 166,760 $ 166,760  
Tier 1 capital188,492 188,492  
Total capital (2)221,230 213,098  
Risk-weighted assets (in billions)1,493 1,447  
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio11.2% 11.5% 9.5%
Tier 1 capital ratio12.6 13.0 11.0
Total capital ratio14.8 14.7 13.0
Leverage-based metrics:  
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) (3)$ 2,374 $ 2,374  
Tier 1 leverage ratio7.9% 7.9% 4.0
SLR leverage exposure (in billions)$ 2,946  
SLR6.4% 5.0
December 31, 2018
Risk-based capital metrics:
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 167,272 $ 167,272
Tier 1 capital 189,038 189,038
Total capital (2)221,304 212,878
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,437 1,409
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 11.6% 11.9% 8.25%
Tier 1 capital ratio 13.2 13.4 9.75
Total capital ratio 15.4 15.1 11.75
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) (3)$ 2,258 $ 2,258
Tier 1 leverage ratio 8.4% 8.4% 4.0
SLR leverage exposure (in billions)$ 2,791  
SLR6.8% 5.0
(1) The capit al conservation buffer and G-SIB surcharge were 2.5 percen t at December 31, 2019 and 1.875 percent at December 31, 2018. The countercyclic al capital buffer for both periods was zero. The
SLR minimum includes a leverage buf fer of 2.0 percent.
(2) Total capital under the Advanced approaches dif fers from the Standardized approach due to dif ferences in the amount permitted in Tier 2 capital related to the qualifying allowance for credit losses.
(3) Reflects total average assets adjusted for certain Tier 1 capital deductions.
At December 31, 2019 , CET1  capital and Total capital under
the Advanced approaches were relatively unchanged compared
to December 31, 2018 . Risk-weighted assets under the
Standardized approach, which yielded the lower CET1 capital
ratio at December 31, 2019 , incre ased $56.3 billion during 2019
to $1,493 billion primarily due to loan growth and increased client activity in
Global Markets  and Global Banking .
Table 12 shows the capital composition at December 31,
2019  and 2018 .
Table 12Capital Composition under Basel 3
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Total common shareholders’ equity $ 241,409 $ 242,999
Goodwill, net of related deferred tax liabilities (68,570) (68,572)
Deferred tax assets arising from net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards (5,193) (5,981)
Intangibles, other than mortgage servicing rights and goodwill, net of related deferred tax liabilities (1,328) (1,294)
Other 442 120
Common equity tier 1 capital 166,760 167,272
Qualifying preferred stock, net of issuance cost 22,329 22,326
Other (597) (560)
Tier 1 capital 188,492 189,038
Tier 2 capital instruments 22,538 21,887
Eligible credit reserves included in Tier 2 capital 2,097 1,972
Other (29) (19)
Total capital under the Advanced approaches $ 213,098 $ 212,878
47     Bank of America
 
Table 13  shows the components of risk-weighted assets as measured under Basel 3 at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table
13 Risk-weighted Assets under Basel 3     
 Standardized
ApproachAdvanced
ApproachesStandardized
Approach Advanced
Approaches
 December 31
(Dollars in billions) 2019 2018
Credit risk $ 1,437 $ 858 $ 1,384 $ 827
Market risk 56 55 53 52
Operational risk n/a 500 n/a 500
Risks related to credit valuation adjustments n/a 34 n/a 30
Total risk-weighted assets $ 1,493 $ 1,447 $ 1,437 $ 1,409
n/a = not applicable
Bank of America, N.A. Regulatory Capital
Table 14 presents regulatory capital information for BANA in accordance with Basel 3 Standardized and Advanced approaches as
measured at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . BANA  met the definition of well capitalized under the PCA  framework at both year ends.
Table
14 Bank of America, N.A. Regulatory Capital under Basel 3  
 Standardized
ApproachAdvanced
ApproachesRegulatory
Minimum (1)
(Dollars in millions, except as noted)
December 31, 2019
Risk-based capital metrics:   
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 154,626 $ 154,626  
Tier 1 capital 154,626 154,626  
Total capital (2) 166,567 158,665  
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,241 991  
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 12.5% 15.6% 7.0%
Tier 1 capital ratio 12.5 15.6 8.5
Total capital ratio 13.4 16.0 10.5
Leverage-based metrics:    
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) (3) $ 1,780 $ 1,780  
Tier 1 leverage ratio 8.7% 8.7% 5.0
SLR leverage exposure (in billions) $ 2,177  
SLR 7.1% 6.0
December 31, 2018
Risk-based capital metrics:   
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 149,824 $ 149,824  
Tier 1 capital 149,824 149,824  
Total capital (2) 161,760 153,627  
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,195 959  
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 12.5% 15.6% 6.5%
Tier 1 capital ratio 12.5 15.6 8.0
Total capital ratio 13.5 16.0 10.0
Leverage-based metrics:    
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) (3) $ 1,719 $ 1,719  
Tier 1 leverage ratio 8.7% 8.7% 5.0
SLR leverage exposure (in billions) $ 2,112  
SLR  7.1% 6.0
(1) Risk-based capital  regulatory minimums at December 31, 2019 are the minimum ratios under Base l 3 including a capital conservation buffer of 2.5 percen t. The regulatory minimums for the leverage
ratios as of both period ends and risk-based capital ratios as of December 31, 2018 are the percent required to be considered well capitalized under the PCA  framework.
(2) Total capital under the Advanced approaches dif fers from the Standardized approach due to dif ferences in the amount permitted in Tier 2 capital related to the qualifying allowance for credit losses.
(3) Reflects total average assets adjusted for certain Tier 1 capital deductions.
Total Loss-Absorbing Capacity Requirements
Effective January 1, 2019, the Corporation is subject to the
Federal Reserve’ s final rule requiring G-SIBs to maintain
minimum levels of total loss-absorbing capac ity (TLAC) and
long-term debt. TLAC consists of the Corporation’ s Tier 1 capital
and eligible long-term debt issued directly by the Corporation.
Eligible long-term debt for TLAC ratios is comprised of
unsecured debt that has a remaining maturity of at least one year and satisfies additional
requirements as prescribed in the TLAC final rule. As with the
risk-based capital ratios and SLR, the Corporation is required to
maintain TLAC ratios in excess of minimum requirements plus
applicable buffers to avoid restrictions on capital distributions
and discretionary bonus payments. Table 15 presents the
Corporation's TLAC and long-term debt ratios and related
information as of December 31, 2019 .
  Bank of America    48
Table
15 Bank of America Corporation Total Loss-Absorbing Capacity and Long-Term Debt
 TLAC  Regulatory
Minimum (1)Long-term
Debt  Regulatory
Minimum (2)
(Dollars in millions)
December 31, 2019
Total eligible balance $ 367,449 $ 171,349  
Percentage of risk-weighted assets (3) 24.6% 22.0% 11.5% 8.5%
Percentage of SLR leverage exposure 12.5 9.5 5.8 4.5
(1) The TLAC  risk-we ighted assets regulatory minimum consists of 18.0 percent plus a TLAC risk-weighted assets buffer comprised of 2.5 percent plus the method 1 G-SIB surcharge of 1.5 percent.
The coun tercyclical buffer is zero for this period. The TLAC SLR leverage exposure regulatory minimum consists of 7.5 percent plus a 2.0 percent TLAC leverage buffer. The TLAC risk-weighted
assets and leverage buf fers must be comprised solely of CET1 capital and Tier 1 capital, respectively .
(2) The long- term debt risk-weighted assets regulatory minimum is comprised of 6.0 percent plus an additional 2.5 percent requirement based on the Corporation’ s method 2 G-SIB surcharge. The
long-term debt leverage exposure regulatory minimum is 4.5 percent .
(3) The approach that yields the higher risk-weighted assets is used to calculate TLAC and long-term debt ratios, which was the Standardized approach as of December 31, 2019 .
Regulatory Capital and Securities Regulation
The Corpora tion’s princ ipal U.S. broker-dealer subsidiaries are
BofA  Securities, Inc. (BofAS), Merrill Lynch Profe ssional Clearing
Corp. (MLPCC) and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
Incorporated (MLPF&S) . BofAS was formed as a result of the
reorganization of MLPF&S which was completed in May 2019.
The Corporation's principal European broker-de aler subsidiaries
are Merrill Lynch International (MLI) and BofA  Securities Europe
SA (BofASE).
The U.S. broker-dealer subsidiaries are subject to the net
capital requirements of Rule 15c3-1 under the Exchange Act.
BofAS computes its minimum capital requirements as an
alternative net capital broker-dealer under Rule 15c3-1, and
MLPCC and MLPF& S compute their minimum capital
requirements in accordance with the alternative  standard under
Rule 15c3-1 . BofAS and MLPCC are also registered as futures
commission merchants and are subject to U.S. Commodity
Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) Regulation 1.17.
BofAS provi des institutional services, and in accordance with
the alternative net capital requirements, is required to maintain
tentative net capital in excess of $1.0 billion and net capital in
excess of the greater of $500 million or a certa in percentage of
its reserve requirement. BofAS must also notify the Securities
and Exchange Commission (SEC) in the event  its tentative net
capital is less than $5.0 billion. BofAS is also required to hold a
certain percentage of its risk-based margin in order to meet its
CFTC minimum net capital requirement. At December 31, 2019 ,
BofAS had tentative net capital of $12.5 billion. BofAS also had
regulatory net capital of $10.4 billion which exceeded the
minimum requirement of $2.4 billion.
MLPCC is a fully-gua ranteed subsidiary of BofAS and
provides clearing and settlement services. At December 31,
2019 , MLPCC’ s regulatory net capital of $5.3 billion exceeded
the minimum requirement of $1.3 billion.
MLPF&S provides retail services. At December 31, 2019 ,
MLPF&S' regulatory net capital was $4.1 billion which exceeded
the minimum requirement of $102 million.
Our European broker-dealers are regulated by non-U.S.
regulators. MLI, a U.K. investment firm, is regulated by the
Prudential Regulation Authority and the FCA and is subject to
certain regulatory capital requirements. At December 31, 2019 ,
MLI’s capital resources were $34.8 billion, which exceeded the
minimum Pillar 1 require ment of $13.9 billion. BofASE, a French
investment firm, is regulated by the Autorité de Contrôle
Prudentiel et de Résolution and the Autorité des Marchés
Financiers, and is subject to certain regulatory capital
requirements. At December 31, 2019 , BofASE's capital
resources were $5.5 billion which exceeded the minimum Pillar 1
requirement of $1.3 billion. Regulatory Developments
Revisions to Basel 3 to Address Current Expected
Credit Loss Accounting
On January 1, 2020, the Corporation adopted the new
accounting standard that requires the measurement of the
allowance for credit losses to be based on management’ s best
estimate of lifetime expected credit losses inherent in the
Corporation's relevant financial assets. For more information,
see Note 1 - Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements. Our adoption of the standard
resulted in a decrease to the CET1 capital ratio of 17 bps, which
will be phased in evenly , or approximately four bps per year, at
the beginning of each year from January 1, 2020 through
January 1, 2023 in accordance with transition provisions issued
by the U.S. banking regulators.
Security-Based Swap Dealer Capital, Margin and
Segregation Requirements
On June 21, 2019, the SEC published a final rule establishing
capital, margin and segregation requirements for security-based
swap dealers (SBSDs). The final rule increases the minimum net
capital requirements for broker-dealers authorized to use internal
models to compute alternative net capital (ANC broker-dealers).
For ANC broker-dealers, the minimum tenta tive net capital
requirement increased from $1.0 billion to $5.0 billion, and the
net capital requirement was raised to the greater of $1.0 billion or
two percent of the applicable risk-margin amount (initial margin
maintained for cleared and non-cleared security-based swaps)
plus two percent of certain customer-related assets. For stand-
alone SBSDs that use models to calculate haircu ts, the minimum
tentative net capital requirement is $100 million and the minimum
net capital requirement  is the greater of $20 million or two
percent of the risk-margin amount.
Capital Requirements for Swap Dealers
On December 10, 2019, the CFTC re-opened the comment
period on its 2016 proposal to establish capital requirements for
swap dealers and major swap participants that are not subject to
existing U.S. prudential regulation. Under the proposal,
applicable subsidiaries of the Corporation would be permitted to
elect one of two approaches to compute their regulatory capital.
The first approach is a bank-based capital approach which
requires that firms maintain CET1 capital greater than or equal to
the larger of 8.0 percent of the entity’ s RWA as calculated under
Basel 3, or 8.0 percent of the margin of the entity’ s cleared and
uncleared swaps, security-based swaps, futures and foreign
futures positions. The second approach is based on net liquid
assets and requires that a firm maintain net capital greater than
or equal to 8.0 percent of the margin as descr ibed above. The
proposal also includes liquidity and reporting requirements.
49     Bank of America
 
Single-Counterparty Credit Limits
The Federal Reserve established single-counterp arty credit limits
(SCCL) for BHCs with total consolidated assets of $250 billion or
more. The SCCL  rule is designed to ensure that the maximum
possible loss that a BHC could incur due to the default of a
single counterparty or a group of connected counterparties would
not endang er the BHC’ s survival, thereby  reducing the
probability of future financial crises. Beginning January 1, 2020,
G-SIBs must calculate SCCL  on a daily basis  by dividing the
aggregate net credit exposure to a given counte rparty by the G-
SIB’s Tier 1 capital, ensuring that exposures to other G-SIBs and
nonbank financial institu tions regulated by the Federal Reserve
do not breac h 15 percent of Tier 1 capital and exposures to most
other counterparties do not breach 25 percent of Tier 1 capital.
Certain expo sures, including exposures to the U.S. government,
U.S. gover nment-sponsored entities and qualifying central
counterparties, are exempt from the credit limits.
Liquidity Risk
Funding and Liquidity Risk Management
Our primary liquidity risk management objective is to meet
expected or unexpected cash flow and collateral needs while
continuing to support our businesses and customers under a
range of economic conditions. To achieve that objective, we
analyze and monitor our liquidity risk under expected and
stressed conditions, maintain liquidity and access to diverse
funding sources, including our stable deposit base, and seek to
align liquidity-related incentives and risks.
We define liquidity as readily available assets, limited to cash
and high-quality , liquid, unencumbered securit ies that we can
use to meet our contractual and contingent financial obligations
as those obligations arise. We manage our liquidity position
through line of business and ALM activities, as well as through
our legal entity funding strategy , on both a forward and current
(including intraday) basis under both expected and stressed
conditions. We believe that a centralized approach to funding
and liquidity  management enhances our ability to monitor
liquidity requirements, maximizes access to funding sources,
minimizes borrowing costs and facilitates timely responses to
liquidity events.
The Board approves our liquidity risk policy and the Financial
Contingency and Recovery Plan. The ERC establishes our
liquidity risk tolerance levels. The MRC is responsible for
overseeing liquidity risks and directing management to maintain
exposures within the established tolerance levels. The MRC
reviews and monitors our liquidity position and stress testing
results, approves certain liquidity risk limits and reviews the
impact of strategic decisions on our liquidity . For more
information, see Managing Risk on page 42. Under this
governance framework, we have developed certain funding and
liquidity risk manageme nt practices which include: maintaining
liquidity at the parent  company and select ed subsidiaries,
including our bank subsidiaries and other regulated entities;
determining what amounts of liquidity are appropriate for these
entities base d on analysis of debt maturities and other potential
cash outflows, including those that we may experience during
stressed market conditions; diversifying funding sources,
considering our asset profile and legal entity structure; and
performing contingency planning.
NB Holdings Corporation
We have intercompa ny arrangements with certain key
subsidiaries under which we transferred certain assets of Bank
of America Corporation, as the parent company , which is a
separate and distinct legal entity from our banki ng and nonbank
subsidiaries, and agreed to transfer certain additional parent company assets
not needed to satisfy anticipated near-term expenditures, to NB
Holdings Corporation, a wholly-owned holding company
subsidiary (NB Holdings). The parent company is expected to
continue to have access  to the same flow of dividends, interest
and other amounts of cash necessary to servi ce its debt, pay
dividends and perform other obligations as it would have had if it
had not entered into these arrangements and transferred any
assets.
In consideration for the transfer of assets, NB Holdings
issued a subordinated note to the parent company in a principal
amount equal to the value of the transferred assets. The
aggregate principal amount of the note will increase by the
amount of any future asset transfers. NB Holdings also provided
the parent company with a committed line of credit that allows
the parent company to draw funds necessary to service near-
term cash needs. Thes e arrangements support our preferred
single point of entry resolution strategy , under which only the
parent company would be resolved under the U.S. Bankruptcy
Code. These  arrangeme nts include provisions to terminate the
line of credit, forgive the subordinated note and require the
parent company to transfer its remaining financial assets to NB
Holdings if our projec ted liquidity resources deteriorate so
severely that resolution of the parent company becomes
imminent.
Global Liquidity Sources and Other Unencumbered
Assets
We maintain liquidity available to the Corporation, including the
parent company and selected subsidiaries, in the form of cash
and high-quality , liquid, unencumbered securities. Our liquidity
buffer, referred to as Global Liquidity Sources (GLS), is
comprised of assets that are readily available to the parent
company and selected subsidiaries, including holding company ,
bank and broker-dealer subsidiaries, even during stressed
market cond itions. Our cash is primarily on deposit with the
Federal Reserve Bank and, to a lesser extent, central banks
outside of the U.S. We limit the composition  of high-quality ,
liquid, unenc umbered securities to U.S. govern ment securities,
U.S. agency securities, U.S. agency MBS and a select group of
non-U.S. government securities. We can quickly obtain cash for
these securities, even in stressed conditions, through repurchase
agreements or outright sales. We hold our GLS in legal entities
that allow us to meet the liquidity requirements of our global
businesses, and we consider the impact of potential regulatory ,
tax, legal and other restrictions that could limit the transferability
of funds among entities.
Table 16 presents average GLS for the three months ended
December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table 16Average Global Liquidity Sources
  Three Months Ended
December 31
(Dollars in billions) 2019  2018
Parent company and NB Holdings $ 59 $ 76
Bank subsidiaries 454 420
Other regulated entities 63 48
Total Average Global Liquidity Sources$ 576 $ 544
Typically , parent company and NB Holdings liquidity is in the
form of cash deposited with BANA.
Our bank subsidiaries’  liquidity is primarily driven by deposit
and lending activity , as well as securities valuat ion and net debt
activity . Liquidity at bank subsidiaries excludes the cash
deposited by the parent company and NB Holdings. Our bank
subsidiaries can also generate incremental liquidity by pledging a
range of unencumbered loans and securities to certain FHLBs
and the Federal Reserv e Discount Window . The cash we could
have
  Bank of America    50
obtained by borrowing against this pool of spec ifically-identified
eligible assets was $372 billion  and $344 billion  at December 31,
2019  and 2018 . We have established operational procedures to
enable us to borrow against these assets, including regularly
monitoring our total pool of eligible loans and securities
collateral. Eligibility is defined in guidelines from the FHLBs and
the Federal Reserve and is subject to change at their discretion.
Due to regulatory restrictions, liquidity generated by the bank
subsidiaries can generally be used only to fund obligations within
the bank subsidiaries, and transfers to the parent company or
nonbank subsidiaries may be subject to prior regulatory
approval.
Liquidity held in other regulated entities, comprised primarily
of broker-dealer subsidiaries, is primarily available to meet the
obligations of that entity and transfers to the parent company or
to any other subsidiar y may be subject to prior regulatory
approval due to regulatory restrictions and minimum
requirements. Our other regulated entiti es also hold
unencumbered investme nt-grade securities and equities that we
believe could be used to generate additional liquidity .
Table 17 presents the compositi on of average GLS for the
three months ended December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table 17Average Global Liquidity Sources
Composition
  Three Months Ended
December 31
(Dollars in billions) 2019  2018
Cash on deposit $ 103 $ 113
U.S. Treasury securities 98 81
U.S. agency securities and mortgage-backed
securities 358 340
Non-U.S. government securities 17 10
Total Average Global Liquidity Sources$ 576 $ 544
Our GLS are substanti ally the same in composition to what
qualifies as High Quality Liquid Assets (HQLA) under the final
U.S. Liquidity Coverage Ratio (LCR) rules. However , HQLA  for
purposes of calculating LCR is not reported at market value, but
at a lower value that incorporates regulatory deductions and the
exclusion of excess liquidity held at certain subsidiaries. The
LCR is calculated as the amount of a financial institution’ s
unencumbered HQLA  relative to the estimated net cash outflows
the institution could enco unter over a 30-day period of significant
liquidity stress, expressed as a percentage . Our average
consolidated HQLA, on a net basis, was $464 billion and $446
billion  for the three months ended December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
For the same periods, the average consolidated LCR was 116
percent  and 118 percent . Our LCR fluctuates due to normal
business flows from customer activity .
Liquidity Stress Analysis
We utilize liquidity stress  analysis to assist us in determining the
appropriate amounts of liquidity to maintain at the parent
company and our subsidiaries to meet contractual and
contingent cash outflows under a range of scenarios. The
scenarios we consider and utilize incorporate market-wide and
Corporation-specific events, including potential credit rating
downgrades for the parent company and our subsidiaries, and
more severe  events including potential resolutio n scenarios. The
scenarios are based on our historical experience, experience of
distressed and failed financial institutions, regulatory guidance,
and both expected and unexpected future events.
The types of potential contractual and contingent cash
outflows we consider in our scenarios may include, but are not
limited to, upcoming contractual maturities of unsecured debt
and reductions in new debt issuance; diminished access to
secured financing markets; potential deposit withdrawals; increase d draws on loan
commitments, liquidity facilities and letters of credit; additional
collateral that counterparties could call if our credit ratings were
downgraded; collateral and margin requireme nts arising from
market value changes; and potential liquidity required to maintain
businesses and finance customer activities. Changes in certain
market factors, including, but not limited to, credit rating
downgrades, could negatively impact potential contractual and
contingent outflows and the related financial instruments, and in
some cases these impacts could be material to our financial
results.
We consider  all sources of funds that we could access during
each stress scenario and focus particularly on matching
available sources with corresponding liquidity requirements by
legal entity. We also use the stress modeling results to manage
our asset and liability profile and establish limits and guidelines
on certain funding sources and businesses.
Net Stable Funding Ratio
U.S. banking regulators issued a proposal for a Net Stable
Funding Ratio (NSFR) requirement applicable to U.S. financial
institutions following the Basel Committee’ s final standard. The
proposed U.S. NSFR would apply to the Corporation on a
consolidated basis and to our insured depos itory institutions.
While the final requirement remains pending and is subject to
change, if finalized as proposed, we expect to be in compliance
within the regulatory timeline. The standard is intended to reduce
funding risk over a longer time horizon. The NSFR is designed to
provide an appropriate amount of stable funding, generally
capital and liabilities maturing beyond one year, given the mix of
assets and of f-balance sheet items.
Diversified Funding Sources
We fund our assets primarily with a mix of deposits, and secured
and unsecured liabilities through a centralized, globally
coordinated funding approach diversified across products,
programs, markets, currencies and investor groups.
The primary benefits of our centralized fundi ng approach
include greater control, reduced funding costs, wider name
recognition by investors and greater flexibility to meet the
variable funding requirements of subsidiaries. Where regulations,
time zone differences or other business cons iderations make
parent comp any funding  impractical, certain other subsidiaries
may issue their own debt.
We fund a substantial portion of our lending activities through
our deposits , which were $1.43 trillion  and $1.38 trillion  at
December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Deposits are primarily generated
by our Consumer Banking , GWIM  and Global Banking
segments. These deposits are diversified by clients, product type
and geograp hy, and the majority of our U.S. deposits are insured
by the FDIC . We consider a substantial portion of our deposits to
be a stable, low-cost and consistent source of funding. We
believe this deposit funding is generally less sensitive to interest
rate change s, market volatility or changes in our credit ratings
than wholesale funding sources. Our lending activities may also
be financed through secured borrowings, including credit card
securitizations and securitizations with government-sponsored
enterprises (GSE), the FHA and private-label investors, as well
as FHLB loans.
Our trading activities in other regulated entities are primarily
funded on a secured basis through securities lending and
repurchase agreements, and these amounts will vary based on
customer activity and market conditions. We believe funding
these activities in the secured financing markets is more cost-
efficient and less sensitive to changes in our credit ratings than
unsecured financing. Repurchase agreements are generally
short-term and
51     Bank of America
 
often overnight. Disruptions in secured financing markets for
financial institutions have occurred in prior market cycles which
resulted in adverse chan ges in terms or significant reductions in
the availabil ity of such financing. We manage the liquidity risks
arising from secured funding by sourcing funding globally from a
diverse group of counterparties, providing a range of securities
collateral and pursuing longer durations, when appropriate. For
more information on secured financing agreements, see Note 11
– Federal Funds Sold or Purchased, Secu rities Financing
Agreements, Short-term  Borrowings and Restricted Cash  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
We issue long-term unsecured debt in a variety of maturities
and currencies to achieve cost-ef ficient funding and to maintain
an appropriate maturity profile. While the cost and availability of
unsecured funding may be negatively impacted by general
market cond itions or by matters specific to the financial services
industry or the Corporat ion, we seek to mitigate refinancing risk
by actively managing the amount of our borrowings that we
anticipate will mature within any month or quarter .
Table 18 presents our long-term debt by major currency at
December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table 18Long-term Debt by Major Currency
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
U.S. dollar $ 191,284$ 180,724
Euro 32,781 34,328
British pound 5,067 5,450
Japanese yen 4,310 3,038
Canadian dollar 3,857 2,936
Australian dollar 1,957 1,722
Other 1,600 1,194
Total long-term debt $ 240,856$ 229,392
Total long-te rm debt increased  $11.5 billion  during 2019 ,
primarily due to debt issuances and valuation adjustments,
partially offset by maturit ies and redemptions. We may, from time
to time, purchase outstanding debt instrum ents in various
transactions, depending on market conditions, liquidity and other
factors. Our other regulated entities may also make markets in
our debt instruments to provide liquidity for investors.
During 2019 , the Corporation issued $52.5 billion  of long-term
debt consis ting of $29.3 billion  of notes issued by Bank of
America Corporation, substantially all of which was TLAC
compliant, $10.9 billion  of notes issued by Bank of America, N.A.
and $12.3 billion  of other debt, substan tially all of which was
structured liabilities. During 2018 , the Corporation issued $64.4
billion  of long-ter m debt consisting of $30.7 billion  of notes
issued by Bank of America Corporation, substantially all of which
was TLAC compliant, $18.7 billion  of notes issued by Bank of
America, N.A. and $15.0 billion  of other debt, substanti ally all of
which was structured liabilities.
During 2019 , the Corporation had total long-term debt
maturities and redemptions in the aggregate of $50.6 billion
consisting of $21.1 billion  for Bank of America Corporation, $19.9
billion  for Bank of America, N.A. and $9.6 billion of other debt.
During 2018 , the Corporation had total long-term debt maturities
and redemptions in the aggregate of $53.3 billion  consi sting of
$29.8 billion  for Bank of America Corporation, $11.2 billion  for
Bank of America, N.A. and $12.3 billion  of other debt.
At December 31, 2019 , Bank of America Corporation's senior
notes of $159.8 billion  included $107.7 billion  of outstanding
notes that are both TLAC eligible and callable at least one year
before their stated maturities. Of these senior notes, $7.4 billion
will be callable and become TLAC ineligible during 2020 , and
$11.7 billion , $14.8 billion , $10.7 billion  and $9.2 billion  will do so during
each of 2021  through 2024 , respectively , and $53.9 billion
thereafter .
We use derivative transactions to manage the duration,
interest rate and currency risks of our borrowings, considering
the characteristics of the assets they are funding. For more
information on our ALM activities, see Interest Rate Risk
Management for the Banking Book  on page 74.
We may issue unsecured debt in the form of structured notes
for client purposes, certain of which qualify as TLAC-eligible
debt. During 2019 , we issued  $9.6 billion of structure d notes,
which are debt obligatio ns that pay investors returns linked to
other debt or equity securities, indices, currencies or
commodities. We typically hedge the returns we are obligated to
pay on these liabilities with derivatives and/or investments in the
underlying instruments, so that from a funding perspective, the
cost is similar to our other unsecured long-term debt. We could
be required to settle certain structured note obligations for cash
or other securities prior to maturity under certain circumstances,
which we consider for liquidity planning purposes. We believe,
however , that a portion of such borrowings will remain
outstanding beyond the earliest put or redemption date.
Substantially all of our senior and subordinated debt
obligations contain no provisions that could trigger a requirement
for an early repayment, require additional collateral support,
result in changes to terms, accelerate maturity or create
additional financial obligations upon an adverse change in our
credit ratings, financial ratios, earnings, cash flows or stock price.
For more information on long-term debt funding, including
issuances and maturities and redemptions, see Note 12 – Long-
term Debt  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Contingency Planning
We maintain contingency funding plans that outline our potential
responses to liquidity stress events at various levels of severity .
These policies and plans are based on stress  scenarios and
include potential funding strategies and communication and
notification procedures that we would implement  in the event we
experienced stressed liquidity conditions. We periodically review
and test the contingenc y funding plans to validate efficacy and
assess readiness.
Our U.S. bank subsidiaries can access contingency funding
through the Federal Reserve Discount Window . Certain non-U.S.
subsidiaries have access to central bank facilities in the
jurisdictions in which they operate. While we do not rely on these
sources in our liquidity modeling, we maintain the policies,
procedures and governance processes that would enable us to
access these sources if necessary .
Credit Ratings
Our borrowing costs and ability to raise funds are impacted by
our credit ratings. In addition, credit ratings may be important to
customers or counterparties when we compete in certain
markets and when we seek to engage in certain transactions,
including over-the-coun ter (OTC) derivatives. Thus, it is our
objective to maintain  high-quality credit ratings, and
management maintains an active dialogue with the major rating
agencies.
Credit ratings and outlooks are opinions expressed by rating
agencies on our creditworthiness and that of our obligations or
securities, including long-term debt, short-te rm borrowings,
preferred stock and other securities, including asset
securitizations. Our credit ratings are subject to ongoing review
by the rating agencies, and they consider a number of factors,
including our own financial strength, performance, prospects and
operations as well as factors not under our control. The rating
  Bank of America    52
agencies could make adjustments to our ratings at any time, and
they provide no assuran ces that they will maintain our ratings at
current levels.
Other factors that influence our credit ratings include changes
to the rating agencies’  methodologies for our industry or certain
security types; the rating agencies’  assessment of the general
operating environment for financial services companies; our
relative positions in the markets in which we compete; our
various risk exposures and risk management policies and
activities; pending litigat ion and other contingencies or potential
tail risks; our reputation; our liquidity position, diversity of funding
sources and funding costs; the current and expected level and
volatility of our earnings; our capital position and capital
management practices; our corporate governance; the sovereign
credit ratings of the U.S. government; current or future regulatory
and legislative initiatives; and the agencies’  views on whether the
U.S. government would provide meaningful support to the
Corporation or its subsidiaries in a crisis.
On June 12, 2019, Fitch Ratings (Fitch) completed its
periodic review of the 12 large, complex secur ities trading and
universal banks, including Bank of America Corporation. The
agency affirmed the long-term and short-term senior debt ratings
of the Corpo ration and all of its rated subsidiaries, except Bank
of America Merrill Lynch Intern ational Designated Activity Company , which Fitch
upgraded by one notch to AA-/F1+. The rating outlook for all
long-term ratings is currently stable.
On March 6, 2019, Moody’ s Investors Service (Moody’ s)
upgraded the long-term and short-term ratings of the Corporation
by one notch to A2/P-1 from A3/P-2 for senior debt, as well as
the long-term ratings of its rated subsidiaries, including BANA,
which the agency upgraded to Aa2 from Aa3 for senior debt.
Moody’ s concurrently affirmed the short-term  ratings of the
Corporation’ s rated subsidiaries, including BANA . Moody’ s cited
the Corporation’ s strengthening profitability , continued adherence
to a conservative risk profile and stable capital ratios as rationale
for the upgrade. The rating outlook for all long-term ratings is
currently stable.
The ratings from Standa rd & Poor ’s Global Ratings (S&P) for
the Corporation and its subsidiaries did not chan ge during 2019 .
The long-term and short -term debt ratings of BofAS and BofASE,
which were initially rated by S&P during the first quarter 2019 ,
also remained unchanged during the rest of 2019 .
Table 19 presents the Corporation’ s current long-term/short-
term senior debt ratings  and outlooks expressed by the rating
agencies.
Table 19 Senior Debt Ratings
  Moody’s Investors Service Standard & Poor’s Global Ratings Fitch Ratings
 Long-
termShort-
term OutlookLong-
termShort-
term OutlookLong-
termShort-
term Outlook
Bank of America Corporation         A2         P-1       Stable          A-        A-2       Stable         A+         F1       Stable
Bank of America, N.A.        Aa2         P-1       Stable          A+        A-1       Stable        AA-         F1+       Stable
Bank of America Merrill Lynch International
Designated Activity Company         NR         NR         NR          A+        A-1       Stable        AA-         F1+       Stable
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
Incorporated         NR         NR         NR          A+        A-1       Stable        AA-         F1+       Stable
BofA Securities, Inc.         NR         NR         NR          A+        A-1       Stable        AA-         F1+       Stable
Merrill Lynch International         NR         NR         NR          A+        A-1       Stable         A+         F1       Stable
BofA Securities Europe SA         NR         NR         NR          A+        A-1       Stable         A+         F1       Stable
NR = not rated
A reduction in certain of our credit ratings or the ratings of
certain asset-backed securitizations may have a material
adverse effect on our liquidity , potential loss of access to credit
markets, the related cost of funds, our businesses and on certain
revenues, particularly in those businesses where counterparty
creditworthiness is critical. In addition, under the terms of certain
OTC derivative contracts and other trading agreements, in the
event of downgrades of our or our rated subsidiaries’  credit
ratings, the counterparties to those agreements may require us
to provide additional collateral, or to terminate these contracts or
agreements, which could cause us to sustain losses and/or
adversely impact our liquidity . If the short-term credit ratings of
our parent company , bank or broker-dealer subsidiaries were
downgraded by one or more levels, the potential loss of access
to short-term  funding sources such as repo financing and the
effect on our incremental cost of funds could be material.
While certa in potenti al impacts are contractual and
quantifiable, the full scope of the consequences of a credit rating
downgrade to a financial institution is inherently uncertain, as it
depends upon numerou s dynamic, complex and inter-related
factors and assumptions, including whether any downgrade of a
company’ s long-term credit ratings precipitates downgrades to its
short-term credit ratings, and assumptions about the potential
behaviors of various customers, investors and counterparties.
For more information on potential impacts of credit rating
downgrades, see Liquidity Risk – Liquidity Stress Analysis  on
page 51. For more information on additional collateral and termination
payments that could be required in connection with certain OTC
derivative contracts and other trading agreemen ts as a result of
such a credit rating downgrade, see Note 3 – Derivatives  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements  and Item 1A. Risk Factors .
Common Stock Dividends
For a summary of our declared quarterly cash dividends on
common stock during 2019  and through February 19, 2020 , see
Note 14 – Shareholders’  Equity  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Credit Risk Management
Credit risk is the risk of loss arising from the inability or failure of
a borro wer or counterpa rty to meet its obligations. Credit risk can
also arise from operational failures that result in an erroneous
advance, commitment or investment of funds. We define the
credit exposure to a borrower or counterparty as the loss
potential arising from all product classifications  including loans
and leases, deposit overdrafts, derivatives, assets held-for-sale
and unfunded lending commitments which include loan
commitments, letters of credit and financial guarantees.
Derivative positions are recorded at fair value and assets held-
for-sale are recorded at either fair value or the lower of cost or
fair value. Certain loans and unfunded commitments are
accounted for under the fair value option. Credit risk for
categories of assets carried at fair value is not accounted for as
part of the allowance for credit losses but as part of the fair
53     Bank of America
 
value adjustments recorded in earnings. For derivative positions,
our credit risk is measured as the net cost in the event the
counterparties with contracts in which we are in a gain position
fail to perfor m under the terms of those contracts. We use the
current fair value to represent credit exposure without giving
consideration to future mark-to-market changes. The credit risk
amounts take into consideration the effects of legally enforceable
master netting agreements and cash collateral . Our consumer
and commercial credit extension and review procedures
encompass funded and unfunded credit expos ures. For more
information on derivatives and credit extension commitments,
see Note 3 – Derivatives  and Note 13 – Commitmen ts and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
We manage  credit risk based on the risk profile of the
borrower or counterparty , repayment sources , the nature of
underlying collateral, and other support given current events,
conditions and expectations. We classify our portfolios as either
consumer or commercial and monitor credit risk in each as
discussed below .
We refine our underwriting and credit risk management
practices as well as credit standards to meet the changing
economic environment. To mitigate losses and enhance
customer support in our consumer businesses, we have in place
collection programs and loan modification and customer
assistance infrastructures. We utilize a number of actions to
mitigate losses in the commercial businesses including
increasing the frequenc y and intensity of portfolio monitoring,
hedging activity and our practice of transferring management of
deteriorating commercia l exposures to independ ent special asset
officers as credits enter criticized categories.
For more information on our credit risk management
activities, see Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Managemen t
below , Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management  on page
60, Non-U.S. Portfolio  on page 66, Provision for Credit Losses
on page 68, Allowance for Credit Losses  on page 68, and Note 5
– Outs tanding Loans and Leases  and Note 6 – Allowance for
Credit Losses  to the Consolidated Financial Statements . Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Management
Credit risk management for the consumer portfolio begins with
initial underw riting and continues throughout a borrower ’s credit
cycle. Statistical techniques in conjunction with experiential
judgment are used in all aspects of portfolio management
including underwriting, product pricing, risk appetite, setting
credit limits, and establishing operating processes and metrics to
quantify and balance risks and returns. Statistical models are
built using detailed beha vioral information from external sources
such as credit bureaus and/or internal historical experience and
are a component of our consumer credit risk management
process. These models are used in part to assis t in making both
new and ongoing credit decisions, as well as portfolio
management strategie s, including authorizations and line
management, collection practices and strategies, and
determination of the allowance for loan and lease losses and
allocated capital for credit risk.
Consumer Credit Portfolio
Improvement in home prices continued during 2019  resulting in
improved credit quality compared to 2018 . Net recove ries in the
consumer real estate portfolio due primarily to non-core loan
sales were partially offset by seasoning in the credit card
portfolio compared to 2018 .
Improved credit quality and continued loan balance runof f
primarily in the non-core consumer real estate portfolio, partially
offset by seasoning within the credit card portfolio, drove a $260
million  decrease  in the consumer allowance for loan and lease
losses in 2019  to $4.5 billion . For more informatio n, see
Allowance for Credit Losses  on page 68.
For more information on our accounting policies regarding
delinquencies, nonperfo rming status, charge-of fs and troubled
debt restructurings (TDRs) for the consumer portfolio, see Note 1
– Summary of Significant Accounting Principle s and Note 5 –
Outstanding Loans and Leases  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Table 20 presents our outstanding consumer loans and
leases, cons umer nonpe rforming loans and accruing consumer
loans past due 90 days or more.
Table
20 Consumer Credit Quality    
 Outstandings Nonperforming  Accruing Past Due
90 Days or More
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2019 2018  2019 2018
Residential mortgage (1) $236,169 $208,557 $ 1,470 $ 1,893 $ 1,088 $ 1,884
Home equity 40,208 48,286 536 1,893 — —
Credit card 97,608 98,338 n/a n/a 1,042 994
Direct/Indirect consumer (2) 90,998 91,166 47 56 33 38
Other consumer 192 202 — — — —
Consumer loans excluding loans accounted for under the fair value
option $465,175 $446,549 $ 2,053 $ 3,842 $ 2,163 $ 2,916
Loans accounted for under the fair value option (3) 594 682   
Total consumer loans and leases $465,769 $447,231   
Percentage of outstanding consumer loans and leases (4) n/a n/a 0.44% 0.86% 0.47% 0.65%
Percentage of outstanding consumer loans and leases, excluding fully-
insured loan portfolios (4) n/a n/a 0.46 0.90 0.24 0.24
(1) Residential mortga ge loans accruing past due 90 days or more are fully-insured loans. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, residential mortgage includes $740 million  and $1.4 billion  of loans on which
interest had been curtailed by the FHA, and therefore were no longer accruing interest, although principal was still insured, and $348 million  and $498 million  of loans on which  interest was still
accruing.
(2) Outstandings primarily include auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $50.4 billion  and $50.1 billion , U.S. securities-based lending loans of $36.7 billion  and $37.0 billion  and non-U.S.
consumer loans of $2.8 billion  and $2.9 billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(3) Consumer loans accounted for under the fair value option include residential mortgage loans of $257 milli on and $336 milli on and home equity loans of $337 milli on and $346 milli on at December 31,
2019 and 2018. For more information on the fair value option, see Note 22 – Fair V alue Option  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
(4) Excludes consumer loans accounted  for under the fair value option. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, $6 million  and $12 million  of loans accounte d for under the fair value option were past due 90
days or more and not accruing interest.
n/a = not applicable
  Bank of America    54
Table 21  presents net charge-of fs and related ratios for consumer loans and leases.
Table
21 Consumer Net Charge-offs and Related Ratios     
  Net Charge-offs Net Charge-off Ratios (1)
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  2019 2018
Residential mortgage $ (47) $ 28 (0.02)% 0.01%
Home equity (358) (2) (0.81) —
Credit card 2,948 2,837 3.12 3.00
Direct/Indirect consumer 209 195 0.23 0.21
Other consumer 234 182 n/m n/m
Total $ 2,986 $ 3,240 0.66 0.72
(1) Net charge-of f ratios are calculated as net charge-of fs divided by average outstanding loans and leases excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option.
n/m = not meaningful
Table 22 presents outstandings, nonperforming balances, net
charge-of fs, allowance for loan and lease losses and provision
for loan and lease losses for the core and non-core portfolios
within the consumer real estate portfolio. We categorize
consumer real estate loans as core and non-core based on loan
and custom er character istics such as origination date, product
type, loan-to-value (LTV), Fair Isaac Corporation (FICO) score
and delinquency status consistent with our current consumer and
mortgage servicing strategy . Generally , loans that were
originated after January 1, 2010, qualifie d under GSE
underwriting guidelines, or otherwise met our underwriting
guidelines in place in 2015 are characterized as core loans. All other loans are generally characterized as non-
core loans and represent runof f portfolios. Core loans as
reported in Table 22 includ e loans held in the Consumer Banking
and GWIM  segments, as well as loans held for ALM activities in
All Other .
As shown in Table 22, outstanding core consumer real estate
loans increased  $27.3 billion  during 2019  driven by an increase
of $32.1 billion  in residential mortgage,  partially offset by a $4.8
billion  decrease  in home equity .
During 2019 , we sold $4.7 billion  of consumer real estate
loans, primarily non-core, compared to $11.6 billion  in 2018 .
Table
22 Consumer Real Estate Portfolio (1)    
  Outstandings  Nonperforming    
 December 31  Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019  2018  2019 2018
Core portfolio          
Residential mortgage $ 225,770 $ 193,695 $ 883 $ 1,010 $ 7 $ 11
Home equity 35,226 40,010 363 955 51 78
Total core portfolio 260,996 233,705 1,246 1,965 58 89
Non-core portfolio         
Residential mortgage 10,399 14,862 587 883 (54) 17
Home equity 4,982 8,276 173 938 (409) (80)
Total non-core portfolio 15,381 23,138 760 1,821 (463) (63)
Consumer real estate portfolio          
 Residential mortgage 236,169 208,557 1,470 1,893 (47) 28
 Home equity 40,208 48,286 536 1,893 (358) (2)
Total consumer real estate portfolio $ 276,377 $ 256,843 $ 2,006 $ 3,786 $ (405)$ 26
    Allowance for Loan
and Lease Losses  
Provision for Loan
and Lease Losses     December 31  
    2019  2018  2019 2018
Core portfolio       
Residential mortgage   $ 229 $ 214 $ 22 $ 7
Home equity   120 228 (58) (60)
Total core portfolio   349 442 (36) (53)
Non-core portfolio         
Residential mortgage   96 208 (134) (104)
Home equity   101 278 (510) (335)
Total non-core portfolio   197 486 (644) (439)
Consumer real estate portfolio         
 Residential mortgage   325 422 (112) (97)
 Home equity   221 506 (568) (395)
Total consumer real estate portfolio   $ 546 $ 928 $ (680)$ (492)
(1) Outstandings and nonperforming loans exclude loans accounted for unde r the fair value option. Consumer loans accounted for under the fair value option include residential mortgage loans of $257
million  and $336 million  and home equity loans of $337 million  and $346 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018. For more information, see Note 22 – Fair Value Option  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
55     Bank of America
 
We believe that the presentation of information adjusted to
exclude the impact of the fully-insured loan portfolio and loans
accounted for under the fair value option is more representative
of the ongoing operations and credit quality of the business. As a
result, in the following tables and discussions of the residential
mortgage and home equity portfolios, we exclude loans
accounted for under the fair value option and provide information
that exclude s the impact of the fully-insured loan portfolio in
certain credit quality statistics.
Residential Mortgage
The reside ntial mortg age portfolio made up the largest
percentage of our consumer loan portfolio at 51 percent  of
consumer loans and leases at December 31, 2019 .
Approximately 50 percent  of the resid ential mortgage portfolio
was in Consumer Banking  and 36 percent  was in GWIM. The
remaining portion was in All Other  and was comprised of loans
used in our overall ALM activities, delinquent FHA loans repurchased pursuant to our servicing
agreements with the Government National Mortgage Association
as well as loans repurchased related to our representations and
warranties.
Outstanding balances in the residential mortgage portfolio
increased  $27.6 billion  in 2019  as retention of new originations
was partially of fset by loan sales of $2.7 billion  and runof f.
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the residential mortgage
portfolio included $18.7 billion  and $20.1 billion  of outstanding
fully-insured loans, of which $11.2 billion  and $14.0 billion  had
FHA insurance with the remainder protected by long-term
standby agreements.
Table 23 presents certain resid ential mortgage key credit
statistics on both a repor ted basis and excluding  the fully-insured
loan portfolio. The following discussion present s the residential
mortgage portfolio excluding the fully-insured loan portfolio.
Table
23 Residential Mortgage – Key Credit Statistics    
      Reported Basis (1) Excluding Fully-insured Loans (1)
      December 31
(Dollars in millions)     2019 2018 2019  2018
Outstandings    $ 236,169 $ 208,557 $ 217,479 $ 188,427
Accruing past due 30 days or more    3,108 3,945 1,296 1,155
Accruing past due 90 days or more    1,088 1,884 — —
Nonperforming loans    1,470 1,893 1,470 1,893
Percent of portfolio         
Refreshed LTV greater than 90 but less than or equal to 100   2% 2% 2% 2%
Refreshed LTV greater than 100    1 1 1 1
Refreshed FICO below 620    3 4 2 2
2006 and 2007 vintages (2)    4 6 4 6
(1) Outstandings, accruing past due, nonperforming loans and percentages of portfolio exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
(2) These vintages of loans accounted for $365 million , or 25 percent , and $536 million , or 28 percent , of nonperforming residential mortgage loans at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
Nonperforming resident ial mortgage loans decreased  $423
million  in 2019  prima rily driven by sales. Of the nonperformin g
residential mortgage loans at December 31, 2019 , $616 million ,
or 42 percent , were current on contractual payments. Loans
accruing past due 30 days or more increased  $141 million .
Net charge-of fs improved $75 million to a net recovery of $47
million  in 2019  compared to net charge-of fs of $28 million  in
2018  primarily due to recov eries from the sales of previously
charged-of f loans and continued improvement in credit quality .
Of the $217.5 billion  in total residential mortgage loans
outstanding at December 31, 2019 , as shown in Table 23, 26
percent  were originated as interest-only loans. The outstanding
balance of interest-only residential mortgage loans that have
entered the amortization period was $7.4 billion, or 13 percent, at
December 31, 2019 . Residential mortgage loans that have
entered the amortization period generally have experienced a
higher rate of early stage delinquencies and nonperforming
status comp ared to the residential mortgage portfolio as a whole.
At December 31, 2019 , $124 million , or two percent , of
outstanding interest-only  residential mortgages that had entered
the amortization period were accruing past due 30 days or more compared to $1.3 billion , or one percent , for the entire residential
mortgage portfolio. In addition, at December 31, 2019 , $260
million , or four percent , of outstanding interes t-only residential
mortgage loans that had entered the amortization period were
nonperforming, of which $108 million  were contractually curre nt,
compared to $1.5 billion , or one percent , for the entire residential
mortgage portfolio. Loans that have yet to enter the amortization
period in our interest-o nly residential mortgage portfolio are
primarily well-collateralized loans to our wealth management
clients and have an interest-only period of three to ten years.
Approximately 94 percent  of these loans that have yet to enter
the amortiza tion period will not be required to make a fully-
amortizing payment until 2022 or later .
Table 24 presents outstandings, nonperforming loans and net
charge-of fs by certain state concentrations for the residential
mortgage portfolio. The Los Angeles-Long Beach-Santa Ana
Metropolitan Statistical Area (MSA) within California represented
16 percent  of outstandings at both December 31, 2019  and
2018 . In the New York area, the New York-Northern New Jersey-
Long Island  MSA  made up 13 percent  of outstandings at both
December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
  Bank of America    56
Table
24 Residential Mortgage State Concentrations
 Outstandings (1)  Nonperforming (1)  
 December 31  Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019 2018  2019 2018
California $ 88,998 $ 76,323 $ 274 $ 314 $ (22)$ (22)
New York 22,385 19,219 196 222 5 10
Florida 12,833 11,624 143 221 (12) (6)
Texas 8,943 7,820 65 102 1 4
New Jersey 8,734 7,051 77 98 (4) 8
Other 75,586 66,390 715 936 (15) 34
Residential mortgage loans $ 217,479 $ 188,427 $ 1,470 $ 1,893 $ (47)$ 28
Fully-insured loan portfolio 18,690 20,130    
Total residential mortgage loan portfolio $ 236,169 $ 208,557    
(1) Outstandings and nonperforming loans exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Home Equity
At December 31, 2019 , the home equity portfolio made up nine
percent  of the consumer portfo lio and was comprised of home
equity lines of credit (HELOCs), home equity loans and reverse
mortgages. We no longe r originate home equity loans or reverse
mortgages.
At December 31, 2019 , our HELOC portfolio had an
outstanding balance of $37.5 billion , or 93 percent  of the total
home equity  portfolio, compared to $44.3 billion , or 92 percent,
at December 31, 2018 . HELOCs generally have an initial draw
period of 10 years, and after the initial draw period ends, the
loans generally convert to 15- or 20-year amortizing loans.
At December 31, 2019 , our home equity loan portfolio had an
outstanding balance of $1.2 billion, or three percent  of the total
home equity  portfolio, compared to $1.8 billion , or four percent ,
at December 31, 2018 . At December 31, 2019 , our revers e
mortgage portfolio had an outstanding balance of $1.5 billion , or
four percent  of the total home equity portfolio, compared to $2.2
billion , also four percent , at December 31, 2018 . At December 31, 2019 , 80 percent  of the home equity
portfolio was in Consumer Banking , 12 percent  was in All Other
and the remainder of the portfolio was primarily in GWIM .
Outstanding balances in the home equity portfolio decreased
$8.1 billion  in 2019  primarily due to paydowns and loan sales of
$2.0 billion  outpacing new originations and draws on existing
lines. Of the total home equity portfolio at December 31, 2019
and 2018 , $15.0 billion , or 37 percent , and $17.3 billion , or 36
percent , were in first-lien positions. At December 31, 2019 ,
outstanding balances in the home equity portfolio that were in a
second-lien or more junior-lien position and where we also held
the first-lien loan totaled  $6.9 billion , or 17 percent  of our total
home equity portfolio.
Unused HELOCs totaled $43.6 billion  and $43.1 billion  at
December 31, 2019  and 2018 . The increase  was primarily driven
by the impact of lower utilization of open lines and new
production partially offset by customers choosing to close
accounts. The HELOC utilization rate was 46 percent  and 51
percent  at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table 25 presents certain home equity portfolio key credit
statistics.
Table
25 Home Equity – Key Credit Statistics (1)
    December 31
(Dollars in millions)   2019  2018
Outstandings   $ 40,208 $ 48,286
Accruing past due 30 days or more (2)   218 363
Nonperforming loans (2)   536 1,893
Percent of portfolio     
Refreshed CLTV greater than 90 but less than or equal to 100  1% 2%
Refreshed CLTV greater than 100   2 3
Refreshed FICO below 620   3 5
2006 and 2007 vintages (3)   18 22
(1) Outstandings, accruing past due, nonperforming loans and percentages of the portfolio exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
(2) Accruing past due 30 days or more include $30 million  and $48 million  and nonperforming loans include $57 million  and $218 million  of loans where we serviced the underlying first lien at December
31, 2019  and 2018.
(3) These vintages of loans accounted for 34 percent  and 49 percent  of nonperforming home equity loans at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
Nonperforming outstand ing balances in the home equity
portfolio decreased  $1.4 billion  in 2019  as outflows, primarily
sales, outpaced new inflows. Of the nonperforming home equity
loans at December 31, 2019 , $241 million, or 45 percent, were
current on contractual payments. Nonperforming loans that are
contractually current primarily consist of collateral-dependent
TDRs, includ ing those that have been discharged in Chapter 7
bankruptcy , junior-lien loans where the underlyin g first lien is 90
days or more past due, as well as loans that have not yet
demonstrated a sustained period of payment performance
following a TDR. In addition, $162 million , or 30 percent , of
nonperforming home equity loans were 180 days or more past
due and had been written down to the estimated fair value of the collateral, less costs to sell. Accruing loans that were 30 days or
more past due decreased  $145 million  in 2019 .
Net charge-of fs decreased  $356 million to a net recovery of
$358 million in 2019  compared to a net recovery of $2 million in
2018  primarily driven by recoveries from the sales of previously
charged of f non-core home equity loans.
Of the $40.2 billion  in total home equity portfolio outstandings
at December 31, 2019 , as shown in Table 25, 17 percent requir e
interest-only payments. The outstanding balan ce of HELOCs
that have reached the end of their draw period and have entered
the amortization period was $11.5 billion  at December 31, 2019 .
The HELOCs that have entered the amortization period have
experienced a higher percentage of early stage delinquencies
and
57     Bank of America
 
nonperforming status when compared to the HELOC portfolio as
a whole. At December 31, 2019 , $149 million , or one percent , of
outstanding HELOCs that had entered the amortization period
were accrui ng past due 30 days or more. In addition, at
December 31, 2019 , $472 million , or four percent , were
nonperforming. Loans that have yet to enter the amortization
period in our interest-only portfolio are primarily post-2008
vintages and generally have better credit quality than the
previous vintages that had entered the amortization period. We
communicate to contractually current customers more than a
year prior to the end of their draw period to inform them of the
potential change to the payment structure before entering the
amortization period, and provide payment options to customers
prior to the end of the draw period.
Although we do not actively track how many of our home
equity customers pay only the minimum amount due on their
home equity loans and lines, we can infer some of this inform ation through a
review of our HELOC portfolio that we service and that is still in
its revolving period. During 2019 , 13 percent of these customers
with an outstanding balance did not pay any principal on their
HELOCs.
Table 26 presents outstandings, nonperforming balances  and
net charge-of fs by certain state concentrations for the home
equity portfo lio. In the New York area, the New York-Northern
New Jersey-Long Island MSA  made up 13 percent  of the
outstanding home equity portfolio at both December 31, 2019
and 2018 . The Los Angeles-Long Beach-Santa Ana MSA  within
California made up 11 percent  of the outstanding home equity
portfolio at both December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table
26 Home Equity State Concentrations
  Outstandings (1)  Nonperforming (1)  
  December 31  Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019  2018  2019 2018
California $ 11,232 $ 13,515 $ 101 $ 536 $ (117)$ (54)
Florida 4,327 5,418 71 315 (74) 1
New Jersey 3,216 3,871 56 150 (8) 25
New York 2,899 3,590 85 194 (1) 23
Massachusetts 2,023 2,400 29 65 (5) 5
Other 16,511 19,492 194 633 (153) (2)
Total home equity loan portfolio $ 40,208 $ 48,286 $ 536 $ 1,893 $ (358)$ (2)
(1) Outstandings and nonperforming loans exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Credit Card
At December 31, 2019 , 97 percent  of the credit card portfolio
was managed in Consumer Banking  with the remainder in
GWIM . Outstandings in the credit card portfolio decreased  $730
million  in 2019  to $97.6 billion . In 2019 , net charge-of fs
increased  $111 million  to $2.9 billion  compared to net charg e-
offs of $2.8 billion  in 2018 . Credit card loans 30 days or more
past due and still accruing interest increased  $46 million  and loans 90 days or
more past due and still accruing interest increased  $48 million.
These increases were driven by portfolio seasoning.
Unused lines of credit for credit card increased to $336.9
billion  at December 31, 2019  from $334.8 billion at Decemb er
31, 2018.
Table 27 presents certain state concentrations for the credit
card portfolio.
Table
27 Credit Card State Concentrations   
 Outstandings  Accruing Past Due
90 Days or More  
 December 31 Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019 2018 2019  2018
California $ 16,135 $ 16,062 $ 178 $ 163 $ 526 $ 479
Florida 9,075 8,840 135 119 363 332
Texas 7,815 7,730 93 84 241 224
New York 5,975 6,066 80 81 243 268
Washington 4,639 4,558 26 24 71 63
Other 53,969 55,082 530 523 1,504 1,471
Total credit card portfolio $ 97,608 $ 98,338 $ 1,042 $ 994 $ 2,948 $ 2,837
Direct/Indirect Consumer
At December 31, 2019 , 56 percent of the direct/indirect portfolio
was included in Consumer Banking  (consumer auto and
specialty lending – automotive, recreational vehicle, marine,
aircraft and consumer personal loans) and 44 percent  was
included in GWIM  (principally securities-based lending loans). Outstandings of $91.0 billion  in the direct/indirect portfolio
were relatively unchanged at December 31, 2019 .
Table 28 presents certain state concentrations for the
direct/indirect consumer loan portfolio.
  Bank of America    58
Table
28 Direct/Indirect State Concentrations
 OutstandingsAccruing Past Due
90 Days or More  
 December 31  Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2019  2018  2019 2018
California $ 11,912 $ 11,734 $ 4 $ 4 $ 49 $ 21
Florida 10,154 10,240 4 4 27 36
Texas 9,516 9,876 5 6 29 30
New York 6,394 6,296 1 2 12 9
New Jersey 3,468 3,308 1 1 4 2
Other 49,554 49,712 18 21 88 97
Total direct/indirect loan portfolio $ 90,998 $ 91,166 $ 33 $ 38 $ 209 $ 195
Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and
Foreclosed Properties Activity
Table 29 presents nonperformin g consumer loans, leases and
foreclosed properties activity during 2019  and 2018 . During
2019 , nonperform ing consum er loans decreased  $1.8 billion  to
$2.1 billion  primarily driven by loan sales of $1.5 billion .
At December 31, 2019 , $606 million , or 29 percent , of
nonperforming loans were 180 days or more past due and had
been written  down to their estimated property value less costs to
sell. In addition, at December 31, 2019 , $901 million , or 44 percent , of nonperf orming consumer loans were modified and
are now current after successful trial periods , or are current
loans classified as nonperforming loans in accordance with
applicable policies.
Foreclosed properties decreased  $15 million  in 2019  to $229
million  as liquidations outpaced additions.
Nonperforming loans also include certain loans that have
been modified in TDRs where economic concessions have been
granted to borrowers experiencing financial difficulties.
Nonperforming TDRs are included in Table 29 .
Table 29Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity   
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Nonperforming loans and leases, January 1 $ 3,842 $ 5,166
Additions 1,407 2,440
Reductions:   
Paydowns and payoffs (701) (958)
Sales (1,523) (969)
Returns to performing status (1) (766) (1,283)
Charge-offs (111) (401)
Transfers to foreclosed properties (95) (151)
Transfers to loans held-for-sale — (2)
Total net reductions to nonperforming loans and leases (1,789) (1,324)
Total nonperforming loans and leases, December 31 2,053 3,842
Foreclosed properties, December 31 (2) 229 244
Nonperforming consumer loans, leases and foreclosed properties, December 31 $ 2,282 $ 4,086
Nonperforming consumer loans and leases as a percentage of outstanding consumer loans and leases (3) 0.44% 0.86%
Nonperforming consumer loans, leases and foreclosed properties as a percentage of outstanding consumer loans, leases and
foreclosed properties (3) 0.49 0.92
(1) Consumer loans may be returned to performing status when all principa l and interest is current and full repayment of the remaining contractual principal and interest is expected, or when the loan
otherwise becomes well-secured and is in the process of collection.
(2) Foreclosed property balances do not include properties insured by certain government-guaranteed loans, principally FHA-insured, of $260 million  and $488 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(3) Outstanding consumer loans and leases exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Table 30 prese nts TDRs for the consumer real estate portfolio. Performing TDR balances are excluded from nonperforming loans
and leases in Table 29 .
Table
30 Consumer Real Estate Troubled Debt Restructurings
  December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
(Dollars in millions) Nonperforming Performing Total Nonperforming Performing Total
Residential mortgage (1, 2) $ 921 $ 3,832 $ 4,753 $ 1,209 $ 4,988 $ 6,197
Home equity (3) 252 977 1,229 1,107 1,252 2,359
Total consumer real estate troubled debt
restructurings $ 1,173 $ 4,809 $ 5,982 $ 2,316 $ 6,240 $ 8,556
(1) At December 31, 2019 and 2018, residential mortgage TDRs deeme d collateral dependent totaled $1.2 billion  and $1.6 billion , and included $748 million  and $960 million  of loans classifie d as
nonperforming and $468 million  and $605 million  of loans classified as performing.
(2) At December 31, 2019  and 2018, residential mortgage performing TDRs include $2.1 billion  and $2.8 billion  of loans that were fully-insured.
(3) At December 31, 2019 and 2018, home equity TDRs deemed collateral dependent totaled $442 milli on and $1.3 billio n, and include $209 milli on and $961 milli on of loans classified  as nonperforming
and $233 million  and $322 million  of loans classified as performing.
In addition to modifying consumer real estate loans, we work
with customers who are experiencing financ ial difficulty by
modifying credit card and other consumer loans. Credit card and
other consumer loan modifications generally involve a reduction in the customer ’s intere st rate on the account and placing the
customer on a fixed payment plan not exceedin g 60 months, all
of which are considered TDRs (the renegotiated TDR portfolio).
59     Bank of America
 
Modifications of credit card and other consumer loans are
made throug h renegotia tion programs utilizing direct customer
contact, but may also utilize external renegotiation programs.
The renegotiated TDR portfolio is excluded in large part from
Table 29 as substantially all of the loans remain on accrua l status
until either charged off or paid in full. At December 31, 2019  and
2018 , our renegotiated TDR portfolio was $679 million  and $566
million , of which $570 million  and $481 million  were current or
less than 30 days past due under the modified terms. The
increase  in the renegotiated TDR portfolio was primarily driven
by new renegotiated enrollments outpacing runof f of existing
portfolios.
Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk
Management
Credit risk management for the commercial portfolio begins with
an assessment of the credit risk profile of the borrower or
counterparty based on an analysis of its financial position. As
part of the overall credit risk assessment, our commercial credit
exposures are assigned a risk rating and are subject to approval
based on defined credit approval standards. Subsequent to loan
origination, risk ratings are monitored on an ongoing basis, and if
necessary , adjusted to reflect changes in the financial condition,
cash flow, risk profile or outlook of a borrower or counterparty . In
making credit decisions, we consider risk rating, collateral,
country , industry and single-name concentration limits while also
balancing these considerations with the total borrower or
counterparty relationship. We use a variety of tools to
continuously monitor the ability of a borrower or counterparty to
perform under its obligations. We use risk rating  aggregations to
measure and evaluate concentrations within portfolios. In
addition, risk ratings are a factor in determin ing the level of
allocated capital and the allowance for credit losses.
As part of our ongoing risk mitigation initiatives, we attempt to
work with clients experiencing financial difficulty to modify their
loans to terms that better align with their current ability to pay. In
situations where an economic concession has been granted to a
borrower experiencing financial difficulty , we identify these loans
as TDRs. For more information on our accounting policies
regarding delinquencies, nonperforming status and net charge-
offs for the commercial portfolio, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Management of Commercial Credit Risk
Concentrations
Commercial credit risk is evaluated and managed with the goal
that concentrations of credit exposure continue to be aligned with
our risk appetite. We review , measure and manage
concentrations of credit exposure by industry , product,
geography , customer relationship and loan size. We also review ,
measure and manage  commercial real estate loans by
geographic location and property type. In addition, within our
non-U.S. portfolio, we evaluate exposures by region and by
country . Tables 35, 38 and 41 summarize our concent rations. We
also utilize syndications of exposure to third parties, loan sales, hedging and other risk
mitigation techniques  to manage  the  size  and  risk  profile  of the
commercial credit portfolio. For more information on our industry
concentrations, see Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk
Management – Industry Concentrations  on page 64 and Table
38.
We account for certain large corporate loans and loan
commitments, including  issued but unfunded letters of credit
which are considered utilized for credit risk management
purposes, that exceed our single-name credit risk concentration
guidelines under the fair value option. Lendin g commitments,
both funded and unfunded, are actively managed and monitored,
and as appropriate, credit risk for these lending relationships
may be mitigated through the use of credit derivatives, with our
credit view and market perspectives determining the size and
timing of the hedging activity . In addition, we purchase credit
protection to cover the funded portion as well as the unfunded
portion of certain other credit exposures. To lessen the cost of
obtaining our desired credit protection levels, credit exposure
may be added within an industry , borrower or counterparty group
by selling protection. These credit derivatives do not meet the
requirements for treatment as accounting hedges. They are
carried at fair value with changes in fair value recorded in other
income.
In addition, we are a member of various securities and
derivative exchanges and clearinghouses, both in the U.S. and
other countries. As a member , we may be required to pay a pro-
rata share of the losses incurred by some of these organizations
as a result of another member default and under other loss
scenarios. For more information, see Note 13 – Commitments
and Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Commercial Credit Portfolio
During 2019 , credit quality among large corporate and middle-
market borrowers in our commercial and industrial portfolio
remained strong. Credit quality of commercial real estate
borrowers in most sectors remained stable with conservative LTV
ratios. However , some of the real estate markets experienced
slowing tenant demand and decelerating rental income.
Total commercial utilized credit exposure increased  $14.3
billion  in 2019  to $635.3 billion  driven by higher loans and
leases. The utilization rate for loans and leases, SBLCs and
financial guarantees, and commercial letters of credit, in the
aggregate, was 58 percent  at December 31, 2019  and 59
percent  at December 31, 2018 .
Table 31 presents commercial credit exposure by type for
utilized, unfunded and total binding committed credit exposure.
Commercial utilized credit exposure include s SBLCs and
financial guarantees and commercial letters of credit that have
been issued  and for which we are legally bound to advance
funds under prescribed conditions during a specified time period,
and excludes exposure related to trading account assets.
Although funds have not yet been advanced, these exposure
types are considered utilized for credit risk management
purposes.
  Bank of America    60
Table
31 Commercial Credit Exposure by Type
 Commercial Utilized (1)  Commercial Unfunded (2, 3, 4) Total Commercial Committed
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  2019 2018  2019  2018
Loans and leases $ 517,657 $ 499,664 $ 405,834 $ 369,282 $ 923,491 $ 868,946
Derivative assets (5) 40,485 43,725 — — 40,485 43,725
Standby letters of credit and financial guarantees 36,062 34,941 468 491 36,530 35,432
Debt securities and other investments 25,546 25,425 5,101 4,250 30,647 29,675
Loans held-for-sale 7,047 9,090 15,135 14,812 22,182 23,902
Operating leases 6,660 6,060 — — 6,660 6,060
Commercial letters of credit 1,049 1,210 451 168 1,500 1,378
Other 800 898 — — 800 898
Total $ 635,306 $ 621,013 $ 426,989 $ 389,003 $ 1,062,295 $ 1,010,016
(1) Commercial utilized exposure includ es loans of $7.7 billion  and $3.7 billion  and issued letters of credit with a notional amount of $170 million  and $100 million  accounted for under the fair value
option at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(2) Commercial unfunded exposure includes commitments accounted for under the fair value option with a notional amount of $4.2 billion  and $3.0 billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(3) Excludes unused business card lines, which are not legally binding.
(4) Includes the notional amount of unfunded legally binding lending commitments net of amounts distributed (i.e., syndicated or participated) to other financial institutions. The distributed amounts
were $10.6 billion  and $10.7 billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(5) Derivative assets are carried at fair value, reflect the effects of legally enforceable master netting agreements and have been reduced by cash collateral of $33.9 billion and $32.4 billion at December
31, 2019 and 2018. Not reflected in utilized and committed exposure is additional non-cash derivative collateral held of $35.2 billio n and $33.0 billion at December 31, 2019 and 2018, which consists
primarily of other marketable securities.
Outstanding commercial loans and leases increased  $18.0
billion  during 2019  primarily in the commercial and industrial
portfolio. Nonperforming commercial loans increased $397
million  and commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure
increased $391 million  driven by a small number of client
downgrades across industries which were not indicative of
broader issues in the portfolio. The allowance for loan and lease losses for the
commercial portfolio increased  $75 million  to $4.9 billion  at
December 31, 2019 . For more information, see Allowance for
Credit Losses  on page 68. Table 32 presents our commerc ial
loans and leases portfolio and related credit quality information
at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table
32 Commercial Credit Quality
  Outstandings  Nonperforming  Accruing Past Due
90 Days or More
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019  2018  2019 2018
Commercial and industrial:       
U.S. commercial $ 307,048 $ 299,277 $ 1,094 $ 794 $ 106 $ 197
Non-U.S. commercial 104,966 98,776 43 80 8 —
Total commercial and industrial 412,014 398,053 1,137 874 114 197
Commercial real estate 62,689 60,845 280 156 19 4
Commercial lease financing 19,880 22,534 32 18 20 29
 494,583 481,432 1,449 1,048 153 230
U.S. small business commercial (1) 15,333 14,565 50 54 97 84
Commercial loans excluding loans accounted for under
the fair value option 509,916 495,997 1,499 1,102 250 314
Loans accounted for under the fair value option (2) 7,741 3,667 — — — —
Total commercial loans and leases $ 517,657 $ 499,664 $ 1,499 $ 1,102 $ 250 $ 314
(1) Includes card-related products.
(2) Commercial loans  accounted for under the fair value option include U.S. commercial of $4.7 billion  and $2.5 billion  and non-U.S. commercial of $3.1 billion  and $1.1 billion  at December 31, 2019 and
2018. For more information on the fair value option, see Note 22 – Fair V alue Option  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Table 33  presents net charge-of fs and related ratios for our commercial loans and leases for 2019  and 2018 .
Table
33 Commercial Net Charge-offs and Related Ratios
  Net Charge-offs Net Charge-off Ratios (1)
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2019  2018
Commercial and industrial:     
U.S. commercial $ 256 $ 215 0.08% 0.07%
Non-U.S. commercial 84 68 0.08 0.07
Total commercial and industrial 340 283 0.08 0.07
Commercial real estate 29 1 0.05 —
Commercial lease financing 21 (1) 0.10 (0.01)
  390 283 0.08 0.06
U.S. small business commercial 272 240 1.83 1.70
Total commercial $ 662 $ 523 0.13 0.11
(1) Net charge-of f ratios are calculated as net charge-of fs divided by average outstanding loans and leases excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option.
61     Bank of America
 
Table 34 presents commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure by loan type. Criticized exposure corresponds to the Special
Mention, Substandard and Doubtful asset categories as defined by regulatory authorities. At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , 90
percent and 91 percent of commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure was secured.
Table
34 Commercial Reservable Criticized Utilized Exposure (1, 2)
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Commercial and industrial:
U.S. commercial $ 8,272 2.46% $ 7,986 2.43%
Non-U.S. commercial 989 0.89 1,013 0.97
Total commercial and industrial 9,261 2.07 8,999 2.08
Commercial real estate 1,129 1.75 936 1.50
Commercial lease financing 329 1.66 366 1.62
  10,719 2.01 10,301 1.99
U.S. small business commercial 733 4.78 760 5.22
Total commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure (1) $ 11,452 2.09 $ 11,061 2.08
(1) Total commercial reservable criticize d utilized exposure includes loans and leases of $10.7 billion  and $10.3 billion  and commercial letters of credit of $715 million  and $781 million  at December 31,
2019 and 2018.
(2) Percentages are calculated as commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure divided by total commercial reservable utilized exposure for each exposure category .
Commercial and Industrial
Commercial and industrial loans include U.S. commercial and
non-U.S. commercial portfolios.
U.S. Commercial
At December 31, 2019 , 70 percent of the U.S. commercial loan
portfolio, excluding small business, was managed in Global
Banking,  16 perce nt in Global Markets , 13 perce nt in GWIM
(generally business-purpose loans for high net worth clients) and
the remainder primarily in Consumer Banking . U.S. commercial
loans increased  $7.8 billion  during 2019 , across lines of
business.
Non-U.S. Commercial
At December 31, 2019 , 83 percent of the non-U.S . commercial
loan portfolio  was managed in Global Bank ing and 17 percent in
Global Markets . Non-U.S. commercial loans increased  $6.2
billion  during 2019 , primarily in Global Banking . For information
on the non-U.S. commercial portfolio, see Non-U.S. Portfolio  on
page 66.
Commercial Real Estate
Commercial real estate primarily includes commercial loans
secured by non-owner-occupied real estate and is dependent on
the sale or lease of the real estate as the primary source of repayment. Outstanding loans increased  $1.8 billion, or three
percent , durin g 2019  to $62.7 billion  due to new origination s
slightly outpacing payd owns. The portfolio remains diversified
across property types and geographic regions. California
represented the largest state concentration at 24 percent  and 23
percent  of the comm ercial real estate portfolio at December 31,
2019  and 2018 . The commercial real estate portfolio is
predominantly managed in Global Banking  and consists of loans
made primarily to public and private developers, and commercial
real estate firms.
During 2019 , we continu ed to see low default rates and solid
credit quality in both the residential and non-residential portfolios.
We use a number of proactive risk mitigation initiatives to reduce
adversely rated exposure in the commercial real estate portfolio,
including transfers of deteriorating exposures to management by
independent special asset officers and the pursuit of loan
restructurings or asset sales to achieve the best results for our
customers and the Corporation.
Table 35 prese nts outstanding commercial real estate loans
by geograph ic region, based on the geographic location of the
collateral, and by property type.
  Bank of America    62
Table
35 Outstanding Commercial Real Estate Loans
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
By Geographic Region   
California $ 14,910 $ 14,002
Northeast 12,408 10,895
Southwest 8,408 7,339
Southeast 5,937 5,726
Florida 3,984 3,680
Illinois 3,349 2,989
Midwest 3,203 3,772
Midsouth 2,468 2,919
Northwest 1,638 2,178
Non-U.S. 3,724 4,240
Other (1) 2,660 3,105
Total outstanding commercial real estate loans $ 62,689 $ 60,845
By Property Type   
Non-residential   
Office $ 17,902 $ 17,246
Industrial / Warehouse 8,677 5,379
Shopping centers / Retail 8,183 8,798
Multi-family rental 7,250 7,762
Hotels / Motels 6,982 7,248
Unsecured 3,438 2,956
Multi-use 1,788 2,848
Other 6,958 7,029
Total non-residential 61,178 59,266
Residential 1,511 1,579
Total outstanding commercial real estate loans $ 62,689 $ 60,845
(1) Includes unsecured loans to real estate investment trusts and national home builders whose portfolios of properties span multiple geographic regions and properties in the states of Colorado, Utah,
Hawaii, W yoming and Montana.
U.S. Small Business Commercial
The U.S. small business commercial loan portfolio is comprised
of small business card loans and small business  loans managed
in Consumer Banking . Credit card-related products were 52
percent  and 51 percent  of the U.S. small business commercial
portfolio at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Of the U.S. small
business commercial net charge-of fs, 94 percent  and 95 percent
were credit card-related products in 2019  and 2018 .
Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and
Foreclosed Properties Activity
Table 36 prese nts the nonperforming commercial loans,  leases
and foreclosed properties activity during 2019  and 2018 . Nonperforming loans do not include loans accounted for under
the fair value option. During 2019 , nonp erforming commercial
loans and leases increased  $397 million  to $1.5 billion. At
December 31, 2019 , 94 percent  of commercial nonperf orming
loans, leases and foreclosed properties were secured and 64
percent  were  contractually current. Commercial nonperforming
loans were carried at 88 percent of their unpa id principal  balance
before consideration of the allowance for loan and lease losses
as the carrying value of these loans has been reduced to the
estimated collateral value less costs to sell.
Table
36 Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity (1, 2)
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Nonperforming loans and leases, January 1 $ 1,102 $ 1,304
Additions 2,048 1,415
Reductions:   
Paydowns (648) (771)
Sales (215) (210)
Returns to performing status (3) (120) (246)
Charge-offs (478) (361)
Transfers to foreclosed properties (9) (12)
Transfers to loans held-for-sale (181) (17)
Total net reductions to nonperforming loans and leases 397 (202)
Total nonperforming loans and leases, December 31 1,499 1,102
Foreclosed properties, December 31 56 56
Nonperforming commercial loans, leases and foreclosed properties, December 31 $ 1,555 $ 1,158
Nonperforming commercial loans and leases as a percentage of outstanding commercial loans and leases (4) 0.29% 0.22%
Nonperforming commercial loans, leases and foreclosed properties as a percentage of outstanding commercial loans, leases and
foreclosed properties (4) 0.30 0.23
(1) Balances do not include nonperforming loans held-for-sale of $239 million  and $292 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(2) Includes U.S. small business commercial activity . Small business card loans are excluded as they are not classified as nonperforming.
(3) Commercial loans and leases may be returned to performing status when all principal and interest is current and full repayment of the remaining contractual principal and interest is expected, or
when the loan otherwise becomes well-secured and is in the process of collection. TDRs are generally classified as performing after a sustained period of demonstrated payment performance.
(4) Outstanding commercial loans exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
63     Bank of America
 
Table 37 presents our commerc ial TDRs by product type and performing status. U.S. small business commercial TDRs are
comprised of renegotiate d small business card loans and small business loans. The renegotiate d small business card loans are not
classified as nonperform ing as they are charged off no later than the end of the month in which the loan becomes 180 days past due.
For more information on TDRs, see Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and Leases  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Table
37 Commercial Troubled Debt Restructurings
  December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
(Dollars in millions) Nonperforming Performing Total  Nonperforming Performing Total
Commercial and industrial:
U.S. commercial $ 617 $ 999 $ 1,616 $ 306 $ 1,092 $ 1,398
Non-U.S. commercial 41 193 234 78 162 240
Total commercial and industrial 658 1,192 1,850 384 1,254 1,638
Commercial real estate 212 14 226 114 6 120
Commercial lease financing 18 31 49 3 68 71
 888 1,237 2,125 501 1,328 1,829
U.S. small business commercial — 27 27 3 18 21
Total commercial troubled debt restructurings $ 888 $ 1,264 $ 2,152 $ 504 $ 1,346 $ 1,850
Industry Concentrations
Table 38 presents commercial committed and utilized  credit
exposure by industry and the total net credit default protection
purchased to cover the funded and unfunded portions of certain
credit exposures. Our commercial credit exposure is diversified
across a broad range of industries. Total commercial committed
exposure increased  $52.3 billion , or five perce nt, during 2019  to
$1.1 trillion . The increa se in commercial committed exposure
was concentrated in the Real estate, Utilities and Finance
companies industry sectors. Increases were partially offset by
decreased exposure to the Pharmaceuticals and biotechnology ,
Technology hardware and equipment, and Government and
public education industry sectors.
Industry limits are used internally to manage industry
concentrations and are based on committed exposure that is
allocated on an industry-by-industry basis. A risk management
framework is in place to set and approve industry limits as well as to provide ongoing monitoring. The MRC oversees industry
limit governance.
Asset manag ers and funds, our largest industry concentration
with committed exposure of $110.0 billion , increased  $2.1 billion ,
or two percent , during 2019 .
Real estate, our second largest industry concentration with
committed exposure of $96.3 billion , increased  $9.8 billion , or 11
percent , during 2019 . This growth occurred primarily in the
category of industrial and warehouse buildings, partially offset by
declines in REIT s.
Capital good s, our third largest industry conce ntration with
committed exposure of $80.9 billion , increased $5.8 billion , or
eight percent , during 2019  with the growth largely occurring in
the trading companies and distributors industry categories,
partially offset by a decrease in industrial conglomerates. For
more information on the commercial real estate and related
portfolios, see Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management –
Commercial Real Estate  on page 62.
  Bank of America    64
Table 38Commercial Credit Exposure by Industry (1)
  Commercial
UtilizedTotal Commercial
Committed (2)
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2019 2018
Asset managers and funds $ 71,289 $ 71,756 $ 109,972 $ 107,888
Real estate (3) 70,341 65,328 96,349 86,514
Capital goods 41,060 39,192 80,871 75,080
Finance companies 40,171 36,662 63,940 56,659
Healthcare equipment and services 34,353 35,763 55,918 56,489
Government and public education 41,889 43,675 53,566 54,749
Materials 26,663 27,347 52,128 51,865
Consumer services 28,434 25,702 49,071 43,298
Retailing 25,868 25,333 48,317 47,507
Food, beverage and tobacco 24,163 23,586 45,956 42,745
Commercial services and supplies 23,102 22,623 38,943 39,349
Energy 16,407 13,727 36,327 32,279
Utilities 12,383 12,035 36,060 27,623
Transportation 23,448 22,814 33,027 31,523
Global commercial banks 26,492 26,583 28,670 28,627
Individuals and trusts 18,926 18,643 27,815 25,019
Technology hardware and equipment 10,645 13,014 24,071 26,228
Media 12,429 12,132 23,629 24,502
Vehicle dealers 18,013 17,603 21,435 20,446
Consumer durables and apparel 10,193 9,904 21,245 20,199
Software and services 10,432 8,809 20,556 19,172
Pharmaceuticals and biotechnology 5,962 7,430 20,203 23,634
Telecommunication services 9,144 8,686 16,103 14,166
Insurance 6,669 8,674 15,214 15,807
Automobiles and components 7,345 7,131 14,910 13,893
Financial markets infrastructure (clearinghouses) 9,351 8,317 11,851 10,042
Food and staples retailing 6,290 4,787 10,392 9,093
Religious and social organizations 3,844 3,757 5,756 5,620
Total commercial credit exposure by industry $ 635,306 $ 621,013 $ 1,062,295 $ 1,010,016
Net credit default protection purchased on total commitments (4)   $ (3,349)$ (2,663)
(1) Includes U.S. small business commercial exposure.
(2) Includes the notional amount of unfunded legally binding lending commitments net of amounts distributed (i.e., syndicated or participated) to other financial institutions. The distributed amounts
were $10.6 billion  and $10.7 billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(3) Industries are viewed from a variety of perspectives to best isolate the perceived risks. For purposes of this table, the real estate industry is defined based on the primary business activity of the
borrowers or counterparties using operating cash flows and primary source of repayment as key factors.
(4) Represents net notional credit prote ction purchased to hedge funded and unfunded exposures for which we elected the fair value option, as well as certain other credit exposures. For more
information, see Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management – Risk Mitigation .
Risk Mitigation
We purchase credit protection to cover the funded portion as well
as the unfunded portion of certain credit exposures. To lower the
cost of obtaining our desired credit protection levels, we may add
credit expos ure within an industry , borrower or counterparty
group by selling protection.
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , net notiona l credit default
protection purchased in our credit derivatives portfolio to hedge
our  funded  and unfunde d exposures for which  we elected the fair
value option , as well as certain other credit exposures, was $3.3
billion  and $2.7 billion. We recorde d net losses of $145  million  in
2019  compared to net losses of $2 million in 2018  on these
positions. The gains and losses on these instrum ents were offset
by gains and losses on the related exposures. The V alue-at-Risk
(VaR) results for these exposures are included in the fair value option portfolio information in Table 45. For more information,
see Trading Risk Management  on page 72.
Tables 39 and 40 present the maturity profiles and the credit
exposure debt ratings of the net credit default protection portfolio
at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Table 39Net Credit Default Protection by Maturity
 December 31
 2019  2018
Less than or equal to one year 54% 20%
Greater than one year and less than or equal
to five years 45 78
Greater than five years 1 2
Total net credit default protection 100% 100%
65     Bank of America
 
Table
40Net Credit Default Protection by Credit
Exposure Debt Rating
 Net
Notional (1)Percent of
Total Net
Notional (1)Percent of
Total
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Ratings (2, 3)      
A $ (697) 20.8% $ (700) 26.3%
BBB (1,089) 32.5 (501) 18.8
BB (766) 22.9 (804) 30.2
B (373) 11.1 (422) 15.8
CCC and below (119) 3.6 (205) 7.7
NR (4) (305) 9.1 (31) 1.2
Total net credit
default
protection $ (3,349) 100.0% $ (2,663) 100.0%
(1) Represents net credit default protection purchased.
(2) Ratings are refreshed on a quarterly basis.
(3) Ratings of BBB- or higher are considered to meet the definition of investment grade.
(4) NR is comprised of index positions held and any names that have not been rated.
In addition to our net notional credit default protection
purchased to cover the funded and unfunded portion of certain
credit exposures, credit derivatives are used for market-making
activities for clients and establishing positions intended to profit
from directional or relative value changes. We execute the
majority of our credit derivative trades in the OTC market with
large, multinational financial institutions, includin g broker-dealers
and, to a lesser degree, with a variety of other investors.
Because these transactions are executed in the OTC market, we
are subject to settlement  risk. We are also subjec t to credit risk in
the event that these counterparties fail to perform under the
terms of these contracts . In order to properly reflect counterparty
credit risk, we record counterparty credit risk valuation
adjustments on certain derivative assets, including our
purchased credit default protection.
In most cases, credit derivative transactions are executed on
a daily margin basis. Therefore, events such as a credit
downgrade, depending on the ultimate rating level, or a breach
of credit covenants would typically require an increase in the
amount of collateral required by the counterparty , where
applicable, and/or allow us to take additional protective measures such as early
termination of all trades. For more information on credit
derivatives and counterparty credit risk valuation adjustments,
see Note 3 – Derivatives  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Non-U.S. Portfolio
Our non-U.S. credit and trading portfolios are subject to country
risk. We define country risk as the risk of loss from unfavorable
economic and political conditions, currency fluctuations, social
instability and changes in government policies. A risk
management framework is in place to measure, monitor and
manage non-U.S. risk and exposures. In addition to the direct
risk of doing business in a country , we also are exposed to
indirect coun try risks (e.g., related to the collateral received on
secured financing transactions or related to client clearing
activities). These indirect exposures are managed in the normal
course of business through credit, market and operational risk
governance, rather than through country risk governance.
Table 41 presents our 20 largest non-U.S. country exposures
at December 31, 2019 . These exposures accounted for 88
percent  and 89 percent  of our total non-U.S. exposure at
December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Net countr y exposure for these
20 countries increased  $8.5 billion  in 2019 , primarily driven by
increased sovereign and corporate exposure across multiple
countries.
Non-U.S. exposure is presented on an internal risk
management basis and includes sovereign and non-sovereign
credit exposure, securities and other investments issued by or
domiciled in countries other than the U.S.
Funded loans and loan equivalents include loans, leases, and
other extensions of credit and funds, including letters of credit
and due from placements. Unfunded comm itments are the
undrawn portion of legally binding commitments related to loans
and loan equivalents. Net counterparty exposure includes the fair
value of derivatives, including the counterparty  risk associated
with credit default swaps (CDS), and secured financing
transactions. Securities and other investments are carried at fair
value and long securities exposures are netted against short
exposures with the same underlying issuer to, but not below ,
zero. Net country exposure represents country exposure less
hedges and credit default protection purchased, net of credit
default protection sold.
  Bank of America    66
Table
41 Top 20 Non-U.S. Countries Exposure
(Dollars in millions)Funded Loans
and Loan
EquivalentsUnfunded Loan
CommitmentsNet
Counterparty
ExposureSecurities/
Other
InvestmentsCountry
Exposure at
December 31
2019  Hedges and
Credit Default
Protection Net Country
Exposure at
December 31
2019Increase
(Decrease)
from
December 31
2018
United Kingdom $ 29,156 $ 17,341 $ 7,800 $ 3,545 $ 57,842 $ (1,998) $ 55,844 $ 990
Germany 21,920 7,408 1,828 1,967 33,123 (2,295) 30,828 2,171
Canada 7,967 8,255 1,690 2,879 20,791 (669) 20,122 607
France 7,243 9,208 876 969 18,296 (2,041) 16,255 3,604
China 13,304 497 1,085 949 15,835 (248) 15,587 946
India 7,817 364 398 3,660 12,239 (222) 12,017 905
Brazil 7,393 716 218 3,683 12,010 (238) 11,772 1,523
Australia 6,100 3,583 415 1,443 11,541 (439) 11,102 1,172
Japan 8,450 896 1,002 1,589 11,937 (1,405) 10,532 (9,491)
Netherlands 6,322 3,585 330 876 11,113 (786) 10,327 (1,250)
South Korea 5,981 758 386 1,762 8,887 (182) 8,705 (465)
Singapore 3,749 435 172 3,528 7,884 (58) 7,826 2,309
Mexico 4,190 1,733 224 1,814 7,961 (150) 7,811 1,575
Switzerland 4,387 2,947 213 325 7,872 (487) 7,385 (379)
Hong Kong 5,106 353 434 1,194 7,087 (31) 7,056 (180)
Belgium 5,077 1,259 526 159 7,021 (514) 6,507 929
Italy 2,353 2,303 510 1,386 6,552 (1,175) 5,377 2,296
Spain 3,153 1,073 258 867 5,351 (629) 4,722 72
United Arab Emirates 3,267 229 119 10 3,625 (38) 3,587 (62)
Ireland 2,142 979 76 201 3,398 (31) 3,367 1,206
Total top 20 non-
U.S. countries
exposure $ 155,077 $ 63,922 $ 18,560 $ 32,806 $ 270,365 $ (13,636) $ 256,729 $ 8,478
A number of economic  conditions and geopo litical events
have given rise to risk aversion in certain emerging markets.
Additionally , in light of ongoing trade tensions, we continue to
closely monitor our exposures to tariff-sensitive regions and
industries, particularly to countries that account for a large
percentage of U.S. trade, such as China.
Our largest emerging market country exposure at December
31, 2019 was China, with net exposure of $15.6 billion ,
concentrated in large state-owned companies,  subsidiaries of
multinational corporations and commercial banks.
The economic performance in the EU remai ns uncertain,
including as a result of the uncertainty surroundin g the terms of a
potential trade agreement and other terms associated with the
future relatio nship betw een the U.K. and the EU, which could
weigh unevenly on the economic performance of EU countries
generally , and even more heavily on that of the U.K. For more
information, see Item 1A. Risk Factors – Geopolitical  on page 10
and Executive Summary – Recent Developments – U.K. Exit
from the EU on page 23. Our larges t EU country exposure at
December 31, 2019  was the U.K. with net expos ure of $55.8 billion , which represents a
$990 million  increase  from December 31, 2018 . Our second
largest EU exposure was Germany with net exposure of $30.8
billion  as of December 31, 2019 , which represents a $2.2 billion
increase  from December 31, 2018 . The increase in Germany
was primarily driven by an increase in sovereign exposure.
Table 42 presents countries that had total cross-border
exposure, including the notional amount of cash loaned under
secured financing agreements, exceeding one percent of our
total assets at December 31, 2019 . Local exposure, define d as
exposure booked in local offices of a respect ive country with
clients in the same coun try, is excluded. At December 31, 2019 ,
the U.K. and France were the only countries where their
respective total cross-border exposures exceede d one percent of
our total assets. At December 31, 2019 , Germany had total
cross-border exposure of $19.4 billion  representing 0.80 percent
of our total assets. No other countries had total cross-border
exposure that exceeded 0.75 percent of our total assets at
December 31, 2019 .
Table
42 Total Cross-border Exposure Exceeding One Percent of Total Assets
(Dollars in millions) December 31 Public Sector Banks Private SectorCross-border
ExposureExposure as a
Percent of
Total Assets
United Kingdom 2019 $ 1,859 $ 3,580 $ 93,232 $ 98,671 4.05%
 2018 1,505 3,458 46,191 51,154 2.17
 2017 923 2,984 47,205 51,112 2.24
France 2019 736 2,473 23,172 26,381 1.08
 2018 633 2,385 29,847 32,865 1.40
 2017 2,964 1,521 27,903 32,388 1.42
67     Bank of America
 
Provision for Credit Losses
The provision for credit  losses increased  $308 million  to $3.6
billion  in 2019  compared to 2018 . The provision for credit  losses
was $58 million lower  than net charge-of fs for 2019 , resulting in
a decrease  in the allowance for credit losses. This compared to a
decrease  of $481 million  in the allow ance for credit losses in
2018 . Net charge -offs in 2019  were $3.6 billion compared to $3.8
billion  in 2018.
The provision for credit losses for the consumer portfolio
decreased  $117 million  to $2.8 billion  in 2019  compared to 2018 .
The decreas e was primarily driven by consumer real estate loan
sales.
The provision for credit losses for the commercial portfolio,
including unfunded lendi ng commitments, increased  $425 million
to $758 million  in 2019  compared to 2018 . The increase was due
in part to energy reserve releases in the prior-year periods.
Assuming a stable econ omic environment in 2020 compared
to the end of 2019, we expect net charge-of fs of approximately
$1 billion per quarter in 2020. In view of the newly adopted
accounting standard on the measurement of the allowance for
credit losses, we expec t the provision for credit losses to be
modestly higher than net charge-of fs in 2020, assuming no
change in the current economic outlook and estimates of loan
growth, including product mix. For more inform ation regarding
the new accounting standard, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Allowance for Credit Losses
Allowance for Loan and Lease Losses
The allowan ce for loan and lease losses is comprised of two
components. The first component covers nonperforming
commercial loans and TDRs. The second component covers
loans and leases on which there are incurred losses that are not
yet individually identifiable, as well as incurred losses that may
not be represented in the loss forecast models. We evaluate the
adequacy of the allowance for loan and lease losses based on
the total of these two components, each of which is described in
more detail below . The allowance for loan and lease losses
excludes loans held-for -sale (LHFS) and loans accounted for
under the fair value option as the fair value reflects a credit risk
component.
The first component of the allowance for loan and lease
losses covers both nonperforming commercia l loans and all
TDRs within  the consumer and commercial portfolios. These
loans are subject to impairment measurement based on the
present value of projected future cash flows discounted at the
loan’ s original effective interest rate, or in certain circumstances,
impairment may also be based upon the collateral value or the
loan’ s obse rvable market price if availab le. Impairment
measurement for the renegotiated consumer credit card and
small business credit card TDR portfolios is based on the present
value of projected cash flows discounted using the average
portfolio contractual interest rate, excluding promotionally priced
loans, in effect prior to restructuring. For purpos es of computing
this specific loss component of the allowance, larger impaired
loans are evaluated individually and smaller impaired loans are
evaluated as a pool using historical experience for the respective
product types and risk ratings of the loans.
The second component of the allowance for loan and lease
losses cove rs the remaining consumer and commercial loans
and leases that have incurred losses that are not yet individually
identifiable. The allowance for consumer (including credit card
and other consumer loans) and certain homogeneous
commercial loan and lease products is based on aggregated
portfolio evaluations, which include both quantitative and
qualitative components, generally by product type. Loss forecast models  are utilized that
consider a variety of factors including, but not limited to,
historical loss experien ce, estimated defaults or foreclosures
based on portfolio trends, delinquencies, economic trends, credit
scores and the amount of loss in the event of default. Our
consumer real estate loss forecast model estimates the portion
of loans that will default based on individual loan attributes, the
most significant of which  are refreshed LTV or combined loan-to-
value (CLTV), and borrower credit score as well as vintage and
geography , all of which are further broken down into current
delinquency status. Additionally , we incorporate the delinquency
status of underlying first-lien loans on our junior-lien home equity
portfolio in our allowance process. Incorporatin g refreshed LTV
and CLTV into our probability of default allows us to factor the
impact of changes in home prices into our allowance for loan and
lease losses. These loss forecast models are updated on a
quarterly basis to incorporate information reflec ting the current
economic environment. As of December 31, 2019 , the loss
forecast process resulted in reductions in the allowance related
to the residential mortgage and home equity portfolios compared
to December 31, 2018 .
The allowance for commercial loan and lease losses is
established by product type after analyzing historical loss
experience, internal risk rating, current economic conditions,
industry performance trends, geographic  and obligor
concentrations within each portfolio and any other pertinent
information. The statistical models for comme rcial loans are
generally updated annually and utilize our historical database of
actual defaults and other data, including external default data.
The loan risk ratings and composition of the commercial
portfolios used to calculate the allowance are updated quarterly
to incorporate the most recent data reflecting the current
economic environment.  For risk-rated comme rcial loans, we
estimate the probability of default and the loss given default
(LGD) based  on our historical experience of defaults and credit
losses. Factors considered when assessing the internal risk
rating includ e the value of the underlying collateral, if applicable,
the industry in which the obligor operates, the obligor ’s liquidity
and other financial indicators, and other quantitative and
qualitative factors relev ant to the obligor ’s credit risk. As of
December 31, 2019 , the allowance for the commercial real
estate portfolio increased compared to December 31, 2018 .
Also included within the second component of the allowance
for loan and lease losse s are reserves to cover losses that are
incurred but, in our assessment, may not be adequately
represented in the historical loss data used in the loss forecast
models. For example, factors that we consider include, among
others, changes in lending policies and procedures, changes in
economic and business conditions, changes in the nature and
size of the portfolio, changes in portfolio concentrations, changes
in the volum e and severity of past due loans and nonaccrual
loans, the effect of external factors such as competition, and
legal and regulatory requirements. Further , we consider the
inherent uncertainty in mathematical models that are built upon
historical data.
We monitor differences between estimated and actual
incurred loan and lease losses. This monitoring process includes
periodic assessments by senior management of loan and lease
portfolios and the models used to estimate incurred losses in
those portfolios.
The allowance for loan and lease losses for the consumer
portfolio, as presented in Table 43, was $4.5 billion  at December
31, 2019 , a decrease  of $260 million  from December 31, 2018 .
The decrease  was primari ly in the consumer real estate portfolio,
partially of fset by an increase in the credit card portfolio. The
  Bank of America    68
reduction in the allowan ce for the consumer real estate portfolio
was driven by improve d credit quality , a decrease in loan
balances in our non-core portfolio, proac tive credit risk
management initiatives and high credit quality originations. The
improved credit quality was impacted by continuing
improvements in the U.S. economy and strong labor markets
evidenced by low levels of unemployment and increases in home
prices. Nonp erforming consumer loans decreased $1.8 billion
during 2019 as loan sales, returns to perform ing status and
paydowns continued to outpace additions. The increase in
allowance for the credit card portfolio was primarily driven by
continued portfolio seasoning.
The allowance for loan and lease losses for the commercial
portfolio, as presented in Table 43, was $4.9 billion  at December
31, 2019, an increase  of $75 million from December 31, 2018 .
Commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure increased  to
$11.5 billion  at December 31, 2019  from $11.1 billion  (to 2.09
percent  from 2.08 percent  of total commercial reservable utilized
exposure) at December 31, 2018 , and nonperforming
commercial loans increased  to $1.5 billion at December 31, 2019
from $1.1 billion  (to 0.29 percent  from 0.22 percent  of
outstanding commercial loans excluding loans accounted for
under the fair value option) at December 31, 2018  with the
increases spread across multiple industries. See Tables 32, 33
and 34 for more details on key commercial credit statistics.
The allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of
total loans and leases outstanding was 0.97 percent  at
December 31, 2019  comp ared to 1.02 percent  at December 31,
2018 .
On January 1, 2020, the Corporation adopted the new
accounting standard that requires the measurement of the
allowance for credit losses to be based on management’ s best
estimate of lifetime expected credit losses inherent in the Corporation’ s relevant financial assets. Upon adoption of the
standard on January 1, 2020, the Corporation recorded a $3.3
billion , or 32 percent , increase to the allowance for credit losses.
After adjusti ng for deferred taxes and other adoption effects, a
$2.4 billion  decrease was recorded in retained earnings through
a cumulative-ef fect adjustment. For more information regarding
this new accounting standard, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Reserve for Unfunded Lending Commitments
In addition to the allowa nce for loan and lease losses, we also
estimate probable losses related to unfunded lending
commitments such as letters of credit, financial guarantees,
unfunded bankers’  acceptances and binding loan commitments,
excluding commitments accounted for under the fair value
option. Unfunded lending commitments are subject to the same
assessment as funded loans, including estimates of probability of
default and LGD. Due to the nature of unfunded commitments,
the estimate of probable  losses must also consider utilization. To
estimate the portion of these undrawn commitments that is likely
to be drawn  by a borrower at the time of estimated default,
analyses of our historica l experience are applied to the unfunded
commitments to estimate the funded exposure at default (EAD).
The expected loss for unfunded lending commitments is the
product of the probabil ity of default, the LGD and the EAD,
adjusted for any qualitative factors including economic
uncertainty and inherent imprecision in models.
The reserve for unfund ed lending commitments was $813
million  at December 31, 2019  compared to $797 million  at
December 31, 2018 .
Table
43 Allocation of the Allowance for Credit Losses by Product Type    
 AmountPercent of
TotalPercent of
Loans and
Leases
Outstanding (1) AmountPercent of
Total  Percent of
Loans and
Leases
Outstanding (1)
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Allowance for loan and lease losses        
Residential mortgage $ 325 3.45% 0.14% $ 422 4.40% 0.20%
Home equity 221 2.35 0.55 506 5.27 1.05
Credit card 3,710 39.39 3.80 3,597 37.47 3.66
Direct/Indirect consumer 234 2.49 0.26 248 2.58 0.27
Other consumer 52 0.55 n/m 29 0.30 n/m
Total consumer 4,542 48.23 0.98 4,802 50.02 1.08
U.S. commercial (2) 3,015 32.02 0.94 3,010 31.35 0.96
Non-U.S. commercial 658 6.99 0.63 677 7.05 0.69
Commercial real estate 1,042 11.07 1.66 958 9.98 1.57
Commercial lease financing 159 1.69 0.80 154 1.60 0.68
Total commercial 4,874 51.77 0.96 4,799 49.98 0.97
Allowance for loan and lease losses 9,416 100.00% 0.97 9,601 100.00% 1.02
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments 813  797   
Allowance for credit losses $ 10,229  $ 10,398   
(1) Ratios are calculated as allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of loans and leases outstanding excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option. Consumer loans accounted
for under the fair value option include residential mortgage loans of $257 million  and $336 million  and home equity loans of $337 million  and $346 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018. Commercial
loans accounted for under the fair value option include U.S. commercial loans of $4.7 billion  and $2.5 billion  and non-U.S. commercial loans of $3.1 billion  and $1.1 billion  at December 31, 2019 and
2018.
(2) Includes allowance for loan and lease losses for U.S. small business commercial loans of $523 million  and $474 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
n/m = not meaningful
69     Bank of America
 
Table 44 presents a rollforward of the allowance for credi t losses, which includes the allowance for loan and lease losses and the
reserve for unfunded lending commitments, for 2019  and 2018 .
Table
44 Allowance for Credit Losses    
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 9,601 $ 10,393
Loans and leases charged off    
Residential mortgage (93) (207)
Home equity (429) (483)
Credit card (3,535) (3,345)
Direct/Indirect consumer (518) (495)
Other consumer (249) (197)
Total consumer charge-offs (4,824) (4,727)
U.S. commercial (1) (650) (575)
Non-U.S. commercial (115) (82)
Commercial real estate (31) (10)
Commercial lease financing (26) (8)
Total commercial charge-offs (822) (675)
Total loans and leases charged off (5,646) (5,402)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off    
Residential mortgage 140 179
Home equity 787 485
Credit card 587 508
Direct/Indirect consumer 309 300
Other consumer 15 15
Total consumer recoveries 1,838 1,487
U.S. commercial (2) 122 120
Non-U.S. commercial 31 14
Commercial real estate 2 9
Commercial lease financing 5 9
Total commercial recoveries 160 152
Total recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 1,998 1,639
Net charge-offs (3,648) (3,763)
Provision for loan and lease losses 3,574 3,262
Other (3) (111) (291)
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 9,416 9,601
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 797 777
Provision for unfunded lending commitments 16 20
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 813 797
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 10,229 $ 10,398
Loan and allowance ratios:    
Loans and leases outstanding at December 31 (4) $ 975,091 $ 942,546
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total loans and leases outstanding at December 31 (4) 0.97% 1.02%
Consumer allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total consumer loans and leases outstanding at
December 31 (5) 0.98 1.08
Commercial allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total commercial loans and leases outstanding at
December 31 (6) 0.96 0.97
Average loans and leases outstanding (4) $ 951,583 $ 927,531
Net charge-offs as a percentage of average loans and leases outstanding (4) 0.38% 0.41%
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and leases at December 31 265 194
Ratio of the allowance for loan and lease losses at December 31 to net charge-offs 2.58 2.55
Amounts included in allowance for loan and lease losses for loans and leases that are excluded from nonperforming loans and
leases at December 31 (7) $ 4,151 $ 4,031
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and leases, excluding the allowance for loan
and lease losses for loans and leases that are excluded from nonperforming loans and leases at December 31 (7) 148% 113%
(1) Includes U.S. small business commercial charge-of fs of $320 million  and $287 million  in 2019 and 2018.
(2) Includes U.S. small business commercial recoveries of $48 million  and $47 million  in 2019 and 2018.
(3) Primarily represents write-of fs of purchased credit-impaired (PCI) loans, the net impact of portfolio sales, and transfers to loans held-for-sale.
(4) Outstanding loan and lease balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option of $8.3 billion  and $4.3 billion  at December 31, 2019 and 2018. Average loans accounted
for under the fair value option were $6.8 billion  and $5.5 billion  in 2019 and 2018.
(5) Excludes consumer loans accounted for under the fair value option of $594 million  and $682 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(6) Excludes commercial loans accounted for under the fair value option of $7.7 billion  and $3.7 billion  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(7) Primarily includes amounts allocated to credit card and unsecured consumer lending portfolios in Consumer Banking .
  Bank of America    70
Market Risk Management
Market risk is the risk that changes in market conditions may
adversely impact the value of assets or liabiliti es, or otherwise
negatively impact earnings. This risk is inherent in the financial
instruments associated with our operations, primarily within our
Global Markets  segment. We are also exposed to these risks in
other areas of the Corporation (e.g., our ALM activities). In the
event of market stress, these risks could have a material impact
on our results. For more information, see Interest Rate Risk
Management for the Banking Book  on page 74.
Our traditional banking loan and deposit products are non-
trading posit ions and are generally reported at amortized cost for
assets or the amount owed for liabilities (historical cost).
However , these positions are still subject to changes in economic
value based on varying market conditions, with one of the
primary risks being changes in the levels of interest rates. The
risk of adverse changes in the economic value of our non-trading
positions arising from changes in interest rates is managed
through our ALM activities. We have elected to account for
certain assets and liabilities under the fair value option.
Our trading positions are reported at fair value with changes
reflected in income. Trading positions are subject to various
changes in market-based risk factors. The majo rity of this risk is
generated by our activiti es in the interest rate, foreign exchange,
credit, equity and commo dities markets. In addition, the values of
assets and liabilities could change due to market liquidity ,
correlations across markets and expectations of market volatility .
We seek to manage these risk exposures by using a variety of
techniques that encompass a broad range of financial
instruments. The key risk management techniques are discussed
in more detail in the Trading Risk Management section.
Global Risk Manageme nt is responsible for providing senior
management with a clear and comprehensive understanding of
the trading risks to which we are exposed. These responsibilities
include ownership of market risk policy , developing and
maintaining quantitative risk models, calculating aggregated risk
measures, establishing and monitoring position limits consistent
with risk appetite, conducting daily reviews and analysis of
trading inven tory, approving material risk exposu res and fulfilling
regulatory requirements. Market risks that impact businesses
outside of Global Mark ets are monitored and governed by their
respective governance functions.
Model risk is the potential for adverse consequences from
decisions based on incorrect or misused model outputs and
reports. Given that models are used across the Corporation,
model risk impacts all risk types including credit, market and
operational risk. The Enterprise Model Risk Com mittee (EMRC),
a subcommittee of the MRC, is responsible for providing
management oversight and approval of model risk management
and govern ance. The EMRC defines model risk standards,
consistent with the Corporation’ s Risk Framework and risk
appetite, prevailing regulatory guidance and industry best
practice. All models, including risk management, valuation and
regulatory capital models, must meet certain validation criteria,
including effective challenge of the conceptual soundness of the
model, independent model testing and ongoing monitoring
through outcomes analysis and benchmarkin g. The EMRC
oversees that model standards are consistent with model risk
requirements and monitors the effective challenge in the model
validation process across the Corporation.
Interest Rate Risk
Interest rate risk represents exposures to instruments whose
values vary with the level or volatility of interest rates. These
instruments include, but are not limited to, loans, debt securities, certain tradin g-related assets and liabilities, depo sits, borrowings
and derivatives. Hedging instruments used to mitigate these
risks include derivatives such as options, futures, forwards and
swaps.
Foreign Exchange Risk
Foreign exchange risk represents exposures to changes in the
values of current holding s and future cash flows denominated in
currencies other than the U.S. dollar . The types of instruments
exposed to this risk include investments in non-U.S. subsidiaries,
foreign curre ncy-denominated loans and securities, future cash
flows in foreign currencies arising from foreign exchange
transactions, foreign currency-denominated debt and various
foreign exchange derivatives whose values  fluctuate with
changes in the level or volatility of currency exchange rates or
non-U.S. interest rates. Hedging instruments used to mitigate
this risk include foreig n exchange options, currency swaps,
futures, forwards, and foreign currency-denom inated debt and
deposits.
Mortgage Risk
Mortgage risk represents exposures to changes  in the values of
mortgage-related instruments. The values of these instruments
are sensitive to prepayment rates, mortgage rates, agency debt
ratings, default, market  liquidity , government participation and
interest rate volatility . Our exposure to these instruments takes
several forms. For example, we trade and engage in market-
making activities in a variety of mortgage securities including
whole loans , pass-through certificates, commercial mortgages
and collater alized mortgage obligations including collateralized
debt obligations using mortgages as underlyi ng collateral. In
addition, we originate a variety of MBS, which involves the
accumulation of mortgage-related loans in anticipation of
eventual securitization, and we may hold positions in mortgage
securities and residenti al mortgage loans as part of the ALM
portfolio. We also record MSRs as part of our mortgage
origination activities. Hedging instruments used to mitigate this
risk include derivatives such as options, swaps, futures and
forwards as well as securities including MBS and U.S. Treasury
securities. For more information, see Mortgage Banking Risk
Management  on page 76.
Equity Market Risk
Equity mark et risk represents exposures to securities that
represent an ownership interest in a corporatio n in the form of
domestic and foreign common stock or other equity-linked
instruments. Instruments that would lead to this exposure
include, but are not limited to, the following: common stock,
exchange-traded funds, American Depositary Receipts,
convertible bonds, listed equity options (puts and calls), OTC
equity options, equity total return swaps, equity index futures and
other equity derivative products. Hedging instruments used to
mitigate this risk include options, futures, swaps, convertible
bonds and cash positions.
Commodity Risk
Commodity risk represents exposures to instru ments traded in
the petroleum, natural gas, power and metals markets. These
instruments consist primarily of futures, forwa rds, swaps and
options. Hedging instruments used to mitigate this risk include
options, futures and swaps in the same or similar commodity
product, as well as cash positions.
Issuer Credit Risk
Issuer credit risk represents exposures to changes in the
creditworthiness of individual issuers or groups of issuers. Our
portfolio is exposed to issuer credit risk where  the value of an
asset may be adversely  impacted by changes  in the levels of
credit spreads, by credit migration or by defaults. Hedging
instruments
71     Bank of America
 
used to mitigate this risk include bonds, CDS and other credit
fixed-income instruments.
Market Liquidity Risk
Market liquid ity risk represents the risk that the level of expected
market activity changes dramatically and, in certain cases, may
even cease. This exposes us to the risk that we will not be able
to transact business and execute trades in an orderly manner
which may impact our results. This impact could be further
exacerbated if expected hedging or pricing correlations are
compromised by disproportionate demand or lack of demand for
certain instruments. We utilize various risk mitigating techniques
as discussed in more detail in Trading Risk Management .
Trading Risk Management
To evaluate risks in our trading activities, we focus on the actual
and potential volatility of revenues generated by individual
positions as well as portfolios of positions. Various techniques
and procedures are utilized to enable the most complete
understanding of these risks. Quantitative measures of market
risk are evaluated on a daily basis from a single position to the
portfolio of the Corporation. These measures include sensitivities
of positions to various market risk factors, such as the potential
impact on revenue from a one basis point change in interest
rates, and statistical measures utilizing both actual and
hypothetical market moves, such as VaR and stress testing.
Periods of extreme market stress influence the reliability of these
techniques to varying degrees. Qualitative evalu ations of market
risk utilize the suite of quantitative risk measures while
understanding each of their respective limitations. Additionally ,
risk managers independently evaluate the risk of the portfolios
under the current market environment and potential future
environments.
VaR is a common statistic used to measure market risk as it
allows the aggregation of market risk factors, including the
effects of portfolio diversification. A VaR model simulates the
value of a portfolio under a range of scenarios in order to
generate a distribution of potential gains and losses. VaR
represents the loss a portfolio is not expected to exceed more
than a certain number of times per period, based on a specified
holding period, confidence level and window of historical data.
We use one VaR model consistently across the trading portfolios
and it uses a historical simulation approach based on a three-
year window of historic al data. Our primary VaR statistic is
equivalent to a 99 percent confidence level, which means that for
a VaR with a one-day holding period, there shou ld not be losses
in excess of V aR, on average, 99 out of 100 trading days.
Within any VaR model, there are significant and numerous
assumptions that will differ from company to company . The
accuracy of a VaR mode l depends on the availability and quality
of historical data for each of the risk factors in the portfolio. A
VaR model may require additional modeling assumptions for new
products that do not have the necessary historical market data or
for less liquid positions for which accurate daily prices are not
consistently available. For positions with insuf ficient historical
data for the VaR calcu lation, the process for establishing an
appropriate proxy is based on fundamental and statistical
analysis of the new product or less liquid position. This analysis
identifies reasonable alternatives that replicate both the expected
volatility and correlation to other market risk factors that the
missing data would be expected to experience.
VaR may not be indica tive of realized revenue  volatility as
changes in market conditions or in the composition of the
portfolio can have a material impact on the results. In particular ,
the historical data used  for the VaR calculation might indicate
higher or lower levels of portfolio diversification than will be
experienced. In order for the VaR model to reflect current market conditions,
we update the historica l data underlying our VaR model on a
weekly basis, or more frequently during periods of market stress,
and regularly review the assumptions underlying the model. A
minor portio n of risks related to our trading positions is not
included in VaR. These risks are reviewed as part of our ICAAP .
For more information regarding ICAAP , see Capital Management
on page 45.
Global Risk Managemen t continually reviews, evaluates and
enhances our VaR model so that it reflects the material risks in
our trading portfolio. Changes to the VaR model are reviewed
and approved prior to implementation and any material changes
are reporte d to management through the appropriate
management committees.
Trading limits on quantitative risk measures, including VaR,
are independently set by Global Markets Risk Management and
reviewed on a regular basis so that trading limits remain relevant
and within our overall risk appetite for market risks. Trading limits
are reviewed in the context of market liquidity , volatility and
strategic business priorities. Trading limits are set at both a
granular level to allow for extensive coverage of risks as well as
at aggregated portfolios to account for correlations among risk
factors. All trading limits are approved at least annually .
Approved trading limits are stored and tracked  in a centralized
limits management system. Trading limit excesses are
communicated to management for review . Certain quantitative
market risk measures and corresponding limits have been
identified as critical in the Corporation’ s Risk Appetite Statement.
These risk appetite limits are reported on a daily basis and are
approved at least annually by the ERC and the Board.
In periods of market stress, Global Markets  senior leadership
communicates daily to discuss losses, key risk positions and any
limit excesse s. As a result of this process, the businesses may
selectively reduce risk.
Table 45 presents the total market-based portfolio VaR which
is the combination of the total covered positions  (and less liquid
trading positions) portfolio and the fair value option portfolio.
Covered positions are defined by regulatory standards as trading
assets and liabilities, both on- and off-balance sheet, that meet a
defined set of specifications. These specificat ions identify the
most liquid trading posit ions which are intended  to be held for a
short-term horizon and where we are able to hedge the material
risk elements in a two-way market. Positions in less liquid
markets, or where there are restrictions on the ability to trade the
positions, typically do not qualify as covered positions. Foreign
exchange and commodity positions are always considered
covered positions, except for structural foreign currency positions
that are excluded with prior regulatory approval. In addition,
Table 45 prese nts our fair value option portfolio, which includes
substantially all of the funded and unfunded exposures for which
we elect the fair value option, and their corresponding hedges.
Additionally , market risk VaR for trading activities  as presented in
Table 45 differs from VaR used for regulatory capital calculations
due to the holding period  being used. The holding period for VaR
used for regulatory capital calculations is 10 days, while for the
market risk VaR presen ted below , it is one day. Both measures
utilize the same process and methodology .
The total market-based portfolio VaR results in Table 45
include market risk to which we are exposed from all business
segments, excluding credit valuation adjustment (CVA), DVA and
related hedg es. The majority of this portfolio is within the Global
Markets  segment.
Table 45 presents year-end, average, high and low daily
trading VaR for 2019  and 2018  using a 99 percent confidence
level. The amounts disclosed in Table 45 and Table 46 align to
the view of covered positions used in the Basel 3 capital
calculations. Foreign
  Bank of America    72
exchange and commodity positions are always considered
covered positions, regardless of trading or banking treatment for
the trade, except for structural foreign currency positions that are
excluded with prior regulatory approval. The annual average of total covered positions and less liquid
trading positions portfo lio VaR slightly increased during 2019
with no significant drivers.
Table
45 Market Risk VaR for Trading Activities    
 2019  2018
(Dollars in millions)Year
End  Average  High  (1) Low  (1) Year
End  Average  High  (1) Low  (1)
Foreign exchange $ 4 $ 6 $ 13 $ 2 $ 9 $ 8 $ 15 $ 2
Interest rate 25 24 49 14 36 25 45 15
Credit 26 23 32 16 26 25 31 20
Equity 29 22 33 14 20 20 40 11
Commodities 4 6 31 4 13 8 15 3
Portfolio diversification (47) (49) — — (59) (55) — —
Total covered positions portfolio 41 32 47 24 45 31 45 20
Impact from less liquid exposures — 3 — — 5 3 — —
Total covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfolio 41 35 53 27 50 34 51 23
Fair value option loans 8 10 13 7 8 11 18 8
Fair value option hedges 10 10 17 4 5 9 17 4
Fair value option portfolio diversification (9) (10) — — (7) (11) — —
Total fair value option portfolio 9 10 16 5 6 9 16 5
Portfolio diversification (5) (7) — — (3) (5) — —
Total market-based portfolio $ 45 $ 38 56 28 $53 $ 38 57 26
(1) The high and low for each portfolio may have occurred on different trading days than the high and low for the components. Therefore the impact from less liquid exposures and the amount of
portfolio diversification, which is the dif ference between the total portfolio and the sum of the individual components, is not relevant.
The graph below presents the daily covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfolio VaR for 2019 , corre sponding to
the data in Table 45 .
Additional VaR statistics  produced within our single VaR model are provided in Table 46 at the same  level of detail as in Table 45.
Evaluating VaR with additional statistics allows for an increased understanding of the risks in the portfolio as the historical market
data used in the VaR calculation does not necessarily follow a predefined statistical distribution . Table 46 presents average tradin g
VaR statistics at 99 percent and 95 percent confidence levels for 2019  and 2018 .
Table
46 Average Market Risk VaR for Trading Activities – 99 percent and 95 percent VaR Statistics
  2019  2018
(Dollars in millions) 99 percent 95 percent 99 percent 95 percent
Foreign exchange $ 6 $ 3 $ 8 $ 5
Interest rate 24 15 25 16
Credit 23 15 25 15
Equity 22 11 20 11
Commodities 6 3 8 4
Portfolio diversification (49) (29) (55) (33)
Total covered positions portfolio 32 18 31 18
Impact from less liquid exposures 3 2 3 1
Total covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfolio 35 20 34 19
Fair value option loans 10 5 11 6
Fair value option hedges 10 6 9 6
Fair value option portfolio diversification (10) (5) (11) (7)
Total fair value option portfolio 10 6 9 5
Portfolio diversification (7) (5) (5) (3)
Total market-based portfolio $ 38 $ 21 $ 38 $ 21
73     Bank of America
 
Backtesting
The accuracy of the VaR methodology is evaluated by
backtesting, which compares the daily VaR results, utilizing a
one-day holding period, against a comparable subset of trading
revenue. A backtesting excess occurs when a trading loss
exceeds the VaR for the corresponding day. These excesses are
evaluated to understand the positions and market moves that
produced the trading loss with a goal to ensure that the VaR
methodology accurately represents those losses. We expect the
frequency of trading losses in excess of VaR to be in line with the
confidence level of the VaR statistic being tested. For example,
with a 99 percent confid ence level, we expect one trading loss in
excess of VaR every 100 days or between two to three trading
losses in excess of VaR over the course of a year. The number
of backtesting excesses observed can differ from the statistically
expected number of excesses if the current level of market
volatility is materially different than the level of market volatility
that existed during the three years of historical data used in the
VaR calculation.
The trading revenue used for backtesting is defined by
regulatory agencies in order to most closely align with the VaR
component of the regulatory capital calculation. This revenue
differs from total trading-related revenue in that it excludes
revenue from trading activities that either do not generate market
risk or the market risk cannot be included in VaR. Some
examples of the types of revenue excluded for backtesting are
fees, commissions, reserves, net interest income and intra-day
trading revenues.
We conduct  daily backtesting on the VaR results used for
regulatory capital calculations as well as the VaR results for key
legal entities, regions and risk factors. These results are reported
to senior market risk management. Senior management regularly
reviews and evaluates the results of these tests.
During 2019 , there were no days in which there was a
backtesting excess for our total covered portfolio V aR, utilizing a
one-day holding period.
Total Trading-related Revenue
Total trading-related revenue, excluding brokerage fees, and
CVA, DVA and funding  valuation adjustment gains (losses),
represents the total amount earned from trading positions,
including market-based net interest income, which are taken in a
diverse range of
financial instruments and markets. Trading account assets and
liabilities are reported at fair value. For more information on fair
value, see Note 21 – Fair Value Measurements  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements . Trading-rel ated revenue can
be volatile and is largely driven by general market conditions and
customer demand. Also, trading-related revenue is dependent on
the volume and type of transactions, the level of risk assumed,
and the volatility of price and rate movements at any given time
within the ever-changin g market environment. Significant daily
revenue by business is monitored and the primary drivers of
these are reviewed.
The following histogram is a graphic depiction of trading
volatility and illustrates the daily level of trading-related revenue
for 2019  and 2018 . During 2019 , positive trading-related revenue
was recorded for 98 percent of the trading days, of which 80
percent were daily trading gains of over $25 million, and the
largest loss was $35 million. This compares to 2018  where
positive trading-related revenue was recorded for 98 percent of
the trading days, of which 79 percent were daily trading gains of
over $25 million. 
Trading Portfolio Stress Testing
Because the very nature of a VaR model suggests results can
exceed our estimates and it is dependent on a limited historical
window , we also stress test our portfolio using scenario analysis.
This analysis estimates the change in the value of our trading
portfolio that may result from abnormal market movements.
A set of scenarios, categorized as either historical or
hypothetical, are computed daily for the overall trading portfolio
and individual businesses. These scenarios include shocks to
underlying market risk factors that may be well beyond the
shocks found in the historical data used to calculate VaR.
Historical scenarios simulate the impact of the market moves
that occurred during a period of extended historical market
stress. Generally , a multi-week period representing the most
severe point during a crisis is selected for each historical
scenario. Hypothetical scenarios provide estimated portfolio
impacts from potential future market stress events. Scenarios
are reviewed and update d in response to changing positions and
new economic or political information. In addition, new or ad hoc
scenarios are develope d to address specific potential market
events or particular vulnerabilities in the portfolio. The stress
tests are reviewed on a regular basis and the results are
presented to senior management.
Stress testing for the trading portfolio is integrated with
enterprise-wide stress testing and incorporated  into the limits
framework. The macroeconomic scenarios used for enterprise-
wide stress testing purposes differ from the typical trading
portfolio scenarios in that they have a longer time horizon and
the results are forecas ted over multiple periods for use in
consolidated capital and liquidity planning. For more information,
see Managing Risk  on page 42.
Interest Rate Risk Management for the
Banking Book
The following discussion presents net interest income for
banking book activities.
Interest rate risk represents the most significant market risk
exposure to our banking  book balance sheet. Interest rate risk is
measured as the potential change in net interest income caused
by movements in market interest rates. Client-facing activities,
primarily lending and deposit-taking, create intere st rate sensitive
positions on our balance sheet.
We prepare forward-looking forecasts of net interest income.
The baselin e forecast takes into consideration expected future
business growth, ALM positioning and the direction of interest
rate movements as implied by the market-based forward curve.
We then measure and evaluate the impact that alternative
interest rate scenarios have on the baseline forecast in order to
assess interest rate sensitivity under varied conditions. The net
interest income forecast is frequently updated for changing
assumptions and differing outlooks based on economic trends,
market cond itions and business strategies. Thus , we continually
monitor
  Bank of America    74
our balance sheet position in order to maintai n an acceptable
level of exposure to interest rate changes.
The interes t rate scenarios that we analyze incorporate
balance sheet assumptions such as loan and deposit growth and
pricing, changes in funding mix, product repricing, maturity
characteristics and investment securities premiu m amortization.
Our overall  goal is to manage interest rate risk so that
movements in interest rates do not significantly adversely affect
earnings and capital.
Table 47 prese nts the spot and 12-month forward rates used
in our baseline forecasts at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
Table
47 Forward Rates
 December 31, 2019
  Federal
Funds  Three-month
LIBOR  10-Year
Swap
Spot rates 1.75% 1.91% 1.90%
12-month forward rates 1.50 1.62 1.92
 December 31, 2018
Spot rates 2.50% 2.81% 2.71%
12-month forward rates 2.50 2.64 2.75
Table 48 show s the pretax impact to forecasted net interest
income over the next 12 months from December 31, 2019 and
2018 , resulting from instan taneous parallel and non-parallel
shocks to the market- based forward curve. Periodically we
evaluate the scenarios presented so that they are meaningful in
the context of the current rate environment.
During 2019 , the asset sensitivity of our balance sheet
increased primarily due to decreases in interest rates. We
continue to be asset sensitive to a parallel move in interest rates
with the majority of that impact coming from the short end of the
yield curve. Additionally , higher interest rates impact the fair
value of debt securities and, accordingly , for debt securities
classified as available for sale (AFS), may adversely affect
accumulated other comprehensive income (OCI)  and thus capital
levels under the Basel 3 capital rules. Under instantaneous
upward parallel shifts, the near-term adverse impact to Basel 3
capital is reduced over time by offsetting positive impacts to net
interest income. For more information on Base l 3, see Capital
Management – Regulatory Capital  on page 46.
Table
48Estimated Banking Book Net Interest Income
Sensitivity to Curve Changes
 
Short
Rate
(bps) 
Long
Rate
(bps) 
   December 31
(Dollars in millions)   2019 2018
Parallel Shifts    
+100 bps
instantaneous shift +100 +100 $ 4,190 $ 2,833
-100 bps
instantaneous shift -100 -100 (6,536) (4,280)
Flatteners     
Short-end
instantaneous
change +100 — 2,641 2,158
Long-end
instantaneous
change — -100 (2,965) (1,618)
Steepeners     
Short-end
instantaneous
change -100 — (3,527) (2,648)
Long-end
instantaneous
change — +100 1,561 675 changes in interest rates. As part of our ALM activities, we use
securities, certain residential mortgages, and interest rate and
foreign exchange derivatives in managing interest rate
sensitivity .
The behavior of our deposits portfolio in the baseline forecast
and in alternate interes t rate scenarios is a key assumption in
our projected estimates of net interest income. The sensitivity
analysis in Table 48 assumes no change in deposit portfolio size
or mix from the baseline forecast in alternate rate environments.
In higher rate scenarios, any customer activity  resulting in the
replacement of low-cost or noninterest-bearin g deposits with
higher yielding deposits or market-based funding would reduce
our benefit in those scenarios.
Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Derivative
Contracts
Interest rate and foreign exchange derivative contracts are
utilized in our ALM activities and serve as an efficient tool to
manage our interest rate and foreign exchange risk. We use
derivatives to hedge the variability in cash flows or changes in
fair value on our balance sheet due to interest rate and foreign
exchange components. For more information on our hedging
activities, see Note 3 – Derivatives  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Our interest rate contracts are generally non-leveraged
generic interest rate and foreign exchange basis swaps, options,
futures and forwards. In addition, we use foreign exchange
contracts, including cross-currency interest rate swaps, foreign
currency futures contra cts, foreign currency forward contracts
and options to mitigate the foreign exchange risk associated with
foreign currency-denominated assets and liabilities.
Changes to the composition of our derivatives portfolio during
2019  reflec t actio ns taken for interest rate and foreign exchange
rate risk management. The decisions to reposition our
derivatives portfolio are based on the current assessment of
economic and financial conditions including the interest rate and
foreign curre ncy environ ments, balance sheet composition and
trends, and the relative mix of our cash and derivative positions.
We use interest rate derivative instruments to hedge the
variability in the cash flows of our assets and liabilities and other
forecasted transactions (collectively referred to as cash flow
hedges). The net losses on both open and terminated cash flow
hedge deriva tive instruments recorded in accum ulated OCI were
$496 million and $1.3 billion , on a pretax basis, at December 31,
2019 and 2018 . These net losses are expected to be reclassified
into earnings in the same period as the hedged cash flows affect
earnings and will decrease income or increase expense on the
respective hedged cash flows. Assuming no change in open
cash flow derivative hedge positions and no changes in prices or
interest rates beyond what is implied in forward yield curves at
December 31, 2019 , the pretax net losses are expected to be
reclassified into earnings as follows: 17 percent within the next
year, 44 percent in years two through five, 22 percent in years
six through ten, with the remaining 17 percen t thereafter . For
more information on derivatives designated as cash flow hedges,
see Note 3 – Derivatives  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
We hedge our net investment in non-U.S . operations
determined to have functional currencies other than the U.S.
dollar using forward foreign exchange contracts that typically
settle in less than 180 days, cross-currency basis swaps and
foreign exchange options. We recorded net after-tax losses on
derivatives in accumula ted OCI associated with net investment
hedges which were offset by gains on our net investments in
consolidated non-U.S. entities at December 31, 2019 .
Table 49 presents derivatives utilized in our ALM activities and
shows the notional amount, fair value, weighted-average
receive-fixed and pay-fixed rates, expected matu rity and average
estimated
The sensitivity analysis in Table 48 assumes that we take no
action in response to these rate shocks and does not assume
any change in other macroeconomic variables normally
correlated with75     Bank of America
 
durations of our open ALM derivatives at December 31, 2019
and 2018. Thes e amounts do not include derivative hedges on
our MSRs. During 2019 , the fair value of receive-fixed interest
rate swaps incre ased while pay-fixed interest rate swaps decreased,
driven by lower swap rates.
Table 49Asset and Liability Management Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Contracts
   December 31, 2019  
   Expected Maturity  
(Dollars in millions, average estimated duration
in years)Fair
Value Total 2020  2021 2022 2023 2024 ThereafterAverage
Estimated
Duration
Receive-fixed interest rate swaps (1) $12,370           6.47
Notional amount   $215,123 $16,347 $14,642 $21,616 $36,356 $21,257 $104,905 
Weighted-average fixed-rate   2.68% 2.68% 3.17% 2.48% 2.36% 2.55% 2.79% 
Pay-fixed interest rate swaps (1) (2,669)           6.99
Notional amount   $69,586 $ 4,344 $2,117 $ — $13,993 $8,194 $40,938  
Weighted-average fixed-rate   2.36% 2.16% 2.15% —% 2.52% 2.26% 2.35% 
Same-currency basis swaps (2) (290)            
Notional amount   $152,160 $18,857 $18,590 $4,306 $2,017 $14,567 $93,823  
Foreign exchange basis swaps (1, 3, 4) (1,258)        
Notional amount   113,529 23,639 24,215 14,611 7,111 3,521 40,432  
Foreign exchange contracts (1, 4, 5) 414        
Notional amount (6)   (53,106) (79,315) 4,539 2,674 2,340 4,432 12,224 
Option products —        
Notional amount   15 — — — 15 — —  
Net ALM contracts $8,567            
   December 31, 2018
   Expected Maturity
(Dollars in millions, average
estimated duration in years)Fair
Value Total 2019  2020 2021  2022  2023 ThereafterAverage
Estimated
Duration
Receive-fixed interest rate
swaps (1) $2,128           5.17
Notional amount  $198,914 $27,176 $16,347 $14,640 $19,866 $36,215 $84,670  
Weighted-average fixed-rate  2.66% 1.87% 2.68% 3.17% 2.56% 2.37% 2.97%  
Pay-fixed interest rate swaps (1) 295           6.30
Notional amount  $49,275 $ 1,210 $ 4,344 $ 1,616 $ — $10,801 $31,304  
Weighted-average fixed-rate  2.50% 2.07% 2.16% 2.22% —% 2.59% 2.55%  
Same-currency basis swaps (2) 21            
Notional amount  $101,203 $ 7,628 $15,097 $15,493 $ 2,586 $ 2,017 $58,382  
Foreign exchange basis swaps
(1, 3, 4) (1,716)            
Notional amount  106,742 13,946 21,448 19,241 10,239 6,260 35,608  
Foreign exchange contracts (1,
4, 5) 82           
Notional amount (6)  (8,447) (27,823) 13 4,196 2,741 2,448 9,978
Option products 2            
Notional amount  587 572 — — — 15 —  
Net ALM contracts $ 812            
(1) Does not include basis adjustments on either fixed-rate debt issued by the Corporation or AFS debt securities, which are hedged using derivatives designated as fair value hedging instruments,
that substantially of fset the fair values of these derivatives.
(2) At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the notional amount of same-currency basis swaps included $152.2 billion  and $101.2 billion  in both foreign currency and U.S. dollar-denominated basis swaps in
which both sides of the swap are in the same currency .
(3) Foreign exchange basis swaps consisted of cross-currency variable interest rate swaps used separately or in conjunction with receive-fixed interest rate swaps.
(4) Does not include foreign currency translation adjustments on certain non-U.S. debt issued by the Corporation that substantially of fset the fair values of these derivatives.
(5) The notional amount of foreign exch ange contracts of $(53.1) billion  at December 31, 2019 was comprised of $29.0 billion in foreign currency-denominated and cross-currency receive-fixed swaps,
$(82.4) billion in net foreign currency  forward rate contracts, $(313) million in foreign currency-denominated interest rate swaps and $644 million in net foreign currency futures contracts. Foreign
exchange contracts of $(8.4) billion  at December 31, 2018 were comprised of $25.2 billion  in foreign currency-denominated and cross-currency receive-fixed swaps, $(32.7) billion  in net foreign
currency forward rate contracts, $(1.8) billion  in foreign currency-denominated interest rate swaps and $814 million  in foreign currency futures contracts.
(6) Reflects the net of long and short positions. Amounts shown as negative reflect a net short position.
Mortgage Banking Risk Management
We originate, fund and service mortgage loans, which subject us
to credit, liquidity and interest rate risks, among others. We
determine whether loans will be held for invest ment or held for
sale at the time of commitment and manage credit and liquidity
risks by selling or securitizing a portion of the loans we originate.
Interest rate risk and market risk can be substantial in the
mortgage business. Changes in interest rates and other market
factors impact the volume of mortgage originations. Changes in
interest rates also impact the value of interest rate lock
commitments (IRLCs) and the related residenti al first mortgage
LHFS betwe en the date of the IRLC and the date the loans are
sold to the secondary market. An increase in mortgage interest
rates typica lly leads to a decrease in the value of these
instruments. Conversely , when there is an increase in interest rates, the value of the MSRs will increase driven by lower
prepayment expectation s. Because the intere st rate risks of
these hedge d items offset, we combine them into one overall
hedged item with one combined economic hedge portfolio
consisting of derivative contracts and securities.
During 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , we recorded gains of $291
million, $244 million and $118 million related to the change in fair
value of the MSRs, IRLC s and LHFS, net of gains and losses on
the hedge portfolio. For more information on MSRs, see Note 21
– Fair Value Measure ments  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Compliance and Operational Risk
Management
Compliance risk is the risk of legal or regul atory sanctions,
material financial loss or damage to the reputation of the
Corporation arising from the failure of the Corpo ration to comply
with the
  Bank of America    76
requirements of applicable laws, rules, regulations and our
internal policies and procedures (collectively , applicable laws,
rules and regulations).
Operational risk is the risk of loss resulting from inadequate
or failed processes, people and systems or from external events.
Operational risk may occur anywhere in the Corporation,
including third-party business processes, and is not limited to
operations functions. Effects may extend beyond financial losses
and may result in reputational risk impacts. Operational risk
includes legal risk. Additionally , operational risk is a component
in the calcul ation of total risk-weighted assets used in the Basel
3 capital calculation. For more information on Basel 3
calculations, see Capital Management  on page 45.
FLUs and control functions are first and foremost responsible
for managing all aspects of their businesses, including their
compliance and operational risk. FLUs and control functions are
required to understand their business proces ses and related
risks and controls, including third-party dependencies, the
related regulatory requirements, and monitor and report on the
effectiveness of the control environment. In order to actively
monitor and assess the performance of their processes and
controls, they must conduct comprehensive quality assurance
activities and identify issues and risks to remediate control gaps
and weaknesses. FLUs and control functions must also adhere
to compliance and operational risk appetite limits to meet
strategic, capital and financial planning objective s. Finally , FLUs
and control functions are responsible for the proactive
identification, managem ent and escalation of compliance and
operational risks across the Corporation.
Global Compliance and Operational Risk teams
independently assess compliance and operatio nal risk, monitor
business activities and processes, evaluate FLUs and control
functions for adherence to applicable laws, rules and regulations,
including identifying issues and risks, determining and
developing tests to be conducted by the Enterprise Independent
Testing unit, and reporting on the state of the control
environment. Enterprise  Independent Testing, an independent
testing function within IRM, works with Global Compliance and
Operational Risk, the FLUs and control functions in the
identification of testing needs and test design, and is
accountable for test execution, reporting and analysis of results.
Corporate Audit provides independent asse ssment and
validation through testing of key compliance and operational risk
processes and controls across the Corporation.
The Corpora tion's Globa l Compliance Enterprise Policy and
Operational Risk Management - Enterprise Policy set the
requirements for reporting compliance and operational risk
information to executive management as well as the Board or
appropriate Board-leve l committees in support of Global
Compliance and Operational Risk’ s responsibilities for
conducting independen t oversight of our compliance and
operational risk management activities. The Board provides
oversight of compliance risk through its Audit Committee and the
ERC, and operational risk through the ERC.
A key operational risk facing the Corporation is information
security , which includes cybersecurity . Cybersecurity risk
represents, among other things, exposure to failures or
interruptions of service or breaches of security , including as a
result of malicious technological attacks, that impact the
confidentiality , availability or integrity of our, or third parties'
(including their downstream service providers, the financial
services industry and financial data aggregators) operations,
systems or data, including sensitive corporate  and customer
information. The Corporation manages information security risk
in accordance with  internal policies which govern our comprehensive informat ion security program designed to protect
the Corpor ation by enabling preventative, detective and
responsive measures to combat information and cybersecurity
risks. The Board and the ERC provide cybersecurity and
information security risk oversight for the Corporation and our
Global Information Security Team manages the day-to-day
implementation of our information security program.
Reputational Risk Management
Reputational risk is the risk that negative perceptions of the
Corporation’ s conduct or business practices may adversely
impact its profitability or operations. Reputational risk may result
from many of the Corporation’ s activities, including those related
to the management of our strategic, operational, compliance and
credit risks.
The Corporation manages reputational risk through
established policies and controls in its businesses and risk
management processes to mitigate reputational risks in a timely
manner and through proactive monitoring and identification of
potential reputational risk events. If reputational risk events
occur , we focus on remediating the underlying issue and taking
action to minimize damage to the Corporation’ s reputation. The
Corporation has processes and procedures in place to respond
to events that give rise to reputational risk, including educating
individuals and organizations that influence public opinion,
implementing external communication strategies to mitigate the
risk, and informing key stakeholders of potential reputational
risks. The Corporation’ s organization and governance structure
provides oversight of reputational risks, and reputational risk
reporting is provided regularly and directly to management and
the ERC, which provides primary oversight of reputational risk. In
addition, each FLU has a committee, which includes
representatives from Compliance, Legal and Risk, that is
responsible for the oversight of reputatio nal risk. Such
committees’  oversight includes providing approval for business
activities that present elevated levels of reputational risks.
Complex Accounting Estimates
Our significant accounting principles, as descri bed in Note 1 -
Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, are essential in
understanding the MD&A. Many of our signifi cant accounting
principles require complex judgments to estimate the values of
assets and liabilities. We have procedures and processes in
place to facilitate making these judgments.
The more judgmental estimates are summa rized in the
following discussion. We have identified and described the
development of the variables most important in the estimation
processes that involve mathematical models to derive the
estimates. In many cases, there are numerous alternative
judgments that could be used in the process of determining the
inputs to the models. Where alternatives exist, we have used the
factors that we believe represent the most reasonable value in
developing the inputs. Actual performance that differs from our
estimates of the key variables could materially impact our results
of operations. Separate from the possible future impact to our
results of operations from input and model variables, the value of
our lending portfolio and market-sensitive asse ts and liabilities
may change subsequent to the balance sheet date, often
significantly , due to the nature and magnitude of future credit and
market conditions. Such credit and market conditions may
change quickly and in unforeseen ways and the resulting
volatility could have a significant, negative effect on future
operating results. These fluctuations would not be indicative of
deficiencies in our models or inputs.
77     Bank of America
 
Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowance for credit  losses, which includes the allowance for
loan and lease losses and the reserve for unfunded lending
commitments, represents management’ s estim ate of probable
incurred credit losses in the Corporation’ s loan and lease
portfolio excluding those loans accounted for under the fair value
option. The allowance for credit losses includes both quantitative
and qualitative components. The qualitative component has a
higher degre e of management subjectivity , and includes factors
such as concentrations, economic conditions and other
considerations. Our process for determining the allowance for
credit losses  is discussed in Note 1 – Summary of Significant
Accounting Principles  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Our estimate  for the allowance for loan and lease losses is
sensitive to the loss rates and expected cash flows from our
Consumer Real Estate and Credit Card and Other Consumer
portfolio segments, as well as our U.S. small business
commercial card portfolio within the Commercial portfolio
segment. For each one-percent increase in the loss rates on
loans collectively evaluated for impairment in our Consumer Real
Estate portfolio segment, coupled with a one-percent decrease in
the discounted cash flows on those loans individually evaluated
for impairment within this portfolio segment, the allowance for
loan and lease losses  at December 31, 2019  would have
increased $18 million. Within our Credit Card and Other
Consumer portfolio segment and U.S. small business
commercial card portfolio, for each one-percent increase in the
loss rates on loans collectively evaluated for impairment coupled
with a one-percent decre ase in the expected cash flows on those
loans individually evaluated for impairment, the allowance for
loan and lease losses  at December 31, 2019  would have
increased $46 million.
Our allowan ce for loan and lease losses is sensitive to the
risk ratings assigned to loans and leases within the Commercial
portfolio segment (excluding the U.S. small business commercial
card portfolio ). Assuming a downgrade of one level in the internal
risk ratings for commercial loans and leases, except loans and
leases already classified as Substandard and Doubtful as
defined by regulatory authorities, the allowance for loan and
lease losses would have increased $2.6 billion at December 31,
2019 .
The allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of
total loans and leases at December 31, 2019  was 0.97 percent
and these hypothetical increases in the allowance would raise
the ratio to 1.24 percent.
These sens itivity analys es do not represent management’ s
expectations of the deterioration in risk ratings or the increases
in loss rates but are provided as hypothetic al scenarios to
assess the sensitivity of the allowance for loan and lease losses
to changes in key inputs. We believe the risk ratings and loss
severities currently in use are appropriate and that the probability
of the alternative scenarios outlined above occurring within a
short period of time is remote.
The process  of determining the level of the allowance for
credit losses  requires a high degree of judgme nt. It is possible
that others, given the same information, may at any point in time
reach dif ferent reasonable conclusions.
The process es, judgme nts and estimates described herein
relate to the accounting standard in effect through December 31,
2019. On January 1, 2020, the Corporation adopted the new
accounting standard that requires the measurement of the
allowance for credit losses to be based on management’ s best
estimate of lifetime expected credit losses inherent in the
Corporation’ s relevant financial assets. The Corporation’ s lifetime
expected credit losses are determined using macroeconomic
forecast assumptions and management judgments applicable to
and through the expected life of the loan portfolios. For more information, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
Under applicable accounting standards, we are required to
maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
unobservable inputs in measuring fair value. We classify fair
value measurements of financial instruments and MSRs based
on the three-level fair value hierarchy in the accounting
standards.
The fair values of assets and liabilities may include
adjustments, such as market liquidity and credit quality , where
appropriate. Valuations  of products using models or other
techniques are sensitive to assumptions used for the significant
inputs. Where market data is available, the inputs used for
valuation reflect that information as of our valuation date. Inputs
to valuation models are considered unobservable if they are
supported by little or no market activity . In periods of extreme
volatility , lessened liquid ity or in illiquid markets, there may be
more variability in marke t pricing or a lack of market data to use
in the valuat ion process. In keeping with the prudent application
of estimates and management judgment in determining the fair
value of assets and liabilities, we have in place various
processes and controls that include: a model validation policy
that requires review and approval of quantitative  models used for
deal pricing, financial statement fair value determination and risk
quantification; a trading product valuation policy that requires
verification of all traded product valuations; and a periodic review
and substan tiation of daily profit and loss report ing for all traded
products. Primarily through validation controls, we utilize both
broker and pricing servic e inputs which can and do include both
market-observable and internally-modeled values and/or
valuation inputs. Our reliance on this information is affected by
our understanding of how the broker and/or pricing service
develops its data with a higher degree of reliance applied to
those that are more directly observable and lesser reliance
applied to those developed through their own internal modeling.
For example, broker quotes in less active markets may only be
indicative and therefore less reliable. These processes and
controls are performed independently of the business. For more
information, see Note 21 – Fair Value Measurements  and Note
22 – Fair V alue Option  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
Level 3 Assets and Liabilities
Financial assets and liabilities, and MSRs, where values are
based on valuation techniques that require inputs that are both
unobservable and are significant to the overall fair value
measurement are classified as Level 3 under the fair value
hierarchy established in applicable accounting standards. The
fair value of these Level 3 financial assets and liabilities and
MSRs is determined using pricing models, discounted cash flow
methodologies or similar techniques for which the determination
of fair value requires significant manageme nt judgment or
estimation.
Level 3 financial instruments may be hedged with derivatives
classified as Level 1 or 2; therefore, gains or losses associated
with Level 3 financial instruments may be offset by gains or
losses associated with financial instruments classified in other
levels of the fair value hierarchy . The Level 3 gains and losses
recorded in earnings did not have a significant impact on our
liquidity or capital. We conduct a review of our fair value
hierarchy classifications on
a quarterly basis. Transfers into or out of Level 3 are made if the
significant inputs used in the financial models measuring the fair
values of the assets and liabilities became unobservable or
observable, respectively , in the current market place. For more
information on transfers into and out of Level  3 during 2019 ,
2018
  Bank of America    78
and 2017 , see Note 21 – Fair Value Measurements  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
Accrued Income Taxes and Deferred Tax Assets
Accrued income taxes, reported as a component of either other
assets or accrued expenses and other liabilities on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet, represent the net amount of
current incom e taxes we expect to pay to or receive from various
taxing jurisdictions attributable to our operations to date. We
currently file income tax returns in more than 100 jurisdictions
and consider many factors, including statutory , judicial and
regulatory guidance , in estimat ing the appropriate accrued
income taxes for each jurisdiction.
Net deferred  tax assets, reported as a component of other
assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet, represent the net
decrease in taxes expec ted to be paid in the future because of
net operating loss (NOL) and tax credit carryforwards and
because of future reversals of temporary differences in the bases
of assets and liabilities as measured by tax laws and their bases
as reported in the financial statements. NOL and tax credit
carryforwards result in reductions to future tax liabilities, and
many of these attributes  can expire if not utilized within certain
periods. We consider the need for valuation allowances to
reduce net deferred tax assets to the amounts that we estimate
are more likely than not to be realized.
Consistent with the applicable accounting guidance, we
monitor relevant tax authorities and change our estimates of
accrued income taxes and/or net deferred tax assets due to
changes in income tax laws and their interpretation by the courts
and regulat ory authorit ies. These revisions of our estimates,
which also may result from our income tax planning and from the
resolution of income tax audit matters, may be material to our
operating results for any given period. See Note 20 – Income Taxes  to the Cons olidated Financial
Statements  for a table of significan t tax attributes and additional
information. For more information, see page 14 under Item 1A.
Risk Factors – Regulatory , Compliance and Legal .
Goodwill and Intangible Assets
The nature of and accounting for goodwill and intangible assets
are discussed in Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles , and Note 8 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements .
We completed our annual goodwill impairment test as of June
30, 2019  for all of our reporting units that had goodwill. We
performed that test by assessing qualitative factors to determine
whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of each
reporting unit is less than its respective carrying value. Factors
considered in the qualitative assessments include, among other
things, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market
considerations, financial  performance of the respective reporting
unit and other relevant entity- and reporting-unit specific
considerations. If based on the results of the qualitative
assessment, it is more likely than not that the fair value of a
reporting unit is less than its carrying value, a quantitative
assessment is performed.
Based on our qualitativ e assessments, we determined that
for each reporting unit with goodwill, it was more likely than not
that its respective fair value exceeded its carrying value,
indicating there was no impairment. For more information
regarding goodwill balances at June 30, 2019 , see Note 8 –
Goodwill and Intangible Assets  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements .
Certain Contingent Liabilities
For more information on the complex judgments associated with
certain contingent liabilities, see Note 13 – Commitments and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements .
79     Bank of America
 
Non-GAAP Reconciliations
Tables 50 and 51 provide reconciliations of certain non-GAAP  financial measures to GAAP  financial measures.
Table 50Five-year Reconciliations to GAAP Financial Measures (1)  
(Dollars in millions, shares in thousands)2019  2018  2017  2016 2015
Reconciliation of average shareholders’ equity to average tangible shareholders’ equity
and average tangible common shareholders’ equity        
Shareholders’ equity$267,889 $264,748 $271,289 $265,843 $251,384
Goodwill(68,951) (68,951) (69,286) (69,750) (69,772)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs)(1,721) (2,058) (2,652) (3,382) (4,201)
Related deferred tax liabilities773 906 1,463 1,644 1,852
Tangible shareholders’ equity$197,990 $194,645 $200,814 $194,355 $179,263
Preferred stock(23,036) (22,949) (24,188) (24,656) (21,808)
Tangible common shareholders’ equity$174,954 $171,696 $176,626 $169,699 $157,455
Reconciliation of year-end shareholders’ equity to year-end tangible shareholders’
equity and year-end tangible common shareholders’ equity        
Shareholders’ equity$264,810 $265,325 $267,146 $266,195 $255,615
Goodwill(68,951) (68,951) (68,951) (69,744) (69,761)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs)(1,661) (1,774) (2,312) (2,989) (3,768)
Related deferred tax liabilities713 858 943 1,545 1,716
Tangible shareholders’ equity$194,911 $195,458 $196,826 $195,007 $183,802
Preferred stock(23,401) (22,326) (22,323) (25,220) (22,272)
Tangible common shareholders’ equity$171,510 $173,132 $174,503 $169,787 $161,530
Reconciliation of year-end assets to year-end tangible assets         
Assets$2,434,079 $2,354,507 $2,281,234 $2,188,067 $2,144,606
Goodwill(68,951) (68,951) (68,951) (69,744) (69,761)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs)(1,661) (1,774) (2,312) (2,989) (3,768)
Related deferred tax liabilities713 858 943 1,545 1,716
Tangible assets$2,364,180 $2,284,640 $2,210,914 $2,116,879 $2,072,793
(1) Presents reconciliations of non-GAA P financial measures to GAAP  financial measures. For more information on non-GAAP  financial measures and ratios we use in assessing the results of the
Corporation, see Supplemental Financial Data  on page 27.
Table 51Quarterly Reconciliations to GAAP Financial Measures (1)
  2019 Quarters  2018 Quarters
(Dollars in millions) Fourth  Third  Second  First  Fourth  Third  Second First
Reconciliation of average shareholders’  equity to average tangible
shareholders’  equity and average tangible common
shareholders’  equity               
Shareholders’  equity $266,900  $270,430  $267,975  $266,217  $263,698  $264,653  $265,181 $265,480
Goodwill (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 )
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (1,678 ) (1,707 ) (1,736 ) (1,763 ) (1,857 ) (1,992 ) (2,126 ) (2,261 )
Related deferred tax liabilities 730 752 770 841 874 896 916 939
Tangible shareholders’  equity $197,001  $200,524  $198,058  $196,344  $193,764  $194,606  $195,020 $195,207
Preferred stock (23,461 ) (23,800 ) (22,537 ) (22,326 ) (22,326 ) (22,841 ) (23,868 ) (22,767 )
Tangible common shareholders’  equity $173,540  $176,724  $175,521  $174,018  $171,438  $171,765  $171,152 $172,440
Reconciliation of period-end shareholders’  equity to period-end
tangible shareholders’  equity and period-end tangible common
shareholders’  equity               
Shareholders’  equity $264,810  $268,387  $271,408  $267,010  $265,325  $262,158  $264,216 $266,224
Goodwill (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 )
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (1,661 ) (1,690 ) (1,718 ) (1,747 ) (1,774 ) (1,908 ) (2,043 ) (2,177 )
Related deferred tax liabilities 713 734 756 773 858 878 900 920
Tangible shareholders’  equity $194,911  $198,480  $201,495  $197,085  $195,458  $192,177  $194,122 $196,016
Preferred stock (23,401 ) (23,606 ) (24,689 ) (22,326 ) (22,326 ) (22,326 ) (23,181 ) (24,672 )
Tangible common shareholders’  equity $171,510 $174,874 $176,806 $174,759 $173,132 $169,851 $170,941 $171,344
Reconciliation of period-end assets to period-end tangible assets               
Assets $2,434,079  $2,426,330  $2,395,892  $2,377,164  $2,354,507  $2,338,833  $2,291,670 $2,328,478
Goodwill (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 ) (68,951 )
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (1,661 ) (1,690 ) (1,718 ) (1,747 ) (1,774 ) (1,908 ) (2,043 ) (2,177 )
Related deferred tax liabilities 713 734 756 773 858 878 900 920
Tangible assets $2,364,180  $2,356,423  $2,325,979  $2,307,239  $2,284,640  $2,268,852  $2,221,576 $2,258,270
(1) Presents reconciliations of non-GAA P financial measures to GAAP  financial measures. For more information on non-GAAP  financial measures and ratios we use in assessing the results of the
Corporation, see Supplemental Financial Data  on page 27.
  Bank of America    80
Statistical T ables  
Table of Contents  
  Page
Table I – Outstanding Loans and Leases  81
Table II – Nonperforming Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties  82
Table III – Accruing Loans and Leases Past Due 90 Days or More  82
Table IV – Selected Loan Maturity Data  83
Table V – Allowance for Credit Losses  83
Table VI – Allocation of the Allowance for Credit Losses by Product Type  84
Table
I Outstanding Loans and Leases
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017  2016  2015
Consumer        
Residential mortgage $ 236,169 $ 208,557 $ 203,811 $ 191,797 $ 187,911
Home equity 40,208 48,286 57,744 66,443 75,948
Credit card 97,608 98,338 96,285 92,278 89,602
Non-U.S. credit card — — — 9,214 9,975
Direct/Indirect consumer (1) 90,998 91,166 96,342 95,962 90,149
Other consumer (2) 192 202 166 626 713
Total consumer loans excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option 465,175 446,549 454,348 456,320 454,298
Consumer loans accounted for under the fair value option (3) 594 682 928 1,051 1,871
Total consumer 465,769 447,231 455,276 457,371 456,169
Commercial     
U.S. commercial 307,048 299,277 284,836 270,372 252,771
Non-U.S. commercial 104,966 98,776 97,792 89,397 91,549
Commercial real estate (4) 62,689 60,845 58,298 57,355 57,199
Commercial lease financing 19,880 22,534 22,116 22,375 21,352
  494,583 481,432 463,042 439,499 422,871
U.S. small business commercial (5) 15,333 14,565 13,649 12,993 12,876
Total commercial loans excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option 509,916 495,997 476,691 452,492 435,747
Commercial loans accounted for under the fair value option (3) 7,741 3,667 4,782 6,034 5,067
Total commercial 517,657 499,664 481,473 458,526 440,814
Less: Loans of business held for sale (6) — — — (9,214) —
Total loans and leases $ 983,426 $ 946,895 $ 936,749 $ 906,683 $ 896,983
(1) Includes primarily auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $50.4 billion , $50.1 billion , $52.4 billion , $50.7 billion  and $43.9 billion , U.S. securities-based lending loans of $36.7 billion , $37.0
billion , $39.8 billion , $40.1 billion  and $39.8 billion  and non-U.S. consumer loans of $2.8 billion , $2.9 billion , $3.0 billion , $3.0 billion  and $3.9 billion  at December 31, 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015,
respectively .
(2) Substantially all of other consumer at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is consumer overdrafts. Other consu mer at December 31, 2016 and 2015 also includes consumer finance loans of $465 million
and $564 million , respectively .
(3) Consumer loans accounted for under the fair value option include residential mortgage loans of $257 million , $336 million , $567 million , $710 million  and $1.6 billion , and home equity loans of $337
million , $346 milli on, $361 milli on, $341 milli on and $250 milli on at December 31, 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respecti vely. Com mercial loans accounted for under the fair value option include U.S.
commercial loans of $4.7 billion , $2.5 billion , $2.6 billion , $2.9 billion  and $2.3 billion , and non-U.S. commercial loans of $3.1 billion , $1.1 billion , $2.2 billion , $3.1 billion  and $2.8 billion  at December 31,
2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively .
(4) Includes U.S. commercial real estate loans of $59.0 billion, $56.6 billion, $54.8 billion, $54.3 billion and $53.6 billion, and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $3.7 billio n, $4.2 billio n, $3.5 billion ,
$3.1 billion  and $3.5 billion  at December 31, 2019 , 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively .
(5) Includes card-related products.
(6) Represents non-U.S. credit card loans, which were included in assets of business held for sale on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
81     Bank of America
 
Table
II Nonperforming Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties (1)
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2017  2016  2015
Consumer         
Residential mortgage $ 1,470 $ 1,893 $ 2,476 $ 3,056 $ 4,803
Home equity 536 1,893 2,644 2,918 3,337
Direct/Indirect consumer 47 56 46 28 24
Other consumer — — — 2 1
Total consumer (2) 2,053 3,842 5,166 6,004 8,165
Commercial         
U.S. commercial 1,094 794 814 1,256 867
Non-U.S. commercial 43 80 299 279 158
Commercial real estate 280 156 112 72 93
Commercial lease financing 32 18 24 36 12
  1,449 1,048 1,249 1,643 1,130
U.S. small business commercial 50 54 55 60 82
Total commercial (3) 1,499 1,102 1,304 1,703 1,212
Total nonperforming loans and leases 3,552 4,944 6,470 7,707 9,377
Foreclosed properties 285 300 288 377 459
Total nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties $ 3,837 $ 5,244 $ 6,758 $ 8,084 $ 9,836
(1) Balances exclude foreclosed properties insured by certain government -guaranteed loans, principally FHA-insured loans, that entered foreclosure of $260 milli on, $488 milli on, $801 milli on, $1.2
billion  and $1.4 billion  at December 31, 2019 , 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively .
(2) In 2019, $422 million  in interest income was estimated to be contractually due on $2.1 billion  of consumer loans and leases classified as nonperforming at December 31, 2019, as presented in the
table above, plus $5.5 billion  of TDRs  classified as performing at December 31, 2019. Approximately $297 million  of the estimated $422 million  in contra ctual interest was received  and included in
interest income for 2019.
(3) In 2019, $133 milli on in interes t income was estimated to be contractually due on $1.5 billio n of comm ercial loans and leases classified as nonperforming at December 31, 2019, as prese nted in the
table above, plus $1.3 billio n of TDRs classifie d as performing at December 31, 2019. Approxim ately $88 millio n of the estimated $133 milli on in contractual interest was received and included in
interest income for 2019.
Table
III Accruing Loans and Leases Past Due 90 Days or More (1)
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  2017  2016  2015
Consumer          
Residential mortgage (2) $ 1,088 $ 1,884 $ 3,230 $ 4,793 $ 7,150
Credit card 1,042 994 900 782 789
Non-U.S. credit card — — — 66 76
Direct/Indirect consumer 33 38 40 34 39
Other consumer — — — 4 3
Total consumer 2,163 2,916 4,170 5,679 8,057
Commercial          
U.S. commercial 106 197 144 106 113
Non-U.S. commercial 8 — 3 5 1
Commercial real estate 19 4 4 7 3
Commercial lease financing 20 29 19 19 15
  153 230 170 137 132
U.S. small business commercial 97 84 75 71 61
Total commercial 250 314 245 208 193
Total accruing loans and leases past due 90 days or more $ 2,413 $ 3,230 $ 4,415 $ 5,887 $ 8,250
(1) Our policy is to classify consumer real estate-secured loans as nonperforming at 90 days past due, except the fully-insured loan portfolio and loans accounted for under the fair value option.
(2) Balances are fully-insured loans.
  Bank of America    82
Table
IV Selected Loan Maturity Data (1, 2)    
 December 31, 2019
(Dollars in millions)Due in One
Year or Less Due After One
Year Through
Five YearsDue After
Five Years Total
U.S. commercial $ 76,523 $ 200,298 $ 50,216 $ 327,037
U.S. commercial real estate 13,683 39,259 6,023 58,965
Non-U.S. and other (3) 47,828 56,072 7,875 111,775
Total selected loans $ 138,034 $ 295,629 $ 64,114 $ 497,777
Percent of total 28% 59% 13% 100%
Sensitivity of selected loans to changes in interest rates for loans due after one year:      
Fixed interest rates   $ 21,526 $ 31,383  
Floating or adjustable interest rates   274,103 32,731  
Total   $ 295,629 $ 64,114  
(1) Loan maturities are based on the remaining maturities under contractual terms.
(2) Includes loans accounted for under the fair value option.
(3) Loan maturities include non-U.S. commercial and commercial real estate loans.
Table
V Allowance for Credit Losses      
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  2017  2016  2015
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 9,601 $10,393 $11,237 $12,234 $14,419
Loans and leases charged off        
Residential mortgage (93) (207) (188) (403) (866)
Home equity (429) (483) (582) (752) (975)
Credit card (3,535) (3,345) (2,968) (2,691) (2,738)
Non-U.S. credit card (1) — — (103) (238) (275)
Direct/Indirect consumer (518) (495) (491) (392) (383)
Other consumer (249) (197) (212) (232) (224)
Total consumer charge-offs (4,824) (4,727) (4,544) (4,708) (5,461)
U.S. commercial (2) (650) (575) (589) (567) (536)
Non-U.S. commercial (115) (82) (446) (133) (59)
Commercial real estate (31) (10) (24) (10) (30)
Commercial lease financing (26) (8) (16) (30) (19)
Total commercial charge-offs (822) (675) (1,075) (740) (644)
Total loans and leases charged off (5,646) (5,402) (5,619) (5,448) (6,105)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off        
Residential mortgage 140 179 288 272 393
Home equity 787 485 369 347 339
Credit card 587 508 455 422 424
Non-U.S. credit card (1) — — 28 63 87
Direct/Indirect consumer 309 300 277 258 271
Other consumer 15 15 49 27 31
Total consumer recoveries 1,838 1,487 1,466 1,389 1,545
U.S. commercial (3) 122 120 142 175 172
Non-U.S. commercial 31 14 6 13 5
Commercial real estate 2 9 15 41 35
Commercial lease financing 5 9 11 9 10
Total commercial recoveries 160 152 174 238 222
Total recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 1,998 1,639 1,640 1,627 1,767
Net charge-offs (3,648) (3,763) (3,979) (3,821) (4,338)
Provision for loan and lease losses 3,574 3,262 3,381 3,581 3,043
Other (4) (111) (291) (246) (514) (890)
Total allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 9,416 9,601 10,393 11,480 12,234
Less: Allowance included in assets of business held for sale (5) — — — (243) —
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 9,416 9,601 10,393 11,237 12,234
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 797 777 762 646 528
Provision for unfunded lending commitments 16 20 15 16 118
Other (4) — — — 100 —
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 813 797 777 762 646
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $10,229 $10,398 $11,170 $11,999 $12,880
(1) Represents amounts related to the non-U.S. credit card loan portfolio, which was sold in 2017.
(2) Includes U.S. small business commercial charge-of fs of $320 million , $287 million , $258 million , $253 million  and $282 million  in 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively .
(3) Includes U.S. small business commercial recoveries of $48 million , $47 million , $43 million , $45 million  and $57 million  in 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively .
(4) Primarily represen ts write-of fs of PCI loans, the net impact of portfolio sales, consolidations and deconsolidations, foreign currency translation adjustments, transfers to held for sale and certain
other reclassifications.
(5) Represents allowance related to the non-U.S. credit card loan portfolio, which was sold in 2017.
83     Bank of America
 
Table
V Allowance for Credit Losses (continued)     
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2017 2016  2015
Loan and allowance ratios (6):     
Loans and leases outstanding at December 31 (7) $975,091 $942,546 $931,039 $908,812 $890,045
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total loans and leases
outstanding at December 31 (7) 0.97% 1.02% 1.12% 1.26% 1.37%
Consumer allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total consumer loans
and leases outstanding at December 31 (8) 0.98 1.08 1.18 1.36 1.63
Commercial allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total commercial
loans and leases outstanding at December 31 (9) 0.96 0.97 1.05 1.16 1.11
Average loans and leases outstanding (7) $951,583 $927,531 $911,988 $892,255 $869,065
Net charge-offs as a percentage of average loans and leases outstanding (7) 0.38% 0.41% 0.44% 0.43% 0.50%
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and
leases at December 31 265 194 161 149 130
Ratio of the allowance for loan and lease losses at December 31 to net charge-offs 2.58 2.55 2.61 3.00 2.82
Amounts included in allowance for loan and lease losses for loans and leases that are
excluded from nonperforming loans and leases at December 31 (10) $ 4,151 $ 4,031 $ 3,971 $ 3,951 $ 4,518
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and
leases, excluding the allowance for loan and lease losses for loans and leases that are
excluded from nonperforming loans and leases at December 31 (10) 148% 113% 99% 98% 82%
(6) Loan and allowance ratios for 2016 include $243 million  of non-U.S. credit card allowance for loan and lease losses and $ 9.2 billion  of ending non-U.S. credit card loans, which were sold in 2017.
(7) Outstanding loan and lease balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option of $8.3 billion , $4.3 billion , $5.7 billion, $7.1 billion and $6.9 billion at December 31,
2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively . Average loans accounted for under the fair value option were $6.8 billion , $5.5 billion , $6.7 billion, $8.2 billion and $7.7 billion in 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016
and 2015, respectively .
(8) Excludes consum er loans accounted for under the fair value option of $594 million , $682 million , $928 million, $1.1 billion and $1.9 billion at December 31, 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015,
respectively .
(9) Excludes commercial loans accounted for under the fair value option of $7.7 billion , $3.7 billion , $4.8 billion, $6.0 billion and $5.1 billion at December 31, 2019 , 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively .
(10) Primarily includes amounts allocated to credit card and unsecured consumer lending portfolios in Consumer Banking and, in 2016 and 2015, the non-U.S. credit card portfolio in All Other .
Table
VI Allocation of the Allowance for Credit Losses by Product Type
 December 31
 2019 2018  2017 2016  2015
(Dollars in millions) Amount Percent
of Total AmountPercent
of Total Amount Percent
of Total AmountPercent
of Total Amount Percent
of Total
Allowance for loan and lease
losses                
Residential mortgage $ 325 3.45% $ 422 4.40% $ 701 6.74% $1,012 8.82% $1,500 12.26%
Home equity 221 2.35 506 5.27 1,019 9.80 1,738 15.14 2,414 19.73
Credit card 3,710 39.39 3,597 37.47 3,368 32.41 2,934 25.56 2,927 23.93
Non-U.S. credit card — — — — — — 243 2.12 274 2.24
Direct/Indirect consumer 234 2.49 248 2.58 264 2.54 244 2.13 223 1.82
Other consumer 52 0.55 29 0.30 31 0.30 51 0.44 47 0.38
Total consumer 4,542 48.23 4,802 50.02 5,383 51.79 6,222 54.21 7,385 60.36
U.S. commercial (1) 3,015 32.02 3,010 31.35 3,113 29.95 3,326 28.97 2,964 24.23
Non-U.S. commercial 658 6.99 677 7.05 803 7.73 874 7.61 754 6.17
Commercial real estate 1,042 11.07 958 9.98 935 9.00 920 8.01 967 7.90
Commercial lease financing 159 1.69 154 1.60 159 1.53 138 1.20 164 1.34
Total commercial 4,874 51.77 4,799 49.98 5,010 48.21 5,258 45.79 4,849 39.64
Total allowance for loan and
lease losses 9,416 100.00% 9,601 100.00% 10,393 100.00% 11,480 100.00% 12,234 100.00%
Less: Allowance included in assets
of business held for sale (2) —  —  — (243)  — 
Allowance for loan and lease
losses 9,416  9,601  10,393 11,237  12,234 
Reserve for unfunded lending
commitments 813  797   777 762  646 
Allowance for credit losses $10,229  $10,398   $11,170 $11,999  $12,880 
(1) Includes allowance for loan and lease losses for U.S. small business commercial loans of $523 milli on, $474 milli on, $439 milli on, $416 milli on and $507 milli on at December 31, 2019, 2018, 2017, 2016
and 2015, respectively .
(2) Represents allowance for loan and lease losses related to the non-U.S. credit card loan portfolio, which was sold in 2017.
  Bank of America    84
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
See Market Risk Management on page 71 in the MD&A  and the sections referenced therein for Quantitative and Qualitative
Disclosures about Market Risk.
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Table of Contents
 Page
Consolidated Statement of Income 89
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income 89
Consolidated Balance Sheet 90
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Shareholders’  Equity 91
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows 92
Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles 93
Note 2 – Net Interest Income and Noninterest Income 101
Note 3 – Derivatives 102
Note 4 – Securities 109
Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and Leases 112
Note 6 – Allowance for Credit Losses 120
Note 7 – Securitizations and Other V ariable Interest Entities 121
Note 8 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets 125
Note 9 – Leases
125
Note 10 – Deposits 126
Note 11 – Federal Funds Sold or Purchased, Securities Financing Agreements, Short-term Borrowings
and Restricted Cash 126
Note 12 – Long-term Debt 128
Note 13 – Commitments and Contingencies 129
Note 14 – Shareholders’  Equity 134
Note 15 – Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) 136
Note 16 – Earnings Per Common Share 137
Note 17 – Regulatory Requirements and Restrictions 137
Note 18 – Employee Benefit Plans 139
Note 19 – Stock-based Compensation Plans 143
Note 20 – Income Taxes 144
Note 21 – Fair V alue Measurements 145
Note 22 – Fair V alue Option 154
Note 23 – Fair V alue of Financial Instruments 156
Note 24 – Business Segment Information 156
Note 25 – Parent Company Information 159
Note 26 – Performance by Geographical Area 161
Glossary 162
Acronyms 163
85     Bank of America
 
Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The management of Bank of America Corporation is responsible
for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over
financial reporting.
The Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting is a
process designed to provide reasonable assuran ce regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
statements for external purposes in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
The Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting
includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and
fairly reflect the transact ions and dispositions of the assets of the
Corporation; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions
are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America, and that receipts and
expenditures of the Corporation are being made only in
accordance with authorizations of management  and directors of
the Corpor ation; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance
regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized
acquisition, use, or disposition of the Corporation’ s assets that
could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inhere nt limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future
periods are subject to the risk that control s may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree
of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate. Management assessed the effectiveness of the Corporation’ s
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019
based on the framew ork set forth by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizatio ns of the Treadway Commission in
Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) . Based on that
assessment, management concluded that, as of December 31,
2019 , the Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting is
effective.
The Corporation’ s internal control over financia l reporting as
of December 31, 2019  has been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers , LLP, an independent register ed public
accounting firm, as stated in their accompanying report which
expresses an unqualified opinion on the effectiveness of the
Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019 .
Brian T . Moynihan
Chairman, Chief Executive Of ficer and President
Paul M. Donofrio
Chief Financial Of ficer
  Bank of America    86
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of
Bank of America Corporation:
Opinions on the Financial Statements and
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated  balance sheets
of Bank of America Corporation and its subsidiaries (the
"Corporation") as of December 31, 2019  and December 31,
2018 , and the related conso lidated statements of income,
comprehensive income, changes in shareholders’  equity and
cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2019 , including the related notes (collectively
referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also
have audited the Corporation’ s internal contro l over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2019 , base d on criteria established
in Internal Control - Integrated Framework  (2013)  issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO).
In our opinio n, the consolidated financial statements referred
to above present fairly, in all material respec ts, the financial
position of the Corporation as of December 31, 2019  and
December 31, 2018 , and the results of its operations and its
cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2019  in conformit y with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America. Also in our
opinion, the Corporation maintained, in all material respects,
effective internal control over financial reporting as of December
31, 2019 , based on criteria established in Internal Control -
Integrated Framework  (2013)  issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Corpo ration’ s management is responsible for these
consolidated financial statements, for maint aining effective
internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment of
the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting,
included in the accompanying Report of Management on Internal
Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express
opinions on the Corporation’ s consolidated financial statements
and on the Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting
based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered
with the Public Compan y Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with
respect to the Corporat ion in accordance with the U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the
Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of
the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform
the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the
consolidated financial statements are free of material
misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether
effective internal control  over financial reporting was maintained
in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included
performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether
due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to
those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant
estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the
overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our
audit of internal control over financial reporting included
obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial
reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing
and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal
control base d on the assessed risk. Our audits also included
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary
in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a
reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control
over Financial Reporting
A company’ s internal control over financial repor ting is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance  regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
statements for external purposes in accordanc e with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company’ s internal control
over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures
that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable
detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the asset s of the company; (ii) provide reasonable
assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and
expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance
with authorizations of management and directors of the
company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use,
or dispositio n of the company’ s assets that could  have a material
effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future
periods are subject to the risk that control s may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree
of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters
arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that were communicated or required to be
communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated
financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging,
subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical
audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the
consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are
not, by communicating the critical audit matters below , providing
separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts
or disclosures to which they relate.
Allowance for Loan and Lease Losses
As describe d in Notes 1 and 6 to the conso lidated financial
statements, the allowance for loan and lease losses represents
management’ s estimate of probable incurred credit losses in the
Corporation’ s loan and lease portfolio. As of December 31, 2019,
the allowanc e for loan and lease losses was $9.4 billion on total
loans and leases of $975.1 billion, which excludes loans
accounted for under the fair value option. The allowance for loan
and lease losses includes both quantitative and qualitative
components. The allowance for certain consume r loan portfolios
considers a variety of factors including historical loss experience,
estimated defaults or foreclosures based on portfolio trends,
delinquencies, bankruptcies, economic condition s, credit scores
and the amount of loss in the event of default. The allowance for
certain commercial loans is calculated using loss rates
delineated by risk rating and product type. In addition, the
qualitative
87     Bank of America
 
component has a higher degree of management subjectivity , and
includes factors such as concentrations, economic conditions
and other considerations.
The principal considerations for our determination that
performing procedures relating to the allowance for loan and
lease losses is a critical audit matter are (i) there was significant
judgment and estimation by management in determining the
allowance for loan and lease losses, which in turn led to a high
degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity and effort in performing
procedures and in evaluating audit evidence obtained relating to
the allowanc e for loan and lease losses, including the qualitative
component, and (ii) the audit effort involved professionals with
specialized skill and knowledge to assist in evaluating certain
audit evidence.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and
evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These
procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating
to the allowance for loan and lease losses. These procedures
also included, among others, testing management’ s process for
estimating the allowance for loan and lease losses, including
evaluating the appropriateness of the loss forecast models and
methodology , testing the completeness and accuracy of certain
data used in the allow ance for loan and lease losses, and
evaluating the reasonab leness of significant assumptions and
judgments used by management to estimate the qualitative
component of the allowance for loan and lease losses including
those judgments related to the impact of concentrations,
economic conditions and other considerations. The procedures
also included the involv ement of professionals with specialized
skill and knowledge to assist in evaluating the reasonableness of
certain loss forecast models and methodologies , evaluating the
reasonableness of risk ratings used in the allowance for
commercial loans, and evaluating the reasonab leness of certain
judgments used by management in estimating the qualitative
component of the allowance for loan and lease losses.
Valuation of Certain Level 3 Financial Instruments
As described in Notes 1 and 21 to the consolidated financial
statements, the Corporation carries certain financial instruments
at fair value, which includes $10.3 billion of assets and $5.9
billion
of liabilities classified as Level 3 fair value measurements for
which the determination of fair value requires significant management judgmen t or estimation. The Corporation
determines the fair value of certain Level 3 financial instruments
using quan titative models that utilize multiple significant
unobservable inputs, including long-dated volatility and forward
price, as applicable. As disclosed by management, estimation
risk is greater for finan cial instruments that are either option-
based or have longer maturity dates where observable market
inputs are less readily available, or are unobservable, in which
case, quanti tative-based extrapolations are used in determining
fair values.
The principal considerations for our determination that
performing procedures relating to the valuation of certain Level 3
financial instruments is a critical audit matter are the significant
judgment and estimation used by management to determine the
fair value of these financ ial instruments. This in turn led to a high
degree of auditor judgment and effort in performing procedures,
including the involvement of professionals with specialized skill
and knowledge to assist in evaluating certain audit evidence.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and
evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial state ments.  These
procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating
to the valuation of financial instruments, including controls
related to valuation models, significant unobserv able inputs, and
data.  These procedures also included, among others, the
involvement of professionals with special ized skill and
knowledge to assist in developing an independent estimate of
fair value for a sample of these certain financial instruments and
comparison of management’ s estimate to the independently
developed estimate of fair value. Developing the independent
estimate involved testing the completeness and accuracy of data
provided by management and evaluating the reasonableness of
management’ s assumptions used to develop the significant
unobservable inputs.
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 19, 2020
We have served as the Corporation’ s auditor since 1958.
  Bank of America    88
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statement of Income
(In millions, except per share information) 2019  2018 2017
Net interest income   
Interest income $ 71,236 $ 66,769 $ 57,579
Interest expense 22,345 18,607 12,340
Net interest income 48,891 48,162 45,239
Noninterest income   
Fees and commissions 33,015 33,078 33,341
Market making and similar activities 9,034 9,008 7,102
Other income 304 772 1,444
Total noninterest income 42,353 42,858 41,887
Total revenue, net of interest expense 91,244 91,020 87,126
Provision for credit losses 3,590 3,282 3,396
Noninterest expense   
Compensation and benefits 31,977 31,880 31,931
Occupancy and equipment 6,588 6,380 6,264
Information processing and communications 4,646 4,555 4,530
Product delivery and transaction related 2,762 2,857 3,041
Marketing 1,934 1,674 1,746
Professional fees 1,597 1,699 1,888
Other general operating 5,396 4,109 5,117
Total noninterest expense 54,900 53,154 54,517
Income before income taxes 32,754 34,584 29,213
Income tax expense 5,324 6,437 10,981
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
Preferred stock dividends 1,432 1,451 1,614
Net income applicable to common shareholders $ 25,998 $ 26,696 $ 16,618
Per common share information   
Earnings $ 2.77 $ 2.64 $ 1.63
Diluted earnings 2.75 2.61 1.56
Average common shares issued and outstanding 9,390.5 10,096.5 10,195.6
Average diluted common shares issued and outstanding 9,442.9 10,236.9 10,778.4
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income  
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
Other comprehensive income (loss), net-of-tax:    
Net change in debt securities 5,875 (3,953) 61
Net change in debit valuation adjustments (963) 749 (293)
Net change in derivatives 616 (53) 64
Employee benefit plan adjustments 136 (405) 288
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments (86) (254) 86
Other comprehensive income (loss) 5,578 (3,916) 206
Comprehensive income $ 33,008 $ 24,231 $ 18,438
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
89     Bank of America
 
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Balance Sheet
  December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Assets   
Cash and due from banks $ 30,152 $ 29,063
Interest-bearing deposits with the Federal Reserve, non-U.S. central banks and other banks 131,408 148,341
Cash and cash equivalents 161,560 177,404
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments 7,107 7,494
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell
   (includes $50,364 and $56,399 measured at fair value) 274,597 261,131
Trading account assets (includes $90,946 and $119,363 pledged as collateral) 229,826 214,348
Derivative assets 40,485 43,725
Debt securities:   
Carried at fair value 256,467 238,101
Held-to-maturity, at cost (fair value – $219,821 and $200,435) 215,730 203,652
Total debt securities 472,197 441,753
Loans and leases (includes $8,335 and $4,349 measured at fair value) 983,426 946,895
Allowance for loan and lease losses (9,416) (9,601)
Loans and leases, net of allowance 974,010 937,294
Premises and equipment, net 10,561 9,906
Goodwill 68,951 68,951
Loans held-for-sale (includes $3,709 and $2,942 measured at fair value) 9,158 10,367
Customer and other receivables 55,937 65,814
Other assets (includes $15,518 and $19,739 measured at fair value) 129,690 116,320
Total assets $ 2,434,079 $ 2,354,507
Liabilities   
Deposits in U.S. offices:   
Noninterest-bearing $ 403,305 $ 412,587
Interest-bearing (includes $508 and $492 measured at fair value) 940,731 891,636
Deposits in non-U.S. offices:   
Noninterest-bearing 13,719 14,060
Interest-bearing 77,048 63,193
Total deposits 1,434,803 1,381,476
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase
   (includes $16,008 and $28,875 measured at fair value) 165,109 186,988
Trading account liabilities 83,270 68,220
Derivative liabilities 38,229 37,891
Short-term borrowings (includes $3,941 and $1,648 measured at fair value) 24,204 20,189
Accrued expenses and other liabilities (includes $15,434 and $20,075 measured at fair value
   and $813 and $797 of reserve for unfunded lending commitments) 182,798 165,026
Long-term debt (includes $34,975 and $27,689 measured at fair value) 240,856 229,392
Total liabilities 2,169,269 2,089,182
Commitments and contingencies (Note 7 – Securitizations and Other Variable Interest Entities
   and Note 13 – Commitments and Contingencies)  
Shareholders’ equity   
Preferred stock, $0.01 par value; authorized – 100,000,000 shares; issued and outstanding – 3,887,440 and 3,843,140 shares 23,401 22,326
Common stock and additional paid-in capital, $0.01 par value; authorized – 12,800,000,000 shares;
   issued and outstanding – 8,836,148,954 and 9,669,286,370 shares 91,723 118,896
Retained earnings 156,319 136,314
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (6,633) (12,211)
Total shareholders’ equity 264,810 265,325
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity$ 2,434,079 $ 2,354,507
 Assets of consolidated variable interest entities included in total assets above (isolated to settle the liabilities of the variable interest entities)   
 Trading account assets $ 5,811 $ 5,798
 Loans and leases 38,837 43,850
 Allowance for loan and lease losses (807) (912)
 Loans and leases, net of allowance 38,030 42,938
 All other assets 540 337
 Total assets of consolidated variable interest entities $ 44,381 $ 49,073
 Liabilities of consolidated variable interest entities included in total liabilities above   
 Short-term borrowings $ 2,175 $ 742
 Long-term debt (includes $8,717  and $10,943 of non-recourse debt) 8,718 10,944
 All other liabilities (includes $19 and $27 of non-recourse liabilities) 22 30
 Total liabilities of consolidated variable interest entities $ 10,915 $ 11,716
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
  Bank of America    90
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Shareholders’  Equity
 
Preferred
Stock Common Stock and
Additional Paid-in Capital 
Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Total
Shareholders’
Equity (In millions)  Shares Amount 
Balance, December 31, 2016 $ 25,220 10,052.6 $ 147,038 $ 101,225 $ (7,288)$ 266,195
Net income      18,232 18,232
Net change in debt securities       61 61
Net change in debit valuation adjustments     (293) (293)
Net change in derivatives       64 64
Employee benefit plan adjustments       288 288
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments       86 86
Dividends declared:        
Common     (4,027)  (4,027)
Preferred      (1,578)  (1,578)
Common stock issued in connection with exercise of warrants
and exchange of preferred stock (2,897) 700.0 2,933 (36) —
Common stock issued under employee plans, net, and other  43.3 932   932
Common stock repurchased   (508.6) (12,814)  (12,814)
Balance, December 31, 2017 $ 22,323 10,287.3 $ 138,089 $ 113,816 $ (7,082)$ 267,146
Cumulative adjustment for adoption of hedge accounting
standard    (32) 57 25
Adoption of accounting standard related to certain tax effects
stranded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss)   1,270 (1,270) —
Net income    28,147 28,147
Net change in debt securities     (3,953) (3,953)
Net change in debit valuation adjustments     749 749
Net change in derivatives     (53) (53)
Employee benefit plan adjustments     (405) (405)
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments     (254) (254)
Dividends declared:     
Common    (5,424) (5,424)
Preferred    (1,451) (1,451)
Issuance of preferred stock 4,515   4,515
Redemption of preferred stock (4,512)   (4,512)
Common stock issued under employee plans, net, and other  58.2 901 (12) 889
Common stock repurchased   (676.2) (20,094)  (20,094)
Balance, December 31, 2018 $ 22,326 9,669.3 $ 118,896 $ 136,314 $ (12,211)$ 265,325
Cumulative adjustment for adoption of lease accounting
standard    165 165
Net income    27,430 27,430
Net change in debt securities     5,875 5,875
Net change in debit valuation adjustments     (963) (963)
Net change in derivatives     616 616
Employee benefit plan adjustments     136 136
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments     (86) (86)
Dividends declared:     
Common    (6,146) (6,146)
Preferred    (1,432) (1,432)
Issuance of preferred stock 3,643   3,643
Redemption of preferred stock (2,568)   (2,568)
Common stock issued under employee plans, net, and other  123.3 971 (12) 959
Common stock repurchased   (956.5) (28,144)  (28,144)
Balance, December 31, 2019 $ 23,401 8,836.1 $ 91,723 $ 156,319 $ (6,633)$ 264,810
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
91     Bank of America
 
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Operating activities    
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Provision for credit losses 3,590 3,282 3,396
Gains on sales of debt securities (217) (154) (255)
Depreciation and amortization 1,729 2,063 2,103
Net amortization of premium/discount on debt securities 2,066 1,824 2,251
Deferred income taxes 2,435 3,041 8,175
Stock-based compensation 1,974 1,729 1,649
Impairment of equity method investment 2,072 — —
Loans held-for-sale:    
Originations and purchases (28,874) (28,071) (43,506)
Proceeds from sales and paydowns of loans originally classified as held for sale and instruments
from related securitization activities 30,191 28,972 40,548
Net change in:    
Trading and derivative assets/liabilities 7,920 (23,673) (14,663)
Other assets (11,113) 11,920 (20,090)
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 16,363 13,010 4,673
Other operating activities, net 6,211 (2,570) 7,351
Net cash provided by operating activities 61,777 39,520 9,864
Investing activities    
Net change in:    
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments 387 3,659 (1,292)
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell (13,466) (48,384) (14,523)
Debt securities carried at fair value:    
Proceeds from sales 52,0065,11773,353
Proceeds from paydowns and maturities 79,114 78,513 93,874
Purchases (152,782) (76,640) (166,975)
Held-to-maturity debt securities:    
Proceeds from paydowns and maturities 34,770 18,789 16,653
Purchases (37,115) (35,980) (25,088)
Loans and leases:    
Proceeds from sales of loans originally classified as held for investment and instruments
from related securitization activities 12,201 21,365 11,996
Purchases (5,963) (4,629) (6,846)
Other changes in loans and leases, net (46,808) (31,292) (41,104)
Other investing activities, net (2,974) (1,986) 8,411
Net cash used in investing activities (80,630) (71,468) (51,541)
Financing activities    
Net change in:    
Deposits 53,327 71,931 48,611
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase (21,879) 10,070 7,024
Short-term borrowings 4,004 (12,478) 8,538
Long-term debt:    
Proceeds from issuance 52,420 64,278 53,486
Retirement (50,794) (53,046) (49,480)
Preferred stock:    
Proceeds from issuance 3,643 4,515 —
Redemption (2,568) (4,512) —
Common stock repurchased (28,144) (20,094) (12,814)
Cash dividends paid (5,934) (6,895) (5,700)
Other financing activities, net (698) (651) (397)
Net cash provided by financing activities 3,377 53,118 49,268
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents (368) (1,200) 2,105
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents (15,844) 19,970 9,696
Cash and cash equivalents at January 1 177,404 157,434 147,738
Cash and cash equivalents at December 31 $ 161,560 $ 177,404 $ 157,434
Supplemental cash flow disclosures    
Interest paid $ 22,196 $ 19,087 $ 12,852
Income taxes paid, net 4,359 2,470 3,235
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
  Bank of America    92
Bank of America Corporation and
Subsidiaries
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
NOTE 1  Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles
Bank of America Corporation, a bank holding company and a
financial holding company , provides a diverse range of financial
services and products throughout the U.S. and in certain
international markets. The term “the Corporation” as used herein
may refer to Bank of America Corporation, individually , Bank of
America Corporation and its subsidiaries, or certain of Bank of
America Corporation’ s subsidiaries or af filiates.
Principles of Consolidation and Basis of
Presentation
The Consoli dated Finan cial Statements include the accounts of
the Corpora tion and its majority-owned subsid iaries and those
variable interest entities (VIEs) where the Corporation is the
primary beneficiary . Intercompany accounts and transactions
have been eliminated . Results of operations of acquired
companies are included  from the dates of acquisition, and for
VIEs, from the dates that the Corporation became the primary
beneficiary . Assets held in an agency or fiduciary capacity are
not included in the Consolidated Financial Statements. The
Corporation accounts for investments in companies for which it
owns a votin g interest and for which it has the ability to exercise
significant influence over operating and financing  decisions using
the equity method of accounting. These investments are
included in other assets. Equity method investments are subject
to impairment testing, and the Corporation’ s proportionate share
of income or loss is included in other income.
The prepara tion of the Consolidated Financial Statements in
conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America requires management to make
estimates and assumpt ions that affect reported amounts and
disclosures. Actual results could materially differ from those
estimates and assumptions. Certain prior-period amounts have
been reclassified to conform to current-period presentation.
In the Consolidated Statement of Income, amounts related to
certain asse t and liability management (ALM)  activities have
been reclassified from other income to market making and
similar activities, which was previously referred to as trading
account income. All prior periods presented reflect this change,
which has no impact on the Corporation's total noninterest
income or net income, and has no impact on business segment
results. The amounts included in market making and similar
activities related to this change in presentation are increases of
$930 million, $1.1 billion and $332 million for 2019 , 2018  and
2017 , respectively .
New Accounting Standards
Lease Accounting
On January 1, 2019, the Corporation adopted the new
accounting standards that require lessees to recognize operating
leases on the balance sheet as right-of-use assets and lease
liabilities based on the value of the discounted future lease
payments. Lessor acco unting is largely unchan ged. Expanded
disclosures about the nature and terms of lease agreements are
required prospectively and are included in Note 9 – Leases . The
Corporation elected to retain prior determinations of whether an
existing contract contains a lease and how the lease should be
classified. The Corporation elected to recognize leases existing
on January 1, 2019 through a cumulative-ef fect adjustment
which increased retained earnings by $165 million , with no
adjustment to prior periods presented. Upon adoption, the
Corporation also recognized right-of-use assets and lease
liabilities of $9.7 billion . Adoption of the standards did not have a signific ant effect on the
Corporation’ s regulatory capital measures.
Accounting for Financial Instruments -- Credit Losses
On January 1, 2020, the Corporation adopted the new
accounting standard that requires the measurement of the
allowance for credit losses to be based on management’ s best
estimate of lifetime expected credit losses inherent in the
Corporation’ s relevant financial assets. The Corporation’ s lifetime
expected credit losses are determined using macroeconomic
forecast assumptions and management judgments applicable to
and through the expected life of the loan portfolios, and are net
of expected recoveries on loans that were previously charged
off. The standard also expands credit quality disclosures
beginning in the first quarter of 2020. While the standard
changes the measurement of the allowance for credit losses, it
does not change the Corporation’ s credit risk of its lending
portfolios or the ultimate losses in those portfolios. Upon
adoption of the standard on January 1, 2020, the Corporation
recorded a $3.3 billion, or 32 percent, increase to the allowance
for credit losses. After adjusting for deferred taxes and other
adoption effects, a $2.4 billion  decrease was recorded in
retained earnings through a cumulative-ef fect adjustment.
Significant Accounting Principles
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivale nts include cash on hand, cash items in
the process of collection, cash segregated under federal and
other brokerage regulations, and amounts due from
correspondent banks, the Federal Reserve Bank and certain
non-U.S. central banks. Certain cash balances are restricted as
to withdrawal or usage by legally binding contractual agreements
or regulatory requirements.
Securities Financing Agreements
Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell
and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase
(securities financing agreements) are treated as collateralized
financing transactions except in instances where  the transaction
is required to be accounted for as individual sale and purchase
transactions. Generally , these agreements are recorded at
acquisition or sale price plus accrued interest, except for certain
securities financing agreements that the Corporation accounts
for under the fair value option. Changes in the fair value of
securities financing agreements that are accounted for under the
fair value option are recorded in market making and similar
activities in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The Corpora tion’s policy is to monitor the marke t value of the
principal amount loaned under resale agreem ents and obtain
collateral from or return collateral pledged to counterparties
when approp riate. Secur ities financing agreements do not create
material credit risk due to these collateral provisions; therefore,
an allowance for loan losses is not necessary .
In transactio ns where the Corporation acts as the lender in a
securities lending agreement and receives securities that can be
pledged or sold as collateral, it recognizes an asset on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet at fair value, representing the
securities received, and a liability , representing the obligation to
return those securities.
Collateral
The Corpora tion accepts securities and loans as collateral that it
is permitted  by contract or practice to sell or repledge. At
December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the fair value of this collateral was
$693.0  billion  and $599.0  billion , of which $593.8  billion  and
$508.6
93     Bank of America 
billion were sold or repledged. The primary source of this
collateral is securities borrowed or purchased under agreements
to resell.
The Corporation also pledges company-owned securities and
loans as collateral in transactions that include repurchase
agreements, securities loaned, public and trust deposits, U.S.
Treasury tax and loan notes, and short-term borrowings. This
collateral, which in some cases can be sold or repledged by the
counterparties to the transactions, is parenthetically disclosed on
the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
In certain cases, the Corporation has transferred assets to
consolidated VIEs where those restricted assets serve as
collateral for the interests issued by the VIEs. These assets are
included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet in Assets of
Consolidated VIEs.
In addition, the Corporation obtains collateral in connection
with its derivative contracts. Required collate ral levels vary
depending on the credit  risk rating and the type of counterparty .
Generally , the Corporation accepts collateral in the form of cash,
U.S. Treasury securities and other marketable securities. Based
on provision s contained in master netting agreements, the
Corporation nets cash collateral received against derivative
assets. The Corporation also pledges collateral on its own
derivative positions which can be applied against derivative
liabilities.
Trading Instruments
Financial instruments utilized in trading activities are carried at
fair value. Fair value is generally based on quoted market prices
for the same or similar  assets and liabilities. If these market
prices are not available, fair values are estim ated based on
dealer quotes, pricing models, discounted cash flow
methodologies, or similar techniques where the determination of
fair value may require  significant management judgment or
estimation. Realized gains and losses are recorded on a trade-
date basis. Realized and unrealized gains and losses are
recognized in market making and similar activities.
Derivatives and Hedging Activities
Derivatives are entered into on behalf of custom ers, for trading
or to support risk management activities. Derivatives used in risk
management activities include derivatives that are both
designated in qualifying accounting hedge relationships and
derivatives used to hedge market risks in relationships that are
not designated in qualifying accounting hedge relationships
(referred to as other risk management activities). The
Corporation manages interest rate and foreign currency
exchange rate sensitivity predominantly through the use of
derivatives. Derivatives  utilized by the Corporation include
swaps, futures and forward settlement contra cts, and option
contracts.
All derivatives are recorded on the Consolida ted Balance
Sheet at fair value, takin g into consideration the effects of legally
enforceable master netting agreements that allow the
Corporation to settle positive and negative positions and offset
cash collate ral held with the same counterparty on a net basis.
For exchange-traded contracts, fair value is based on quoted
market prices in active or inactive markets or is derived from
observable market- based pricing parameters, similar to those
applied to over-the-coun ter (OTC) derivatives. For non-exchange
traded contr acts, fair value is based on dealer quotes, pricing
models, discounted cash flow methodologies or similar
techniques for which the determination of fair value may require
significant management judgment or estimation.
Valuations of derivative assets and liabilities reflect the value
of the instrument including counterparty credit risk. These values
also take into account the Corporation’ s own credit standing. Trading Derivatives and Other Risk Management
Activities
Derivatives held for trading purposes are included in derivative
assets or derivative liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet
with changes in fair value included in market making and similar
activities.
Derivatives used for other risk management activities are
included in derivative assets or derivative liabilities. Derivatives
used in other risk management activities have not been
designated in qualifying accounting hedge relationships because
they did not qualify or the risk that is being mitigated pertains to
an item that is reported at fair value through earnings so that the
effect of measuring the derivative instrument and the asset or
liability to which the risk exposure pertains will offset in the
Consolidated Statement of Income to the extent effective. The
changes in the fair value of derivatives that serve to mitigate
certain risks associated  with mortgage servicing rights (MSRs),
interest rate lock comm itments (IRLCs) and first-lien mortgage
loans held-for-sale (LHFS) that are originated by the Corporation
are recorded in other income. Changes in the fair value of
derivatives that serve to mitigate interest rate risk and foreign
currency risk are included in market making and similar activities.
Credit derivatives are also used by the Corpor ation to mitigate
the risk associated with various credit exposures. The changes
in the fair value of these derivatives are included in market
making and similar activities and other income.
Derivatives Used For Hedge Accounting Purposes
(Accounting Hedges)
For accounting hedges, the Corporation formally documents at
inception all relationships between hedging instruments and
hedged items, as well as the risk management objectives and
strategies for undertaking various accounting hedges.
Additionally , the Corporation primarily uses regression analysis
at the inception of a hedge and for each reporting period
thereafter to assess whether the derivative used in an
accounting hedge trans action is expected to be and has been
highly effective in offsetting changes in the fair value or cash
flows of a hedged item or forecasted transaction. The
Corporation discontinu es hedge accounting when it is
determined that a deriva tive is not expected to be or has ceased
to be highly effective as a hedge, and then reflects changes in
fair value of the derivative in earnings after termination of the
hedge relationship.
Fair value hedges are used to protect against changes in
the fair value of the Corporation’ s assets and liabilities that are
attributable to interest rate or foreign exchange volatility .
Changes in the fair value of derivatives designated as fair value
hedges are recorded in earnings, together and in the same
income statement line item with changes in the fair value of the
related hedg ed item. If a derivative instrument in a fair value
hedge is terminated or the hedge designation removed, the
previous adjustments to the carrying value of the hedged asset
or liability are subsequently accounted for in the same manner
as other components of the carrying value of that asset or
liability . For interest-earning assets and interest-bearing
liabilities, such adjustments are amortized to earnings over the
remaining life of the respective asset or liability .
Cash flow hedges are used primarily to minimize the
variability in cash flows  of assets and liabilities or forecasted
transactions caused by interest rate or foreign exchange rate
fluctuations. The Corporation also uses cash flow hedges to
hedge the price risk associated with deferred compensation.
Changes in the fair value  of derivatives used in cash flow hedges
are recorded in accumulated other comprehensi ve income (OCI)
and are reclassified into the line item in the income statement in
which the hedged item is recorded in the same period the
hedged item affects earnings. Components of a derivative that
are excluded in
  Bank of America    94
assessing hedge effectiveness are recorded in the same income
statement line item as the hedged item.
Net investment hedges are used to manage the foreign
exchange rate sensitivity arising from a net investment in a
foreign operation. Changes in the spot prices of derivatives that
are designated as net investment hedges of foreign operations
are recorded as a component of accumulated OCI. The
remaining components of these derivatives are excluded in
assessing hedge effectiveness and are recorded in market
making and similar activities.
Securities
Debt securities are reported on the Consolidated Balance Sheet
at their trade date. Their classification is dependent on the
purpose for which the securities were acquired. Debt securities
purchased for use in the Corporation’ s trading activities are
reported in trading account assets at fair value with unrealized
gains and losses included in market making and similar
activities. Substantially all other debt securities  purchased are
used in the Corporation’ s ALM activities and are reported on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet as either debt securities carried at
fair value or as held-to-maturity (HTM) debt securities. Debt
securities carried at fair value are either available-for-sale (AFS)
securities with unrealized gains and losses net-of-tax included in
accumulated OCI or carried at fair value with unrealized gains
and losses reported in other income. HTM debt securities, which
are certain debt securiti es that management has the intent and
ability to hold to maturity , are reported at amortized cost.
The Corporation regularly evaluates each AFS and HTM debt
security where the value has declined below amortized cost to
assess whet her the decline in fair value is other than temporary .
In determining whether an impairment is other than temporary ,
the Corporation considers the severity and duration of the
decline in fair value, the length of time expected for recovery , the
financial condition of the issuer , and other quali tative factors, as
well as whether the Corporation either plans to sell the security
or it is more likely than not that it will be required to sell the
security before recovery of the amortized cost. For AFS debt
securities the Corporation intends to hold, an analysis is
performed to determine how much of the decline in fair value is
related to the issuer ’s credit and how much is related to market
factors (e.g., interest rates). If any of the declin e in fair value is
due to credit, an other-than-temporary impairment (OTTI) loss is
recognized in the Consolidated Statement of Income for that
amount. If any of the decline in fair value is related to market
factors, that amount is recognized in accumulated OCI. In certain
instances, the credit loss may exceed the total decline in fair
value, in which case, the difference is due to market factors and
is recognize d as an unrealized gain in accumu lated OCI. If the
Corporation intends to sell or believes it is more likely than not
that it will be required to sell the debt security , it is written down
to fair value as an OTTI loss.
Interest on debt securities, including amortization of premiums
and accretion of discounts, is included in interest income.
Premiums and discounts are amortized or accreted to interest
income at a constant effective yield over the contractual lives of
the securitie s. Realized gains and losses from the sales of debt
securities are determined using the specific identification
method.
Equity securities with readily determinable fair values that are
not held for trading purposes are carried at fair value with
unrealized gains and losses included in other income. Equity
securities that do not have readily determinable fair values are
recorded at cost less impairment, if any, plus or minus qualifying
observable price changes. These securities are reported in other
assets. Loans and Leases
Loans, with the exceptio n of loans accounted for under the fair
value option, are meas ured at historical cost and reported at
their outstanding principal balances net of any unearned income,
charge-of fs, unamortized  deferred fees and costs on originated
loans, and for purchased loans, net of any unamortized
premiums or discounts. Loan origination fees and certain direct
origination costs are deferred and recognized as adjustments to
interest income over the lives of the related loans. Unearned
income, discounts and premiums are amort ized to interest
income using a level yield methodology . The Corporation elects
to account for certain consumer and commercial loans under the
fair value option with interest reported in interest income and
changes in fair value reported in market making and similar
activities or other income.
Under applicable accounting guidance, for reporting
purposes, the loan and lease portfolio is catego rized by portfolio
segment and, within each portfolio segment, by class of
financing receivables. A portfolio segment is defined as the level
at which an entity develops and documents a systematic
methodology to determine the allowance for credit losses, and a
class of financing receivables is defined as the level of
disaggregation of portfolio segments based  on the initial
measurement attribute, risk characteristics and methods for
assessing risk. The Corporation’ s three  portfolio segments are
Consumer Real Estate, Credit Card and Other Consumer , and
Commercial. The classes within the Consumer Real Estate
portfolio segment are residential mortgage and home equity . The
classes within the Credit Card and Other Consumer portfolio
segment are credit card, direct/indirect consu mer and other
consumer . The classes within the Commercial portfolio segment
are U.S. commercial, non-U.S. commercial, commercial real
estate, commercial lease financing and U.S. small business
commercial.
Leases
The Corporation provides equipment financing to its customers
through a variety of lessor arrangements. Direct financing leases
and sales-ty pe leases are carried at the aggregate of lease
payments receivable plus the estimated residual value of the
leased property less unearned income, which is accreted to
interest income over the lease terms using methods that
approximate the interest method. Operating lease income is
recognized on a straight-line basis. The Corporation's lease
arrangements generally do not contain non-lease components.
Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowance for credit  losses, which includes the allowance for
loan and lease losses and the reserve for unfunded lending
commitments, represents management’ s estim ate of probable
incurred credit losses in the Corporation’ s loan and lease
portfolio excluding loans and unfunded lendin g commitments
accounted for under the fair value option. The allowance for
credit losse s includes  both quantitative and qualitative
components. The qualitative component has a higher degree of
management subjectivity , and includes factors such as
concentrations, econom ic conditions and other considerations.
The allowance for loan and lease losses represents the
estimated probable credit losses on funded consumer and
commercial loans and leases while the reserve for unfunded
lending commitments, including standby letters of credit (SBLCs)
and binding unfunded loan commitments, represents estimated
probable credit losses on these unfunded credit instruments
based on utilization assumptions. Lending -related credit
exposures deemed to be uncollectible, excluding loans carried at
fair value, are charged of f against these accounts.
95     Bank of America
 
The Corpora tion perform s periodic and system atic detailed
reviews of its lending portfolios to identify credit risks and to
assess the overall collectability of those portfolios. The
allowance on certain homogeneous consumer loan portfolios,
which gener ally consist of consumer real estate loans within the
Consumer Real Estate portfolio segment and credit card loans
within the Credit Card and Other Consumer portfolio segment, is
based on aggregated portfolio segment evaluations generally by
product type. Loss forecast models are utilized for these
portfolios which consider a variety of factors including, but not
limited to, historical loss experience, estimated defaults or
foreclosures based on portfolio trends, delinquencies,
bankruptcies, economic conditions, credit scores  and the amount
of loss in the event of default.
For consumer loans secured by residential real estate, using
statistical modeling methodologies, the Corpo ration estimates
the number of loans that will default based on the individual loan
attributes aggregated into pools of homogene ous loans with
similar attributes. The attributes that are most significant to the
probability of default and are used to estimate defaults include
refreshed loan-to-value (LTV) or, in the case of a subordinated
lien, refreshed combined LTV (CLTV), borrower credit score,
months since origination and geography , all of which are further
broken down by present collection status (whether the loan is
current, delinquent, in default or in bankruptcy). The severity or
loss given default is estimated based on the refreshed LTV for
first-lien mortgages or CLTV for subordina ted liens. The
estimates are based on the Corporation’ s histo rical experience
with the loan portfolio, adjusted to reflect an assessment of
environmental factors not yet reflected in the historical data
underlying the loss estimates, such as changes in real estate
values, local and national economies, underwriting standards
and the regulatory environment. The probability of default
models also incorporat e recent experience with modification
programs including re-defaults subsequent to modification, a
loan’ s default history prior to modification and the change in
borrower payments post-modification. On home equity loans
where the Corporation holds only a second-lien position and
foreclosure is not the best alternative, the loss severity is
estimated at 100 percent .
The allowan ce on certain commercial loans (except business
card and certain small business loans) is calculated using loss
rates delineated by risk rating and product type. Factors
considered when asses sing loss rates include the value of the
underlying collateral, if applicable, the industry of the obligor , and
the obligor ’s liquidity and other financial indicators along with
certain qualitative factors. These statistical models are updated
regularly for changes in economic and busin ess conditions.
Included in the analysis of consumer and commercial loan
portfolios are qualitative estimates which are maintained to cover
uncertainties that affect the Corporation’ s estim ate of probable
losses includ ing domest ic and global economic uncertainty and
large single-name defaults.
For individually impaired loans, which include nonperforming
commercial loans as well as consumer and commercial loans
and leases modified in a troubled debt restructuring (TDR),
management measures  impairment primarily based on the
present value of payments expected to be received, discounted
at the loans’  original effective contractual interest rates. Credit
card loans are discounted at the portfolio average contractual
annual perce ntage rate, excluding promotionally priced loans, in
effect prior to restructuring. Impaired loans and TDRs may also
be measured based on observable market prices, or for loans
that are solely depende nt on the collateral for repayment, the
estimated fair value of the collateral less costs to sell. If the
recorded investment in impaired loans exceeds this amount, a
specific allowance is established as part of the allowance for
loan and lease losses unless these are secured consumer loans that are
solely depen dent on collateral for repayment, in which case the
amount that exceeds the fair value of the collateral is charged
off.
Generally , the Corporation initially estimates the fair value of
the collateral securing these consumer real estate-secured loans
using an automated valuation model (AVM). An AVM is a tool that
estimates the value of a property by reference  to market data
including sales of comparable properties and price trends
specific to the Metropolitan Statistical Area in which the property
being valued  is located. In the event that an AVM value is not
available, the Corporation utilizes publicized indices or if these
methods provide less reliable valuations, the Corporation uses
appraisals or broker price opinions to estimate the fair value of
the collateral. While there is inherent imprecision in these
valuations, the Corporation believes that they are representative
of the portfolio in the aggregate.
In addition to the allowance for loan and lease losses, the
Corporation also estimates probable losses related to unfunded
lending commitments, such as letters of credit, financial
guarantees and binding unfunded loan commitments. Unfunded
lending commitments are subject to individual reviews and are
analyzed and segregated by risk according to the Corporation’ s
internal risk rating scale. These risk classifications, in conjunction
with an analysis of historical loss experience, utilization
assumptions, current economic conditions, performance trends
within the portfolio and any other pertinent information, result in
the estimation of the reserve for unfunded lending commitments.
The allowance for credit  losses related to the loan and lease
portfolio is reported separately on the Consolidated Balance
Sheet whereas the reserve for unfunded lending commitments is
reported on the Consolidated Balance Sheet in accrued
expenses and other liabilities. The provision for credit losses
related to the loan and lease portfolio and unfunded lending
commitments is reported in the Consolidated Statement of
Income.
Nonperforming Loans and Leases, Charge-offs and
Delinquencies
Nonperforming loans and leases generally include loans and
leases that have been placed on nonaccrual status. Loans
accounted for under the fair value option and LHFS are not
reported as nonperforming.
In accordance with the Corporation’ s policies, consumer real
estate-secured loans, including residential mortg ages and home
equity loans, are generally placed on nonaccrual status and
classified as nonperforming at 90 days  past due unless
repayment of the loan is insured by the Federal Housing
Administration (FHA) or through individually insured long-term
standby agreements with Fannie Mae (FNMA) or Freddie Mac
(FHLMC) (the fully-insur ed portfolio). Residential mortgage loans
in the fully-in sured portfolio are not placed on nonaccrual status
and, therefore, are not reported as nonperforming. Junior-lien
home equity loans are placed on nonaccrual status and
classified as nonperforming when the underlying first-lien
mortgage loan becomes 90 days past due even if the junior-lien
loan is current. The outstanding balance of real estate-secured
loans that is in excess of the estimated property value less costs
to sell is charged off no later than the end of the month in which
the loan becomes 180 days  past due unless the loan is fully
insured, or for loans in bankruptcy , within 60 days of receipt of
notification of filing, with the remaining balance classified as
nonperforming.
Consumer loans secure d by personal property , credit card
loans and other unsecu red consumer loans are not placed on
nonaccrual status prior to charge-of f and, therefore, are not
reported as nonperforming loans, except for certain secured
consumer loans, including those that have been modified in a
TDR. Personal
  Bank of America    96
property-secured loans (including auto loans) are charged off to
collateral value no later than the end of the month in which the
account becomes 120 days past due, or upon repossession of
an auto or, for loans in bankruptcy , within 60 days of receipt of
notification of filing. Credit card and other unsecured customer
loans are charged off no later than the end of the month in which
the account  becomes 180 days past due, within 60 days after
receipt of notification of death or bankruptcy , or upon
confirmation of fraud.
Commercial loans and leases, excluding business card loans,
that are past due 90 days  or more as to principal or interest, or
where reasonable doubt exists as to timely collection, including
loans that are individually identified as being impaired, are
generally placed on nonaccrual status and classified as
nonperforming unless well-secured and in the process of
collection.
Business card loans are charged off in the same manner as
consumer credit card loans. Other commercial loans and leases
are generally charged off when all or a portion of the principal
amount is determined to be uncollectible.
The entire balance of a consumer loan or comm ercial loan or
lease is contractually delinquent if the minimum payment is not
received by the specified due date on the customer ’s billing
statement. Interest and fees continue to accrue on past due
loans and leases until the date the loan is placed on nonaccrual
status, if applicable. Accrued interest receivable is reversed
when loans and leases are placed on nonaccrua l status. Interest
collections on nonaccruing loans and leases for which the
ultimate collectability of principal is uncertain are applied as
principal reductions; otherwise, such collections  are credited to
income when received. Loans and leases may be restored to
accrual status when all principal and interest is current and full
repayment of the remaining contractual principal and interest is
expected.
Troubled Debt Restructurings
Consumer and commerc ial loans and leases whose contractual
terms have  been restructured in a manner that grants a
concession to a borrow er experiencing financial difficulties are
classified as TDRs. Concessions could include a reduction in the
interest rate to a rate that is below market on the loan, payment
extensions, forgiveness of principal, forbearance or other actions
designed to maximize collections. Loans that are carried at fair
value and LHFS are not classified as TDRs.
Loans and leases whose contractual terms  have been
modified in a TDR and are current at the time of restructuring
may remain on accrual status if there is demonstrated
performance prior to the restructuring and paym ent in full under
the restructured terms is expected. Otherwise, the loans are
placed on nonaccrual status and reported as nonperforming,
except for fully-insured consumer real estate loans, until there is
sustained repayment performance for a reasonable period,
generally six months. If accruing TDRs ceas e to perform in
accordance with their modified contractual terms, they are
placed on nonaccrual status and reported as nonperforming
TDRs.
Secured consumer loans that have been discharged in
Chapter 7 bankruptcy and have not been reaffirmed by the
borrower are classified as TDRs at the time of discharge. Such
loans are placed on nonaccrual status and written down to the
estimated collateral value less costs to sell no later than at the
time of discharge. If these loans are contractually current,
interest collections are generally recorded in interest income on
a cash  basis. Consume r real estate-secured loans for which a
binding offer to restructu re has been extended are also classified
as TDRs. Credit card and other unsecured consumer loans that
have been renegotiated in a TDR generally remain on accrual
status until the loan is either paid in full or charged off, which occurs no later than the end of
the month in which the loan becomes 180 days  past due or, for
loans that have been placed on a fixed payment plan, 120 days
past due.
A loan that had previously been modified in a TDR and is
subsequently refinanced  under current underwri ting standards at
a market rate with no concessionary terms is accounted for as a
new loan and is no longer reported as a TDR.
Loans Held-for-sale
Loans that the Corpora tion intends to sell in the foreseeable
future, includ ing residen tial mortgages, loan syndications, and to
a lesser degree, commercial real estate, consumer finance and
other loans, are reported  as LHFS and are carrie d at the lower of
aggregate cost or fair value. The Corporation accounts for
certain LHFS, including residential mortgage LHFS, under the
fair value option with interest recorded in interest income and
changes in fair value recorded in other income. Loan origination
costs related to LHFS that the Corporation accounts for under
the fair value option are recognized in noninteres t expense when
incurred. Loan origination costs for LHFS carried at the lower of
cost or fair value are capitalized as part of the carrying value of
the loans and recognized as a reduction of noninterest income
upon the sale of such loans. LHFS that are on nonaccrual status
and are reported as nonperforming, as defined in the policy
herein, are reported separately from nonperforming loans and
leases.
Premises and Equipment
Premises and equipment are carried at cost less accumulated
depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization are
recognized using the straight-line method over the estimated
useful lives of the asset s. Estimated lives range up to 40 years
for buildings, up to 12 years  for furniture and equipment, and the
shorter of lease term or estimated useful life for leasehold
improvements.
Lessee Arrangements
Substantially all of the Corporation’ s lessee arrangements are
operating leases. Under these arrangements, the Corporation
records right-of-use assets and lease liabilities at lease
commencement. Right-of-use assets are reported in other assets
on the Consolidated Balance Sheet, and the related lease
liabilities are reported in accrued expenses and other liabilities.
All leases are recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheet
except leases with an initial term less than 12 months  for which
the Corporation made the short-term lease election. Lease
expense is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease
term and is recorded in occupancy and equipment expense in
the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The Corporation made an accounting policy election not to
separate lease and non-lease components of a contract that is or
contains a lease for its real estate and equipment leases. As
such, lease payments represent payments on both lease and
non-lease components. At lease commencement, lease liabilities
are recogniz ed based on the present value of the remaining
lease payments and discounted using the Corporation’ s
incremental borrowing rate. Right-of-use assets initially equal the
lease liability , adjusted for any lease payments made prior to
lease commencement and for any lease incentives.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill is the purchase premium after adjusting for the fair
value of net assets acquired. Goodwill is not amortized but is
reviewed for potential impairment on an annual basis, or when
events or circumstances indicate a potential impairment, at the
reporting
97     Bank of America
 
unit level. A reporting unit is a business segment or one level
below a business segment.
The Corporation assesses the fair value of each reporting
unit against its carrying value, including goodwill, as measured
by allocated equity . For purposes of goodwill impairment testing,
the Corporation utilizes allocated equity as a proxy for the
carrying value of its reporting units. Allocated equity in the
reporting units is comprised of allocated capital plus capital for
the portion of goodwill and intangibles specifically assigned to
the reporting unit.
In performing its goodwi ll impairment testing, the Corporation
first assesse s qualitative factors to determine whether it is more
likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its
carrying value. Qualitati ve factors include, among other things,
macroeconomic conditio ns, industry and market considerations,
financial performance of the respective reporting unit and other
relevant entity- and reporting-unit specific considerations.
If the Corporation conclu des it is more likely than not that the
fair value of a reporting  unit is less than its carrying value, a
quantitative assessmen t is performed. If the fair value of the
reporting unit exceeds its carrying value, goodwill of the reporting
unit is considered not impaired; however , if the carrying value of
the reporting unit excee ds its fair value, an additional step is
performed to measure potential impairment.
This step involves calcul ating an implied fair value of goodwill
which is the excess of the fair value of the reporting unit, as
determined in the first step, over the aggregate fair values of the
assets, liabilities and identifiable intangibles as if the reporting
unit was being acquired in a business combination. If the implied
fair value of goodwill exceeds the goodwill assigned to the
reporting unit, there is no impairment. If the goodwill assigned to
a reporting unit exceed s the implied fair value of goodwill, an
impairment charge is recorded for the excess. An impairment
loss recognized cannot exceed the amount of goodwill assigned
to a reporting unit. An impairment loss establishes a new basis in
the goodwill, and subsequent reversals of goodwill impairment
losses are not permitted under applicable accounting guidance.
For intangib le assets subject to amortization, an impairment
loss is recognized if the carrying value of the intangible asset is
not recovera ble and exceeds fair value. The carrying value of the
intangible asset is considered not recoverable if it exceeds the
sum of the undiscounted cash flows expected to result from the
use of the asset. Intan gible assets deemed to have indefinite
useful lives are not subject to amortization. An impairment loss is
recognized if the carrying value of the intangib le asset with an
indefinite life exceeds its fair value.
Variable Interest Entities
A VIE is an entity that lacks equity investors or whose equity
investors do not have a controlling financial interest in the entity
through their equity investments. The Corporation consolidates a
VIE if it has both the power to direct the activities of the VIE that
most significantly impact the VIE’s economic performance and
an obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits that
could potent ially be significant to the VIE. On a quarterly basis,
the Corporation reassesses its involvement with the VIE and
evaluates the impact of changes in governing documents and its
financial interests in the VIE. The consolidatio n status of the
VIEs with which the Corporation is involved may change as a
result of such reassessments.
The Corpor ation prima rily uses VIEs for its securitization
activities, in which the Corporation transfers whole loans or debt
securities into a trust or other vehicle. When the Corporation is
the servicer of whole loans held in a securitization trust, including
non-agency residential mortgages, home equity loans, credit
cards, and other loans, the Corporation has the power to direct
the most significant activities of the trust. The Corporation generally does
not have the power to direct the most significant activities of a
residential mortgage agency trust except in certain
circumstances in which the Corporation holds substantially all of
the issued securities and has the unilateral right to liquidate the
trust. The power to direct the most significant activities of a
commercial mortgage securitization trust is typically held by the
special servicer or by the party holding specific subordinate
securities which embody certain controlling rights. The
Corporation consolidates a whole-loan securitization trust if it has
the power to direct the most significant activities and also holds
securities issued by the trust or has other contractual
arrangements, other than standard repre sentations and
warranties, that could potentially be significant to the trust.
The Corpora tion may also transfer trading acco unt securities
and AFS securities into municipal bond or resecuritization trusts.
The Corpo ration consolidates a municipal bond or
resecuritization trust if it has control over the ongoing activities of
the trust such as the remarketing of the trust’ s liabilities or, if
there are no ongoing activities, sole discretion over the design of
the trust, including the identification of securities to be
transferred in and the structure of securities to be issued, and
also retains securities or has liquidity or other commitments that
could potent ially be significant to the trust. The Corporation does
not consolidate a munic ipal bond or resecuritization trust if one
or a limited number of third-party investors share responsibility
for the design of the trust or have control over the significant
activities of the trust through liquidation or other substantive
rights.
Other VIEs used by the Corporation include collateralized
debt obligations (CDOs), investment vehicles created on behalf
of customers and other investment vehicles. The Corporation
does not routinely serve as collateral manager  for CDOs and,
therefore, does not typically have the powe r to direct the
activities that most significantly impact the economic
performance of a CDO. However , following an event of default, if
the Corporat ion is a majority holder of senior securities issued by
a CDO  and acquires the power to manage its assets, the
Corporation consolidates the CDO.
The Corporation consolidates a customer or other investment
vehicle if it has control over the initial design of the vehicle or
manages the assets in the vehicle and also absorbs potentially
significant gains or losses through an investment in the vehicle,
derivative contracts or other arrangements. The Corporation
does not consolidate an investment vehicle if a single investor
controlled the initial design of the vehicle or manages the assets
in the vehic les or if the Corporation does not have a variable
interest that could potentially be significant to the vehicle.
Retained interests in securitized assets are initially recorded
at fair value. In addition, the Corporation may invest in debt
securities issued by unconsolidated VIEs. Fair values of these
debt securities, which are classified as trading account assets,
debt securities carried at fair value or HTM securities, are based
primarily on quoted market prices in active or inactive markets.
Generally , quoted market prices for retained residual interests
are not available; therefore, the Corporation estimates fair values
based on the present value of the associated expected future
cash flows.
Fair Value
The Corpor ation measu res the fair values of its assets and
liabilities, where applicable, in accordance with accounting
guidance that requires an entity to base fair value on exit price.
Under this guidance, an entity is required to maximize the use of
observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs
in measuring fair value. Under applicable accounting standards,
fair value measurements are categorized into one of three levels
  Bank of America    98
based on the inputs to the valuation technique with the highest
priority given to unadjusted quoted prices in active markets and
the lowest priority given to unobservable inputs. The Corporation
categorizes its fair value  measurements of finan cial instruments
based on this three-level hierarchy .
Level 1Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical
assets or liabilities. Level 1 assets and liabilities include
debt and equity securities and derivative contra cts that
are traded in an active  exchange market, as well as
certain U.S. Treasury securities that are highl y liquid
and are actively traded in OTC markets.
Level 2Observable inputs other than Level 1 prices, such as
quoted prices for similar assets or liabilities, quoted
prices in markets that are not active, or other inputs that
are observa ble or can be corroborated by observable
market data for substantially the full term of the assets
or liabilities. Level 2 assets and liabilities include debt
securities with quoted prices that are traded less
frequently than exchange-traded instruments and
derivative contracts where fair value is determined
using a pricing model with inputs that are observable in
the market or can be derived principally from or
corroborated by observable market data. This category
generally includes U.S. government and agency
mortgage-backed (MBS) and asset-backed securities
(ABS), corporate debt securities, derivative contracts,
certain loans and LHFS.
Level 3Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no
market activity and that are significant to the overall fair
value of the assets or liabilities. Level 3 assets and
liabilities include financial instruments for which the
determination of fair value requires significant
management judgment or estimation. The fair value for
such assets and liabilities is generally determined using
pricing mode ls, discount ed cash flow methodolo gies or
similar techn iques that incorporate the assumptions a
market participant would use in pricing the asset or
liability . This category generally includes retained
residual interests in securitizations, consumer MSRs,
certain ABS, highly structured, complex or long-dated
derivative contracts, certain loans and LHFS,  IRLCs
and certai n CDOs where independent pricing
information cannot be obtained for a significant portion
of the underlying assets.
Income Taxes
There are two components of income tax expense: current and
deferred. Current income tax expense reflects taxes to be paid or
refunded for the current period. Deferred income tax expense
results from changes in deferred tax assets and liabilities
between periods. These gross deferred tax assets and liabilities
represent decreases or increases in taxes expected to be paid in
the future because of future reversals of temporary differences in
the bases of assets and liabilities as measured by tax laws and
their bases as reported in the financial statemen ts. Deferred tax
assets are also recog nized for tax attributes such as net
operating loss carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards.
Valuation allowances are recorded to reduce deferred tax assets
to the amounts management concludes are more likely than not
to be realized.
Income tax benefits are recognized and measured based
upon a two-step model: first, a tax position must be more likely
than not to be sustained based solely on its technical merits in
order to be recognized, and second, the benefit is measured as
the largest dollar amount of that position that is more likely than
not to be sustained upon settlement. The difference between the
benefit recognized and the tax benefit claimed on a tax return is referred
to as an unrecognized tax benefit. The Corporation records
income tax-related interest and penalties, if applicable, within
income tax expense.
Revenue Recognition
The following summarizes the Corporation’ s revenue recognition
accounting policies for certain noninterest income activities.
Card Income
Card income  includes annual, late and over-limit fees as well as
fees earned from interchange, cash advan ces and other
miscellaneous transactions and is presented net of direct costs.
Interchange fees are recognized upon settlement of the credit
and debit card payment transactions and are generally
determined on a percentage basis for credit cards and fixed
rates for debit cards based on the corresponding payment
network’ s rates. Substantially all card fees are recognized at the
transaction date, except for certain time-based fees such as
annual fees, which are recognized over 12 months . Fees
charged to cardholders that are estimated to be uncollectible are
reserved in the allowance for loan and lease losses. Included in
direct cost are rewards and credit card partner payments.
Rewards paid to cardholders are related to points earned by the
cardholder that can be redeemed for a broad range of rewards
including cash, travel and gift cards. The points to be redeemed
are estimated based on past redemption behavior , card product
type, accou nt transaction activity and other historical card
performance. The liability is reduced as the point s are redeemed.
The Corporation also makes payments to credit card partners.
The payments are based on revenue-sharing agreements that
are generally driven by cardholder transactions and partner sales
volumes. As part of the revenue-sharing agreements, the credit
card partner provides the Corporation exclusive rights to market
to the credit card partner ’s members or customers on behalf of
the Corporation.
Service Charges
Service charges include deposit and lending-related fees.
Deposit-related fees consist of fees earned on consumer and
commercial
deposit activities and are generally recogn ized when the
transactions occur or as the service is performed. Consumer
fees are earned on consumer deposit accounts for account
maintenance and various transaction-based services, such as
ATM transactions, wire transfer activities, check and money
order processing and insufficient funds/overdraft transactions.
Commercial deposit-rel ated fees are from the Corporation’ s
Global Transaction Services business and consi st of commercial
deposit and treasury management services, including account
maintenance and other services, such as payroll, sweep account
and other cash manag ement services. Lending-related fees
generally represent transactional fees earned from certain loan
commitments, financial guarantees and SBLCs.
Investment and Brokerage Services
Investment and brokerage services consist of asset
management and brokerage fees. Asset manag ement fees are
earned from the management of client assets under advisory
agreements or the full discretion of the Corporation’ s financial
advisors (collectively referred to as assets under management
(AUM)). Asset management fees are earned as a percentage of
the client’s AUM and generally range from 50 basis points (bps)
to 150 bps of the AUM. In cases where a third party is used to
obtain a client’ s investm ent allocation, the fee remitted to the
third party is recorded net and is not reflected in the transaction
price, as the Corporation is an agent for those services.
99     Bank of America
 
Brokerage fees include income earned from transaction-
based services that are performed as part of investment
management services and are based on a fixed price per unit or
as a percentage of the total transaction amount. Brokerage fees
also include distribution fees and sales commissions that are
primarily in the Global Wealth & Investment Management
(GWIM ) segment and are earne d over time. In addition, primarily
in the Global Mark ets segment, brokerage fees are earned when
the Corporation fills customer orders to buy or sell various
financial products or when it acknowledges, affirms, settles and
clears transactions and/or submits trade information to the
appropriate clearing broker . Certain customers  pay brokerage,
clearing and/or exchang e fees imposed by relevant regulatory
bodies or exchanges in order to execute or clear trades. These
fees are recorded net and are not reflected in the transaction
price, as the Corporation is an agent for those services.
Investment Banking Income
Investment banking income includes underwriting income and
financial advisory services income. Underwriting  consists of fees
earned for the placement of a customer ’s debt or equity
securities. The revenue is generally earned based on a
percentage of the fixed number of shares or principal placed.
Once the number of shares or notes is determined and the
service is completed, the underwriting fees are recognized. The
Corporation incurs certain out-of-pocket expense s, such as legal
costs, in performing these services. These  expenses are
recovered through the revenue the Corporation earns from the
customer and are includ ed in operating expen ses. Syndication
fees repres ent fees earned as the agent or lead lender
responsible for structuring, arranging and administering a loan
syndication.
Financial advisory services consist of fees earned for
assisting clients with transactions related to mergers and
acquisitions and financial restructurings. Revenue varies
depending on the size of the transaction and scope of services
performed and is genera lly contingent on succe ssful completion
of the transaction. Revenue is typically recognized once the
transaction is completed and all services have been rendered.
Additionally , the Corporation may earn a fixed fee in merger and
acquisition transactions to provide a fairness opinion, with the
fees recognized when the opinion is delivered to the client. Other Revenue Measurement and Recognition Policies
The Corporation did not disclose the value  of any open
performance obligations at December 31, 2019 , as its contracts
with customers generally have a fixed term that is less than one
year, an open term with a cancellation period that is less than
one year, or provisions that allow the Corporation to recognize
revenue at the amount it has the right to invoice.
Earnings Per Common Share
Earnings per common share (EPS) is computed  by dividing net
income allocated to common shareholders by the weighted-
average common shares outstanding, excluding unvested
common shares subject to repurchase or cancellation. Net
income allocated to common shareholders is net income
adjusted for preferred stock dividends including dividends
declared, accretion of discounts on preferred  stock including
accelerated accretion when preferred stock is repaid early , and
cumulative dividends related to the current dividend period that
have not been declared  as of period end, less income allocated
to participating securities. Diluted EPS is computed by dividing
income allocated to common shareholders plus dividends on
dilutive convertible preferred stock and preferred stock that can
be tendered to exercise warrants, by the weighted-average
common shares outstanding plus amounts representing the
dilutive effect of stock  options outstanding, restricted stock,
restricted stock units (RSUs), outstanding warrants and the
dilution resulting from the conversion of conv ertible preferred
stock, if applicable.
Foreign Currency T ranslation
Assets, liabilities and operations of foreign branches and
subsidiaries are recorded based on the functional currency of
each entity . When the functional currency of a foreign operation
is the local currency , the assets, liabilities and operations are
translated, for consolidation purposes, from the local currency to
the U.S. dollar reporting  currency at period-end rates for assets
and liabilities and generally at average rates for results of
operations. The resulting unrealized gains and losses are
reported as a component of accumulated OCI, net-of-tax. When
the foreign entity’ s functional currency is the U.S. dollar , the
resulting remeasurement gains or losses on foreign currency-
denominated assets or liabilities are included in earnings.
  Bank of America    100
NOTE 2  Net Interest Income and Noninterest Income
The table below presents the Corporation’ s net interest income and noninterest income disaggr egated by revenue source for 2019 ,
2018  and 2017 . For more information,  see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles . For a disaggregation of
noninterest income by business segment and All Other , see Note 24 – Business Segment Information .
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Net interest income    
Interest income    
Loans and leases $ 43,086 $ 40,811 $ 36,221
Debt securities 11,806 11,724 10,471
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell 4,843 3,176 2,390
Trading account assets 5,196 4,811 4,474
Other interest income 6,305 6,247 4,023
Total interest income 71,236 66,769 57,579
Interest expense    
Deposits 7,188 4,495 1,931
Short-term borrowings 7,208 5,839 3,538
Trading account liabilities 1,249 1,358 1,204
Long-term debt 6,700 6,915 5,667
Total interest expense 22,345 18,607 12,340
Net interest income $ 48,891 $ 48,162 $ 45,239
Noninterest income    
Fees and commissions    
Card income    
Interchange fees (1) $ 3,834 $ 3,866 $ 3,777
Other card income 1,963 1,958 1,899
Total card income 5,797 5,824 5,676
Service charges    
Deposit-related fees 6,588 6,667 6,708
Lending-related fees 1,086 1,100 1,110
Total service charges 7,674 7,767 7,818
Investment and brokerage services    
Asset management fees 10,241 10,189 9,310
Brokerage fees 3,661 3,971 4,526
Total investment and brokerage services 13,902 14,160 13,836
Investment banking fees    
Underwriting income 2,998 2,722 2,821
Syndication fees 1,184 1,347 1,499
Financial advisory services 1,460 1,258 1,691
Total investment banking fees 5,642 5,327 6,011
Total fees and commissions 33,015 33,078 33,341
Market making and similar activities 9,034 9,008 7,102
Other income 304 772 1,444
Total noninterest income $ 42,353 $ 42,858 $ 41,887
(1) Gross interchange fees were $10.0 billion , $9.5 billion  and $8.8 billion  for 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively , and are presented net of $6.2 billion , $5.6 billion  and $5.1 billion  of expenses for rewards
and partner payments for the same periods.
101     Bank of America
 
NOTE 3  Derivatives
Derivative Balances
Derivatives are entered into on behalf of custom ers, for trading
or to support risk management activities. Derivatives used in risk
management activities include derivatives that may or may not
be designated in qualifying hedge accounting relationships.
Derivatives that are not designated in qualifying hedge
accounting relationships are referred to as other risk
management derivatives. For more information on the
Corporation’ s derivatives and hedging activities, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles . The following tables present derivative instruments
included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet in derivative assets
and liabilitie s at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Balances are
presented on a gross basis, prior to the application of
counterparty and cash collateral netting. Total derivative assets
and liabilitie s are adjusted on an aggregate basis to take into
consideration the effects of legally enforceable  master netting
agreements and have been reduced by cash collateral received
or paid.
  December 31, 2019
  Gross Derivative Assets Gross Derivative Liabilities
(Dollars in billions)Contract/
Notional (1) Trading and
Other Risk
Management
Derivatives Qualifying
Accounting
Hedges TotalTrading and
Other Risk
Management
DerivativesQualifying
Accounting
Hedges Total
Interest rate contracts          
Swaps $15,074.4 $ 162.0 $ 9.7 $ 171.7 $ 168.5 $ 0.4 $ 168.9
Futures and forwards 3,279.8 1.0 — 1.0 1.0 — 1.0
Written options 1,767.7 — — — 32.5 — 32.5
Purchased options 1,673.6 37.4 — 37.4 — — —
Foreign exchange contracts     
Swaps 1,657.7 30.3 0.7 31.0 31.7 0.9 32.6
Spot, futures and forwards 3,792.7 35.9 0.1 36.0 38.7 0.3 39.0
Written options 274.3 — — — 3.8 — 3.8
Purchased options 261.6 4.0 — 4.0 — — —
Equity contracts     
Swaps 315.0 6.5 — 6.5 8.1 — 8.1
Futures and forwards 125.1 0.3 — 0.3 1.1 — 1.1
Written options 731.1 — — — 34.6 — 34.6
Purchased options 668.6 42.4 — 42.4 — — —
Commodity contracts      
Swaps 42.0 2.1 — 2.1 4.4 — 4.4
Futures and forwards 61.3 1.7 — 1.7 0.4 — 0.4
Written options 33.2 — — — 1.4 — 1.4
Purchased options 37.9 1.4 — 1.4 — — —
Credit derivatives (2)       
Purchased credit derivatives:       
Credit default swaps 321.6 2.7 — 2.7 5.6 — 5.6
Total return swaps/options 86.6 0.4 — 0.4 1.3 — 1.3
Written credit derivatives:      
Credit default swaps 300.2 5.4 — 5.4 2.0 — 2.0
Total return swaps/options 86.2 0.8 — 0.8 0.4 — 0.4
Gross derivative assets/liabilities  $ 334.3 $ 10.5 $ 344.8 $ 335.5 $ 1.6 $ 337.1
Less: Legally enforceable master netting
agreements     (270.4)   (270.4)
Less: Cash collateral received/paid      (33.9)   (28.5)
Total derivative assets/liabilities      $ 40.5   $ 38.2
(1) Represents the total contract/notional amount of derivative assets and liabilities outstanding.
(2) The net derivative asset (liability) and notional amount of written credit derivatives for which the Corporation held purchased credit derivatives with identical underlying referenced names were $2.8
billion  and $309.7  billion  at December 31, 2019 .
  Bank of America    102
   December 31, 2018
   Gross Derivative Assets Gross Derivative Liabilities
(Dollars in billions)Contract/
Notional (1) Trading and
Other Risk
Management
Derivatives Qualifying
Accounting
Hedges TotalTrading and
Other Risk
Management
Derivatives Qualifying
Accounting
Hedges Total
Interest rate contracts             
Swaps $15,977.9 $ 141.0 $ 3.2 $ 144.2 $ 138.9 $ 2.0 $ 140.9
Futures and forwards 3,656.6 4.7 — 4.7 5.0 — 5.0
Written options 1,584.9 — — — 28.6 — 28.6
Purchased options 1,614.0 30.8 — 30.8 — — —
Foreign exchange contracts             
Swaps 1,704.8 38.8 1.4 40.2 42.2 2.3 44.5
Spot, futures and forwards 4,276.0 39.8 0.4 40.2 39.3 0.3 39.6
Written options 256.7 — — — 5.0 — 5.0
Purchased options 240.4 4.6 — 4.6 — — —
Equity contracts             
Swaps 253.6 7.7 — 7.7 8.4 — 8.4
Futures and forwards 100.0 2.1 — 2.1 0.3 — 0.3
Written options 597.1 — — — 27.5 — 27.5
Purchased options 549.4 36.0 — 36.0 — — —
Commodity contracts             
Swaps 43.1 2.7 — 2.7 4.5 — 4.5
Futures and forwards 51.7 3.2 — 3.2 0.5 — 0.5
Written options 27.5 — — — 2.2 — 2.2
Purchased options 23.4 1.7 — 1.7 — — —
Credit derivatives (2)             
Purchased credit derivatives:             
Credit default swaps 408.1 5.3 — 5.3 4.9 — 4.9
Total return swaps/options 84.5 0.4 — 0.4 1.0 — 1.0
Written credit derivatives:             
Credit default swaps 371.9 4.4 — 4.4 4.3 — 4.3
Total return swaps/options 87.3 0.6 — 0.6 0.6 — 0.6
Gross derivative assets/liabilities   $ 323.8 $ 5.0 $ 328.8 $ 313.2 $ 4.6 $ 317.8
Less: Legally enforceable master netting agreements       (252.7)     (252.7)
Less: Cash collateral received/paid       (32.4)     (27.2)
Total derivative assets/liabilities       $ 43.7     $ 37.9
(1) Represents the total contract/notional amount of derivative assets and liabilities outstanding.
(2) The net derivative asset (liability) and notional amount of written credit  derivatives for which the Corporation held purchased credit derivatives  with identical underlying referenced names were
$(185) million  and $342.8  billion  at December 31, 2018 .
Offsetting of Derivatives
The Corporation enters into International Swaps  and Derivatives
Association, Inc. (ISDA) master netting agreements or similar
agreements with substantially all of the Corpora tion’s derivative
counterparties. Where legally enforceable, these master netting
agreements give the Corporation, in the event of default by the
counterparty , the right to liquidate securities held as collateral
and to offset receivables and payables with the same
counterparty . For purposes of the Consolidated  Balance Sheet,
the Corporation offsets derivative assets and liabilities and cash
collateral held with the same counterparty where it has such a
legally enforceable master netting agreement.
The following table presents derivative instruments included
in derivative assets and liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2019  and 2018  by primary  risk (e.g.,
interest rate risk) and the platform, where applicable, on which
these derivatives are transacted. Balances are presented on a
gross basis,  prior to the application of counte rparty and cash
collateral netting. Total gross derivative assets and liabilities are
adjusted on an aggregate basis to take into consideration the
effects of legally enforc eable master netting agreements which
include reducing the balance for counterparty netting and cash
collateral received or paid.
For more information on offsetting of securit ies financing
agreements, see Note 11 – Federal Funds Sold or Purchased,
Securities Financing Agreements, Short-term Borrowings and
Restricted Cash .
103     Bank of America
 
Offsetting of Derivatives (1)     
 Derivative
AssetsDerivative
LiabilitiesDerivative
Assets  Derivative
Liabilities
(Dollars in billions) December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Interest rate contracts      
Over-the-counter $ 203.1 $ 196.6 $ 174.2 $ 169.4
Exchange-traded 0.1 0.1 — —
Over-the-counter cleared 6.0 5.3 4.8 4.0
Foreign exchange contracts     
Over-the-counter 69.2 73.1 82.5 86.3
Over-the-counter cleared 0.5 0.5 0.9 0.9
Equity contracts     
Over-the-counter 21.3 17.8 24.6 14.6
Exchange-traded 26.4 22.8 16.1 15.1
Commodity contracts     
Over-the-counter 2.8 4.2 3.5 4.5
Exchange-traded 0.8 0.8 1.0 0.9
Over-the-counter cleared — 0.1 — —
Credit derivatives     
Over-the-counter 6.4 6.6 7.7 8.2
Over-the-counter cleared 2.5 2.2 2.5 2.3
Total gross derivative assets/liabilities, before netting     
Over-the-counter 302.8 298.3 292.5 283.0
Exchange-traded 27.3 23.7 17.1 16.0
Over-the-counter cleared 9.0 8.1 8.2 7.2
Less: Legally enforceable master netting agreements and cash collateral
received/paid     
Over-the-counter (274.7) (269.3) (264.4) (259.2)
Exchange-traded (21.5) (21.5) (13.5) (13.5)
Over-the-counter cleared (8.1) (8.1) (7.2) (7.2)
Derivative assets/liabilities, after netting 34.8 31.2 32.7 26.3
Other gross derivative assets/liabilities (2) 5.7 7.0 11.0 11.6
Total derivative assets/liabilities 40.5 38.2 43.7 37.9
Less: Financial instruments collateral (3) (14.6) (16.1) (16.3) (8.6)
Total net derivative assets/liabilities $ 25.9 $ 22.1 $ 27.4 $ 29.3
(1) OTC derivatives include bilateral transactions between the Corporatio n and a particular counterparty . OTC-cleared derivatives include bilateral transactions between the Corporation and a
counterparty where the transaction is cleared through a clearinghouse. Exchange-traded derivatives include listed options transacted on an exchange.
(2) Consists of derivatives entered into under master netting agreements where the enforceability of these agreements is uncertain under bankruptcy laws in some countries or industries.
(3) Amounts are limited to the derivati ve asset/liability balance and, accordingly , do not include excess collateral received/pledged. Financial instruments collateral includes securities collateral
received or pledged and cash secur ities held and posted at third-party custodians that are not offset on the Consolidated Balance Sheet but shown as a reduction to derive net derivative assets
and liabilities.
ALM and Risk Management Derivatives
The Corpora tion’s ALM and risk management activities include
the use of derivatives to mitigate risk to the Corporation including
derivatives designated in qualifying hedge accounting
relationships and derivatives used in other risk management
activities. Interest rate, foreign exchange, equity , commodity and
credit contracts are utilized in the Corporation's ALM and risk
management activities.
The Corporation maintains an overall interest rate risk
management strategy that incorporates the use of interest rate
contracts, which are generally non-leveraged generic interest
rate and basis swaps, options, futures and forwa rds, to minimize
significant fluctuations in earnings caused by interest rate
volatility . The Corporation’ s goal is to manage interest rate
sensitivity and volatility so that movements in interest rates do
not significa ntly adversely affect earnings or capital. As a result
of interest rate fluctuations, hedged fixed-rate assets and
liabilities appreciate or depreciate in fair value. Gains or losses
on the derivative instrum ents that are linked to the hedged fixed-
rate assets and liabilities  are expected to substantially offset this
unrealized appreciation or depreciation.
Market risk, including interest rate risk, can be substantial in
the mortgage business. Market risk in the mortg age business is
the risk that values of mortgage assets or revenues will be
adversely affected by changes in market conditions such as
interest rate movements. To mitigate the interest rate risk in
mortgage banking production income, the Corporation utilizes
forward loan sale commitments and other derivative instruments,
including purchased options, and certain debt securities. The Corporation also utilizes derivatives such as interest rate options,
interest rate swaps, forward settlement contracts and eurodollar
futures to hedge certain market risks of MSRs.
The Corporation uses foreign exchange contrac ts to manage
the foreign exchange risk associated with certain foreign
currency-denominated assets and liabilities, as well as the
Corporation’ s investments in non-U.S. subsidiaries. Exposure to
loss on these contracts will increase or decrease over their
respective lives as currency exchange and interest rates
fluctuate.
The Corporation purchases credit derivatives to manage
credit risk related to certain funded and unfunded credit
exposures. Credit deriva tives include credit default swaps (CDS),
total return  swaps and swaptions. These derivatives are
recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheet at fair value with
changes in fair value recorded in other income.
Derivatives Designated as Accounting Hedges
The Corporation uses various types of interest rate and foreign
exchange derivative contracts to protect against changes in the
fair value of its assets and liabilities due to fluctuations in interest
rates and exchange rates (fair value hedges). The Corporation
also uses these types of contracts to protect against changes in
the cash flows of its assets and liabilities, and other forecasted
transactions (cash flow hedges). The Corporation hedges its net
investment in consolidated non-U.S. operation s determined to
have functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar using
forward exchange contracts and cross-currency basis swaps,
and by issuing foreign currency-denomina ted debt (net
investment hedges).
  Bank of America    104
Fair Value Hedges
The table below summarizes information related to fair value hedges for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
Gains and Losses on Derivatives Designated as Fair Value Hedges    
 Derivative Hedged Item
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019  2018  2017
Interest rate risk on long-term debt (1) $ 6,113 $ (1,538)$ (1,537)$ (6,110) $ 1,429 $ 1,045
Interest rate and foreign currency risk on long-term debt (2) 119 (1,187) 1,811 (101) 1,079 (1,767)
Interest rate risk on available-for-sale securities (3) (102) (52) (67) 98 50 35
Total $ 6,130 $ (2,777)$ 207 $ (6,113) $ 2,558 $ (687)
(1) Amounts are recorded in interest expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
(2) In 2019, 2018 and 2017, the deriv ative amount includes gains (losses) of $73 milli on, $(116) million and $(365) million in interes t expense, $28 milli on, $(992) million and $2.2 billion in marke t making
and similar activities, and $18 million  and $(79) million  in accumulated OCI, respectively . Line item totals are in the Consolidated Statement of Income and in the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
(3) Amounts are recorded in interest income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The table below summarizes the carrying value of hedged assets and liabilities that are designated and qualifying in fair value
hedging relationships along with the cumulative  amount of fair value hedging adjustments included in the carrying value that have
been record ed in the current hedging relationships. These fair value hedging adjustments are open basis adjustments that are not
subject to amortization as long as the hedging relationship remains designated.
Designated Fair Value Hedged Assets (Liabilities)
 Carrying Value Cumulative
Fair Value
Adjustments (1) Carrying Value Cumulative
Fair Value
Adjustments (1)
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
Long-term debt (2) $ (162,389) $ (8,685) $ (138,682) $ (2,117)
Available-for-sale debt securities (2) 1,654 64 981 (29)
(1) For assets, increase (decrease) to carrying value and for liabilities, (increase) decrease to carrying value.
(2) At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the cumulative fair value adjustme nts remaining on long-term debt and AFS debt securities from discontinued hedging relationships resulted in a decrease in the
related liability of $1.3 billio n and $1.6 billio n and an increase (decrease) in the related asset of $8 milli on and $(29) million, which are being amortized over the remaining contractual life of the de-
designated hedged items.
Cash Flow and Net Investment Hedges
The following table summarizes certain information related to
cash flow hedges and net investment hedges for 2019 , 2018  and
2017 . Of the $400 million  after-tax net loss ($526 million  pretax)
on derivatives in accum ulated OCI at December 31, 2019 , $68
million  after-tax ($90 million pretax) is expected to be reclassified
into earnings in the next 12 months. These net losses reclassified
into earnings are expected to primarily reduce net interest
income related to the respective hedged items. For terminated
cash flow hedges, the time period over which the majority of the
forecasted transactions are hedged is approxi mately 3 years ,
with a maximum length of time for certain forecasted
transactions of 16 years .
Gains and Losses on Derivatives Designated as Cash Flow and Net Investment Hedges   
 Gains (Losses) in
 Accumulated OCI on Derivatives  Gains (Losses) in Income
Reclassified from Accumulated OCI
(Dollars in millions, amounts pretax) 2019 2018 2017  2019  2018  2017
Cash flow hedges       
Interest rate risk on variable-rate assets (1) $ 671 $ (159)$ (109) $ (104) $ (165) $ (327)
Price risk on certain compensation plans (2) 34 4 59 (2) 27 148
Total $ 705 $ (155)$ (50) $ (106) $ (138) $ (179)
Net investment hedges          
Foreign exchange risk (3) $ 22 $ 989 $ (1,588) $ 366 $ 411 $ 1,782
(1) Amounts reclassified from accumulated OCI are recorded in interest income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
(2) Amounts reclassified from accumulated OCI are recorded in compensation and benefits expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
(3) Amounts reclassifi ed from accumulated OCI are recorded in other income in the Consolidated Statement of Income. Amounts excluded from effectiveness testing and recognized in market making
and similar activities were gains of $154 million , $47 million  and $120 million  in 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
Other Risk Management Derivatives
Other risk management derivatives are used by the Corporation to reduce certain risk exposur es by economically hedging various
assets and liabilities. The followin g table presents gains (losses) on these derivatives for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 . These gains (losses)
are largely of fset by the income or expense recorded on the hedged item.
105     Bank of America 
Gains and Losses on Other Risk Management
Derivatives
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Interest rate risk on mortgage activities
(1, 2) $ 315 $ (107)$ 8
Credit risk on loans (2) (58) 9 (6)
Interest rate and foreign currency risk on
ALM activities (3) 1,112 3,278 (1,318)
Price risk on certain compensation plans
(4) 943 (495) 704
(1) Primarily related to hedges of interest rate risk on MSRs and IRLCs to originate mortgage
loans that will be held for sale. The net gains on IRLCs, which are not included in the table but
are consi dered derivative instruments, were $73 million , $47 million  and $220 million  in 2019,
2018 and 2017, respectively .
(2) Gains (losses) on these derivatives are recorded in other income.
(3) Gains (losses) on these derivatives are recorded in market making and similar activities. Prior-
period amounts have been updated to conform to the current-period presentation.
(4) Gains (losses) on these derivatives are recorded in compensation and benefits expense.
Transfers of Financial Assets with Risk Retained
through Derivatives
The Corporation enters into certain transactions involving the
transfer of financial asse ts that are accounted for as sales where
substantially all of the economic exposure to the transferred
financial assets is retained through derivatives (e.g., interest rate
and/or credit), but the Corporation does not retain control over
the assets transferred. As of December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the
Corporation had transferred $5.2 billion and $5.8 billion of non-
U.S. government-guaranteed MBS to a third-party trust and
retained economic exposure to the transferred assets through
derivative contracts. In connection with these transfers, the
Corporation received gross cash proceeds of $5.2 billion  and
$5.8 billion at the transfer dates. At December 31, 2019  and
2018 , the fair value of the transferred securities was $5.3 billion
and $5.5 billion .
Sales and Trading Revenue
The Corporation enters into trading derivatives to facilitate client
transactions and to manage risk exposures arising from trading
account assets and liabilities. It is the Corpor ation’ s policy to
include these derivative instruments in its trading activities which
include derivatives and non-derivative cash instruments. The
resulting risk from these derivatives is manage d on a portfolio
basis as part of the Corporation’ s Global Markets  business
segment. The related sales and trading revenue generated
within Global Markets  is recorded in various income statement
line items including market making and similar activities and net
interest income as well as other revenue categories.
Sales and trading reven ue includes changes in the fair value
and realized gains and losses on the sales of trading and other
assets, net interest income, and fees primarily from commissions
on equity securities. Revenue is generated by the difference in
the client price for an instrument and the price at which the
trading desk can execu te the trade in the dealer market. For
equity securities, commissions related to purch ases and sales
are recorde d in the “Other” column in the Sales and Trading
Revenue table. Changes in the fair value of these securities are
included in market making and similar activities. For debt
securities, revenue, with the exception of interest associated with
the debt securities, is typically included in market making and
similar activities. Unlike commissions for equity securities, the
initial revenue related to broker-dealer services for debt
securities is typically included in the pricing of the instrument
rather than being charg ed through separate fee arrangements.
Therefore, this revenue is recorded in market making and similar
activities as part of the initial mark to fair value. For derivatives,
the majority of revenue is included in market making and similar
activities. In transactions where the Corporation acts as agent, which include
exchange-traded futures and options, fees are recorded in other
income.
The following table, which includes both derivatives and non-
derivative cash instruments, identifies the amounts in the
respective income statement line items attributable to the
Corporation’ s sales and trading revenue in Global Mark ets,
categorized by primary risk, for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 . This table
includes debit valuation adjustment (DVA) and funding valuation
adjustment (FVA) gains (losses). Global Markets  results in Note
24 – Busine ss Segment Information  are presen ted on a fully
taxable-equivalent (FTE) basis. The table below is not presented
on an FTE basis.
Sales and Trading Revenue
 Market
making and
similar
activitiesNet
Interest
Income Other (1) Total
(Dollars in millions) 2019
Interest rate risk $ 916$ 1,831 $ 121$ 2,868
Foreign exchange risk 1,300 54 43 1,397
Equity risk 3,565 (638) 1,574 4,501
Credit risk 1,158 1,800 511 3,469
Other risk 123 75 57 255
Total sales and
trading revenue $ 7,062$ 3,122 $ 2,306$12,490
 2018
Interest rate risk $ 784$ 1,696 $ 259$ 2,739
Foreign exchange risk 1,486 11 14 1,511
Equity risk 3,874 (662) 1,644 4,856
Credit risk 1,063 1,861 588 3,512
Other risk 50 202 53 305
Total sales and
trading revenue $ 7,257$ 3,108 $ 2,558$12,923
 2017
Interest rate risk $ 429$ 1,846 $ 248$ 2,523
Foreign exchange risk 1,409 12 9 1,430
Equity risk 2,598 (427) 1,904 4,075
Credit risk 1,685 1,945 578 4,208
Other risk 79 170 75 324
Total sales and
trading revenue $ 6,200$ 3,546 $ 2,814$12,560
(1) Represents amounts in investment and brokerage services and other income that are
recorded in Global Markets  and included in the definition of sales and trading revenue.
Includes investment and brokerage services revenue of $1.7 billion, $1.7 billion and $2.0 billion
in 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
Credit Derivatives
The Corporation enters into credit derivativ es primarily to
facilitate client transactions and to manage credit risk exposures.
Credit derivatives derive value based on an underlying third-
party referenced obligation or a portfolio of referenced
obligations and generally require the Corporation , as the seller of
credit prote ction, to make payments to a buyer upon the
occurrence of a predefined credit event. Such credit events
generally include bankruptcy of the referenced credit entity and
failure to pay under the obligation, as well as acceleration of
indebtedness and payment repudiation or moratorium. For credit
derivatives based on a portfolio of referenced credits or credit
indices, the Corporation may not be required to make payment
until a specified amount of loss has occurred and/or may only be
required to make payment up to a specified amount.
Credit derivatives are classified as investment and non-
investment grade based on the credit quality of the underlying
referenced obligation. The Corporation considers ratings of BBB-
or higher as investment grade. Non-investment grade includes
non-
  Bank of America    106
rated credit derivative instruments. The Corporation discloses
internal categorizations of investment grade and non-investment
grade consistent with how risk is managed for these instruments. Credit derivative instruments where the Corporation is the
seller of credit protectio n and their expiration at December 31,
2019  and 2018  are summarized in the following table.
Credit Derivative Instruments      
 Less than
One YearOne to
Three Years Three to
Five Years Over Five
Years  Total
 December 31, 2019
(Dollars in millions) Carrying Value
Credit default swaps:         
Investment grade $ — $ 5 $ 60 $ 164 $ 229
Non-investment grade 70 292 561 808 1,731
Total 70 297 621 972 1,960
Total return swaps/options:         
Investment grade 35 — — — 35
Non-investment grade 344 — — — 344
Total 379 — — — 379
Total credit derivatives $ 449 $ 297 $ 621 $ 972 $ 2,339
Credit-related notes:         
Investment grade $ — $ 3 $ 1 $ 639 $ 643
Non-investment grade 6 2 1 1,125 1,134
Total credit-related notes $ 6 $ 5 $ 2 $ 1,764 $ 1,777
 Maximum Payout/Notional
Credit default swaps:         
Investment grade $ 55,827 $ 67,838 $ 71,320 $ 17,708 $ 212,693
Non-investment grade 19,049 26,521 29,618 12,337 87,525
Total 74,876 94,359 100,938 30,045 300,218
Total return swaps/options:         
Investment grade 56,488 — 62 76 56,626
Non-investment grade 28,707 657 104 60 29,528
Total 85,195 657 166 136 86,154
Total credit derivatives $ 160,071 $ 95,016 $ 101,104 $ 30,181 $ 386,372
 December 31, 2018
 Carrying Value
Credit default swaps:      
Investment grade $ 2 $ 44 $ 436 $ 488 $ 970
Non-investment grade 132 636 914 1,691 3,373
Total 134 680 1,350 2,179 4,343
Total return swaps/options:         
Investment grade 105 — — — 105
Non-investment grade 472 21 — — 493
Total 577 21 — — 598
Total credit derivatives $ 711 $ 701 $ 1,350 $ 2,179 $ 4,941
Credit-related notes:         
Investment grade $ — $ — $ 4 $ 532 $ 536
Non-investment grade 1 1 1 1,500 1,503
Total credit-related notes $ 1 $ 1 $ 5 $ 2,032 $ 2,039
 Maximum Payout/Notional
Credit default swaps:      
Investment grade $ 53,758 $ 95,699 $ 95,274 $ 20,054 $ 264,785
Non-investment grade 24,297 33,881 34,530 14,426 107,134
Total 78,055 129,580 129,804 34,480 371,919
Total return swaps/options:         
Investment grade 60,042 822 59 72 60,995
Non-investment grade 24,524 1,649 39 70 26,282
Total 84,566 2,471 98 142 87,277
Total credit derivatives $ 162,621 $ 132,051 $ 129,902 $ 34,622 $ 459,196
The notional amount represents the maximum amount
payable by the Corporation for most credit derivatives. However ,
the Corporation does not monitor its exposure to credit
derivatives based solely on the notional amount because this
measure does not take into consideration the probability of
occurrence. As such, the notional amount is not a reliable
indicator of the Corpo ration’ s exposure to these contracts.
Instead, a risk framework is used to define risk tolerances and
establish limits so that certain credit risk-related losses occur
within acceptable, predefined limits.
Credit-related notes in the table above include investments in
securities issued by CDO, collateralized loan obligation (CLO)
and credit-linked note vehicles. These instrume nts are primarily
classified as trading securities. The carrying value of these instruments equals the Corporation’ s maximum exposure to loss.
The Corporation is not obligated to make any payments to the
entities under the terms of the securities owned.
Credit-related Contingent Features and Collateral
The Corporation executes the majority of its derivative contracts
in the OTC market with large, international financial institutions,
including broker-dealers and, to a lesser degree, with a variety of
non-financial companies . A significant majority of the derivative
transactions are executed on a daily margin basis. Therefore,
events such  as a credit rating downgrade (depending on the
ultimate rating level) or a breach of credit covenants would
typically require an increase in the amount of collateral required
of the counterparty , where applicable, and/or allow the
Corporation to
107     Bank of America
 
take additional protective measures such as early termination of
all trades. Further , as previously discussed on page 103, the
Corporation enters into legally enforceable master netting
agreements which reduce risk by permitting closeout and netting
of transactions with the same counterparty upon the occurrence
of certain events.
Certain of the Corporation’ s derivative contracts contain credit
risk-related contingent features, primarily in the form of ISDA
master netting agreements and credit support documentation
that enhan ce the creditworthiness of these instruments
compared to other obligations of the respective counterparty with
whom the Corporation has transacted. These contingent features
may be for the benefit of the Corporation as well as its
counterparties with respect to changes in the Corporation’ s
creditworthiness and the mark-to-market expo sure under the
derivative transactions. At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the
Corporation held cash and securities collateral of $84.3 billion
and $81.6 billion and posted cash and securities collateral of
$69.1 billion and $56.5 billion in the norm al course of business
under derivative agreements, excluding cross-pr oduct margining
agreements where clients are permitted to margin on a net basis
for both derivative and secured financing arrangements.
In connection with certain OTC derivative contracts and other
trading agreements, the Corporation can be required to provide
additional collateral or to terminate transactions with certain
counterparties in the event of a downgrade of the senior debt
ratings of the Corporation or certain subsidiaries. The amount of
additional collateral required depends on the contract and is
usually a fixed incremental amount and/or the market value of
the exposure.
At December 31, 2019 , the amount of collateral, calculated
based on the terms of the contracts, that the Corporation and
certain subsidiaries could be required to post to counterparties
but had not yet posted to counterparties was $2.3 billion ,
including $913 million  for Bank of America, National Association
(BANA).
Some counterparties are currently able to unilaterally
terminate certain contracts, or the Corporation or certain
subsidiaries may be required to take other action such as find a
suitable replacement or obtain a guarantee. At December 31,
2019  and 2018 , the liability recorded for these derivative
contracts was not significant.
The following table presents the amount of additional
collateral that would have been contractua lly required by
derivative contracts and other trading agreements at December
31, 2019  if the rating  agencies had downgraded their long-term
senior debt ratings for the Corporation or certain subsidiaries by
one incremental notch and by an additional second incremental
notch.
Additional Collateral Required to be Posted Upon
Downgrade at December 31, 2019
(Dollars in millions)One
incremental
notchSecond
incremental
notch
Bank of America Corporation $ 480$ 491
Bank of America, N.A. and subsidiaries (1) 222 353
(1) Included in Bank of America Corporation collateral requirements in this table.
The following table presents the derivative liabilities that
would be subject to unilateral termination by counterparties and
the amounts of collateral that would have been contractually
required at December 31, 2019  if the long-term senior debt
ratings for the Corporation or certain subsidiaries  had been lower
by one incremental notch and by an additional second
incremental notch. 
Derivative Liabilities Subject to Unilateral
Termination Upon Downgrade at December 31, 2019
(Dollars in millions)One
incremental
notchSecond
incremental
notch
Derivative liabilities $ 57$ 783
Collateral posted 42 411
Valuation Adjustments on Derivatives
The Corporation records credit risk valuation adjustments on
derivatives in order to properly reflect the credit quality of the
counterparties and its own credit quality . The Corporation
calculates valuation adjustments on derivatives based on a
modeled expected exposure that incorporates current market
risk factors. The exposure also takes into consideration credit
mitigants such as enfor ceable master netting agreements and
collateral. CDS spread data is used to estimate the default
probabilities and severities that are applied to the exposures.
Where no observable credit default data is available for
counterparties, the Corporation uses proxies and other market
data to estimate default probabilities and severity .
Valuation adjustments on derivatives are affected by changes
in market spreads, non-credit related market factors such as
interest rates and foreign exchange rates that affect the
expected exposure, and other factors like changes in collateral
arrangements and partial payments. Credit spreads and non-
credit factors can move independently . For example, for an
interest rate swap, chan ges in interest rates may increase the
expected exposure, which would increase the counterparty credit
valuation adjustment (CVA). Independently , counterparty credit
spreads may tighten, which would result in an offsetting
decrease to CV A.
The Corporation enters into risk management  activities to
offset market driven exposures. The Corporation often hedges
the counterp arty spread risk in CVA with CDS. The Corporation
hedges other market risks in both CVA and DVA primarily with
foreign exchange and interest rate swaps. In certain instances,
the net-of-hedge amounts in the table below move in the same
direction as the gross amount or may move in the opposite
direction. This movement is a consequence of the complex
interaction of the risks being hedged, resulting  in limitations in
the ability to perfectly hedge all of the market exposures at all
times.
The table below presents CVA, DVA and FVA gains (losses)
on derivatives, which are recorded in market making and similar
activities, on a gross and net of hedge basis for 2019 , 2018  and
2017 . CVA gains reduce the cumulative CVA thereby increasing
the derivative assets balance. DVA gains  increase the
cumulative DVA thereby decreasing the derivative liabilities
balance. CVA and DVA losses have the opposite impact. FVA
gains related to derivative assets reduce the cumulative FVA
thereby increasing the derivative assets balance. FVA gains
related to derivative liabilities increase the cumulative FVA
thereby decreasing the derivative liabilities balance. FVA losses
have the opposite impact.
Valuation Adjustments Gains (Losses) on Derivatives
(1)
 Gross Net Gross Net Gross Net
 2019 2018  2017
Derivative assets (CVA)$ 72$45 $ 77$187 $330$98
Derivative
assets/liabilities (FVA) (2) 46 (15) 14 160 178
Derivative liabilities
(DVA) (147)(135) (19) (55) (324)(281)
(1) At December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, cumulative CVA reduced the deriv ative assets balance
by $528 million , $600 million  and $677 million , cumulative FVA reduced the net derivatives
balance by $153 million , $151 million  and $136 million , and cumulative DVA reduced the
derivative liabilities balance by $285 million , $432 million  and $450 million , respectively .
  Bank of America    108
NOTE 4  Securities
The table below presen ts the amortized cost, gross unrealized gains and losses, and fair value  of AFS debt securities, other debt
securities carried at fair value and HTM debt securities at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
Debt Securities   
 Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
Losses Fair
Value
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Available-for-sale debt securities    
Mortgage-backed securities:     
Agency $121,698 $ 1,013 $ (183) $122,528
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 4,587 78 (24) 4,641
Commercial 14,797 249 (25) 15,021
Non-agency residential (1) 948 138 (9) 1,077
Total mortgage-backed securities 142,030 1,478 (241) 143,267
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 67,700 1,023 (195) 68,528
Non-U.S. securities 11,987 6 (2) 11,991
Other taxable securities, substantially all asset-backed securities 3,874 67 — 3,941
Total taxable securities 225,591 2,574 (438) 227,727
Tax-exempt securities 17,716 202 (6) 17,912
Total available-for-sale debt securities 243,307 2,776 (444) 245,639
Other debt securities carried at fair value (2) 10,596 255 (23) 10,828
Total debt securities carried at fair value 253,903 3,031 (467) 256,467
Held-to-maturity debt securities, substantially all U.S. agency mortgage-backed securities 215,730 4,433 (342) 219,821
Total debt securities (3, 4) $469,633 $ 7,464 $ (809) $476,288
 December 31, 2018
Available-for-sale debt securities    
Mortgage-backed securities:      
Agency $125,116 $ 138 $ (3,428) $121,826
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 5,621 19 (110) 5,530
Commercial 14,469 11 (402) 14,078
Non-agency residential (1) 1,792 136 (11) 1,917
Total mortgage-backed securities 146,998 304 (3,951) 143,351
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 56,239 62 (1,378) 54,923
Non-U.S. securities 9,307 5 (6) 9,306
Other taxable securities, substantially all asset-backed securities 4,387 29 (6) 4,410
Total taxable securities 216,931 400 (5,341) 211,990
Tax-exempt securities 17,349 99 (72) 17,376
Total available-for-sale debt securities 234,280 499 (5,413) 229,366
Other debt securities carried at fair value (2) 8,595 172 (32) 8,735
Total debt securities carried at fair value 242,875 671 (5,445) 238,101
Held-to-maturity debt securities, substantially all U.S. agency mortgage-backed securities 203,652 747 (3,964) 200,435
Total debt securities (3, 4) $446,527 $ 1,418 $ (9,409) $438,536
(1) At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the underlying collateral type included approximately 49 percent  and 68 percent  prime, six percent  and four percent  Alt-A  and 45 percent  and 28 percent  subprime.
(2) Primarily includes non-U.S. securitie s used to satisfy certain internationa l regulatory requirements. Any changes in value are reported in other income. For detail on the components, see Note 21 –
Fair V alue Measurements .
(3) Includes securities pledged as collateral of $67.0 billion  and $40.6 billion  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(4) The Corporation held debt securities  from FNMA  and FHLMC that each exceeded 10 percent of shareholders’  equity , with an amortized cost of $157.2  billion and $54.1 billion, and a fair value of
$160.6  billion  and $55.1 billion  at December 31, 2019 , and an amortized cost of $161.2  billion  and $52.2 billion , and a fair value of $158.5  billion  and $51.4 billion  at December 31, 2018 .
At December 31, 2019 , the accumulated net unrealized gain
on AFS debt securities , excluding the amount related to debt
securities previously transferred to held to maturity , included in
accumulated OCI was $1.8 billion, net of the related income tax
expense  of $569 millio n. The Corpo ration had nonperforming
AFS debt securities of $9 millio n and $11 millio n at December
31, 2019  and 2018 .
At December 31, 2019 , the Corporation held equity securities
at an aggregate fair value of $891 million  and other equity
securities, as valued under the measurement alternative, at cost
of $183 million , both of which are included in other assets. At
December 31, 2019 , the Corporation also held equity securities
at fair value of $1.0 billion included in time deposi ts placed and
other short-term investments. The gross realized gains and losses on sales of AFS debt
securities for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  are presen ted in the table
below .
Gains and Losses on Sales of AFS Debt Securities
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Gross gains $ 336 $ 169 $ 352
Gross losses (119) (15) (97)
Net gains on sales of AFS debt
securities $ 217 $ 154 $ 255
Income tax expense attributable to
realized net gains on sales of AFS debt
securities $ 54 $ 37 $ 97
109     Bank of America
 
The table below presents the fair value and the associated gross unrealized losses on AFS debt securities and whether these
securities have had gross unrealized losses for less than 12 months or for 12 months or longer at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Temporarily Impaired and Other-than-temporarily Impaired AFS Debt Securities    
 Less than Twelve Months Twelve Months or Longer Total
 Fair
Value Gross
Unrealized
Losses Fair
ValueGross
Unrealized
Losses Fair
ValueGross
Unrealized
Losses
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Temporarily impaired AFS debt securities       
Mortgage-backed securities:        
Agency $17,641 $ (41) $17,238 $ (142) $34,879 $ (183)
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 255 (1) 925 (23) 1,180 (24)
Commercial 2,180 (22) 442 (3) 2,622 (25)
Non-agency residential 19 (1) 1 — 20 (1)
Total mortgage-backed securities 20,095 (65) 18,606 (168) 38,701 (233)
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 12,836 (71) 18,866 (124) 31,702 (195)
Non-U.S. securities 851 — 837 (2) 1,688 (2)
Other taxable securities, substantially all asset-backed securities 938 — 222 — 1,160 —
Total taxable securities 34,720 (136) 38,531 (294) 73,251 (430)
Tax-exempt securities 4,286 (5) 190 (1) 4,476 (6)
Total temporarily impaired AFS debt securities 39,006 (141) 38,721 (295) 77,727 (436)
Other-than-temporarily impaired AFS debt securities (1)          
Non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities
103 (5) 21 (3) 124 (8)
Total temporarily impaired and other-than-temporarily impaired
AFS debt securities $39,109 $ (146) $38,742 $ (298) $77,851 $ (444)
 December 31, 2018
Temporarily impaired AFS debt securities          
Mortgage-backed securities:          
Agency $14,771 $ (49) $99,211 $ (3,379) $113,982 $ (3,428)
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 3 — 4,452 (110) 4,455 (110)
Commercial 1,344 (8) 11,991 (394) 13,335 (402)
Non-agency residential 106 (8) 49 (3) 155 (11)
Total mortgage-backed securities 16,224 (65) 115,703 (3,886) 131,927 (3,951)
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 288 (1) 51,374 (1,377) 51,662 (1,378)
Non-U.S. securities 773 (5) 21 (1) 794 (6)
Other taxable securities, substantially all asset-backed securities 183 (1) 185 (5) 368 (6)
Total taxable securities 17,468 (72) 167,283 (5,269) 184,751 (5,341)
Tax-exempt securities 232 (2) 2,148 (70) 2,380 (72)
Total temporarily impaired AFS debt securities 17,700 (74) 169,431 (5,339) 187,131 (5,413)
Other-than-temporarily impaired AFS debt securities (1)          
Non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities 131 — 3 — 134 —
Total temporarily impaired and other-than-temporarily impaired
AFS debt securities $17,831 $ (74) $169,434 $ (5,339) $187,265 $ (5,413)
(1) Includes other-than-temporarily impaired AFS debt securities on which an OTTI loss, primarily related to changes in interest rates, remains in accumulated OCI.
In 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , the Corpora tion had $24 million , $33
million  and $41 million , respectively , of credit-related OTTI losses
on AFS debt securities which were recognized in other income.
The amount of non-credit related OTTI losses for these AFS debt
securities, which is recognized in OCI, was not significant for all
periods presented.
The cumulative OTTI credit losses recognized in income on
AFS debt securities that the Corporation does not intend to sell
were $85 million , $120 million  and $274 million  at December 31,
2019 , 2018  and 2017 , respectively .
The Corporation estimates the portion of a loss on a security
that is attributable to credit using a discounted cash flow model
and estimates the expected cash flows of the underlying
collateral using internal credit, interest rate and prepayment risk
models that incorporate management’ s best estimate of current
key assumptions such as default rates, loss severity and prepayment
rates. Assumptions used for the underlying loans  that support the
MBS can vary widely from loan to loan and are influenced by
such factors as loan interest rate, geographic location of the
borrower , borrower characteristics and collateral type. Based on
these assum ptions, the Corporation then determines how the
underlying collateral cash flows will be distributed to each MBS
issued from the applic able special purpose entity . Expected
principal and interest cash flows on an impaired AFS debt
security are discounted using the effective yield of each
individual impaired AFS debt security .
Significant assumptions used in estimating the expected cash
flows for measuring credit losses on non-ag ency residential
mortgage-backed secu rities (RMBS) were as follows at
December 31, 2019 .
  Bank of America    110
Significant Assumptions
  Range (1)
 Weighted
average10th
Percentile (2) 90th
Percentile (2)
Prepayment speed 16.6% 5.5% 27.8%
Loss severity 14.7 8.0 30.7
Life default rate 11.9 1.0 36.5
(1) Represents the range of inputs/assumptions based upon the underlying collateral.
(2) The value of a variable below which the indicated percentile of observations will fall.
Annual cons tant prepay ment speed and loss severity rates
are projecte d considerin g collateral characteristics such as LTV,
creditworthiness of borrowers as measured using Fair Isaac
Corporation (FICO) scores, and geographic concentrations. The
weighted-average severity by collateral type was 12.9 percent  for
prime, 11.1 percent  for Alt-A  and 18.8 percent  for subprime at
December 31, 2019 . Default rates are projected by considering
collateral characteristics including, but not limited to, LTV, FICO
and geographic concentration. Weighted-aver age life default
rates by collateral  type were 7.8 percent  for prime, 11.6 percent  for Alt-
A and 13.6 percent  for subprime at December 31, 2019 .
The remaining contractual maturity distribution and yields of
the Corporation’ s debt securities carried at fair value and HTM
debt securities at December 31, 2019  are summa rized in the
table below . Actual duration and yields may differ as
prepayments on the loans underlying the mortgages or other
ABS are passed through to the Corporation.
Maturities of Debt Securities Carried at Fair Value and Held-to-maturity Debt Securities
 Due in One
Year or LessDue after One Year
through Five YearsDue after Five Years
through T en YearsDue after
Ten Years  Total
(Dollars in millions) Amount  Yield (1) Amount Yield (1) Amount Yield (1) Amount  Yield (1) Amount Yield (1)
Amortized cost of debt securities carried at fair value              
Mortgage-backed securities:              
Agency $ — —% $ 11 5.25% $ 66 4.56% $124,618  3.24% $124,695 3.24%
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations — — — — 27 2.48 4,560  3.16  4,587 3.16
Commercial — — 3,806 2.37 10,136 2.57 868 2.99  14,810 2.54
Non-agency residential — — — — 12 — 2,157  9.26  2,169 9.22
Total mortgage-backed securities — — 3,817 2.38 10,241 2.58 132,203  3.33  146,261 3.25
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 1,350  0.92 35,544 1.67 30,789 2.25 20 2.45  67,703 1.92
Non-U.S. securities 15,648  1.17 2,598 1.03 7 4.17 96 6.74  18,349 1.18
Other taxable securities, substantially all asset-backed
securities 1,189  2.80 1,650 3.02 440 3.32 595 2.91  3,874 2.97
Total taxable securities 18,187  1.26 43,609 1.74 41,477 2.34 132,914  3.34  236,187 2.70
Tax-exempt securities 2,189  1.72 7,472 2.10 4,849 2.06 3,206  2.44  17,716 2.10
Total amortized cost of debt securities
carried at fair value $20,376  1.31 $51,081 1.79 $46,326 2.31 $136,120  3.32  $253,903 2.67
Amortized cost of HTM debt securities  (2) $1,025  2.83 $ 48 3.57 $1,102 2.57 $213,555  3.19  $215,730 3.19
Debt securities carried at fair value              
Mortgage-backed securities:              
Agency $ —  $ 11  $ 71  $125,449    $125,531  
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations —  —  26  4,615    4,641  
Commercial —  3,854  10,287  893   15,034  
Non-agency residential —  —  25  2,386    2,411  
Total mortgage-backed securities —  3,865  10,409  133,343   147,617  
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 1,347   35,686  31,478  20  68,531  
Non-U.S. securities 15,751   2,606  8  98   18,463  
Other taxable securities, substantially all asset-backed
securities 1,196   1,687  465  596   3,944  
Total taxable securities 18,294   43,844  42,360  134,057    238,555  
Tax-exempt securities 2,192   7,509  4,976  3,235    17,912  
Total debt securities carried at fair value $20,486   $51,353  $47,336  $137,292    $256,467  
Fair value of HTM debt securities (2) $1,025   $ 48 $1,113  $217,635   $219,821  
(1) The weighted-average yield is computed based on a constant effectiv e interest rate over the contractual life of each security . The average  yield considers the contractual coupon and the
amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts, excluding the ef fect of related hedging derivatives.
(2) Substantially all U.S. agency MBS.
111     Bank of America
 
NOTE 5  Outstanding Loans and Leases
The following tables present total outstanding loans and leases and an aging analysis for the Consumer Real Estate, Credit Card
and Other Consumer , and Commercial portfolio segments, by class of financing receivables, at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
 30-59 Days
Past Due (1) 60-89 Days
Past Due (1) 90 Days or
More
Past Due (2) Total Past
Due 30
Days
or More Total
Current or
Less Than
30 Days
Past Due (3)Loans
Accounted for
Under the Fair
Value Option Total
Outstandings
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Consumer real estate             
Core portfolio         
Residential mortgage $ 1,378 $ 261 $ 565 $ 2,204 $223,566  $ 225,770
Home equity 135 70 198 403 34,823  35,226
Non-core portfolio         
Residential mortgage 458 209 1,263 1,930 8,469  10,399
Home equity 34 16 72 122 4,860  4,982
Credit card and other consumer         
Credit card 564 429 1,042 2,035 95,573  97,608
Direct/Indirect consumer (4) 297 85 35 417 90,581  90,998
Other consumer — — — — 192  192
Total consumer 2,866 1,070 3,175 7,111 458,064  465,175
Consumer loans accounted for under the fair value
option (5)          $ 594 594
Total consumer loans and leases 2,866 1,070 3,175 7,111 458,064 594 465,769
Commercial         
U.S. commercial 788 279 371 1,438 305,610  307,048
Non-U.S. commercial 35 23 8 66 104,900  104,966
Commercial real estate (6) 144 19 119 282 62,407  62,689
Commercial lease financing 100 56 39 195 19,685  19,880
U.S. small business commercial 119 56 107 282 15,051  15,333
Total commercial 1,186 433 644 2,263 507,653  509,916
Commercial loans accounted for under the fair value
option (5)          7,741 7,741
Total commercial loans and leases 1,186 433 644 2,263 507,653 7,741 517,657
Total loans and leases (7) $ 4,052 $ 1,503 $ 3,819 $ 9,374 $965,717 $ 8,335 $ 983,426
Percentage of outstandings 0.41% 0.15% 0.39% 0.95% 98.20% 0.85% 100.00%
(1) Consumer real estate loans 30-59 days past due includes fully-insured loans of $517 million  and nonperformin g loans of $139 million . Consum er real estate loans 60-89 days past due includes fully-
insured loans of $206 million  and nonperforming loans of $114 million .
(2) Consumer real estate includes fully-insured loans of $1.1 billion .
(3) Consumer real estate includes $856 million  and direct/indirect consumer includes $45 million  of nonperforming loans.
(4) Total outstandings primarily includes auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $50.4 billion , U.S. securities-based lending loans of $36.7 billion  and non-U.S. consumer loans of $2.8 billion .
(5) Consumer loans accounted for unde r the fair value option includes residential mortgage loans of $257 milli on and home equity loans of $337 milli on. Commercial loans accounted for under the fair
value option includes U.S. commercial loans of $4.7 billion  and non-U.S. commercial loans of $3.1 billion . For more informa tion, see Note 21 – Fair Value Measurements  and Note 22 – Fair Value
Option .
(6) Total outstandings includes U.S. commercial real estate loans of $59.0 billion  and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $3.7 billion .
(7) Total outstandings  includes loans and leases pledged as collateral of $25.9 billion . The Corporation also pledged $168.2  billion  of loans with no related outstanding borrowings to secure potential
borrowing capacity with the Federal Reserve Bank and Federal Home Loan Bank.
  Bank of America    112
 30-59 Days
Past Due (1)60-89 Days
Past Due (1)90 Days or
More
Past Due (2) Total Past
Due 30 Days
or MoreTotal
Current or
Less Than
30 Days
Past Due (3) Loans
Accounted
for Under
the Fair
Value OptionTotal
Outstandings
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2018
Consumer real estate         
Core portfolio       
Residential mortgage $ 1,188 $ 249 $ 793 $ 2,230 $191,465  $ 193,695
Home equity 200 85 387 672 39,338  40,010
Non-core portfolio          
Residential mortgage 757 309 2,201 3,267 11,595  14,862
Home equity 139 69 339 547 7,729  8,276
Credit card and other consumer          
Credit card 577 418 994 1,989 96,349  98,338
Direct/Indirect consumer (4) 317 90 40 447 90,719  91,166
Other consumer (5) — — — — 202  202
Total consumer 3,178 1,220 4,754 9,152 437,397 446,549
Consumer loans accounted for under the fair value
option (6)      $ 682 682
Total consumer loans and leases 3,178 1,220 4,754 9,152 437,397 682 447,231
Commercial          
U.S. commercial 594 232 573 1,399 297,878  299,277
Non-U.S. commercial 1 49 — 50 98,726  98,776
Commercial real estate (7) 29 16 14 59 60,786  60,845
Commercial lease financing 124 114 37 275 22,259  22,534
U.S. small business commercial 83 54 96 233 14,332  14,565
Total commercial 831 465 720 2,016 493,981  495,997
Commercial loans accounted for under the fair value
option (6)      3,667 3,667
Total commercial loans and leases 831 465 720 2,016 493,981 3,667 499,664
Total loans and leases (8) $ 4,009 $ 1,685 $ 5,474 $11,168 $931,378 $ 4,349 $ 946,895
Percentage of outstandings 0.42% 0.18% 0.58% 1.18% 98.36% 0.46% 100.00%
(1) Consumer real estate loans 30-59 days past due includes fully-insured loans of $637 million  and nonperformin g loans of $217 million . Consum er real estate loans 60-89 days past due includes fully-
insured loans of $269 million  and nonperforming loans of $146 million .
(2) Consumer real estate includes fully-insured loans of $1.9 billion .
(3) Consumer real estate includes $1.8 billion  and direct/indirect consumer includes $53 million  of nonperforming loans.
(4) Total outstandings primarily includes auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $50.1 billion , U.S. securities-based lending loans of $37.0 billion  and non-U.S. consumer loans of $2.9 billion .
(5) Substantially all of other consumer is consumer overdrafts.
(6) Consumer loans accounted for unde r the fair value option includes residential mortgage loans of $336 milli on and home equity loans of $346 milli on. Commercial loans accounted for under the fair
value option includes U.S. commercial loans of $2.5 billion  and non-U.S. commercial loans of $1.1 billion . For more informa tion, see Note 21 – Fair Value Measurements  and Note 22 – Fair Value
Option .
(7) Total outstandings includes U.S. commercial real estate loans of $56.6 billion  and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $4.2 billion .
(8) Total outstandings  includes loans and leases pledged as collateral of $36.7 billion . The Corporation also pledged $166.1  billion  of loans with no related outstanding borrowings to secure potential
borrowing capacity with the Federal Reserve Bank and Federal Home Loan Bank.
The Corporation categorizes consumer real estate loans as
core and non-core based on loan and customer characteristics
such as origination date, product type, LTV, FICO score and
delinquency status consistent with its current  consumer and
mortgage servicing strategy . Generally , loans that were
originated after January 1, 2010, qualified under government-
sponsored enterprise (GSE) underwriting guidelines, or
otherwise met the Corporation’ s underwriting guidelines in place
in 2015 are characteriz ed as core loans. All other loans are
generally characterized as non-core loans and represent runof f
portfolios.
The Corporation has entered into long-term credit protection
agreements with FNMA  and FHLMC on loans totaling $7.5 billion
and $6.1 billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018 , providing full
credit protection on residential mortgage loans that become severely delinquent. All of these loans are individually insured
and therefore the Corpo ration does not record an allowance for
credit losses related to these loans.
During 2019 , the Corporation sold $4.7 billion  of consumer
real estate compared to $11.6 billion  in 2018 .
Nonperforming Loans and Leases
The Corporation classifies consumer real estate loans that have
been discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy and not reaffirmed by
the borrower as TDRs, irrespective of payment history or
delinquency status, even if the repayment terms for the loans
have not been otherwise modified. The Corporation continues to
have a lien on the underlying collateral.
113     Bank of America
 
The table below present s the Corporation’ s nonperforming loans and leases including nonperforming TDRs, and loans accruing
past due 90 days or more at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Nonperforming LHFS are excluded from nonperforming loans and leases
as they are recorded at either fair value or the lower of cost or fair value. For more information on the criteria for classification as
nonperforming, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles .
Credit Quality  
 Nonperforming Loans
and Leases  Accruing Past Due
90 Days or More
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  2019 2018
Consumer real estate       
Core portfolio      
Residential mortgage (1) $ 883 $ 1,010 $ 176 $ 274
Home equity 363 955 — —
Non-core portfolio       
Residential mortgage (1) 587 883 912 1,610
Home equity 173 938 — —
Credit card and other consumer       
Credit card n/a n/a 1,042 994
Direct/Indirect consumer 47 56 33 38
Total consumer 2,053 3,842 2,163 2,916
Commercial       
U.S. commercial 1,094 794 106 197
Non-U.S. commercial 43 80 8 —
Commercial real estate 280 156 19 4
Commercial lease financing 32 18 20 29
U.S. small business commercial 50 54 97 84
Total commercial 1,499 1,102 250 314
Total loans and leases $ 3,552 $ 4,944 $ 2,413 $ 3,230
(1) Residential mortga ge loans in the core and non-core portfolios accruing past due 90 days or more are fully-insured loans. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, resident ial mortg age includes $740 million
and $1.4 billion  of loans on which  interest has been curtailed by the FHA and therefore are no longer accruing interest, although principal is still insured, and $348 milli on and $498 milli on of loans on
which interest is still accruing.
n/a = not applicable
Credit Quality Indicators
The Corporation monitors credit quality within its Consumer Real
Estate, Credit Card and Other Consumer , and Commercial
portfolio segments based on primary credit quality indicators. For
more information on the portfolio segments, see Note 1 –
Summary of Significant Accounting Principles . Within the
Consumer Real Estate portfolio segment, the primary credit
quality indicators are refreshed LTV and refreshed FICO score.
Refreshed LTV measures the carrying value of the loan as a
percentage of the value of the property securing the loan,
refreshed quarterly . Home equity loans are evaluated using
CLTV which measures the carrying value of the Corporation’ s
loan and available line of credit combined with any outstanding
senior liens against the property as a percentag e of the value of
the property securing the loan, refreshed quarterly . FICO score
measures the creditworthiness of the borrower based on the
financial obligations of the borrower and the borrower ’s credit
history . FICO scores are typically refreshed quarterly or more
frequently . Certain borrowers (e.g., borrowers that have had
debts discharged in a bankruptcy proceeding) may not have their
FICO scores updated. FICO scores are also a primary credit quality
indicator for the Credit Card and Other Consumer portfolio
segment and the business card portfolio within U.S. small
business commercial. Within the Commercial portfolio segment,
loans are evaluated using the internal classifications of pass
rated or reservable criticized as the primary credit quality
indicators. The term reservable criticized refers to those
commercial loans that are internally classified or listed by the
Corporation as Special Mention, Substandard or Doubtful, which
are asset quality categories defined by regula tory authorities.
These assets have an elevated level of risk and may have a high
probability of default or total loss. Pass rated refers to all loans
not considered reservable criticized. In addition to these primary
credit quality indicators, the Corporation uses other credit quality
indicators for certain types of loans.
The followin g tables present certain credit quality indicators
for the Corporation's Consumer Real Estate, Credit Card and
Other Consumer , and Commercial portfolio segments, by class
of financing receivables, at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
  Bank of America    114
Consumer Real Estate – Credit Quality Indicators (1)
 Core
Residential
MortgageNon-core
Residential
MortgageCore
Home
EquityNon-core
Home
EquityCore
Residential
MortgageNon-core
Residential
MortgageCore
Home
Equity Non-core
Home
Equity
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Refreshed LTV          
Less than or equal to 90 percent $205,357 $ 7,433 $34,733 $ 4,127 $173,911 $ 10,272 $39,246 $ 6,478
Greater than 90 percent but less than or
equal to 100 percent 3,100 273 226 348 2,349 533 354 715
Greater than 100 percent 1,049 267 267 507 817 545 410 1,083
Fully-insured loans (2) 16,264 2,426  16,618 3,512   
Total consumer real estate $225,770 $ 10,399 $35,226 $ 4,982 $193,695 $ 14,862 $40,010 $ 8,276
Refreshed FICO score          
Less than 620 $ 2,127 $ 1,230 $ 751 $ 541 $ 2,125 $ 1,974 $ 1,064 $ 1,503
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than
680 4,821 1,053 1,550 800 4,538 1,719 2,008 1,720
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than
740 26,905 1,981 6,025 1,412 23,841 3,042 7,008 2,188
Greater than or equal to 740 175,653 3,709 26,900 2,229 146,573 4,615 29,930 2,865
Fully-insured loans (2) 16,264 2,426  16,618 3,512   
Total consumer real estate $225,770 $ 10,399 $35,226 $ 4,982 $193,695 $ 14,862 $40,010 $ 8,276
(1) Excludes $594 million  and $682 million  of loans accounted for under the fair value option at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(2) Credit quality indicators are not reported for fully-insured loans as principal repayment is insured.
Credit Card and Other Consumer – Credit Quality Indicators    
 Credit
Card  Direct/Indirect
ConsumerOther
ConsumerCredit
Card  Direct/Indirect
ConsumerOther
Consumer
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Refreshed FICO score       
Less than 620 $ 5,179 $ 1,720 $ 5,016 $ 1,719
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680 12,277 2,734 12,415 3,124
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740 35,301 8,460 35,781 8,921
Greater than or equal to 740 44,851 37,825 45,126 36,709
Other internal credit metrics (1, 2)  40,259 $ 192  40,693 $ 202
Total credit card and other consumer $ 97,608 $ 90,998 $ 192 $ 98,338 $ 91,166 $ 202
(1) Other internal credit metrics may include delinquency status, geography or other factors.
(2) Direct/indirect consumer includes $39.6 billion  and $39.9 billion  of securities-based lending which is overcollateralized and therefore has minimal credit risk at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
Commercial – Credit Quality Indicators (1)   
 U.S.
CommercialNon-U.S.
Commercial Commercial
Real EstateCommercial
Lease
Financing U.S. Small
Business
Commercial (2)
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Risk ratings        
Pass rated $ 299,380 $ 104,051 $ 61,598 $ 19,551 $ 231
Reservable criticized 7,668 915 1,091 329 18
Refreshed FICO score        
Less than 620       308
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680       756
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740       2,267
Greater than or equal to 740       4,607
Other internal credit metrics (3)       7,146
Total commercial $ 307,048 $ 104,966 $ 62,689 $ 19,880 $ 15,333
 December 31, 2018
Risk ratings       
Pass rated $ 291,918 $ 97,916 $ 59,910 $ 22,168 $ 389
Reservable criticized 7,359 860 935 366 29
Refreshed FICO score        
Less than 620       264
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680       684
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740       2,072
Greater than or equal to 740       4,254
Other internal credit metrics (3)       6,873
Total commercial $ 299,277 $ 98,776 $ 60,845 $ 22,534 $ 14,565
(1) Excludes $7.7 billion  and $3.7 billion  of loans accounted for under the fair value option at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
(2) At December 31, 2019 and 2018, U.S. small business commercial includes $715 million  and $731 million  of criticized business card and small business loans which are evaluat ed using refreshed
FICO scores or internal credit metric s, including delinquency status, rather than risk ratings. Refreshed FICO score and other internal credit metrics are applicable only to the U.S. small business
commercial portfolio.
(3) Other internal credit metrics may include delinquency status, application  scores, geography or other factors. At both December 31, 2019 and 2018, 99 percent of the balances where internal credit
metrics are used were current or less than 30 days past due.
115     Bank of America
 
Impaired Loans and Troubled Debt
Restructurings
A loan is considered impaired when, based on current
information, it is probable that the Corporation will be unable to
collect all amounts due from the borrower in accordance with the
contractual terms of the loan. For more information, see Note 1 –
Summary of Significant Accounting Principles .
Consumer Real Estate
Impaired consumer real estate loans within the Consumer Real
Estate portfolio segment consist entirely of TDRs. Most
modifications of consumer real estate loans meet the definition of
TDRs when a binding offer is extended to a borrower .
Modifications of consumer real estate loans are done in
accordance with government programs or the Corporation’ s
proprietary programs. These modifications are considered to be
TDRs if concessions have been granted  to borrowers
experiencing financial difficulties. Concession s may include
reductions in interest rates, capitalization of past due amounts,
principal and/or interest forbearance, payment extensions,
principal and/or interest forgiveness, or combinations thereof.
Prior to permanently modifying a loan, the Corporation may
enter into trial modifications with certain borrowers under both
government and proprietary programs. Trial modifications
generally represent a three- to four-month period during which
the borrower makes monthly payments under the anticipated
modified payment terms. Upon successful completion of the trial
period, the Corporation and the borrower enter into a permanent
modification. Binding trial modifications are classified as TDRs
when the trial offer is made and continue to be classified as
TDRs regardless of whether the borrower enters into a
permanent modification.
Consumer real estate loans of $632 million  that have been
discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy with no change in
repayment terms and not reaffirmed by the borrower were
included in TDRs at December 31, 2019 , of which $101 million
were classified as nonperforming and $275 million  were loans
fully insured by the FHA. For more inform ation on loans
discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy , see Nonperforming Loans
and Leases in this Note.
Consumer real estate TDRs are measured primarily based on
the net present value of the estimated cash flows discounted at
the loan’ s original effective interest rate. If the carrying value of a
TDR exceeds this amou nt, a specific allowance is recorded as a
component of the allowance for loan and lease losses. Alternatively , consumer real estate TDRs that are considered to
be dependent solely on the collateral for repayment (e.g., due to
the lack of income verification) are measured based on the
estimated fair value of the collateral and a charge-of f is recorded
if the carryi ng value exceeds the fair value of the collateral.
Consumer real estate loans that reached 180 days past due prior
to modificati on had been charged off to their net realizable value,
less costs to sell, before they were modifie d as TDRs in
accordance with established policy . Therefore, modifications of
consumer real estate loans that are 180 or more days past due
as TDRs do not have an impact on the allowance for loan and
lease losses nor are additional charge-of fs required at the time of
modification. Subsequent declines in the fair value of the
collateral after a loan has reached 180 days past due are
recorded as charge-of fs. Fully-insured loans  are protected
against principal loss, and therefore, the Corporation does not
record an allowance for loan and lease losses on the outstanding
principal balance, even after they have been modified in a TDR.
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , remaining commitments to
lend additional funds to debtors whose terms have been
modified in a consume r real estate TDR were not significant.
Consumer real estate foreclosed properties totaled $229 million
and $244 million  at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . The carryin g
value of consumer real estate loans, includ ing fully-insured
loans, for which formal foreclosure proceedings were in process
at December 31, 2019  was $1.6 billion. Durin g 2019  and 2018 ,
the Corporation reclassified $611 million  and $670 million  of
consumer real estate loans to foreclosed properties or, for
properties acquired upon foreclosure of certain government-
guaranteed loans (principally FHA-insured loans), to other
assets. The reclassifications represent non-cash investing
activities and, accordingly , are not reflected in the Consolidated
Statement of Cash Flows.
The followin g table provides the unpaid princ ipal balance,
carrying value and related allowance at December 31, 2019  and
2018  and the average carrying value and interest income
recognized in 2019 , 2018  and 2017  for impaired loans in the
Corporation’ s Consumer Real Estate portfolio segment. Certain
impaired consumer real estate loans do not have a related
allowance as the current valuation of these impaired loans
exceeded the carrying value, which is net of previously recorded
charge-of fs.
  Bank of America    116
Impaired Loans – Consumer Real Estate  
   Unpaid
Principal
Balance Carrying
ValueRelated
Allowance Unpaid
Principal
Balance Carrying
Value  Related
Allowance
(Dollars in millions)   December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
With no recorded allowance            
Residential mortgage   $ 4,224 $ 3,354 $ — $ 5,396 $ 4,268 $ —
Home equity   1,176 706 — 2,948 1,599 —
With an allowance recorded           
Residential mortgage   $ 1,426 $ 1,399 $ 70 $ 1,977 $ 1,929 $ 114
Home equity   543 523 69 812 760 144
Total             
Residential mortgage   $ 5,650 $ 4,753 $ 70 $ 7,373 $ 6,197 $ 114
Home equity   1,719 1,229 69 3,760 2,359 144
         
   Average
Carrying
Value  Interest
Income
Recognized
(1)Average
Carrying
Value  Interest
Income
Recognized
(1)  Average
Carrying
Value  Interest
Income
Recognized (1)
   2019 2018  2017
With no recorded allowance         
Residential mortgage   $ 3,831 $ 155 $ 5,424 $ 207 $ 7,737 $ 311
Home equity   1,221 76 1,894 105 1,997 109
With an allowance recorded         
Residential mortgage   $ 1,635 $ 62 $ 2,409 $ 91 $ 3,414 $ 123
Home equity   637 22 861 25 858 24
Total         
Residential mortgage   $ 5,466 $ 217 $ 7,833 $ 298 $ 11,151 $ 434
Home equity   1,858 98 2,755 130 2,855 133
(1) Interest income recognized includes interest accrued and collected on the outstanding balances of accruing impaired loans as well as interest cash collections on nonaccruing impaired loans for
which the principal is considered collectible.
The table below presents the December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017  unpaid principal balance, carrying value, and average pre- and
post-modification interes t rates of consumer real estate loans that were modified in TDRs during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 . The following
Consumer Real Estate portfolio segment tables include loans that were initially classified as TDRs during the period and also loans
that had previously been classified as TDRs and were modified again during the period.
Consumer Real Estate – TDRs Entered into During 2019, 2018 and 2017
      Unpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
Value  Pre-
Modification
Interest RatePost-
Modification
Interest Rate (1)
(Dollars in millions)  December 31, 2019
Residential
mortgage      $ 464 $ 377 4.19% 4.13%
Home equity      141 101 5.04 4.31
Total      $ 605 $ 478 4.39 4.17
  December 31, 2018
Residential
mortgage      $ 774 $ 641 4.33% 4.21%
Home equity      489 358 4.46 3.74
Total      $ 1,263 $ 999 4.38 4.03
  December 31, 2017
Residential
mortgage      $ 824 $ 712 4.43% 4.16%
Home equity      764 590 4.22 3.49
Total      $ 1,588 $ 1,302 4.33 3.83
(1) The post-modification interest rate reflects the interest rate applicable only to permanently completed modifications, which exclude loans that are in a trial modification period.
117     Bank of America
 
The table below presents the December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017  carrying value for consumer real estate loans  that were
modified in a TDR during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , by type of modification.
Consumer Real Estate – Modification Programs   
 TDRs Entered into During
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Modifications under government programs (1) $ 35 $ 61 $ 85
Modifications under proprietary programs (1) 174 523 437
Loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy (2) 68 130 211
Trial modifications 201 285 569
Total modifications $ 478 $ 999 $ 1,302
(1) Includes other modifications such as term or payment extensions and repayment plans. During 2018, this included $198 million  of modifications that met the definiti on of a TDR related to the 2017
hurricanes; there were no such modifications in 2019 or 2017. These modifications were written down to their net realizable value less costs to sell or were fully insured as of December 31, 2018.
(2) Includes loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy with no change in repayment terms that are classified as TDRs.
The table below presents the carrying value of consumer real estate loans that entered into payment default during 2019 , 2018
and 2017  that were modified in a TDR during the 12 mont hs preceding payment default. A payment default for consumer real estate
TDRs is recognized when a borrower has missed three  monthly payments (not necessarily consecutively) since modification.
Consumer Real Estate – TDRs Entering Payment Default that were Modified During the Preceding 12 Months
(Dollars in millions)  2019 2018 2017
Modifications under government programs  $ 26 $ 39 $ 81
Modifications under proprietary programs  88 158 138
Loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy (1)  30 64 116
Trial modifications (2)  57 107 391
Total modifications  $ 201 $ 368 $ 726
(1) Includes loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy with no change in repayment terms that are classified as TDRs.
(2) Includes trial modification of fers to which the customer did not respond.
Credit Card and Other Consumer
Impaired loans within the Credit Card and Other Consumer
portfolio segment consist entirely of loans that have been
modified in TDRs. The Corporation seeks to assist customers
that are experiencing financial difficulty by modifying loans while
ensuring compliance with federal and local laws and guidelines.
Credit card and other consumer loan modifications generally
involve reducing the interest rate on the account, placing the
customer on a fixed payment plan not exceeding  60 months and
canceling the customer ’s available line of credit, all of which are
considered TDRs. The Corporation makes loan modifications
directly with borrowers for debt held only by the Corporation
(internal programs). Additionally , the Corporation makes loan
modifications for borrowers working with third-party renegotiation
agencies that provide solutions to customers’  entire unsecured debt structures
(external programs). The Corporation classifies other secured
consumer loans that have been discharged in Chapter 7
bankruptcy as TDRs which are written down to collateral value
and placed on nonacc rual status no later than the time of
discharge. For more information on the regulatory guidance on
loans discha rged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy , see Nonperforming
Loans and Leases in this Note.
The followin g table provides the unpaid princ ipal balance,
carrying value and related allowance at December 31, 2019  and
2018  and the average carryin g value for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  on
TDRs within the Credit Card and Other Consumer portfolio
segment.
Impaired Loans – Credit Card and Other Consumer     
  Unpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
Value (1)Related
Allowance Unpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
Value (1) Related
Allowance 
   Average Carrying Value (2)
(Dollars in millions)  December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018 2019 2018 2017
With no recorded allowance          
Direct/Indirect consumer $ 73 $ 32 $ — $ 72 $ 33 $ — $ 33 $ 30 $ 21
With an allowance recorded            
Credit card (3)  $ 633 $ 647 $ 188 $ 522 $ 533 $ 154 $ 594 $ 491 $ 511
(1) Includes accrued interest and fees.
(2) The related interest income recognized, which includes interest accrued and collected on the outstanding balances of accruing impaired loans as well as interest cash collections on nonaccruing
impaired loans for which the principal was considered collectible, was not significant in 2019, 2018 and 2017.
(3) The average carrying value in 2017 includes $47 million  related to the non-U.S. credit card portfolio, which was sold in the second quarter of 2017.
  Bank of America    118
The table below provides information on the Corporation’ s primary modification programs for the Credit Card and Other
Consumer TDR portfolio at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Credit Card and Other Consumer – TDRs by Program Type at December 31
 Credit Card Direct/Indirect Consumer Total TDRs by Program Type
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2019  2018  2019 2018
Internal programs $ 339 $ 259 $ — $ — $ 339 $ 259
External programs 308 273 — — 308 273
Other — 1 32 33 32 34
Total $ 647 $ 533 $ 32 $ 33 $ 679 $ 566
Percent of balances current or less than 30 days past
due 85% 85% 78% 81% 84% 85%
The table below provides information on the Corporation’ s Credit Card and Other Consumer TDR portfolio including the
December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017  unpaid principal balanc e, carrying value, and average pre- and post-modification interest rates
of loans that were modified in TDRs during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
Credit Card and Other Consumer – TDRs Entered into During 2019, 2018 and 2017
     Unpaid
Principal
Balance Carrying
Value (1) Pre-
Modification
Interest RatePost-
Modification
Interest Rate
(Dollars in millions)  December 31, 2019
Credit card     $ 340 $ 355 19.18% 5.35%
Direct/Indirect consumer    40 21 5.23 5.21
Total     $ 380 $ 376 18.42 5.34
  December 31, 2018
Credit card     $ 278 $ 292 19.49% 5.24%
Direct/Indirect consumer    42 23 5.10 4.95
Total     $ 320 $ 315 18.45 5.22
     December 31, 2017
Credit card    $ 203 $ 213 18.47% 5.32%
Non-U.S. credit card     37 22 4.81 4.30
Total     $ 240 $ 235 17.17 5.22
(1) Includes accrued interest and fees.
Credit card and other consumer loans are deemed to be in
payment default during the quarter in which a borrower misses
the second of two consecutive payments. Payment defaults are
one of the factors considered when projecting future cash flows
in the calculation of the allowance for loan and lease losses for
impaired credit card and other consumer loans. Based on
historical experience, the Corporation estimates that 14 percent
of new credit card TDRs and 20 percent of new direct/indirect
consumer TDRs may be in payment default within 12 mont hs
after modification.
Commercial Loans
Impaired commercial loans include nonperforming loans and
TDRs (both performing and nonperforming). Modifications of
loans to commercial borrowers that are exper iencing financial
difficulty are designed to reduce the Corporation’ s loss exposure
while provid ing the borrower with an opportunity to work through
financial difficulties, often to avoid foreclosure  or bankruptcy .
Each modification is unique and reflects the individual
circumstances of the borrower . Modifications that result in a TDR
may include extensions of maturity at a concessionary (below
market) rate of interest, payment forbearances or other actions
designed to benefit the customer while mitigating the
Corporation’ s risk exposure. Reductions in interest rates are
rare. Instead, the interest rates are typically increased, although
the increase d rate may not represent a market  rate of interest.
Infrequently ,
concessions may also include principal forgiveness in connection with foreclosure, short sale or other settlem ent agreements
leading to termination or sale of the loan.
At the time of restructuring, the loans are remeasured to
reflect the impact, if any, on projected cash flows resulting from
the modified terms. If there was no forgiveness of principal and
the interest rate was not decreased, the modific ation may have
little or no impact on the allowance established for the loan. If a
portion of the loan is deemed to be uncollectib le, a charge-of f
may be recorded at the time of restructuring.  Alternatively , a
charge-of f may have already been recorded in a previous period
such that no charge-of f is required at the time of modification.
For more information on modifications for the U.S. small
business commercial portfolio, see Credit Card and Other
Consumer in this Note.
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , remaining commitments to
lend additional funds to debtors whose terms have been
modified in a commercia l loan TDR were $445 million and $297
million . The balance of commercial TDRs in payment default was
not significant at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
The table below provides  information on impaire d loans in the
Commercial loan portfolio segment including the unpaid principal
balance, carrying value and related allowance at December 31,
2019  and 2018 , and the average carrying value for 2019 , 2018
and 2017 . Certain impaired commercial loans do not have a
related allowance because the valuation of these impaired loans
exceeded the carrying value, which is net of previously recorded
charge-of fs.
119     Bank of America
 
Impaired Loans – Commercial      
 Unpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
ValueRelated
AllowanceUnpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
Value 
Related
Allowance  
  Average Carrying V alue (1)
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018 2019  2018  2017
With no recorded allowance           
U.S. commercial $ 534 $ 520 $ — $ 638 $ 616 $ — $ 635 $ 655 $ 772
Non-U.S. commercial 123 123 — 93 93 — 79 43 46
Commercial real estate 67 58 — — — — 96 44 69
Commercial lease financing 12 12 — — — — 5 3 —
With an allowance recorded          
U.S. commercial $ 1,776 $ 1,574 $ 216 $ 1,437 $ 1,270  $ 121 $ 1,316  $ 1,162  $ 1,260
Non-U.S. commercial 113 113 9 155 149 30 218 327 463
Commercial real estate 322 236 64 247 162 16 149 46 73
Commercial lease financing 57 51 1 71 71 — 73 42 8
U.S. small business commercial (2) 91 77 30 83 72 29 75 73 73
Total           
U.S. commercial $ 2,310 $ 2,094 $ 216 $ 2,075 $ 1,886  $ 121 $ 1,951  $ 1,817  $ 2,032
Non-U.S. commercial 236 236 9 248 242 30 297 370 509
Commercial real estate 389 294 64 247 162 16 245 90 142
Commercial lease financing 69 63 1 71 71 — 78 45 8
U.S. small business commercial (2) 91 77 30 83 72 29 75 73 73
(1) The related interest income recognized, which includes interest accrued and collected on the outstanding balances of accruing impaired loans as well as interest cash collections on nonaccruing
impaired loans for which the principal was considered collectible, was not significant in 2019, 2018 and 2017.
(2) Includes U.S. small business commercial renegotiated TDR loans and related allowance.
Loans Held-for-sale
The Corpora tion had LHFS of $9.2 billion and $10.4 billion at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Cash and non-cash proceeds from
sales and paydowns of loans originally classified as LHFS were $30.6 billion, $29.2 billion and $41.3 billion for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 ,
respectively . Cash used for originations and purchases of LHFS totaled $28.9 billion, $28.1 billion and $43.5 billion for 2019 , 2018
and 2017 , respectively .
NOTE 6  Allowance for Credit Losses
The table below summarizes the changes in the allowance for credit losses by portfolio segment for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
 Consumer
Real EstateCredit Card and
Other Consumer Commercial Total
(Dollars in millions) 2019
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 928 $ 3,874 $ 4,799 $ 9,601
Loans and leases charged off (522) (4,302) (822) (5,646)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 927 911 160 1,998
Net charge-offs 405 (3,391) (662) (3,648)
Provision for loan and lease losses (680) 3,512 742 3,574
Other (1) (107) 1 (5) (111)
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 546 3,996 4,874 9,416
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 — — 797 797
Provision for unfunded lending commitments — — 16 16
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 — — 813 813
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 546 $ 3,996 $ 5,687 $ 10,229
 2018
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 1,720 $ 3,663 $ 5,010 $ 10,393
Loans and leases charged off (690) (4,037) (675) (5,402)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 664 823 152 1,639
Net charge-offs (26) (3,214) (523) (3,763)
Provision for loan and lease losses (492) 3,441 313 3,262
Other (1) (274) (16) (1) (291)
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 928 3,874 4,799 9,601
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 — — 777 777
Provision for unfunded lending commitments — — 20 20
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 — — 797 797
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 928 $ 3,874 $ 5,596 $ 10,398
 2017
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 2,750 $ 3,229 $ 5,258 $ 11,237
Loans and leases charged off (770) (3,774) (1,075) (5,619)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 657 809 174 1,640
Net charge-offs (113) (2,965) (901) (3,979)
Provision for loan and lease losses (710) 3,437 654 3,381
Other (1) (207) (38) (1) (246)
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 1,720 3,663 5,010 10,393
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 — — 762 762
Provision for unfunded lending commitments — — 15 15
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 — — 777 777
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 1,720 $ 3,663 $ 5,787 $ 11,170
(1) Primarily represents write-of fs of purchased credit-impaired loans, the net impact of portfolio sales, and transfers to LHFS.
  Bank of America    120
The table below presents the allowance and the carrying value of outstanding loans and leases by portfolio segment at December
31, 2019  and 2018 .
 Consumer
Real EstateCredit Card and
Other Consumer Commercial Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Impaired loans and troubled debt restructurings (1)      
Allowance for loan and lease losses $ 139 $ 188 $ 320 $ 647
Carrying value (2) 5,982 679 2,764 9,425
Allowance as a percentage of carrying value 2.32% 27.69% 11.58% 6.86%
Loans collectively evaluated for impairment      
Allowance for loan and lease losses $ 407 $ 3,808 $ 4,554 $ 8,769
Carrying value (2, 3) 270,395 188,119 507,152 965,666
Allowance as a percentage of carrying value (3) 0.15% 2.02% 0.90% 0.91%
Total      
Allowance for loan and lease losses $ 546 $ 3,996 $ 4,874 $ 9,416
Carrying value (2, 3) 276,377 188,798 509,916 975,091
Allowance as a percentage of carrying value (3) 0.20% 2.12% 0.96% 0.97%
 December 31, 2018
Impaired loans and troubled debt restructurings (1)      
Allowance for loan and lease losses $ 258 $ 154 $ 196 $ 608
Carrying value (2) 8,556 566 2,433 11,555
Allowance as a percentage of carrying value 3.02% 27.21% 8.06% 5.26%
Loans collectively evaluated for impairment      
Allowance for loan and lease losses $ 670 $ 3,720 $ 4,603 $ 8,993
Carrying value (2, 3) 248,287 189,140 493,564 930,991
Allowance as a percentage of carrying value (3) 0.27% 1.97% 0.93% 0.97%
Total      
Allowance for loan and lease losses $ 928 $ 3,874 $ 4,799 $ 9,601
Carrying value (2, 3) 256,843 189,706 495,997 942,546
Allowance as a percentage of carrying value (3) 0.36% 2.04% 0.97% 1.02%
(1) Impaired loans include nonperforming commercial loans and leases, as well as all TDRs, including both commercial and consumer TDRs. Impa ired loans exclude nonperforming consumer loans
unless they are TDRs, and all consumer and commercial loans accounted for under the fair value option.
(2) Amounts are presented gross of the allowance for loan and lease losses.
(3) Outstanding loan and lease balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option of $8.3 billion  and $4.3 billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018.
NOTE 7  Securitizations and Other V ariable
Interest Entities
The Corporation utilizes VIEs in the ordinary course of business
to support its own and its customers’  financing and investing
needs. The Corporation  routinely securitizes loans and debt
securities using VIEs as a source of funding for the Corporation
and as a means of transferring the economic risk of the loans or
debt securities to third parties. The assets are transferred into a
trust or other securitization vehicle such that the assets are
legally isolat ed from the creditors of the Corpora tion and are not
available to satisfy its obligations. These assets can only be
used to settle obligations of the trust or other securitization
vehicle. The Corporation also administers, structures or invests
in other VIEs including CDOs, investment vehicles and other
entities. For more inform ation on the Corporation’ s use of VIEs,
see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles .
The tables in this Note  present the assets and liabilities of
consolidated and unconsolidated VIEs at December 31, 2019
and 2018  in situations where the Corporation has continuing
involvement with transferred assets or if the Corporation
otherwise has a variab le interest in the VIE. The tables also
present the Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure at December
31, 2019 and 2018  resulting from its involvement with
consolidated VIEs and unconsolidated VIEs in which the
Corporation holds a variable interest. The Corporation’ s
maximum loss exposure is based on the unlikely event that all of
the assets in the VIEs become worthless and incorporates not
only potential losses associated with assets recorded on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet but also potential losses associated
with off-bala nce sheet commitments, such as unfunded liquidity
commitments and other contractual arrangements. The Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure does
not include losses previo usly recognized through write-downs of
assets.
The Corporation invests in ABS issued by third-party VIEs
with which it has no other form of involvement and enters into
certain commercial lending arrangements that may also
incorporate the use of VIEs, for example to hold collateral. These
securities and loans are included in Note 4 – Securities  or Note 5
– Outstanding Loans and Leases . In addition, the Corporation
has used VIEs in connection with its funding activities.
The Corporation did not provide financial support to
consolidated or unconsolidated VIEs during 2019 , 2018  and
2017  that it was not previous ly contractually required to provide,
nor does it intend to do so.
The Corporation had liquidity commitments, including written
put options  and collateral value guarantees, with certain
unconsolidated VIEs of $1.1 billion  and $218 million  at
December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
First-lien Mortgage Securitizations
As part of its mortgage banking activities, the Corporation
securitizes a portion of the first-lien residential mortgage loans it
originates or purchases from third parties, generally in the form
of RMBS guaranteed by GSEs, FNMA  and FHLMC (collectively
the GSEs), or the Government National Mortgage Association
(GNMA) primarily in the case of FHA-insured and U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs (VA)-guaranteed mortgage loans.
Securitization usually occurs in conjunction with or shortly after
origination or purchase, and the Corporation may also securitize
loans held in its residen tial mortgage portfolio. In addition, the
Corporation may, from time to time, securitize commercial
mortgages it originates
121     Bank of America
 
or purchases from other entities. The Corporation typically
services the loans it securitizes. Further , the Corporation may
retain beneficial interests in the securitization trusts including
senior and subordinate securities and equity tranches issued by
the trusts. Except as described in Note 13 – Commitments and
Contingencies , the Corpora tion does not provide guarantees or recourse to the
securitization trusts other than standard representations and
warranties.
The table below summarizes select informatio n related to
first-lien mortgage securitizations for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
First-lien Mortgage Securitizations      
      
 Residential Mortgage - Agency Commercial Mortgage
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Proceeds from loan sales (1) $6,858 $5,801 $16,161 $8,661 $6,991 $ 5,887
Gains on securitizations (2) 27 62 158 103 101 91
Repurchases from securitization trusts (3) 881 1,485 2,713 — — —
(1) The Corp oration transfers residential mortgage loans to securitizations sponsored primarily by the GSEs or GNMA  in the normal course of business and primarily receives RMBS in exchange.
Substantially all of these securities are classified as Level 2 within the fair value hierarchy and are sold shortly after receipt.
(2) A majorit y of the first-lien residential mortgage loans securitized are initially classified as LHFS and accounted for under the fair value option. Gains recognized on these LHFS prior to
securitization, which totaled $64 million , $71 million  and $243 million , net of hedges, during 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively , are not included in the table above.
(3) The Corp oration may have the option to repurchase delinquent loans out of securitization trusts, which reduces the amount of servicing advance s it is required to make. The Corporation may also
repurchase loans from securitization trusts to perform modifications. Repurchased loans include FHA-insured mortgages collateralizing GNMA  securities.
The Corporation recognizes consumer MSRs from the sale or
securitization of consumer real estate loans. The unpaid principal
balance of loans serviced for investors, including residential
mortgage and home equity loans, totaled $192.1  billion  and
$226.6  billion at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . Servicing fee and
ancillary fee income on serviced loans was $585 million , $710
million  and $893 million  during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 . Servicing
advances on serviced loans, including loans serviced for others
and loans held for investment, were $2.4 billion  and $3.3 billion at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . For more information  on
MSRs, see Note 21 – Fair V alue Measurements .
During 2019 , the Corporation deconsolidated agency
residential mortgage securitization trusts with total assets of $1.2
billion . There were no significant deconsolidations in 2018  or
2017 .
The following table summarizes select information related to
first-lien mortgage securitization trusts in which the Corporation
held a variable interest at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
First-lien Mortgage VIEs     
 Residential Mortgage   
   Non-agency   
 Agency Prime Subprime Alt-A Commercial Mortgage
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Unconsolidated VIEs           
Maximum loss exposure (1)$ 12,554 $ 16,011 $ 340 $ 448 $ 1,622 $ 1,897 $ 98 $ 217 $ 1,036 $ 767
On-balance sheet assets           
Senior securities:           
Trading account assets $ 627 $ 460 $ 5$ 30 $ 54 $ 36 $ 24 $ 90 $ 65 $ 97
Debt securities carried at
fair value 6,392 9,381 193 246 1,178 1,470 72 125 — —
Held-to-maturity
securities 5,535 6,170 — — — — — — 809 528
All other assets — — 2 3 49 37 2 2 38 40
Total retained
positions $ 12,554 $ 16,011 $ 200 $ 279 $ 1,281 $ 1,543 $ 98 $ 217 $ 912 $ 665
Principal balance
outstanding (2) $ 160,226 $ 187,512 $ 7,268 $ 8,954 $ 8,594 $ 8,719 $ 19,878 $ 23,467 $ 60,129 $ 43,593
Consolidated VIEs           
Maximum loss exposure (1)$ 10,857 $ 13,296 $ 5$ 7 $ 44 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 76
On-balance sheet assets           
Trading account assets $ 780 $ 1,318 $ 116 $ 150 $ 149 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 76
Loans and leases, net 9,917 11,858 — — — — — — — —
All other assets 161 143 — — — — — — — —
Total assets $ 10,858 $ 13,319 $ 116 $ 150 $ 149 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 76
Total liabilities $ 4$ 26 $ 111 $ 143 $ 105 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ —
(1) Maximum loss exposure includes obligations under loss-sharing reinsurance and other arrangements for non-agency residential mortgage and commercial mortgage securitizations, but excludes
the reserve for representations and warranties obligations and corporate guarantees and also excludes servicing advances and other servicing rights and obligations. For more information, see
Note 13 – Commitments and Contingencies  and Note 21 – Fair V alue Measurements .
(2) Principal balance outstanding includes loans where the Corporation was the transferor to securitization VIEs with which it has continuing involvement, which may include servicing the loans.
  Bank of America    122
Other Asset-backed Securitizations
The following table summarizes select information related to home equity , credit card and other asset-backed VIEs in which the
Corporation held a variable interest at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Home Equity Loan, Credit Card and Other Asset-backed VIEs    
 Home Equity (1)  Credit Card (2, 3) Resecuritization T rusts Municipal Bond T rusts
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Unconsolidated VIEs         
Maximum loss exposure $ 412 $ 908 $ — $ — $ 7,526 $ 7,647 $ 3,701 $ 2,150
On-balance sheet assets         
Senior securities (4):         
Trading account assets $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 2,188 $ 1,419 $ — $ 26
Debt securities carried at fair value 11 27 — — 1,126 1,337 — —
Held-to-maturity securities — — — — 4,212 4,891 — —
Total retained positions $ 11 $ 27 $ — $ — $ 7,526 $ 7,647 $ — $ 26
Total assets of VIEs (5) $ 1,023 $ 1,813  $ — $ — $ 21,234 $ 16,949 $ 4,395 $ 2,829
Consolidated VIEs         
Maximum loss exposure $ 64 $ 85 $ 17,915 $ 18,800 $ 54 $ 128 $ 2,656 $ 1,540
On-balance sheet assets         
Trading account assets $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 73 $ 366 $ 2,480 $ 1,553
Loans and leases 122 133 26,985 29,906 — — — —
Allowance for loan and lease losses (2) (5) (800) (901) — — — —
All other assets 3 4 119 136 — — 176 1
Total assets $ 123 $ 132 $ 26,304 $ 29,141 $ 73 $ 366 $ 2,656 $ 1,554
On-balance sheet liabilities         
Short-term borrowings $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 2,175 $ 742
Long-term debt 64 55 8,372 10,321 19 238 — 12
All other liabilities — — 17 20 — — — —
Total liabilities $ 64 $ 55 $ 8,389 $ 10,341 $ 19 $ 238 $ 2,175 $ 754
(1) For uncon solidated home equity loan VIEs, the maximum loss exposure includes outstanding trust certificates issued by trusts in rapid amortization, net of recorded reserves. For both consolidated
and unconsolidate d home equity loan VIEs, the maximum loss exposure  excludes the reserve for representations and warranties obligations and corporate guarantees. For more information, see
Note 13 – Commitments and Contingencies .
(2) At December 31, 2019  and 2018, loans and leases in the consolidated credit card trust included $10.5 billion  and $11.0 billion  of seller ’s interest.
(3) At December 31, 2019  and 2018, all other assets in the consolidated credit card trust included unbilled accrued interest and fees.
(4) The retained senior securities were valued using quoted market prices or observable market inputs (Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy).
(5) Total assets of VIEs includes loans the Corporation transferred with which it has continuing involvement, which may include servicing the loan.
Home Equity Loans
The Corpora tion retains  interests, primarily senior securities, in
home equity securitization trusts to which it transferred home
equity loans. In addition , the Corporation may be obligated to
provide subordinate funding to the trusts during a rapid
amortization event. This obligation is included in the maximum
loss exposure in the table above. The charges that will ultimately
be recorded as a result of the rapid amortization events depend
on the undrawn portio n of the home equity lines of credit
(HELOCs), performance of the loans, the amount of subsequent
draws and the timing of related cash flows.
Credit Card Securitizations
The Corpora tion securiti zes originated and purchased credit card
loans. The Corporation’ s continuing involve ment with the
securitization trust includes servicing the receivables, retaining
an undivided interest (seller ’s interest) in the receivables, and
holding certa in retained interests including subordinate interests
in accrued interest and fees on the securitized receivables.
During 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , new senior debt securities
issued to third-party investors from the credit card securitization
trust were $1.3 billion , $4.0 billion  and $3.1 billion , respectively .
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the Corporation held
subordinate securities issued by the credit card securitization
trust with a notional principal amount of $7.4 billion and $7.7
billion . These securities serve as a form of credit enhancement to
the senior debt securities and have a stated interest rate of zero
percent . During 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , the credit card
securitization trust issued $202 million , $650 million  and $500
million , respectively , of these subordinate securities. Resecuritization Trusts
The Corporation transfers securities, typically MBS, into
resecuritization VIEs at the request of customers seeking
securities with specific characteristics. Genera lly, there are no
significant ongoing activities performed in a resecuritization trust,
and no single investor has the unilateral ability to liquidate the
trust.
The Corpora tion resecu ritized $24.4 billion, $22.8 billion and
$25.1 billion  of securities during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 ,
respectively . Securities transferred into resecuritization VIEs
were measu red at fair value with changes in fair value recorded
in market making and similar activities prior to the
resecuritization and, accordingly , no gain or loss on sale was
recorded. During 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , resecuritization
proceeds included securities with an initial fair value of $5.2
billion , $4.1 billion  and $3.3 billion , respectively . Substantially all
of the other securities received as resecuritization proceeds were
classified as trading securities and were categorized as Level 2
within the fair value hierarchy .
Municipal Bond Trusts
The Corporation administers municipal bond trusts that hold
highly-rated, long-term, fixed-rate municipal bonds. The trusts
obtain finan cing by issuing floating-rate trust certificates that
reprice on a weekly or other short-term basis to third-party
investors.
The Corpor ation’ s liquidity commitments to unconsolidated
municipal bond trusts, including those for which the Corporation
was transferor , totaled $3.7 billion  and $2.1 billion  at December
31, 2019  and 2018 . The weighted-average remaining life of
bonds held in the trusts at December 31, 2019  was 10.0 years.
There were no significant write-downs or downgrades of assets
or issuers during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
123     Bank of America
 
Other Variable Interest Entities
The table below summa rizes select information related to other VIEs in which the Corporation held a variable interest at December
31, 2019  and 2018 .
Other VIEs     
 
 Consolidated Unconsolidated Total Consolidated Unconsolidated Total
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Maximum loss exposure $ 4,055 $ 26,326 $ 30,381 $ 4,177 $ 24,498 $ 28,675
On-balance sheet assets          
Trading account assets $ 2,213 $ 549 $ 2,762 $ 2,335 $ 860 $ 3,195
Debt securities carried at fair value — 74 74 — 84 84
Loans and leases 1,810 3,214 5,024 1,949 3,940 5,889
Allowance for loan and lease losses (2) (38) (40) (2) (30) (32)
All other assets 81 20,547 20,628 53 18,885 18,938
Total $ 4,102 $ 24,346 $ 28,448 $ 4,335 $ 23,739 $ 28,074
On-balance sheet liabilities          
Long-term debt $ 46 $ — $ 46 $ 152 $ — $ 152
All other liabilities 2 5,087 5,089 7 4,231 4,238
Total $ 48 $ 5,087 $ 5,135 $ 159 $ 4,231 $ 4,390
Total assets of VIEs $ 4,102 $ 98,491 $ 102,593 $ 4,335 $ 94,746 $ 99,081
Customer VIEs
Customer VIEs include credit-linked, equity-linked and
commodity-linked note VIEs, repackaging VIEs and asset
acquisition VIEs, which are typically created on behalf of
customers who wish to obtain market or credit exposure to a
specific company , index, commodity or financial instrument.
The Corpora tion’s maxi mum loss exposure to consolidated
and unconsolidated customer VIEs totaled $2.2 billion  and $2.1
billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018 , including the notional
amount of derivatives to which the Corporation is a counterparty ,
net of losses previously recorded, and the Corporation’ s
investment, if any , in securities issued by the VIEs.
Collateralized Debt Obligation VIEs
The Corporation receives fees for structuring CDO VIEs, which
hold diversified pools of fixed-income securities, typically
corporate debt or ABS, which the CDO VIEs fund by issuing
multiple tranches of debt and equity securities. CDOs are
generally managed by third-party portfolio managers. The
Corporation typically transfers assets to these CDOs, holds
securities issued by the CDOs and may be a derivative
counterparty to the CDOs. The Corporation’ s maximum loss
exposure to consolidated and unconsolidated CDOs totaled
$304 million  and $421 million  at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Investment VIEs
The Corporation sponsors, invests in or provides financing,
which may be in connection with the sale of assets, to a variety
of investment VIEs that hold loans, real estate, debt securities or
other financial instruments and are designed to provide the
desired investment profile to investors or the Corporation. At
December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the Corporation’ s consolidated
investment VIEs had total assets of $104 million  and $270
million . The Corporation also held investments in unconsolidated
VIEs with total assets  of $32.4 billion and $37.7 billion at
December 31, 2019  and 2018 . The Corporation’ s maximum loss
exposure associated with both consolidated and unconsolidated
investment VIEs totaled $6.4 billion and $7.2 billion at December
31, 2019  and 2018  comprised primarily of on-balance sheet
assets less non-recourse liabilities. Leveraged Lease Trusts
The Corporation’ s net investment in consolidated leveraged
lease trusts totaled $1.7 billion and $1.8 billion at December 31,
2019  and 2018 . The trusts hold long-lived equipment such as rail
cars, powe r generatio n and distribution equipment, and
commercial aircraft. The Corporation structures the trusts and
holds a significant residual interest. The net investment
represents the Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure to the
trusts in the unlikely event that the leveraged lease investments
become worthless. Debt issued by the leveraged lease trusts is
non-recourse to the Corporation.
Tax Credit VIEs
The Corporation holds investments in unconsolidated limited
partnerships and similar entities that construct, own and operate
affordable housing, wind and solar projects. An unrelated third
party is typically the general partner or managing member and
has control over the significant activities of the VIE. The
Corporation earns a return primarily through the receipt of tax
credits allocated to the projects. The maximum loss exposure
included in the Other VIEs table was $18.9 billion and $17.0
billion  at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . The Corpor ation’ s risk of
loss is generally mitigat ed by policies requiring that the project
qualify for the expected tax credits prior to making its investment.
The Corpo ration’ s investments in affordable housing
partnerships, which are reported in other assets on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet, totaled $10.0 billion and $8.9
billion , including unfunded commitments to provide capital
contributions of $4.3 billion  and $3.8 billion  at December 31,
2019  and 2018 . The unfunded commitm ents are expected to be
paid over the next five years. Durin g 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , the
Corporation recognized tax credits and other tax benefits from
investments in affordable housing partnerships  of $1.0 billion,
$981 million  and $1.0 billion  and reported pretax losses in other
income of $882 million , $798 million  and $766 million ,
respectively . Tax credits are recognized as part of the
Corporation’ s annual effective tax rate used to determine tax
expense in a given quarter . Accordingly , the portion of a year’s
expected tax benefits recognized in any given quarter may differ
from 25 percent . The Corporation may from time to time be
asked to invest additional amounts to support a troubled
affordable housing project. Such additional investments have not
been and are not expected to be significant.
  Bank of America    124
NOTE 8  Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill
The table below presents goodwill balance s by business
segment and All Other at December 31, 2019  and 2018 . The
reporting units utilized for goodwill impairment testing are the
operating segments or one level below .
Goodwill   
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Consumer Banking $ 30,123$ 30,123
Global Wealth & Investment Management 9,677 9,677
Global Banking 23,923 23,923
Global Markets 5,182 5,182
All Other 46 46
Total goodwill $ 68,951$ 68,951
During 2019 , the Corpor ation completed its annual goodwill
impairment test as of June 30, 2019  using qualitative
assessments for all applicable reporting units. Based on the
results of the annual goodwill impairment test, the Corporation
determined there was no impairment. For more information on
the use of qualitative assessments, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles .
Intangible Assets
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the net carrying value of
intangible assets was $1.7 billion  and $1.8 billion . At December
31, 2019 and 2018 , intan gible assets included $1.6 billion  of
intangible assets associated with trade names,  substantially all
of which had an indefin ite life and, accordingl y, are not being
amortized. Amortization of intangibles expense was $112 million,
$538 million and $621 million for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 ,
respectively .
NOTE 9  Leases
The Corpo ration enters into both lessor and lessee
arrangements. For more information on lease accounting, see
Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles , and on
lease financing receivables, see Note 5 – Outstanding Loans
and Leases .
Lessor Arrangements
The Corporation’ s lessor arrangements primarily consist of
operating, sales-type and direct financing leases for equipment.
Lease agreements may include options to renew and for the
lessee to purchase the leased equipment at the end of the lease
term.
At December 31, 2019 , the total net investmen t in sales-type
and direct financing leases was $21.9 billion, comprised of $19.3
billion  in lease receivables and $2.6 billion  in unguaranteed
residuals. In certain cases, the Corporation obtains third-party
residual value insurance  to reduce its residual asset risk. The
carrying value of residual assets with third-party residual value
insurance for at least a portion of the asset value was $5.8
billion .
For 2019 , total lease income was $1.7 billion, consisting of
$797 million  from sales-type and direct financing leases and
$891 million  from operating leases.
Lessee Arrangements
The Corporation’ s lessee arrangements predom inantly consist of
operating leases for premises and equipment; the Corporation’ s financing leases are not significant. Right-of-u se assets were
$9.7 billion and lease liabilities were $10.1 billion at December
31, 2019 . The weighted-average discount rate used to calculate
the present value of future minimum lease payments was four
percent .
Lease terms may contain renewal and extension options and
early termination features. Generally , these options do not
impact the lease term because the Corporation is not reasonably
certain that it will exercise the options. The weighted-average
lease term was 8.2 years  at December 31, 2019 .
The table below provides the components of lease cost and
supplemental information for 2019 .
Lease Cost and Supplemental Information for 2019
(Dollars in millions)  
Operating lease cost $ 2,085
Variable lease cost (1) 498
Total lease cost (2) $ 2,583
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for new
operating lease liabilities (3) $ 931
Operating cash flows from operating leases (4) 2,009
(1) Primarily consists of payments for common area maintenance and property taxes.
(2) Amounts are recorded in occupancy and equipment expense in the Consolidated Statement
of Income.
(3) Represents non-cash activity and, accordingly , is not reflected in the Consolidated Statement
of Cash Flows.
(4) Represents cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities.
Maturity Analysis
The maturities of lessor and lessee arrangements outstanding at
December 31, 2019  are presented in the table below based on
undiscounted cash flows.
Maturities of Lessor and Lessee Arrangements
 Lessor Lessee (1)
 Operating
Leases  Sales-type and
Direct Financing
Leases (2)Operating
Leases
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
2020 $ 843 $ 4,657$ 1,966
2021 746 4,887 1,763
2022 651 4,259 1,502
2023 530 3,416 1,240
2024 397 1,939 1,098
Thereafter 1,057 1,910 4,225
Total undiscounted
cash flows $ 4,224 21,068 11,794
Less: Net present
value adjustment  1,756 1,701
Total (3)$ 19,312$ 10,093
(1) Excludes $1.5 billion  in commitments  under lessee arrangements that have not yet
commenced with lease terms that will begin in 2020.
(2) Includes $15.1 billion  in commercial lease financing receivables and $4.2 billion  in
direct/indirect consumer lease financing receivables.
(3) Represents lease receivables for lessor arrangements and lease liabilities for lessee
arrangements.
At December 31, 2018 , operating lease comm itments under
lessee arrangements were $2.4 billion , $2.2 billion , $2.0 billion ,
$1.7 billion and $1.3 billion for 2019 through 2023, respectively ,
and $6.2 billion in the aggregate for all years thereafter . These
amounts include variab le lease payments and commitments
under lease s that have not yet commenced, both of which are
excluded from the lessee maturity analysis prese nted in the table
above.
125     Bank of America
 
NOTE 10  Deposits
The table below presents information about the Corporation’ s time deposits of $100 thousand or more at December 31, 2019 and
2018 . The Corporation also had aggregate time depo sits of $15.8 billion and $16.4 billion in denominations that met or exceeded the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) insurance limit at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
Time Deposits of $100 Thousand or More    
 December 31, 2019December 31
2018
(Dollars in millions)Three Months
or LessOver Three
Months to
Twelve Months Thereafter Total Total
U.S. certificates of deposit and other time deposits $ 16,115 $ 21,351 $ 2,273 $ 39,739 $ 29,505
Non-U.S. certificates of deposit and other time deposits 7,108 4,821 1,105 13,034 10,792
The scheduled contractual maturities for total time deposits at December 31, 2019  are presented in the table below .
Contractual Maturities of Total Time Deposits    
(Dollars in millions) U.S. Non-U.S. Total
Due in 2020 $ 56,351 $ 12,000 $ 68,351
Due in 2021 3,503 101 3,604
Due in 2022 990 18 1,008
Due in 2023 280 15 295
Due in 2024 187 981 1,168
Thereafter 212 35 247
Total time deposits $ 61,523 $ 13,150 $ 74,673
NOTE 11  Federal Funds Sold or Purchased, Securities Financing Agreements, Short-term
Borrowings and Restricted Cash
The table below presents federal funds sold or purchased, securities financing agreements (which include securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase) and short-term borrowings.
The Corporation elects to account for certain securities financing agreements and short-term borrowings under the fair value option.
For more information on the fair value option, see Note 22 – Fair V alue Option .
 Amount Rate Amount Rate
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to
resell   
Average during year $ 279,610 1.73% $ 251,328 1.26%
Maximum month-end balance during year 281,684 n/a 279,350 n/a
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to
repurchase   
Average during year $ 201,797 2.31% $ 193,681 1.80%
Maximum month-end balance during year 203,063 n/a 201,089 n/a
Short-term borrowings   
Average during year 24,301 2.42 36,021 2.69
Maximum month-end balance during year 36,538 n/a 52,480 n/a
n/a = not applicable
Bank of America, N.A. maintains a global progra m to offer up
to a maximum of $75 billion outstanding  at any one time, of bank
notes with fixed or floating rates and maturities of at least seven
days  from the date of issue. Short-term bank notes outstanding
under this program totaled $11.7 billion  and $12.1 billion  at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 . These short-term bank notes,
along with Federal Home Loan Bank advances, U.S. Treasury
tax and loan notes, and term federal funds purchased, are
included in short-term borrowings on the Conso lidated Balance
Sheet.
Offsetting of Securities Financing Agreements
The Corpora tion enters into securities financing  agreements to
accommodate customers (also referred to as “matched-book
transactions”), obtain securities to cover short positions and
finance inventory positions. Substantially all of the Corporation’ s
securities financing activities are transacted  under legally
enforceable master repurchase agreemen ts or legally
enforceable master securities lending agreeme nts that give the
Corporation, in the event of default by the counterparty , the right to liquidate
securities held and to offset receivables and payables with the
same counte rparty . The Corporation offsets securities financing
transactions with the same counterparty on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet where it has such a legally enforceable master
netting agreement and the transactions have the same maturity
date.
The Secur ities Financing Agreements table presents
securities financing agreements included on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet in federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell, and in federal funds
purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to
repurchase at December 31, 2019 and 2018 . Balances are
presented on a gross basis, prior to the application of
counterparty netting. Gross assets and liabilities are adjusted on
an aggrega te basis to take into consideration the effects of
legally enforceable master netting agreeme nts. For more
information on the offsetting of derivatives, see Note 3 –
Derivatives .
  Bank of America    126
Securities Financing Agreements
 Gross
Assets/Liabilities
(1)  Amounts Offset Net Balance
Sheet Amount Financial
Instruments (2) Net
Assets/Liabilities
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell (3)$ 434,257 $ (159,660) $ 274,597 $ (244,486) $ 30,111
Securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase $ 324,769 $ (159,660) $ 165,109 $ (141,482) $ 23,627
Other (4) 15,346 — 15,346 (15,346) —
Total $ 340,115 $ (159,660) $ 180,455 $ (156,828) $ 23,627
 December 31, 2018
Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell (3)$ 366,274 $ (106,865) $ 259,409 $ (240,790) $ 18,619
Securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase $ 293,853 $ (106,865) $ 186,988 $ (176,740) $ 10,248
Other (4) 19,906 — 19,906 (19,906) —
Total $ 313,759 $ (106,865) $ 206,894 $ (196,646) $ 10,248
(1) Includes activity where uncertainty exists as to the enforceability of certain master netting agreements under bankruptcy laws in some countries or industries.
(2) Includes securities collateral received or pledged under repurchase or securities lending agreements where there is a legally enforceable master netting agreement. These amounts are not offset
on the Consolidate d Balance Sheet, but are shown as a reduction to derive a net asset or liability . Securities collateral received or pledged where the legal enforceability of the master netting
agreements is uncertain is excluded from the table.
(3) Excludes repurchase activity of $12.9 billion  and $11.5 billion  reported in loans and leases on the Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(4) Balance is reported in accrued expenses and other liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet and relates to transactions where the Corporation acts as the lender in a securities lending
agreement and receives securities that can be pledged as collateral or sold. In these transactions, the Corporation recognizes an asset at fair value, representing the securities received, and a
liability , representing the obligation to return those securities.
Repurchase Agreements and Securities Loaned
Transactions Accounted for as Secured
Borrowings
The following tables present securities sold under agreements to
repurchase and securities loaned by remaining contractual term
to maturity and class of collateral pledged. Included in “Other”
are transactions where the Corporation acts as the lender in a securities lending agreement and receives securities that can be
pledged as collateral or sold. Certain agreements contain a right
to substitute collateral and/or terminate the agreement prior to
maturity at the option of the Corporation or the counterparty .
Such agreem ents are included in the table below based on the
remaining contractual term to maturity .
Remaining Contractual Maturity
 Overnight and
Continuous 30 Days or Less After 30 Days
Through 90 Days Greater than
90 Days (1) Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase $ 129,455 $ 122,685 $ 25,322 $ 21,922 $ 299,384
Securities loaned 18,766 3,329 1,241 2,049 25,385
Other 15,346 — — — 15,346
Total $ 163,567 $ 126,014 $ 26,563 $ 23,971 $ 340,115
 December 31, 2018
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase $ 139,017 $ 81,917 $ 34,204 $ 21,476 $ 276,614
Securities loaned 7,753 4,197 1,783 3,506 17,239
Other 19,906 — — — 19,906
Total $ 166,676 $ 86,114 $ 35,987 $ 24,982 $ 313,759
(1) No agreements have maturities greater than three years .
Class of Collateral Pledged
 Securities Sold
Under
Agreements to
Repurchase Securities
Loaned  Other  Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
U.S. government and agency securities $ 173,533 $ 1 $ — $ 173,534
Corporate securities, trading loans and other 10,467 2,014 258 12,739
Equity securities 14,933 20,026 15,024 49,983
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 96,576 3,344 64 99,984
Mortgage trading loans and ABS 3,875 — — 3,875
Total $ 299,384 $ 25,385 $ 15,346 $ 340,115
 December 31, 2018
U.S. government and agency securities $ 164,664 $ — $ — $ 164,664
Corporate securities, trading loans and other 11,400 2,163 287 13,850
Equity securities 14,090 10,869 19,572 44,531
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 81,329 4,207 47 85,583
Mortgage trading loans and ABS 5,131 — — 5,131
Total $ 276,614 $ 17,239 $ 19,906 $ 313,759
127     Bank of America
 
Under repurchase agreements, the Corporation is required to
post collateral with a market value equal to or in excess of the
principal amount borrowed. For securities loaned transactions,
the Corpora tion receives collateral in the form of cash, letters of
credit or other securities. To determine whether the market value
of the underlying collateral remains sufficient, collateral is
generally valued daily, and the Corporation may be required to
deposit additional collateral or may receive or return collateral
pledged when appropriate. Repurchase agreements and
securities loaned trans actions are generally either overnight,
continuous (i.e., no stated term) or short-term. The Corporation
manages liquidity risks related to these agreements by sourcing
funding from a diverse group of counterparties, providing a range of securities collateral
and pursuing longer durations, when appropriate.
Restricted Cash
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Corporation held restricted
cash included within cash and cash equivalents on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet of $24.4 billion  and $22.6 billion ,
predominantly related to cash held on deposit with the Federal
Reserve Bank and non-U.S. central banks to meet reserve
requirements and cash segregated in complianc e with securities
regulations.
NOTE 12  Long-term Debt
Long-term debt consists of borrowings having an original maturity of one year or more. The table below presents the balance of long-
term debt at December 31, 2019 and 2018 , and the related contractual rates and maturity dates as of December 31, 2019 .
 
Weighted-
average Rate   December 31
(Dollars in millions) Interest Rates Maturity Dates 2019  2018
Notes issued by Bank of America Corporation (1)       
Senior notes:       
Fixed3.30% 0.25 - 8.05% 2020 - 2050 $ 140,265 $ 120,548
Floating1.81 0.25 - 6.68  2020 - 2044 19,552 25,574
Senior structured notes    16,941 13,815
Subordinated notes:       
Fixed4.89 2.94 - 8.57  2021 - 2045 21,632 20,843
Floating2.74 2.56 - 2.89  2022 - 2026 782 1,742
Junior subordinated notes:       
Fixed6.71 6.45 - 8.05  2027 - 2066 736 732
Floating (2)2.71 2.71  2056 1 1
Total notes issued by Bank of America Corporation    199,909 183,255
Notes issued by Bank of America, N.A.       
Senior notes:       
Fixed3.34 3.34  2023 508 —
Floating2.18 1.99 - 2.51  2020 - 2041 6,519 1,770
Subordinated notes6.00 6.00  2036 1,744 1,617
Advances from Federal Home Loan Banks:       
Fixed4.98 0.01 - 7.72  2020 - 2034 112 130
Floating1.79 1.77 - 1.84  2020 2,500 14,751
Securitizations and other BANA VIEs (3)    8,373 10,326
Other    402 442
Total notes issued by Bank of America, N.A.    20,158 29,036
Other debt       
Structured liabilities    20,442 16,483
Nonbank VIEs (3)     347 618
Total other debt    20,789 17,101
Total long-term debt    $ 240,856 $ 229,392
(1) Includes total loss-absorbing capacity compliant debt.
(2) Includes amounts related to trust preferred securities. For more information, see Trust Preferred Securities in this Note.
(3) Represents liabilities of consolidated VIEs included in total long-term debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
During 2019 , the Corporation issued $52.5 billion  of long-term
debt consisting of $29.3 billion of notes issued by Bank of
America Corporation, $10.9 billion of notes issued by Bank of
America, N.A. and $12.3 billion of other debt, substantially all of
which was structured liabilities. During 2018 , the Corpo ration
issued $64.4 billion of long-term  debt consisting of $30.7 billion
of notes issued by Bank of America Corporation, $18.7 billion of
notes issued by Bank of America, N.A. and $15.0 billion of other
debt, substantially all of which was structured liabilities.
During 2019 , the Corporation had total long-term debt
maturities and redemptions in the aggregate of $50.6 billion
consisting of $21.1 billion for Bank of America Corporation, $19.9
billion  for Bank of America, N.A. and $9.6 billion of other debt.
During 2018 , the Corporation had total long-term debt maturities
and redemptions in the aggregate of $53.3 billion  consi sting of
$29.8 billion  for Bank of America Corporation, $11.2 billion  for
Bank of America, N.A. and $12.3 billion  of other debt. Bank of America Corporation and Bank of America, N.A.
maintain various U.S. and non-U.S. debt programs to offer both
senior and subordinated notes. The notes may be denominated
in U.S. dollars or foreign currencies. At December 31, 2019 and
2018 , the amount of foreign currency-denominated debt
translated into U.S. dollars included in total long-term debt was
$49.6 billion  and $48.6 billion . Foreign currency contracts may
be used to convert certain foreign currency-denominated debt
into U.S. dollars.
At December 31, 2019 , long-term debt of consolidated VIEs
in the table above included debt from credit card, residential
mortgage, home equity , other VIEs and ABS of $8.4 billion, $217
million , $64 million , $46 million  and $19 million , respectively .
Long-term debt of VIEs is collateralized by the assets of the
VIEs. For more information, see Note 7 – Securitizations and
Other V ariable Interest Entities .
  Bank of America    128
The weighte d-average effective interest rates for total long-
term debt (excluding senior structured notes) , total fixed-rate
debt and total floating-rate debt were 3.26 percent , 3.55 percent
and 1.92 percent , respectively , at December 31, 2019 , and 3.29
percent , 3.66 percent  and 2.26 percent , respective ly, at
December 31, 2018 . The Corporation’ s ALM activities maintain
an overall interest rate risk management strategy that
incorporates the use of interest rate contracts to manage
fluctuations in earnings that are caused by interest rate volatility .
The Corporation’ s goal is to manage interest rate sensitivity so
that movements in interest rates do not significantly adversely
affect earnings and capital. The weighted-average rates are the
contractual interest rates on the debt and do not reflect the
impacts of derivative transactions.
Debt outstan ding of $5.7 billion at December 31, 2019  was
issued by BofA  Finance LLC, a 100 percent  owned finance subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation, the parent company ,
and is fully and unconditionally guaranteed by the parent
company .
The table below shows the carrying value for aggregate
annual contractual maturities of long-term debt as of December
31, 2019 . Included in the table are certain structured notes
issued by the Corporation that contain provisions whereby the
borrowings are redeemable at the option of the holder (put
options) at specified dates prior to maturity . Other structured
notes have coupon or repayment terms linked to the
performance of debt or equity securities, indices, currencies or
commodities, and the maturity may be accelerated based on the
value of a referenced index or security . In both cases, the
Corporation or a subs idiary may be required to settle the
obligation for cash or other securities prior to the contractual
maturity date. These borrowings are reflected  in the table as
maturing at their contractual maturity date.
Long-term Debt by Maturity
(Dollars in millions) 2020 2021  2022  2023 2024  Thereafter Total
Bank of America Corporation        
Senior notes$ 9,312 $ 15,978 $ 14,875 $ 23,045 $ 17,236 $ 79,371 $ 159,817
Senior structured notes822 453 2,232 288 547 12,599 16,941
Subordinated notes— 360 386 — 3,213 18,455 22,414
Junior subordinated notes (1)— — — — — 737 737
Total Bank of America Corporation 10,134 16,791 17,493 23,333 20,996 111,162 199,909
Bank of America, N.A.        
Senior notes3,000 3,499 — 509 — 19 7,027
Subordinated notes— — — — — 1,744 1,744
Advances from Federal Home Loan Banks2,509 2 3 1 — 97 2,612
Securitizations and other Bank VIEs (2)3,099 4,080 1,185 9 — — 8,373
Other134 55 — 130 — 83 402
Total Bank of America, N.A. 8,742 7,636 1,188 649 — 1,943 20,158
Other debt        
Structured liabilities5,275 1,884 1,057 1,372 745 10,109 20,442
Nonbank VIEs (2)— — — 1 — 346 347
Total other debt 5,275 1,884 1,057 1,373 745 10,455 20,789
Total long-term debt $ 24,151 $ 26,311 $ 19,738 $ 25,355 $ 21,741 $ 123,560 $ 240,856
(1) Includes amounts related to trust preferred securities. For more information, see Trust Preferred Securities in this Note.
(2)
 Represents liabilities of consolidated VIEs included in total long-term debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Trust Preferred Securities
At December 31, 2019 , trust preferred securities (Trust
Securities) with a carry ing value of $1 millio n, issue d by BAC
Capital Trust XV (the Trust), a 100 percen t owned, non-
consolidated finance subsidiary of the Corporat ion, were issued
and outsta nding. The Trust Securities are mandatorily
redeemable preferred security obligations of the Trust. The sole
asset of the Trust is a junior subordinated deferrable interest
note of the Corporation (the Note).
Periodic cash payments and payments upon liquidation or
redemption with respect to Trust Securities are guaranteed by
the Corporation to the extent of funds held by the Trust (the
Preferred Securities Guarantee). The Prefe rred Securities
Guarantee, when taken together with the Corporation’ s other
obligations including its obligations under the Note, generally will
constitute a full and unconditional guarantee, on a subordinated
basis, by the Corpora tion of payments due on the Trust
Securities.
NOTE 13  Commitments and Contingencies
In the normal course of business, the Corporation enters into a
number of off-balance sheet commitments. These commitments
expose the Corporation to varying degrees of credit and market
risk and are subject to the same credit and market risk limitation reviews as those instruments recorded on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet.
Credit Extension Commitments
The Corporation enters into commitments to extend credit such
as loan commitments, SBLCs and commercial letters of credit to
meet the financing need s of its customers. The following table
includes the notional amount of unfunded legally binding lending
commitments net of amounts distributed (i.e., syndicated or
participated) to other financial institutions. The distributed
amounts were $10.6 billion  and $10.7 billion  at December 31,
2019 and 2018 . At December 31, 2019 , the carryin g value of
these commitments, excluding commitments  accounted for
under the fair value option, was $829 million , including deferred
revenue of $16 millio n and a reserve for unfunded lending
commitments of $813 million . At December 31, 2018 , the
comparable amounts were $813 million , $16 million  and $797
million , respectively . The carrying value of these commitments is
classified in accrued expenses and other liabilities on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Legally binding commitments to extend credit generally have
specified rates and maturities. Certain of these commitments
have adverse change clauses that help to protect the
Corporation against deterioration in the borrower ’s ability to pay .
129     Bank of America
 
The table below includes the notional amount of
commitments of $4.4 billion  and $3.1 billion  at December 31,
2019 and 2018  that are accounted for under the fair value option .
However , the table excludes cumulative net fair value of $90
million  and $169 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018  on
these commitments, which is classified in accrued expenses and other liabilities. For
more information regarding the Corporation’ s loan commitments
accounted for under the fair value option, see Note 22 – Fair
Value Option .
Credit Extension Commitments      
 Expire in One
Year or LessExpire After One
Year Through
Three YearsExpire After Three
Years Through
Five YearsExpire After
Five Years Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Notional amount of credit extension
commitments      
Loan commitments (1) $ 97,454 $ 148,000 $ 173,699 $ 24,487 $ 443,640
Home equity lines of credit 1,137 1,948 6,351 34,134 43,570
Standby letters of credit and financial
guarantees (2) 21,311 11,512 3,712 408 36,943
Letters of credit (3) 1,156 254 65 25 1,500
Legally binding commitments 121,058 161,714 183,827 59,054 525,653
Credit card lines (4) 376,067 — — — 376,067
Total credit extension commitments $ 497,125 $ 161,714 $ 183,827 $ 59,054 $ 901,720
 December 31, 2018
Notional amount of credit extension
commitments      
Loan commitments (1) $ 84,910 $ 142,271 $ 155,298 $ 22,683 $ 405,162
Home equity lines of credit 2,578 2,249 3,530 34,702 43,059
Standby letters of credit and financial
guarantees (2) 22,571 9,702 2,457 1,074 35,804
Letters of credit (3) 1,168 84 69 57 1,378
Legally binding commitments 111,227 154,306 161,354 58,516 485,403
Credit card lines (4) 371,658 — — — 371,658
Total credit extension commitments $ 482,885 $ 154,306 $ 161,354 $ 58,516 $ 857,061
(1)
 At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , $5.1 billion  and $4.3 billion  of these loan commitments are held in the form of a security .
(2)
 The notional amounts of SBLCs and financial guarantees classified as investment grade and non-investment grade based on the credit quality of the underlying reference name within the
instrument were $27.9 billion and $8.6 billion at December 31, 2019 , and $28.3 billion and $7.1 billion at December 31, 2018 . Amounts in the table include consumer SBLCs of $413 million and
$372 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(3)
 At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , included  are letters of credit of $1.4 billion and $422 million related to certain liquidity commitme nts of VIEs. For more information, see Note 7 – Securitizations
and Other V ariable Interest Entities .
(4) Includes business card unused lines of credit.
Other Commitments
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Corporation had
commitments to purchase loans (e.g., residential mortgage and
commercial real estate) of $86 million and $329 million, which
upon settlement will be included in loans or LHFS, and
commitments to purchase commercial loans of $1.1 billion  and
$463 million, which upon settlemen t will be included in trading
account assets.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Corporation had
commitments to purchase commodities, primarily liquefied
natural gas, of $830 millio n and $1.3 billion, which upon
settlement will be included in trading account assets.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Corporation had
commitments to enter into resale and forward-dated resale and
securities borrowing agreements of $97.2 billion  and $59.7
billion , and commitments to enter into forward-dated repurchase
and securities lending agreements of $24.9 billion  and $21.2
billion . These commitments expire primarily within the next 12
months .
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Corpo ration had a
commitment to originate or purchase up to $3.3 billion and $3.0
billion  on a rolling 12-month basis, of auto loans and leases from
a strategic partner . This commitment extends through November
2022 and can be terminated with 12 months  prior notice.
Other Guarantees
Bank-owned Life Insurance Book Value Protection
The Corpora tion sells products that offer book value protection to
insurance carriers who offer group life insurance policies to
corporations, primarily banks. At December 31, 2019 and 2018 ,
the notional amount of these guarantees totaled $7.3 billion  and $9.8 billion. At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Corpor ation’ s
maximum exposure related to these guarantees totaled $1.1
billion  and $1.5 billion , with estimated maturity dates between
2033 and 2039.
Indemnifications
In the ordina ry course of business, the Corpor ation enters into
various agreements that contain indemnifications, such as tax
indemnifications, whereu pon payment may beco me due if certain
external events occur , such as a change in tax law. The
indemnification clauses are often standard contractual terms and
were entered into in the normal course of business based on an
assessment that the risk of loss would be remote. These
agreements typically contain an early termination clause that
permits the Corporation to exit the agreement upon these
events. The maximu m potential future payment under
indemnification agreements is difficult to assess for several
reasons, including the occurrence of an external event, the
inability to predict future changes in tax and other laws, the
difficulty in determining how such laws would apply to parties in
contracts, the absence of exposure limits contained in standard
contract language and the timing of any early termination
clauses. Historically , any payments made under these
guarantees have been de minimis. The Corporation has
assessed the probability of making such payme nts in the future
as remote.
Merchant Services
In accordance with credit and debit card association rules, the
Corporation sponsors merchant processing servicers that
process credit and debit card transactions on behalf of various
merchants. If a merchant processor fails to meet its obligation
regarding
  Bank of America    130
disputed transactions, then the Corporation could be held liable.
In 2019  and 2018 , the sponsored entities processed $916.6
billion  and $874.3  billion  of transactions and recorded losses of
$24 million  and $31 million .
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the maximum potential
exposure for sponsored transactions totaled $384.2  billion and
$348.1  billion. However, the Corporation believes that the
maximum potential exposure is not representative of the actual
potential loss exposure and does not expect to make material
payments in connection with these guarantees.
A significant portion of the Corporation's merchant processing
activity is performed by a joint venture, formed in 2009, in which
the Corporation holds a 49 percent ownership interest. The
carrying value of the Corporation’ s investment was $640 million
and $2.8 billion at December 31, 2019 and 2018 . The joint
venture is accounted for as an equity method  investment and
reported in All Other. On July 29, 2019, the Corporation gave
notice to the joint venture partner of the termination of the joint
venture upon the conclusion of its current term in June 2020. As
a result, the Corporation incurred a non-cash, pretax impairment
charge in 2019  of $2.1 billion, included in other gener al operating
expense.
Exchange and Clearing House Member Guarantees
The Corporation is a member of various securitie s and derivative
exchanges and clearinghouses, both in the U.S. and other
countries. As a member , the Corporation may be required to pay
a pro-rata share of the losses incurred by some of these
organizations as a result of another member default and under
other loss scenarios. The Corporation’ s potential obligations may
be limited to its membership interests in such exchanges and
clearinghouses, to the amount (or multiple) of the Corporation’ s
contribution to the guarantee fund or, in limited instances, to the
full pro-rata share of the residual losses after applying the
guarantee fund. The Corporation’ s maximum potential exposure
under these membership agreements is difficult to estimate;
however , the Corporation has assessed the probability of making
any such payments as remote.
Prime Brokerage and Securities Clearing Services
In connection with its prime brokerage and clearing businesses,
the Corpora tion perform s securities clearance and settlement
services with other brokerage firms and clearinghouses on
behalf of its clients. Under these arrangements, the Corporation
stands ready  to meet the obligations of its clients with respect to
securities transactions. The Corporation’ s obligations in this
respect are secured by the assets in the client s’ accounts and
the accounts of their customers as well as by any proceeds
received from the transactions cleared and settled by the
Corporation on behalf of clients or their customers. The
Corporation’ s maximum potential exposure under these
arrangements is difficult to estimate; however , the potential for
the Corporation to incur material losses pursuant to these
arrangements is remote.
Other Guarantees
The Corpo ration has entered into additi onal guarantee
agreements and commitments, including sold risk participation
swaps, liquidity facilities, lease-end obligation agreements,
partial credit guarantees on certain leases, real estate joint
venture guarantees, divested business commitments and sold
put options that require gross settlement. The maximum potential
future payme nts under these agreements are approximately $8.7
billion  and $5.9 billion  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 . The
estimated maturity dates  of these obligations extend up to 2049.
The Corporation has made no mate rial payments under these guarantee s. For more
information on maximum potential future paym ents under VIE-
related liquidity commitments, see Note 7 – Securitizations and
Other V ariable Interest Entities .
During 2019 , the Corporation recognized a loss of $210
million  in other income under its indemnity obligation in
connection with the 2017 sale of its non-U.S. consumer credit
card business (payment protection insurance).
In the normal course of business, the Corporation periodically
guarantees the obligations of its affiliates in a variety of
transactions including ISDA-related transaction s and non-ISDA
related trans actions such as commodities trading, repurchase
agreements, prime brokerage agreement s and other
transactions.
Guarantees of Certain Long-term Debt
The Corporation, as the parent compa ny, fully and
unconditionally guarantees the securities issued by BofA  Finance
LLC, a 100 percent owned finance subsidiary of the Corporation,
and effectively provides for the full and unconditional guarantee
of trust securities issued  by certain statutory trust companies that
are 100 percent owned finance subsidiaries of the Corporation.
Representations and Warranties Obligations and
Corporate Guarantees
The Corporation securitizes first-lien residential  mortgage loans
generally in the form of RMBS guaranteed by the GSEs or by
GNMA  in the case of FHA-insured, VA-guaranteed and Rural
Housing Service-guaran teed mortgage loans, and sells pools of
first-lien residential mortgage loans in the form of whole loans. In
addition, in prior years, legacy companie s and certain
subsidiaries sold pools of first-lien residential mortgage loans
and home equity loans as private-label securitizations or in the
form of whole loans. In connection with these transactions, the
Corporation or certain of its subsidiaries or legacy companies
make and have made various representations and warranties.
Breaches of these representations and warranti es have resulted
in and may continue to result in the requireme nt to repurchase
mortgage loans or to otherwise make whole or provide
indemnification or other remedies to sponsors, investors,
securitization trusts, guarantors, insurers or other parties
(collectively , repurchases).
Unresolved Repurchase Claims
Unresolved representat ions and warranties repurchase claims
represent the notional amount of repurchase claims made by
counterparties, typically the outstanding principa l balance or the
unpaid principal balance at the time of default . In the case of
first-lien mortgages, the claim amount is often significantly
greater than the expected loss amount due to the benefit of
collateral and, in some cases, mortgage insurance or mortgage
guarantee payments.
The notiona l amount of unresolved repurchase claims at
December 31, 2019 and 2018  was $10.7 billion and $14.4 billion.
These balances included $3.7 billion  and $6.2 billion  at
December 31, 2019 and 2018  of claims related to loans in
specific priva te-label securitization groups or tranches where the
Corporation owns substantially all of the outstanding securities or
will otherwis e realize the benefit of any repurchase claims paid.
The balance  for 2019  also includes $1.6 billion of repurchase
claims related to a single monoline insurer and is the subject of
litigation.
During 2019 , the Corporation received $461 million  in new
repurchase claims that were not time-barred. During 2019 , $4.2
billion  in claims were resolve d, including $2.1 billion  of claims
that were deemed time-barred.
131     Bank of America
 
Reserve and Related Provision
The reserve for representations and warranties  obligations and
corporate guarantees was $1.8 billion  and $2.0 billion  at
December 31, 2019 and 2018  and is included in accrued
expenses and other liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet
and the related provision is included in other income in the
Consolidated Statemen t of Income. The representations and
warranties reserve represents the Corporation’ s best estimate of
probable incurred losses, is based on our experi ence in previous
negotiations, and is subject to judgment, a variety of
assumptions, and known or unknown uncertainties. Future
representations and warranties losses may occur in excess of
the amounts recorded for these exposures; however , the
Corporation does not expect such amounts to be material to the
Corporation's financial condition and liquidity . See Litigation and
Regulatory Matters in this Note below for the Corporation's
combined range of possible loss in excess of the reserve for
representations and warranties, and the accrued liability for
litigation.
Litigation and Regulatory Matters
In the ordinary course of business, the Corp oration and its
subsidiaries are routinely defendants in or parties to many
pending and threatened legal, regulatory and governmental
actions and proceeding s. In view of the inherent difficulty of
predicting the outcome of such matters, particularly where the
claimants seek very large or indeterminate damages or where
the matters present novel legal theories or involve a large
number of parties, the Corporation generally cannot predict the
eventual outcome of the pending matters, timing of the ultimate
resolution of these matters, or eventual loss, fines or penalties
related to each pending matter .
In accordance with applicable accounting guidance, the
Corporation establishes an accrued liability when those matters
present loss contingencies that are both probable and estimable.
In such cases, there may be an exposure to loss in excess of
any amounts accrued. As a matter develops, the Corporation, in
conjunction with any outside counsel handling the matter ,
evaluates on an ongoing basis whether such matter presents a
loss contingency that is probable and estimable . Once the loss
contingency is deemed to be both probable and estimable, the
Corporation will establish an accrued liability and record a
corresponding amount of litigation-related expense. The
Corporation continues to monitor the matter for further
developments that could affect the amount of the accrued liability
that has been previously established. Excludi ng expenses of
internal and external legal service providers, litigation-related
expense of $681 million  and $469 million  was recognized in
2019 and 2018.
For a limited number of the matters disclosed in this Note for
which a loss, whether in excess of a related accrued liability or
where there is no accrued liability , is reason ably possible in
future period s, the Corporation is able to estim ate a range of
possible loss. In determining whether it is possib le to estimate a
range of possible loss, the Corporation reviews and evaluates its
matters on an ongoing basis, in conjunction with any outside
counsel handling the matter , in light of potentially relevant factual
and legal developments. With respect to the matters disclosed in
this Note, in cases in which the Corporation possesses sufficient
appropriate information to estimate a range of possible loss, that
estimate is aggregated and disclosed below . There may be other
disclosed matters for which a loss is probable or reasonably
possible but such an estimate of the range of possible loss may
not be possible. For such matters disclosed in this Note, where
an estimate of the range of possible loss is possible, as well as for representations
and warranties exposures, management curren tly estimates the
aggregate range of reasonably possible loss for these exposures
is $0 to $1.6 billion  in excess of the accrued liability , if any .
The estimated range of possible loss, as well as the
Corporation's accrued liability , is based upon currently available
information and is subje ct to significant judgment, a variety of
assumptions and known and unknown uncertainties. The matters
underlying the estimated range of possible loss and liability
accrual are unpredictabl e and will change from time to time, and
actual losses may vary significantly from the current estimate
and accrual. The estimated range of possible loss does not
represent the Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure.
Information is provided below regarding the nature of the
litigation and associated  claimed damages. Based on current
knowledge, and taking into account accrued liabilities,
management does not believe that loss conti ngencies arising
from pending matters, including the matters described herein,
will have a material adverse effect on the consolidated financial
condition or liquidity of the Corporation. However , in light of the
significant judgment, variety of assumptions and uncertainties
involved in these matters, some of which are beyond the
Corporation’ s control, and the very large or indeterminate
damages sought in some of these matters, an adverse outcome
in one or more of these matters could be material to the
Corporation’ s business or results of operations for any particular
reporting period, or cause significant reputational harm.
Ambac Bond Insurance Litigation
Ambac Assurance Corporation and the Segreg ated Account of
Ambac Assurance Corporation (together , Ambac ) have filed four
separate lawsuits against the Corporation and its subsidiaries
relating to bond insurance policies Ambac provided on certain
securitized pools of HELOCs, first-lien subprim e home equity
loans, fixed-rate second-lien mortgage loans and negative
amortization pay option adjustable-rate mortgag e loans. Ambac
alleges that they have paid or will pay claims  as a result of
defaults in the underlyin g loans and asserts that the defendants
misrepresented the characteristics of the underlying loans and/or
breached certain contractual representations and warranties
regarding the underwriting and servicing of the loans. In those
actions where the Corporation is named as a defendant, Ambac
contends the Corporation is liable on various successor and
vicarious liability theories. These actions are at various
procedural stages with material developments provided below .
Ambac v . Countrywide I
The Corpor ation, Coun trywide and other Countrywide entities
are named as defendan ts in an action filed on September 28,
2010 in New York Supreme Court. Ambac asserts claims for
fraudulent inducement as well as breach of contract and seeks
damages in excess of $2.2 billion , plus punitive damages.
On May 16, 2017, the First Department issued its decisions
on the parties’  cross-app eals of the trial court’ s October 22, 2015
summary judgment rulings. Ambac appealed the First
Department’ s rulings requiring Ambac to prove all of the
elements of its fraudulent inducement claim, including justifiable
reliance and loss causation; restricting Ambac’ s sole remedy for
its breach of contract claims to the repurchase protocol of cure,
repurchase or substitution of any materially defective loan; and
dismissing Ambac’ s claim  for reimbursements of attorneys’  fees.
On June 27, 2018, the New York Court of Appeals affirmed the
First Department rulings that Ambac appealed.
  Bank of America    132
Ambac v . Countrywide II
On December 30, 2014, Ambac filed a complaint in New York
Supreme Court against the same defendants, claiming
fraudulent inducement against Countrywide, and successor and
vicarious liability against  the Corporation. Ambac seeks damages
in excess of $600 million , plus punitive damages . On December
19, 2016, the Court granted in part and denied in part
Countrywide’ s motion to dismiss the complaint.
Ambac v . Countrywide IV
On July 21, 2015, Ambac filed an action in New York Supreme
Court against Countrywide asserting the same claims for
fraudulent inducement that Ambac asserted  in the now-
dismissed Ambac v. Countrywide III. The complaint seeks
damages in excess of $350 million , plus punitive damages.
Ambac v . First Franklin
On April 16, 2012, Ambac filed an action against BANA, First
Franklin and various Merrill Lynch entities, including Merrill
Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, in New York
Supreme Court relating to guaranty insurance Ambac provided
on a First Franklin securitization sponsored by Merrill Lynch. The
complaint alleges fraudulent inducement and breach of contract,
including breach of contr act claims against BANA  based upon its
servicing of the loans in the securitization. Ambac seeks as
damages hundreds of millions of dollars that Ambac alleges it
has paid or will pay in claims.
Deposit Insurance Assessment
On January 9, 2017, the FDIC filed suit against BANA in the U.S.
District Cour t for the District of Columbia alleging failure to pay a
December 15, 2016 invoice for additional deposit insurance
assessments and interest in the amount of $542 millio n for the
quarters ending June 30, 2013 through December 31, 2014. On
April 7, 2017 , the FDIC amended its complaint to add a claim for
additional deposit insurance and interest in the amount of $583
million  for the quarters ending March 31, 2012 through March 31,
2013. The FDIC asserts  these claims based on BANA ’s alleged
underreporting of counterparty exposures that resulted in
underpayment of assessments for those quarters and its
Enforcement Section is also conducting a parallel investigation
related to the same alleg ed reporting error. BANA disagrees with
the FDIC’s interpretation of the regulations as they existed during
the relevant time perio d and is defending itself against the
FDIC’ s claims. Pending final resolution, BANA  has pledged
security satisfactory to the FDIC related to the disputed
additional assessment amounts.
On March 27, 2018, the U.S. District Court for the District of
Columbia denied BANA ’s partial motion to dismiss certain of the
FDIC’ s claims.
Interchange Litigation
In 2005, a group of merchants filed a series of putative class
actions and individual actions directed at interchange fees
associated with Visa and MasterCard payment card transactions.
These action s, which were consolidated in the U.S. District Court
for the Eastern District of New York under the caption In re
Payment Card Interchange Fee and Merchant Discount Anti-
Trust Litigation, named Visa, MasterCard, the Corporation,
BANA  and other banks as defendants. Plaintif fs alleged antitrust
claims and sought comp ensatory and treble damages as well as
injunctive relief.
In 2018, defendants reached a settlement of the putative
Rule 23(b)(3) damages class. Defendants agreed to pay an
additional amount to participating class member s by contribution
to the escrow fund established as part of the settlement
previously rejected by the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second
Circuit. The Corporation’ s additiona l contribution was not material. The
District Court granted final approval of the settlement in
December 2019. Beginning in January 2020, a number of class
members who objected to the settlement appealed to the U.S.
Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit.
LIBOR, Other Reference Rates, Foreign Exchange (FX)
and Bond Trading Matters
Government authorities  in the U.S. and vario us international
jurisdictions continue to conduct investigations of, to make
inquiries of, and to pursue proceedings against, the Corporation
and its subsidiaries regarding FX and other reference rates as
well as government, sovereign, supranational and agency bonds
in connection with conduct and systems and controls. The
Corporation is cooperating with these inquiries and
investigations, and responding to the proceedings.
LIBOR
The Corporation, BANA  and certain Merrill Lynch entities have
been named  as defendants along with most of the other London
Interbank Offered Rate  (LIBOR) panel banks in a number of
individual and putative class actions by persons alleging they
sustained losses on U.S. dollar LIBOR-based financial
instruments as a result of collusion or manipulation by
defendants regarding the setting of U.S. dollar LIBOR. Plaintif fs
assert a variety of claims, including antitrust, Commodity
Exchange Act, Racketee r Influenced and Corru pt Organizations
(RICO), Securities Exchange Act of 1934, common law fraud and
breach of contract claims, and seek compensatory , treble and
punitive damages, and injunctive relief. All cases naming the
Corporation and its affiliates relating to U.S. dollar LIBOR are
pending in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New
York.
The District Court has dismissed all RICO claims, and
dismissed all manipulation claims based on alleged trader
conduct against Bank of America entities. The District Court has
also substantially limited the scope of antitrust, Commodity
Exchange Act and various other claims, including by dismissing
in their entirety certain individual and putative class plaintif fs’
antitrust claims for lack of standing and/or personal jurisdiction.
Plaintif fs whose antitrust claims were dismissed by the District
Court are pursuing appeals in the Second Circuit. Certain
individual and putative class actions remain pending in the
District Court against the Corporation, BANA  and certain Merrill
Lynch entities.
On February 28, 2018, the District Court denied certification
of proposed classes of lending institutions and persons that
transacted in eurodollar futures, and the U.S. Court of Appeals
for the Second Circuit subsequently denied petitions filed by
those plaintif fs for interlo cutory appeals of those rulings. Also on
February 28, 2018, the District Court granted certification of a
class of persons that purchased OTC swaps and notes that
referenced U.S. dollar LIBOR from one of the U.S. dollar LIBOR
panel banks, limited to claims under Section 1 of the Sherman
Act. The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit
subsequently denied a petition filed by the defendants for
interlocutory appeal of that ruling.
Mortgage Appraisal Litigation
The Corpora tion, Count rywide and certain affiliates are named
as defendants in two consolidated putative class action lawsuits
filed in the U.S. District Court for the Central District of California
(Waldrup and Williams, et al.). Plaintif fs allege that Countrywide
and a former Country wide subsidiary , LandSafe Appraisal
Services, Inc., arranged for and completed appraisals that were
not in compliance with applicable laws and appraisal standards.
Plaintif fs assert a RICO claim and seek, among other forms of
relief, compensatory and treble damages. On February 8, 2018,
133     Bank of America
 
the District Court granted plaintif fs’ motion for class certification.
On May 22, 2018, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit
denied defendants’  petition for permission to file an interlocutory
appeal of the District Court’ s ruling granting class certification.
On January 21, 2020, the parties agreed to resolve the
litigation for an amount that is not material to the Corporation,
and which was fully accrued as of December 31, 2019. The
agreement is subject to court approval.
U.S. Bank - Harborview and SURF/OWNIT Repurchase
Litigation
Beginning in 2011, U.S. Bank, National Association (U.S. Bank),
as trustee for the HarborV iew Mortgage Loan Trust 2005-10 and
various SURF/OWNIT  RMBS trusts filed complaints against the
Corporation, Countrywid e entities, Merrill Lynch entities and
other affiliate s in New York Supreme Court alleging breaches of
representations and warranties. The defenda nts and certain
certificate-holders in the trusts agreed to settle the respective
matters in amounts not material to the Corporation, subject to
acceptance by U.S. Bank. The litigations have been stayed
pending finalization of the settlements.
NOTE 14  Shareholders’  Equity
Common Stock
Declared Quarterly Cash Dividends on Common
Stock (1)
Declaration Date Record Date  Payment Date Dividend
Per Share
January 29, 2020 March 6, 2020 March 27, 2020 $ 0.18
October 22, 2019 December 6, 2019 December 27, 2019 0.18
July 25, 2019 September 6, 2019 September 27, 2019 0.18
April 24, 2019 June 7, 2019  June 28, 2019 0.15
January 30, 2019 March 1, 2019 March 29, 2019 0.15
(1) In 2019, and through February 19, 2020 .
The cash dividends paid per share of common stock were $0.66,
$0.54 and $0.39 for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , respectively .
The following table summarizes common stock repurchases
during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
Common Stock Repurchase Summary
(in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Total share repurchases, including CCAR
capital plan repurchases 956 676 509
Purchase price of shares repurchased
and retired    
CCAR capital plan repurchases $25,644$16,754$9,347
Other authorized repurchases 2,500 3,340 3,467
   Total shares repurchased $28,144$20,094$12,814
On June 28, 2018, following the non-objection of the Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System (Federal Reserve) to
the Corporation’ s 2018 Comprehensive Capital Analysis and
Review (CCAR) capital plan, the Corporat ion’s Board of
Directors (Board) authorized the repurchase of approximately
$20.6 billion in common stock from July 1, 2018 through June
30, 2019, which included approximately $600 millio n in
repurchases to offset shares awarded under equity-based
compensation plans during the same period. On February 7,
2019, following approval by the Federal Reserve, the Board
authorized the repurchase of an additional $2.5 billion  of
common stock by June 30, 2019.
On June 27, 2019, following the Federal Reserve's non- common stock from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, which
includes approximately $900 millio n in repurch ases to offset
shares awar ded under equity-based compensat ion plans during
the same period.
During 2019 , the Corporation repurchased 956 million  shares
of common stock in connection with the Board's 2018 and 2019
repurchase authorizations, which reduced shareholders’  equity
by $28.1 billion .
In connection with employee stock plans, in 2019 , the
Corporation issued 91 million  shares of its common stock and, to
satisfy tax withholding obligations, repurchased 35 million shares
of its common stock.  At December 31, 2019 , the Corporation had
reserved 579 million unissued shares of common stock for future
issuances under employee stock plans, conve rtible notes and
preferred stock.
Preferred Stock
The cash dividends declared on preferred stock were $1.4
billion , $1.5 billion and $1.6 billion for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 ,
respectively .
On June 20, 2019, the Corporation issued 40,000  shares of
5.125 % Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock,
Series JJ for $1.0 billion . On June 25, 2019, the Corporation
issued 55,900  shares of 5.375 % Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series KK for $1.4 billion. On Septem ber 17, 2019, the
Corporation issued 52,400  shares of 5.000 % Non-Cumulative
Preferred Stock, Series LL for $1.3 billion . Additionally , on
January 24, 2020, the Corporation issued 44,000  shares of
4.300 % Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock,
Series MM for $1.1 billion .
In 2019 , the Corporation fully redeemed Series V and Series
W preferred stock for $2.6 billion . Additionally , on January 27,
2020, the Corporation fully redeemed Series Y preferred stock
for $1.1 billion .
All series of preferred stock in the Preferred Stock Summary
table have a par value of $0.01 per share, are not subject to the
operation of a sinking fund, have no participation  rights, and with
the excepti on of the Series L Preferred Stock, are not
convertible. The holders of the Series B Prefe rred Stock and
Series 1 through 5 Preferred Stock have general voting rights
and vote together with the common stock. The holders of the
other series included in the table have no gene ral voting rights.
All outstanding series of preferred stock of the Corporation have
preference over the Corporation’ s common stock with respect to
the payment of dividends and distribution of the Corporation’ s
assets in the event of a liquidation or dissolution. With the
exception of the Series B, F, G and T Preferred Stock, if any
dividend payable on these series is in arrears for three  or more
semi-annual or six or more quarterly dividend periods, as
applicable (whether consecutive or not), the holders of these
series and any other class or series of preferred stock ranking
equally as to payment of dividends and upon which equivalent
voting rights have been conferred and are exercisable (voting as
a single class) will be entitled to vote for the election of two
additional directors. These voting rights terminate when the
Corporation has paid in full dividends on these series for at least
two semi-annual or four quarterly dividend periods, as
applicable, following the dividend arrearage.
The 7.25% Non-Cumul ative Perpetual Convertible Preferred
Stock, Series L (Series L Preferred Stock) does not have early
redemption/call rights. Each share of the Series L Preferred
Stock may be converted at any time, at the option of the holder ,
into 20 shares of the Corporation’ s common stock plus cash in
lieu of fractional shares.  The Corporation may cause some or all
of the Series L Preferred  Stock, at its option, at any time or from
time to time, to be converted into shares of common stock at the
then-applicable conversion rate if, for 20 trading days during any
period
, , g
objection to the Corporation's 2019 CCAR capita l plan, the Board
authorized the repurchase of approximately $30.9 billion  in
  Bank of America    134
of 30 consecutive  trading days, the closing price of common
stock excee ds 130 percent  of the then-applicable conversion
price of the Series L Preferred Stock. If a conversion of Series L
Preferred Stock occurs at the option of the holder , subsequent to
a dividend record date but prior to the dividend payment date, the
Corporation will still pay any accrued dividends payable.
The table below presents a summary of perpetual preferred
stock outstanding at December 31, 2019 .
Preferred Stock Summary       
(Dollars in millions, except as noted)        
Series Description  Initial
Issuance
DateTotal
Shares
Outstanding  Liquidation
Preference
per Share
(in dollars)Carrying
ValuePer Annum
Dividend Rate  Dividend per
Share
(in dollars)Annual
Dividend Redemption Period (1)
Series B7% Cumulative
Redeemable  June
1997 7,110  $ 100 $ 1 7.00% $ 7.00 $ — n/a
Series E (2)Floating Rate Non-
Cumulative  November
2006 12,691  25,000 317 3-mo. LIBOR + 35 bps (3) 1.01 13On or after
November 15, 2011
Series FFloating Rate Non-
Cumulative  March
2012 1,409  100,000 141 3-mo. LIBOR + 40 bps (3) 4,055.56 6On or after
March 15, 2012
Series GAdjustable Rate Non-
Cumulative  March
2012 4,926  100,000 493 3-mo. LIBOR + 40 bps (3) 4,055.56 20On or after
March 15, 2012
Series L7.25% Non-
Cumulative Perpetual
Convertible  January
2008 3,080,182  1,000 3,080 7.25% 72.50 223 n/a
Series T 6% Non-cumulative  September
2011 354 100,000 35 6.00% 6,000.00 2 After May 7, 2019
Series U (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  May
2013 40,000  25,000 1,0005.2% to, but excluding,
6/1/23; 3-mo. LIBOR +
313.5 bps thereafter  52.00 52On or after
June 1, 2023
Series X (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  September
2014 80,000  25,000 2,0006.250% to, but excluding,
9/5/24; 3-mo. LIBOR +
370.5 bps thereafter  62.50 125On or after
September 5, 2024
Series Y (2)6.500% Non-
Cumulative  January
2015 44,000  25,000 1,100 6.500 % 1.63 72On or after
January 27, 2020
Series Z (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  October
2014 56,000  25,000 1,4006.500% to, but excluding,
10/23/24; 3-mo. LIBOR +
417.4 bps thereafter  65.00 91On or after
October 23, 2024
Series AA (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  March 2015 76,000  25,000 1,9006.100% to, but excluding,
3/17/25; 3-mo. LIBOR +
389.8 bps thereafter  61.00 116On or after
March 17, 2025
Series CC (2)6.200% Non-
Cumulative  January
2016 44,000  25,000 1,100 6.200 % 1.55 68On or after
January 29, 2021
Series DD  (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  March 2016 40,000  25,000 1,0006.300% to, but excluding,
3/10/26; 3-mo. LIBOR +
455.3 bps thereafter  63.00 63On or after
March 10, 2026
Series EE  (2)6.000% Non-
Cumulative  April 2016 36,000  25,000 900 6.000 % 1.50 54On or after
April 25, 2021
Series FF  (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  March 2018 94,000  25,000 2,3505.875% to, but excluding,
3/15/28; 3-mo. LIBOR +
293.1 bps thereafter  58.75 138On or after
March 15, 2028
Series GG  (2)6.000% Non-
Cumulative  May
2018 54,000  25,000 1,350 6.000 % 1.50 81On or after
May 16, 2023
Series HH (2)5.875% Non-
Cumulative  July
2018 34,160  25,000 854 5.875 % 1.47 50On or after
July 24, 2023
Series JJ (4)Fixed-to-Floating
Rate Non-Cumulative  June
2019 40,000  25,000 1,0005.125% to, but excluding,
6/20/24; 3-mo. LIBOR +
329.2 bps thereafter  25.63 26On or after
June 20, 2024
Series KK (2)5.375% Non-
Cumulative  June
2019 55,900  25,000 1,398 5.375 % 0.67 38On or after
June 25, 2024
Series LL  (2)5.000% Non-
Cumulative  September
2019 52,400  25,000 1,310 5.000 % 0.31 16On or after
September 17, 2024
Series 1 (5)Floating Rate Non-
Cumulative  November
2004 3,275  30,000 98 3-mo. LIBOR + 75 bps (6) 0.82 3On or after
November 28, 2009
Series 2 (5)Floating Rate Non-
Cumulative  March
2005 9,967  30,000 299 3-mo. LIBOR + 65 bps (6) 0.81 10On or after
November 28, 2009
Series 4 (5)Floating Rate Non-
Cumulative  November
2005 7,010  30,000 210 3-mo. LIBOR + 75 bps (3) 1.01 9On or after
November 28, 2010
Series 5 (5)Floating Rate Non-
Cumulative  March
2007 14,056  30,000 422 3-mo. LIBOR + 50 bps (3) 1.01 17On or after
May 21, 2012
Issuance costs and certain adjustments   (357)    
Total    3,887,440   $23,401     
(1) The Corporation may redeem series of preferred stock on or after the redemption date, in whole or in part, at its option, at the liquidation preference plus declared and unpaid dividends. Series B
and Series L  Preferred Stock do not have early redemption/call rights.
(2) Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared.
(3) Subject to 4.00% minimum rate per annum.
(4) Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/25th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a semi-annual cash dividend, if and when declared, until the first
redemption date at which time, it adjusts to a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared, thereafter .
(5) Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared.
(6) Subject to 3.00% minimum rate per annum.
n/a = not applicable
135     Bank of America
 
NOTE 15  Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
The table below presents the changes in accumulated OCI after-tax for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
(Dollars in millions) Debt SecuritiesDebit Valuation
Adjustments Derivatives Employee
Benefit PlansForeign
Currency Total
Balance, December 31, 2016 $ (1,267)$ (767)$ (895) $ (3,480)$ (879)$ (7,288)
Net change 61 (293) 64 288 86 206
Balance, December 31, 2017 $ (1,206)$ (1,060)$ (831) $ (3,192)$ (793)$ (7,082)
Accounting change related to certain tax effects (393) (220) (189) (707) 239 (1,270)
Cumulative adjustment for hedge accounting change — — 57 — — 57
Net change (3,953) 749 (53) (405) (254) (3,916)
Balance, December 31, 2018 $ (5,552)$ (531)$ (1,016) $ (4,304)$ (808)$ (12,211)
Net change 5,875 (963) 616 136 (86) 5,578
Balance, December 31, 2019 $ 323 $ (1,494)$ (400) $ (4,168)$ (894)$ (6,633)
The table below presents the net change in fair value recorded in accumulated OCI, net realized gains and losses reclassified
into earnings and other changes for each component of OCI pre- and after-tax for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
 PretaxTax
effect After-
tax Pretax Tax
effectAfter-
tax PretaxTax
effect After-
tax
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018  2017
Debt securities:         
Net increase (decrease) in fair value $8,020 $(2,000) $6,020 $(5,189) $1,329 $(3,860) $240 $ 14 $254
Net realized (gains) reclassified into earnings (1) (193) 48 (145) (123) 30 (93) (304) 111 (193)
Net change 7,827 (1,952) 5,875 (5,312) 1,359 (3,953) (64) 125 61
Debit valuation adjustments:         
Net increase (decrease) in fair value (1,276) 289 (987) 952 (224) 728 (490) 171 (319)
Net realized losses reclassified into earnings (1) 18 6 24 26 (5) 21 42 (16) 26
Net change (1,258) 295 (963) 978 (229) 749 (448) 155 (293)
Derivatives:         
Net increase (decrease) in fair value 692 (156) 536 (232) 74 (158) (50) 1 (49)
Reclassifications into earnings:         
Net interest income 104 (26) 78 165 (40) 125 327 (122) 205
Compensation and benefits expense 2 — 2 (27) 7 (20) (148) 56 (92)
Net realized losses reclassified into earnings 106 (26) 80 138 (33) 105 179 (66) 113
Net change 798 (182) 616 (94) 41 (53) 129 (65) 64
Employee benefit plans:         
Net increase (decrease) in fair value 41 (21) 20 (703) 164 (539) 223 (55) 168
Net actuarial losses and other reclassified into earnings (2) 150 (36) 114 171 (46) 125 179 (61) 118
Settlements, curtailments and other 3 (1) 2 11 (2) 9 3 (1) 2
Net change 194 (58) 136 (521) 116 (405) 405 (117) 288
Foreign currency:         
Net (decrease) in fair value (13) (52) (65) (8) (195) (203) (439) 430 (9)
Net realized (gains) losses reclassified into earnings (3) (110) 89 (21) (149) 98 (51) (606) 701 95
Net change (123) 37 (86) (157) (97) (254) (1,045) 1,131 86
Total other comprehensive income (loss) $7,438 $(1,860) $5,578 $(5,106) $1,190 $(3,916) $(1,023)$1,229 $206
(1) Reclassifications of pretax debt securities and DV A are recorded in other income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
(2) Reclassifications of pretax employee benefit plan costs are recorded in other general operating expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
(3) Reclassifications of pretax debt securities, DV A and foreign currency (gains) losses are recorded in other income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
  Bank of America    136
NOTE 16  Earnings Per Common Share
The calculat ion of EPS and diluted EPS for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  is presented below . For more information on the calculation of
EPS, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles .
(In millions, except per share information) 2019  2018 2017
Earnings per common share    
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
Preferred stock dividends (1,432) (1,451) (1,614)
Net income applicable to common shareholders $ 25,998 $ 26,696 $ 16,618
Average common shares issued and outstanding 9,390.5 10,096.5 10,195.6
Earnings per common share $ 2.77 $ 2.64 $ 1.63
Diluted earnings per common share     
Net income applicable to common shareholders $ 25,998 $ 26,696 $ 16,618
Add preferred stock dividends due to assumed conversions (1) — — 186
Net income allocated to common shareholders $ 25,998 $ 26,696 $ 16,804
Average common shares issued and outstanding 9,390.5 10,096.5 10,195.6
Dilutive potential common shares (2) 52.4 140.4 582.8
Total diluted average common shares issued and outstanding 9,442.9 10,236.9 10,778.4
Diluted earnings per common share $ 2.75 $ 2.61 $ 1.56
(1) Represents the Series T dividends under the "If-converted" method prior to conversion.
(2) Includes incremental dilutive shares from RSUs, restricted stock and warrants.
For 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , 62 million  average dilutive
potential common shares associated with the Series L preferred
stock were not included  in the diluted share count because the
result would have been antidilutive under the “if-converted”
method. For 2018  and 2017 , avera ge options to purchase four
million  and 21 million  share s of common stock were outstanding
but not included in the computation of EPS because the result
would have been antidilutive under the treasury stock method.
For 2017 , average warrants to purchase 122 millio n share s of
common stock were outstanding but not included in the
computation of EPS because the result would have been
antidilutive under the treasury stock method. These warrants
expired on October 29, 2018. For 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , average
warrants to purchase three million , 136 million  and 143 million
shares of common stock, respectively , were included in the
diluted EPS calculation under the treasury stock method.
Substantially all of these  warrants were exercis ed on or before
their expiration date of January 16, 2019.
NOTE 17  Regulatory Requirements and
Restrictions
The Federal Reserve, Office of the Comptroller  of the Currency
(OCC) and FDIC (collectively , U.S. banking regulators) jointly
establish regulatory capital adequacy guidelines, including Basel
3, for U.S. banking organizations. As a financial holding
company , the Corporation is subject to capital adequacy rules
issued by the Federal Reserve. The Corporation’ s banking entity affiliates are
subject to capital adequacy rules issued by the OCC.
The Corporation and its primary banking entity affiliate,
BANA, are Advanced approaches institutions under Basel 3. As
Advanced approaches institutions, the Corp oration and its
banking entity affiliates are required to report regulatory risk-
based capital ratios and risk-weighted assets under both the
Standardized and Advanced approaches. The approach that
yields the lower ratio is used to assess capital adequacy ,
including under the Prompt Corrective Action (PCA) framework.
At December 31, 2019  and 2018 , Common equity tier 1 and Tier
1 capital ratios were lower under the Standardized approach
whereas the Advanced approaches yielded a lower result for the
Total capital ratio.
The Corporation is required to maintain a minimum
supplementary leverage ratio (SLR) of 3.0 percent plus a
leverage buffer of 2.0 percent in order to avoid certain
restrictions on capital distributions and discretionary bonus
payments. The Corporation’ s insured depository institution
subsidiaries are required to maintain a minimum 6.0 percent SLR
to be considered well capitalized under the PCA  framework.
The following table presents capital ratios and related
information in accordance with Basel 3 Standardized and
Advanced approaches as measured at December 31, 2019  and
2018  for the Corporation and BANA.
137     Bank of America
 
Regulatory Capital under Basel 3     
 Bank of America Corporation  Bank of America, N.A.
Standardized
ApproachAdvanced
Approaches  Regulatory
Minimum  (1) Standardized
ApproachAdvanced
Approaches  Regulatory
Minimum (2)
(Dollars in millions, except as noted) December 31, 2019
Risk-based capital metrics:      
Common equity tier 1 capital$166,760 $166,760  $154,626 $154,626 
Tier 1 capital188,492 188,492  154,626 154,626 
Total capital (3)221,230 213,098  166,567 158,665 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions)1,493 1,447  1,241 991 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio11.2% 11.5% 9.5% 12.5% 15.6% 7.0%
Tier 1 capital ratio12.6 13.0 11.0 12.5 15.6 8.5
Total capital ratio14.8 14.7 13.0 13.4 16.0 10.5
Leverage-based metrics:     
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) (4)$ 2,374 $ 2,374  $ 1,780 $ 1,780 
Tier 1 leverage ratio7.9% 7.9% 4.0 8.7% 8.7% 5.0
SLR leverage exposure (in billions)$ 2,946  $ 2,177 
SLR6.4% 5.0 7.1% 6.0
 December 31, 2018
Risk-based capital metrics:       
Common equity tier 1 capital$167,272 $167,272  $149,824 $149,824 
Tier 1 capital189,038 189,038  149,824 149,824 
Total capital (3)221,304 212,878  161,760 153,627 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions)1,437 1,409  1,195 959 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio11.6% 11.9% 8.25% 12.5% 15.6% 6.5%
Tier 1 capital ratio13.2 13.4 9.75 12.5 15.6 8.0
Total capital ratio15.4 15.1 11.75 13.5 16.0 10.0
Leverage-based metrics:     
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) (4)$ 2,258 $ 2,258  $ 1,719 $ 1,719 
Tier 1 leverage ratio8.4% 8.4% 4.0 8.7% 8.7% 5.0
      
SLR leverage exposure (in billions)$ 2,791  $ 2,112 
SLR6.8% 5.0 7.1% 6.0
(1) The capital conservation buffer and global systemically important bank surcharge were 2.5 percent  at December 31, 2019 and 1.875  percent  at December 31, 2018. The countercyclical capital buffer for
both periods was zero. The SLR minimum includes a leverage buf fer of 2.0 percent.
(2) Risk-based capita l regulatory minimums  at December 31, 2019 are the minimu m ratios under Basel 3 including a capital conservation buffer of 2.5 percent. The regulatory minimums for the
leverage ratios as of both period ends and risk-based capital ratios as of December 31, 2018 are the percent required to be considered well capitalized under the PCA  framework.
(3) Total capital under the Advanced approaches dif fers from the Standardized approach due to dif ferences in the amount permitted in Tier 2 capital related to the qualifying allowance for credit losses.
(4) Reflects total average assets adjusted for certain Tier 1 capital deductions.
The capital adequacy rules issued by the U.S. banking
regulators require institu tions to meet the established minimums
outlined in the table above. Failure to meet the minimum
requirements can lead to certain mandatory and discretionary
actions by regulators that could have a material adverse impact
on the Corporation’ s financial position. At December 31, 2019
and 2018 , the Corporation and its banking entity affiliates were
well capitalized.
Other Regulatory Matters
The Federal Reserve requires the Corporation’ s bank
subsidiaries to maintain reserve requirements based on a
percentage of certain deposit liabilities. The average daily
reserve balance requirements, in excess of vault cash,
maintained by the Corporation with the Federal Reserve Bank
were $14.6 billion and $11.4 billion for 2019  and 2018 . At
December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the Corporation had cash and
cash equiva lents in the amount of $6.3 billion and $5.8 billion,
and securities with a fair value of $14.7 billion and $16.6 billion
that were segregated in compliance with securities regulations.
Cash held on deposit with the Federal Reserve Bank to meet
reserve requirements and cash and cash equivalents segregated
in complian ce with securities regulations are components of
restricted cash. For more information, see Note 11 – Federal
Funds Sold or Purchased, Securities Financing Agreements,
Short-term Borrowings and Restricted Cash . In addition, at December 31, 2019  and 2018 , the Corpor ation had
cash deposited with clearing organizations of $7.6 billion  and
$8.1 billion  primarily recorded in other assets on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Bank Subsidiary Distributions
The primary sources of funds for cash distributions by the
Corporation to its shareh olders are capital distributions received
from its bank subsidiarie s, BANA  and Bank of America California,
N.A. In 2019 , the Corporation receive d dividends of $20.5 billion
from BANA  and $215 million from Bank of America California,
N.A. In addition, BANA  returned capital of $8.0 billion to the
Corporation in 2019 .
The amount  of dividends that a subsidiary bank may declare
in a calenda r year without OCC approval is the subsidiary bank’ s
net profits for that year combined with its retained net profits for
the preceding two years. Reta ined net profits, as defined by the
OCC, consis t of net income less dividends declared during the
period. In 2020 , BANA  can declare and pay dividends of
approximately $9.4 billion  to the Corporation plus an additional
amount equal to its retained net profits for 2020  up to the date of
any such dividend declaration. Bank of America California, N.A.
can pay dividends of $94 million  in 2020  plus an additional
amount equal to its retained net profits for 2020  up to the date of
any such dividend declaration.
  Bank of America    138
NOTE 18  Employee Benefit Plans
Pension and Postretirement Plans
The Corporation sponsors a qualified noncontributory trusteed
pension plan (Qualified Pension Plan), a number of
noncontributory nonqua lified pension plans, and postretirement
health and life plans that cover eligible employees. Non-U.S.
pension plans sponsore d by the Corporation vary based on the
country and local practices.
The Qualified Pension Plan has a balance guarantee feature
for account  balances with participant-selected investments,
applied at the time a benefit payment is made from the plan that
effectively provides principal protection for participant balances
transferred and certain compensation credits. The Corporation is
responsible for funding any shortfall on the guarantee feature.
Benefits earned under the Qualified Pension Plan have been
frozen. Thereafter , the cash balance accounts continue to earn
investment credits or interest credits in accordance with the
terms of the plan document.
The Corporation has an annuity contract that guarantees the
payment of benefits vested under a terminated U.S. pension plan
(Other Pension Plan). The Corporation, under a supplemental
agreement, may be responsible for, or benefit from actual
experience and investment performance of the annuity assets.
The Corporation made no contribution under this agreement in
2019  or 2018 . Contributions may be required in the future under
this agreement. The Corporation’ s noncontributory , nonqualified pension plans
are unfunde d and provide supplemental defined pension benefits
to certain eligible employees.
In addition to retiremen t pension benefits, certain benefits-
eligible employees may become eligible to conti nue participation
as retirees in health care and/or life insurance plans sponsored
by the Corporation. These plans are referred to as the
Postretirement Health and Life Plans.
The Pension and Postretirement Plans table summarizes the
changes in the fair value of plan assets, changes in the projected
benefit obligation (PBO), the funded status of both the
accumulated benefit obligation (ABO) and the PBO, and the
weighted-average assumptions used to determine benefit
obligations for the pension plans and postretirement plans at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 . The estimate of the Corporation’ s
PBO associated with these plans considers various actuarial
assumptions, including assumptions for mortality rates and
discount rates. The discount rate assumptions are derived from a
cash flow matching technique that utilizes rates that are based
on Aa-rated corporate bonds with cash flows that match
estimated benefit payments of each of the plans . The decreases
in the weighted-average discount rates in 2019  resulted in
increases to the PBO of approximately $2.2 billion  at December
31, 2019 . The increases in the weighted-average discount rates
in 2018  resulted in decreases to the PBO of approximately $1.3
billion  at December 31, 2018 . Significant gains and losses
related to changes in the PBO for 2019  and 2018  primarily
resulted from changes in the discount rate.
Pension and Postretirement
Plans (1)   
 Qualified
Pension PlanNon-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified and Other
Pension Plans  Postretirement
Health and Life Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2019  2018 2019 2018  2019  2018
Fair value, January 1 $ 18,178  $ 19,708 $ 2,461  $ 2,943 $ 2,584 $ 2,724  $ 252 $ 300
Actual return on plan assets 3,187  (550) 273 (181) 228 8 5 5
Company contributions — — 20 22 91 91 24 43
Plan participant contributions — — 1 1 — — 103 115
Settlements and curtailments — — (42) (107) — — — —
Benefits paid (1,090 ) (980) (108) (52) (237) (239) (185) (214)
Federal subsidy on benefits paid  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a — 3
Foreign currency exchange rate changes  n/a  n/a 91 (165)  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a
Fair value, December 31 $ 20,275  $ 18,178 $ 2,696  $ 2,461 $ 2,666 $ 2,584  $ 199 $ 252
Change in projected benefit obligation             
Projected benefit obligation, January 1 $ 14,144  $ 15,706 $ 2,589  $ 2,814 $ 2,779 $ 3,047  $ 928 $ 1,056
Service cost — — 17 19 1 1 5 6
Interest cost 593 563 65 65 113 105 38 36
Plan participant contributions — — 1 1 — — 103 115
Plan amendments — — 2 13 — — — —
Settlements and curtailments — — (42) (107) — — — —
Actuarial loss (gain) 1,714  (1,145 ) 288 (29) 263 (135) 99 (73)
Benefits paid (1,090 ) (980) (108) (52) (237) (239) (185) (214)
Federal subsidy on benefits paid  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a  n/a — 3
Foreign currency exchange rate changes  n/a  n/a 75 (135)  n/a  n/a 1 (1)
Projected benefit obligation, December 31 $ 15,361  $ 14,144 $ 2,887  $ 2,589 $ 2,919 $ 2,779  $ 989 $ 928
Amounts recognized on Consolidated Balance
Sheet       
Other assets $ 4,914  $ 4,034 $ 364 $ 316 $ 733 $ 754 $ — $ —
Accrued expenses and other liabilities — — (555) (444) (986) (949) (790) (676)
Net amount recognized, December 31 $ 4,914  $ 4,034 $ (191) $ (128) $ (253) $ (195) $ (790) $ (676)
Funded status, December 31             
Accumulated benefit obligation $ 15,361  $ 14,144 $ 2,841  $ 2,542 $ 2,919 $ 2,778   n/a n/a
Overfunded (unfunded) status of ABO 4,914  4,034 (145) (81) (253) (194)  n/a n/a
Provision for future salaries — — 46 47 — 1  n/a n/a
Projected benefit obligation 15,361  14,144 2,887  2,589 2,919 2,779  $ 989 $ 928
Weighted-average assumptions, December 31             
Discount rate 3.32% 4.32% 1.81% 2.60% 3.20% 4.26% 3.27% 4.25%
Rate of compensation increase  n/a  n/a 4.10  4.49 4.00 4.00   n/a n/a
Interest-crediting rate 5.06  5.18 1.53  1.47 4.52 4.50  n/a n/a
(1) The measurement date for all of the above plans was December 31  of each year reported.
n/a = not applicable
139     Bank of America
 
The Corporation’ s estimate of its contributions to be made to
the Non-U.S. Pension Plans, Nonqualified and Other Pension
Plans, and Postretirement Health and Life Plans in 2020  is $21
million , $92 million  and $15 million , respectively . The Corporation
does not expect to make a contribution to the Qualified Pension
Plan in 2020 . It is the policy of the Corporation to fund no less
than the minimum funding amoun t required by the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA).
Pension Plans with ABO and PBO in excess of plan assets as
of December 31, 2019 and 2018  are presen ted in the table
below . For these plans , funding strategies vary due to legal
requirements and local practices.
Plans with ABO and PBO in Excess of Plan Assets    
 Non-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified
and Other
Pension Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2019 2018
PBO $ 744 $ 615 $ 988 $ 950
ABO 720 605 988 949
Fair value of plan assets 191 173 1 1
Components of Net Periodic Benefit Cost       
 Qualified Pension Plan Non-U.S. Pension Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Components of net periodic benefit cost (income)       
Service cost $ — $ — $ — $ 17 $ 19 $ 24
Interest cost 593 563 606 65 65 72
Expected return on plan assets (1,088) (1,136) (1,068) (99) (126) (136)
Amortization of net actuarial loss 135 147 154 6 10 8
Other — — — 4 12 (7)
Net periodic benefit cost (income) $ (360) $ (426) $ (308) $ (7) $ (20) $ (39)
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine net cost for years ended
December 31          
Discount rate 4.32% 3.68% 4.16% 2.60% 2.39% 2.56%
Expected return on plan assets 6.00 6.00 6.00 4.13 4.37 4.73
Rate of compensation increase  n/a n/a n/a 4.49 4.31 4.51
 Nonqualified and
Other Pension PlansPostretirement Health
and Life Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Components of net periodic benefit cost (income)       
Service cost $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 $ 5 $ 6 $ 6
Interest cost 113 105 117 38 36 43
Expected return on plan assets (95) (84) (95) (5) (6) —
Amortization of net actuarial loss (gain) 34 43 34 (24) (27) (21)
Other — — — (2) (3) 4
Net periodic benefit cost (income) $ 53 $ 65 $ 57 $ 12 $ 6 $ 32
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine net cost for years ended
December 31          
Discount rate 4.26% 3.58% 4.01% 4.25% 3.58% 3.99%
Expected return on plan assets 3.73 3.19 3.50 2.00 2.00  n/a
Rate of compensation increase 4.00 4.00 4.00  n/a  n/a  n/a
n/a = not applicable
The asset valuation method used to calculate the expected
return on plan assets component of net periodic benefit cost for
the Qualified  Pension Plan recognizes 60 percent  of the prior
year’s market gains or losses at the next measurement date with
the remaining 40 percent  spread equally over the subsequent
four years.
Gains and losses for all benefit plans except postretirement
health care are recognized in accordance with the standard
amortization provisions of the applicable accounting guidance.
Net periodi c postretirement health and life expense was
determined using the “projected unit credit” actuarial method. For
the Postreti rement Health and Life Plans, 50 percent  of the
unrecognized gain or loss at the beginning of the year (or at
subsequent remeasurement) is recognized on a level basis
during the year . Assumed health care cost trend rates affect the
postretirement benefit obligation and benefit cost reported for the
Postretirement Health and Life Plans. The assumed health care
cost trend rate used to measure the expected cost of benefits
covered by the Postretirement Health and Life Plans is 6.50
percent  for 2020 , reduc ing in steps to 5.00 percent in 2026 and
later years.
The Corpo ration’ s net periodic benefit cost (income)
recognized for the plans is sensitive to the discount rate and
expected return on plan assets. For the Qualifie d Pension Plan,
Non-U.S. Pension Plans, Nonqualified and Other Pension Plans,
and Postretirement Health and Life Plans, a 25 bp decline in
discount rates and expected return on assets would not have
had a significant impact on the net periodic benefit cost for 2019 .
  Bank of America    140
Pretax Amounts included in Accumulated OCI
and OCI       
 Qualified
Pension PlanNon-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified
and Other
Pension PlansPostretirement
Health and
Life Plans Total
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Net actuarial loss (gain) $3,865 $4,386 $559 $454 $1,008 $912 $ 48 $ (75)$5,480 $5,677
Prior service cost (credits) — — 18 18 — — (6) (9) 12 9
Amounts recognized in accumulated OCI $3,865 $4,386 $577 $472 $1,008 $912 $ 42 $ (84)$5,492 $5,686
         
Current year actuarial loss (gain) $(385) $541 $110 $270 $130 $ (59)$ 99 $ (73)$ (46) $679
Amortization of actuarial gain (loss) and
prior service cost (135) (147) (7) (11) (34) (43) 26 30 (150) (171)
Current year prior service cost (credit) — — 2 13 — — — — 2 13
Amounts recognized in OCI $(520)$394 $105 $272 $ 96 $(102)$125 $ (43)$(194)$521
Plan Assets
The Qualified Pension Plan has been established as a retirement
vehicle for participants, and trusts have been established to
secure benefits promised under the Qualified Pension Plan. The
Corporation’ s policy is to invest the trust asse ts in a prudent
manner for the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to
participants and defraying reasonable expenses of
administration. The Corporation’ s investment strategy is
designed to provide a total return that, over the long term,
increases the ratio of assets to liabilities. The strategy attempts
to maximize the investm ent return on assets at a level of risk
deemed appropriate by the Corporation while complying with
ERISA  and any applicable regulations and laws. The investment
strategy utilizes asset allocation as a principal determinant for
establishing the risk/return profile of the assets. Asset allocation
ranges are established,  periodically reviewed and adjusted as
funding levels and liability characteristics change. Active and
passive investment managers are employed to help enhance the
risk/return profile of the assets. An additional aspect of the
investment strategy used to minimize risk (part of the asset
allocation plan) includes  matching the exposure of participant-
selected investment measures.
The assets of the Non-U.S. Pension Plans are primarily
attributable to a U.K. pension plan. This U.K. pension plan’ s
assets are invested prudently so that the benefits promised to
members are provided with consideration given to the nature and
the duration of the plans ' liabilities. The selected asset allocation strategy is
designed to achieve a higher return than the lowest risk strategy .
The expected rate of return on plan assets assumption was
developed through analysis of historical market returns, historical
asset class volatility and correlations, current market conditions,
anticipated future asset allocations, the funds’  past experience,
and expectations on potential future marke t returns. The
expected return on plan assets assumption is determined using
the calculated market-related value for the Qualified Pension
Plan and the Other Pension Plan and the fair value for the Non-
U.S. Pension Plans and Postretirement Health and Life Plans.
The expected return on plan assets assumption represents a
long-term average view of the performance of the assets in the
Qualified Pension Plan, the Non-U.S. Pension Plans, the Other
Pension Plan, and Postretirement Health and Life Plans, a return
that may or may not be achieved during any one calendar year.
The Other Pension Plan is invested solely in an annuity contract
which is primarily invested in fixed-income securities structured
such that asset maturities match the duration of the plan’ s
obligations.
The target allocations for 2020  by asset category for the
Qualified Pension Plan, Non-U.S. Pension Plans, and
Nonqualified and Other Pension Plans are presented in the
following table. Equity securities for the Qualified Pension Plan
include common stock of the Corporation in the amounts of $315
million  (1.55 percent of total plan assets) and $221 million  (1.22
percent  of total plan assets) at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
2020 Target Allocation
 Percentage
Asset CategoryQualified
Pension PlanNon-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified
and Other
Pension Plans
Equity securities 15 - 50% 5 - 30% 0 - 5%
Debt securities 45 - 80% 40 - 70% 95 - 100%
Real estate 0 - 10% 0 - 15% 0 - 5%
Other 0 - 5% 10 - 40% 0 - 5%
Fair Value Measurements
For more information on fair value measureme nts, including descriptions of Level 1, 2 and 3 of the fair value hierarchy and the
valuation methods employed by the Corporation, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  and Note 21 – Fair
Value Measu rements . Combined plan investment assets measured at fair value by level and in total at December 31, 2019 and 2018
are summarized in the Fair V alue Measurements table.
141     Bank of America
 
Fair Value Measurements        
 Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
Cash and short-term investments          
Money market and interest-bearing cash $ 1,426 $ — $ — $ 1,426 $ 1,530 $ — $ — $ 1,530
Cash and cash equivalent
commingled/mutual funds — 250 — 250 — 644 — 644
Fixed income           
U.S. government and agency securities 4,403 890 8 5,301 3,637 805 9 4,451
Corporate debt securities — 3,676 — 3,676 — 2,852 — 2,852
Asset-backed securities — 2,684 — 2,684 — 2,119 — 2,119
Non-U.S. debt securities 748 1,015 — 1,763 539 961 — 1,500
Fixed income commingled/mutual funds 804 1,439 — 2,243 933 1,177 — 2,110
Equity           
Common and preferred equity securities 4,655 — — 4,655 4,414 — — 4,414
Equity commingled/mutual funds 147 1,355 — 1,502 288 1,275 — 1,563
Public real estate investment trusts 91 — — 91 104 — — 104
Real estate           
Private real estate — — — — — — 5 5
Real estate commingled/mutual funds — 18 927 945 — 13 885 898
Limited partnerships — 173 90 263 — 158 82 240
Other investments (1) 11 390 636 1,037 93 364 588 1,045
Total plan investment assets, at fair
value $12,285 $11,890 $ 1,661 $25,836 $11,538 $10,368 $ 1,569 $23,475
(1) Other investments include commodity and balanced funds of $233 million  and $305 million , insuranc e annuity  contracts of $614 million  and $562 million  and other various investments of $190 milli on
and $178 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
The Level 3 Fair Value Measurements table presents a reconciliation of all plan investment assets measured at fair value using
significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
Level 3 Fair Value Measurements  
 Balance
January 1  Actual Return on
Plan Assets Still
Held at the
Reporting DatePurchases, Sales
and SettlementsBalance
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019
Fixed income      
U.S. government and agency securities $ 9 $ — $ (1)$ 8
Real estate    
Private real estate 5 — (5) —
Real estate commingled/mutual funds 885 33 9 927
Limited partnerships 82 — 8 90
Other investments 588 6 42 636
Total $ 1,569 $ 39 $ 53 $ 1,661
 2018
Fixed income      
U.S. government and agency securities $ 9 $ — $ — $ 9
Real estate    
Private real estate 93 (7) (81) 5
Real estate commingled/mutual funds 831 52 2 885
Limited partnerships 85 (12) 9 82
Other investments 74 — 514 588
Total $ 1,092 $ 33 $ 444 $ 1,569
    
 2017
Fixed income    
U.S. government and agency securities $ 10 $ — $ (1)$ 9
Real estate    
Private real estate 150 8 (65) 93
Real estate commingled/mutual funds 748 63 20 831
Limited partnerships 38 14 33 85
Other investments 83 5 (14) 74
Total $ 1,029 $ 90 $ (27)$ 1,092
  Bank of America    142
Projected Benefit Payments
Benefit payments projected to be made from the Qualified Pension Plan, Non-U.S. Pension Plans, Nonqualified and Other Pension
Plans, and Postretirement Health and Life Plans are presented in the table below .
Projected Benefit Payments  
(Dollars in millions)Qualified
Pension Plan (1) Non-U.S.
Pension Plans (2) Nonqualified
and Other
Pension Plans (2)Postretirement
Health and
Life Plans (3)
2020$ 917 $ 108 $ 242 $ 83
2021926 107 245 80
2022927 110 232 77
2023917 116 230 74
2024924 126 223 72
2025 - 20294,409 594 1,011 313
(1) Benefit payments expected to be made from the plan’ s assets.
(2) Benefit payments expected to be made from a combination of the plans’  and the Corporation’ s assets.
(3) Benefit payments (net of retiree contributions) expected to be made from a combination of the plans’  and the Corporation’ s assets.
Defined Contribution Plans
The Corporation maintains qualified and non-qualified defined
contribution retirement plans. The Corporation recorded expense
of $1.0 billion in each of 2019 , 2018  and 2017  related to the
qualified defined contribution plans. At December 31, 2019 and
2018 , 189 million  and 212 million  shares of the Corporation’ s
common stock were held by these plans. Payments to the plans
for dividends on commo n stock were $133 million, $115 million
and $86 million  in 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , respectively .
Certain non-U.S. employees are covered under defined
contribution pension plans that are separately administered in
accordance with local laws.
NOTE 19  Stock-based Compensation Plans
The Corporation administers a number of equity compensation
plans, with awards being  granted predominantly from the Bank of
America Key Employee Equity Plan (KEEP). On April 24, 2019,
Bank of America's shareholders approved an amendment to the
KEEP  to increase the number of shares available for grant by
150 million . Subsequent to this amendment, 600 million  shares
of the Corpo ration’ s common stock are authorized to be used for
grants of awards.
During 2019  and 2018 , the Corporation granted 94 million
and 71 million RSU awards to certain employees under the
KEEP . These RSUs were authorized to settle predominantly in
shares of common stock of the Corporation. Certain RSUs will
be settled in cash or contain settlement provisions that subject
these awards to variable accounting whereby compensation
expense is adjusted to fair value based on changes in the share
price of the Corporation ’s common stock up to the settlement
date. Of the RSUs granted in 2019  and 2018 , 71 million  and 63
million  will vest predominantly over three years with most vesting
occurring in one-third increments on each of the first three
anniversaries of the grant date provided that the employee
remains continuously employed with the Corporation during that
time, and will be expens ed ratably over the vesting period, net of
estimated forfeitures, for non-retirement eligible employees
based on the grant-dat e fair value of the shares. For RSUs
granted to employees who are retirement eligible, the awards are
deemed authorized as of the beginning of the year preceding the
grant date when the incentive award plans are generally
approved. As a result, the estimated value is expensed ratably
over the year preceding the grant date. Additionally , 23 million
and eight million  of the RSUs granted in 2019  and 2018  will vest
predominantly over four years  with most vesting occurring in
one-fourth increments on each of the first four anniversaries of the grant date provided that the employee
remains continuously employed with the Corporation during that
time, and will be expens ed ratably over the vesting period, net of
estimated forfeitures, based on the grant-date fair value of the
shares.
The compensation cost for the stock-based plans was $2.1
billion , $1.8 billion and $2.2 billion and the related income tax
benefit was $511 million , $433 million  and $829 million  for 2019 ,
2018  and 2017 , respectively .
Restricted Stock/Units
The table below presents the status at December 31, 2019  of the
share-settled restricted stock/units and changes during 2019 .
 Stock-settled Restricted Stock/Units
 Shares/Units Weighted-
average Grant
Date Fair Value
Outstanding at January 1, 2019 165,621,246 $ 23.22
Granted 91,164,482 27.72
Vested (92,215,549) 19.30
Canceled (6,660,864) 27.49
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 157,909,315 27.93
The table below present s the status at December 31, 2019  of
the cash-settled RSUs and changes during 2019 .
Cash-settled Restricted Units  
 Units
Outstanding at January 1, 2019 2,609,122
Granted 2,455,177
Vested (3,006,707)
Canceled (93,170)
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 1,964,422
At December 31, 2019 , there was an estimated $1.6 billion of
total unrecognized compensation cost related to certain share-
based compensation awards that is expected to be recognized
over a period of up to four years, with a weighted-average period
of 2.2 years . The total fair value of restricted stock vested in
2019 , 2018  and 2017  was $2.6 billion, $2.3 billion and $1.3
billion , respectivel y. In 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , the amount of cash
paid to settle equity-based awards for all equity compensation
plans was $84 million , $1.3 billion  and $1.9 billion , respectively .
143     Bank of America
 
NOTE 20  Income T axes
The components of income tax expense for 2019 , 2018  and
2017  are presented in the table below .
Income Tax Expense  
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2017
Current income tax expense     
U.S. federal $ 1,136 $ 816$ 1,310
U.S. state and local 901 1,377 557
Non-U.S. 852 1,203 939
Total current expense 2,889 3,396 2,806
Deferred income tax expense     
U.S. federal 2,001 2,579 7,238
U.S. state and local 223 240 835
Non-U.S. 211 222 102
Total deferred expense 2,435 3,041 8,175
Total income tax expense$ 5,324 $ 6,437$ 10,981
Total income  tax expense does not reflect the tax effects of
items that are included in OCI each period. For more information,
see Note 15 – Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
(Loss) . Other tax effects included in OCI each period resulted in
an expense of $1.9 billion in 2019 and a benefit of $1.2 billion in
both 2018  and 2017 . Income tax expense for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  varied from the
amount computed by applying the statutory income tax rate to
income before income taxes. The Corporation’ s federal statutory
tax rate was 21 percent  for 2019  and 2018 , and 35 percent  for
2017 . A reconciliation of the expected U.S. federal income tax
expense, calculated by applying the federal statutory tax rate, to
the Corporation’ s actual income tax expense, and the effective
tax rates for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  are presen ted in the table
below .
On Decemb er 22, 2017, the President signed into law the Tax
Act which made significant changes to federal income tax law
including, among other things, reducing the statutory corporate
income tax rate to 21 percent from 35 percent  and changing the
taxation of the Corporation’ s non-U.S. busines s activities. The
impact on net income in 2017  was $2.9 billion , driven by $2.3
billion  in income tax expense , largely from a lower valuation of
certain U.S. deferred tax assets and liabilities. The change in the
statutory tax rate also impacted the Corporation’ s tax-
advantaged energy investments, resulting in a downward
valuation adjustment of $946 million  recorded in other income
and a related income tax benefit of $347 million, which when
netted against the $2.3 billion , resulted in a net impact on income
tax expense of $1.9 billion .
Reconciliation of Income Tax Expense      
 Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018  2017
Expected U.S. federal income tax expense $ 6,878 21.0 % $ 7,263 21.0 % $10,225 35.0 %
Increase (decrease) in taxes resulting from:       
State tax expense, net of federal benefit 1,283 3.9 1,367 4.0 881 3.0
Affordable housing/energy/other credits (2,365) (7.2) (1,888) (5.5) (1,406) (4.8)
Changes in prior-period UTBs, including interest (613) (1.9) 144 0.4 133 0.5
Tax-exempt income, including dividends (433) (1.3) (413) (1.2) (672) (2.3)
Stock-based compensation (225) (0.7) (257) (0.7) (236) (0.8)
Rate differential on non-U.S. earnings 504 1.5 98 0.3 (272) (0.9)
Nondeductible expenses 290 0.9 302 0.9 97 0.3
Tax law changes — — — — 2,281 7.8
Other 5 0.1 (179) (0.6) (50) (0.2)
Total income tax expense $ 5,324 16.3 % $ 6,437 18.6 % $10,981 37.6 %
The reconcil iation of the beginning unrecognized  tax benefits
(UTB) balance to the ending balance is presented in the
following table.
Reconciliation of the Change in Unrecognized Tax
Benefits
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018 2017
Balance, January 1 $ 2,197 $ 1,773 $ 875
Increases related to positions
taken during the current year 238 395 292
Increases related to positions
taken during prior years (1) 401 406 750
Decreases related to positions
taken during prior years (1) (1,102) (371) (122)
Settlements (541) (6) (17)
Expiration of statute of limitations (18) — (5)
Balance, December 31 $ 1,175 $ 2,197 $ 1,773
(1) The sum of the positions taken during prior years differs from the $(613) million, $144 million
and $133 million in the Reconciliat ion of Income Tax Expense table due to temporary items,
state items and jurisdictional offsets, as well as the inclusion of interest in the Reconciliation of
Income Tax Expense table. At December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 , the balance of the
Corporation’ s UTBs which would, if recognized, affect the
Corporation’ s effective tax rate was $814 million, $1.6 billion and
$1.2 billion, respectively . Included in the UTB balance are some
items the recognition of which would not affect the effective tax
rate, such as the tax effect of certain temporary  differences, the
portion of gross state UTBs that would be offset by the tax
benefit of the associated federal deduction and the portion of
gross non-U.S. UTBs that would be offset by tax reductions in
other jurisdictions.
It is reasona bly possible that the UTB balance may decrease
by as much as $64 million  during the next 12 months, since
resolved items will be removed from the balance whether their
resolution results in payment or recognition.
The Corporation recognized an interest benefit of $19 million
in 2019  and interest expense of $43 million  and $1 million  in
2018  and 2017 . At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the
Corporation’ s accrual for interest and penalties that related to
income taxes, net of taxes and remittances, was $147 millio n
and $218 million .
The Corporation files income tax returns in more than 100
state and non-U.S. jurisdictions each year. The IRS and other tax
authorities in countries and states in which the Corporation has
  Bank of America    144
significant business operations examine tax returns periodically
(continuously in some jurisdictions). The following table
summarizes the status of examinations by major jurisdiction for
the Corporation and various subsidiaries at December 31, 2019 .
Tax Examination Status  
 Years under
Examination (1) Status at
December 31 2019
United States 2017-2018 To begin in 2020
California 2012-2017 Field examination
New York 2016-2018 Field examination
United Kingdom 2018 Field examination
(1) All tax years subsequent to the years shown remain subject to examination.
Significant components of the Corporation’ s net deferred tax
assets and liabilities at December 31, 2019 and 2018  are
presented in the following table.
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019  2018
Deferred tax assets    
Net operating loss carryforwards $ 7,417 $ 7,993
Allowance for credit losses 2,354 2,400
Lease liability 2,321 —
Security, loan and debt valuations 1,860 1,818
Accrued expenses 1,719 1,875
Employee compensation and retirement benefits 1,622 1,564
Credit carryforwards 183 623
Available-for-sale securities — 1,854
Other 1,203 1,037
Gross deferred tax assets 18,679 19,164
Valuation allowance (1,989) (1,569)
Total deferred tax assets, net of valuation
allowance 16,690 17,595
    
Deferred tax liabilities   
Equipment lease financing 2,933 2,684
Right-to-use asset 2,246 —
Tax credit investments 1,577 940
Fixed assets 1,505 1,104
Available-for-sale securities 100 —
Other 1,885 2,126
Gross deferred tax liabilities 10,246 6,854
Net deferred tax assets $ 6,444 $ 10,741
The table below summarizes the deferred tax assets and
related valuation allowances recognized for the net operating
loss (NOL) and tax credit carryforwards at December 31, 2019 .
Net Operating Loss and Tax Credit Carryforward
Deferred Tax Assets
(Dollars in millions)Deferred
Tax Asset Valuation
Allowance Net
Deferred
Tax AssetFirst Year
Expiring
Net operating losses
- U.S. $ 312 $ — $ 312 After 2028
Net operating losses
- U.K. (1) 5,276 — 5,276 None
Net operating Management concluded  that no valua tion allowance was
necessary to reduce the deferred tax assets related to the U.K.
NOL carryforwards and U.S. federal and certain state NOL
carryforwards since estimated future taxable income will be
sufficient to utilize these assets prior to their expiration. The
majority of the Corporation’ s U.K. net deferred tax assets, which
consist primarily of NOLs, are expected to be realized by certain
subsidiaries over an extended number of years . Management’ s
conclusion is supported by financial results, profit forecasts for
the relevant  entities and the indefinite period to carry forward
NOLs. However , a material change in those estim ates could lead
management to reassess such valuation allowance conclusions.
At December 31, 2019 , U.S. federal income taxes had not
been provided on approximately $5.0 billion of tempor ary
differences associated with investments in non-U .S. subsidiaries
that are essentially permanent in duration. If the Corporation
were to record the associated deferred tax liability, the amount
would be approximately $1.0 billion .
NOTE 21  Fair V alue Measurements
Under applicable accounting standards, fair value is defined as
the exchange price that would be received for an asset or paid to
transfer a liability (an exit price) in the principal or most
advantageous market for the asset or liabilit y in an orderly
transaction between market participants on the measurement
date. The Corporation determines the fair values of its financial
instruments under applicable accounting standards that require
an entity to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize
the use of unobservable inputs. The Corporation categorizes its
financial instruments into three levels based on the established
fair value hierarchy and conducts a review of fair value hierarchy
classifications on a quarterly basis. Transfers into or out of fair
value hierarchy classifications are made if the significant inputs
used in the financial models measuring the fair values of the
assets and liabilities become unobservable or observable in the
current marketplace. For more information regarding the fair
value hierarchy and how the Corporation measures fair value,
see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles . The
Corporation accounts for certain financial instruments under the
fair value option. For more information, see Note 22 – Fair Value
Option .
Valuation Techniques
The following sections outline the valuation methodologies for
the Corporation’ s assets and liabilities. While the Corporation
believes its valuation methods are appropriate  and consistent
with other market participants, the use of different methodologies
or assumptions to determine the fair value of certain financial
instruments could result in a different estimate of fair value at the
reporting date.
During 2019, there were no significant changes to valuation
approaches or techniques that had, or are expected to have, a
material impact on the Corporation’ s consolidated financial
position or results of operations.
Trading Account Assets and Liabilities and Debt
Securities
The fair values of trading account assets and liabilities are
primarily based on actively traded markets where prices are
based on either direct market quotes or observed transactions.
The fair values of debt securities are generally based on quoted
market prices or marke t prices for similar assets. Liquidity is a
significant factor in the determination of the fair values of trading
account assets and liabilities and debt securities. Market price
quotes may not be readily available for some positions such as
positions within a market sector where trading activity has
slowed significantly or ceased. Some of these instruments are
valued using a discounted
losses - other non-
U.S. 493 (423) 70 Various
Net operating
losses - U.S.
states (2) 1,336 (580) 756 Various
Foreign tax credits 183 (183) — 2028
(1) Represents U.K. broker-dealer net operating losses that may be carried forward indefinitely .
(2) The net operating losses and related valuation allowances for U.S. states before considering
the benefit of federal deductions were $1.7 billion  and $734 million .145     Bank of America
 
cash flow model, which estimates the fair value of the securities
using interna l credit risk, and interest rate and prepayment risk
models that incorporate management’ s best estimate of current
key assumptions such as default rates, loss severity and
prepayment rates. Principal and interest cash flows are
discounted using an observable discount rate for similar
instruments with adjustments that managem ent believes a
market participant would consider in determining fair value for
the specific security . Other instruments are valued using a net
asset value approach which considers the value of the
underlying securities. Underlying assets are valued using
external pricing services, where available, or matrix pricing
based on the vintages and ratings. Situations of illiquidity
generally are triggered by the market’ s perception of credit
uncertainty regarding a single company or a specific market
sector . In these instances, fair value is determ ined based on
limited availa ble market information and other factors, principally
from reviewing the issuer ’s financial statements and changes in
credit ratings made by one or more rating agencies.
Derivative Assets and Liabilities
The fair values of deriv ative assets and liabiliti es traded in the
OTC market are determined using quantitative models that utilize
multiple market inputs including interest rates, prices and indices
to generate continuous yield or pricing curves and volatility
factors to value the position. The majority of market inputs are
actively quoted and can be validated through external sources,
including brokers, mark et transactions and third-party pricing
services. When third-party pricing services are used, the
methods and assumpti ons are reviewed by the Corporation.
Estimation risk is greater for derivative asset and liability
positions that are either option-based or have longer maturity
dates where observable market inputs are less readily available,
or are unobservable,  in which case, quantitative-based
extrapolations of rate, price or index scenarios are used in
determining fair values. The fair values of derivative assets and
liabilities include adjustments for market liquidity , counterparty
credit quality and other instrument-specific factors, where
appropriate. In addition, the Corporation incorp orates within its
fair value measurements of OTC derivativ es a valuation
adjustment to reflect the credit risk associate d with the net
position. Positions are netted by counterparty , and fair value for
net long exposures is adjusted for counterparty credit risk while
the fair value for net short exposures is adjusted for the
Corporation’ s own credit risk. The Corporation also incorporates
FVA within its fair value measurements to include funding costs
on uncollateralized derivatives and derivatives where the
Corporation is not permitted to use the collateral it receives. An
estimate of severity of loss is also used in the determination of
fair value, primarily based on market data.
Loans and Loan Commitments
The fair values of loans  and loan commitment s are based on
market prices, where available, or discounted cash flow analyses
using market-based credit spreads of comparable debt
instruments or credit derivatives of the specific borrower or
comparable borrowers. Results of discounted cash flow analyses
may be adjusted, as appropriate, to reflect other market
conditions or the perceived credit risk of the borrower .
Mortgage Servicing Rights
The fair values of MSRs are primarily deter mined using an
option-adjusted spread valuation approach, which factors in
prepayment risk to determine the fair value of MSRs. This approach consists
of projecting servicing cash flows under multiple interest rate
scenarios and discounting these cash flows using risk-adjusted
discount rates.
Loans Held-for-sale
The fair values of LHFS are based on quoted market prices,
where available, or are determined by discounting estimated
cash flows using interest rates approximating the Corporation’ s
current origination rates  for similar loans adjusted to reflect the
inherent credit risk. The borrower-specific credit risk is
embedded within the quoted market prices or is implied by
considering loan performance when selecting comparables.
Short-term Borrowings and Long-term Debt
The Corporation issues structured liabilities that have coupons or
repayment terms linked to the performance of debt or equity
securities, interest rates, indices, currencies or commodities. The
fair values of these structured liabilities are estimated using
quantitative models for the combined derivative and debt
portions of the notes. These models incorporate observable and,
in some instances, unobservable inputs including security prices,
interest rate yield curves, option volatility , currency , commodity or
equity rates and correlations among these inputs. The
Corporation also considers the impact of its own credit spread in
determining the discount rate used to value these liabilities. The
credit spread is determined by reference to observable spreads
in the secondary bond market.
Securities Financing Agreements
The fair values of certain reverse repurchase agreements,
repurchase agreements  and securities borrowed transactions
are determined using quantitative models, including discounted
cash flow models that require the use of multiple market inputs
including interest rates and spreads to generate continuous yield
or pricing curves, and volatility factors. The majority of market
inputs are actively quoted and can be validated through external
sources, including broke rs, market transactions and third-party
pricing services.
Deposits
The fair values of deposits are determined using quantitative
models, including discounted cash flow models that require the
use of multiple market inputs including interest rates and spreads
to generate continuous yield or pricing curves, and volatility
factors. The majority of market inputs are actively quoted and
can be validated through external sources, including brokers,
market transactions and third-party pricing services. The
Corporation considers the impact of its own credit spread in the
valuation of these liabilities. The credit risk is determined by
reference to observable credit spreads in the secondary cash
market.
Asset-backed Secured Financings
The fair values of asset-backed secured financings are based on
external broker bids, where available, or are determined by
discounting estimated cash flows using interest rates
approximating the Corporation’ s current origination rates for
similar loans adjusted to reflect the inherent credit risk.
  Bank of America    146
Recurring Fair Value
Assets and liabilities carried at fair value on a recurring basis at December 31, 2019 and 2018 , including financial instruments that
the Corporation accounts for under the fair value option, are summarized in the following tables.
 December 31, 2019
 Fair Value Measurements    
(Dollars in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3  Netting
Adjustments (1)Assets/Liabilities
at Fair Value
Assets       
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments $ 1,000 $ — $ — $ — $ 1,000
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under
agreements to resell — 50,364 — — 50,364
Trading account assets:       
U.S. Treasury and agency securities (2) 49,517 4,157 — — 53,674
Corporate securities, trading loans and other — 25,226 1,507 — 26,733
Equity securities 53,597 32,619 239 — 86,455
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 3,965 23,854 482 — 28,301
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS:      
U.S. government-sponsored agency guaranteed (2) — 24,324 — — 24,324
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS — 8,786 1,553 — 10,339
Total trading account assets (3) 107,079 118,966 3,781 — 229,826
Derivative assets 14,079 328,442 2,226 (304,262) 40,485
AFS debt securities:       
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 67,332 1,196 — — 68,528
Mortgage-backed securities:       
Agency — 122,528 — — 122,528
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations — 4,641 — — 4,641
Non-agency residential — 653 424 — 1,077
Commercial — 15,021 — — 15,021
Non-U.S. securities — 11,989 2 — 11,991
Other taxable securities — 3,876 65 — 3,941
Tax-exempt securities — 17,804 108 — 17,912
Total AFS debt securities 67,332 177,708 599 — 245,639
Other debt securities carried at fair value:      
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 3 — — — 3
Agency MBS — 3,003 — — 3,003
Non-agency residential MBS — 1,035 299 — 1,334
Non-U.S. and other securities 400 6,088 — — 6,488
Total other debt securities carried at fair value 403 10,126 299 — 10,828
Loans and leases — 7,642 693 — 8,335
Loans held-for-sale — 3,334 375 — 3,709
Other assets (4) 11,782 1,376 2,360 — 15,518
Total assets (5) $ 201,675 $ 697,958 $ 10,333 $ (304,262)$ 605,704
Liabilities       
Interest-bearing deposits in U.S. offices $ — $ 508 $ — $ — $ 508
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase — 16,008 — — 16,008
Trading account liabilities:       
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 13,140 282 — — 13,422
Equity securities 38,148 4,144 2 — 42,294
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 10,751 11,310 — — 22,061
Corporate securities and other — 5,478 15 — 5,493
Total trading account liabilities 62,039 21,214 17 — 83,270
Derivative liabilities 11,904 320,479 4,764 (298,918) 38,229
Short-term borrowings — 3,941 — — 3,941
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 13,927 1,507 — — 15,434
Long-term debt — 33,826 1,149 — 34,975
Total liabilities (5) $ 87,870 $ 397,483 $ 5,930 $ (298,918)$ 192,365
(1) Amounts represent the impact of legally enforceable master netting agreements and also cash collateral held or placed with the same counterparties.
(2) Includes $26.7 billion  of GSE obligations.
(3) Includes securities with a fair value  of $14.7 billion  that were segregated in complian ce with securities regulations or deposited with clearing organizations. This amount is included in the
parenthetical disclosure on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
(4) Includes MSRs of $1.5 billion  which are classified as Level 3 assets.
(5) Total recurring Level 3 assets were 0.42 percent of total consolidated assets, and total recurring Level 3 liabilities were 0.27 percent of total consolidated liabilities.
147     Bank of America
 
 December 31, 2018
 Fair Value Measurements    
(Dollars in millions) Level 1 Level 2  Level 3Netting
Adjustments (1) Assets/Liabilities
at Fair Value
Assets        
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments $ 1,214 $ — $ — $ — $ 1,214
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under
agreements to resell — 56,399 — — 56,399
Trading account assets:        
U.S. Treasury and agency securities (2) 53,131 1,593 — — 54,724
Corporate securities, trading loans and other — 24,630 1,558 — 26,188
Equity securities 53,840 23,163 276 — 77,279
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 5,818 19,210 465 — 25,493
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS:      
U.S. government-sponsored agency guaranteed (2) — 19,586 — — 19,586
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS — 9,443 1,635 — 11,078
Total trading account assets (3) 112,789 97,625 3,934 — 214,348
Derivative assets 9,967 315,413 3,466 (285,121) 43,725
AFS debt securities:        
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 53,663 1,260 — — 54,923
Mortgage-backed securities:        
Agency — 121,826 — — 121,826
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations — 5,530 — — 5,530
Non-agency residential — 1,320 597 — 1,917
Commercial — 14,078 — — 14,078
Non-U.S. securities — 9,304 2 — 9,306
Other taxable securities — 4,403 7 — 4,410
Tax-exempt securities — 17,376 — — 17,376
Total AFS debt securities 53,663 175,097 606 — 229,366
Other debt securities carried at fair value:      
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 1,282 — — — 1,282
Non-agency residential MBS — 1,434 172 — 1,606
Non-U.S. and other securities 490 5,357 — — 5,847
Total other debt securities carried at fair value 1,772 6,791 172 — 8,735
Loans and leases — 4,011 338 — 4,349
Loans held-for-sale — 2,400 542 — 2,942
Other assets (4) 15,032 1,775 2,932 — 19,739
Total assets (5) $ 194,437 $ 659,511 $ 11,990 $ (285,121) $ 580,817
Liabilities        
Interest-bearing deposits in U.S. offices $ — $ 492 $ — $ — $ 492
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase — 28,875 — — 28,875
Trading account liabilities:        
U.S. Treasury and agency securities 7,894 761 — — 8,655
Equity securities 33,739 4,070 — — 37,809
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 7,452 9,182 — — 16,634
Corporate securities and other — 5,104 18 — 5,122
Total trading account liabilities 49,085 19,117 18 — 68,220
Derivative liabilities 9,931 303,441 4,401 (279,882) 37,891
Short-term borrowings — 1,648 — — 1,648
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 18,096 1,979 — — 20,075
Long-term debt — 26,872 817 — 27,689
Total liabilities (5) $ 77,112 $ 382,424 $ 5,236 $ (279,882) $ 184,890
(1) Amounts represent the impact of legally enforceable master netting agreements and also cash collateral held or placed with the same counterparties.
(2) Includes $20.2 billion  of GSE obligations.
(3) Includes securities with a fair value  of $16.6 billion  that were segregated in complian ce with securities regulations or deposited with clearing organizations. This amount is included in the
parenthetical disclosure on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
(4) Includes MSRs of $2.0 billion  which are classified as Level 3 assets.
(5) Total recurring Level 3 assets were 0.51 percent of total consolidated assets, and total recurring Level 3 liabilities were 0.25 percent of total consolidated liabilities.
  Bank of America    148
The followin g tables present a reconciliation of all assets and
liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis using
significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) during 2019 , 2018  and
2017 , including net realize d and unrealized gains (losses)
included in earnings and accumulated OCI. Transfers into Level
3 occur primarily due to decreased price observability , and transfers out
of Level 3 occur primarily due to increased price observability .
Transfers occur on a regular basis for long-term debt instruments
due to changes in the impact of unobservable inputs on the
value of the embedded derivative in relation to the instrument as
a whole.
Level 3 – Fair Value Measurements (1)
 
Balance
January
1Total
Realized/Unrealized
Gains (Losses) in
Net Income (2)Gains
(Losses)
in OCI (3)Gross
Gross
Transfers
into
Level 3 Gross
Transfers
out of
Level 3 Balance
December
31Change in
Unrealized
Gains
(Losses) in
Net Income
Related to
Financial
Instruments
Still Held (2)(Dollars in millions)
Purchases Sales Issuances Settlements
Year Ended December 31, 2019       
Trading account assets:           
Corporate securities, trading loans and
other $1,558$ 105 $ — $ 534$(390)$ 18$ (578)$ 699$(439)$ 1,507$ 29
Equity securities 276 (12) — 38 (87) — (9) 79 (46) 239 (18)
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 465 46 (12) 1 — — (51) 39 (6) 482 47
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other
MBS 1,635 99 (2) 662 (899) — (175) 738 (505) 1,553 26
Total trading account assets 3,934 238 (14) 1,235(1,376) 18 (813) 1,555 (996) 3,781 84
Net derivative assets (liabilities) (4,5) (935) (37) — 298 (837) — (97) 147 (1,077) (2,538) 228
AFS debt securities:            
Non-agency residential MBS 597 13 64 — (73) — (40) 206 (343) 424 —
Non-U.S. securities 2 — — — — — — — — 2 —
Other taxable securities 7 2 — — — — (5) 61 — 65 —
Tax-exempt securities — — — — — — — 108 — 108 —
Total AFS debt securities 606 15 64 — (73) — (45) 375 (343) 599 —
Other debt securities carried at fair value –
Non-agency residential MBS 172 36 — — — — (17) 155 (47) 299 38
Loans and leases (6,7) 338 — — 230 (35) 217 (57) — — 693 (1)
Loans held-for-sale (6,7) 542 48 (6) 12 (71) 36 (245) 59 — 375 22
Other assets (7) 2,932 (81) 19 — (10) 179 (683) 5 (1) 2,360 (267)
Trading account liabilities – Equity securities — (2) — — — — — — — (2) (2)
Trading account liabilities – Corporate
securities
   and other (18) 8 — (1) (3) (1) — — — (15) —
Long-term debt (5,6) (817) (59) (64) — — (40) 180 (350) 1 (1,149) (55)
Year Ended December 31, 2018       
Trading account assets:          
Corporate securities, trading loans and
other $1,864$ (32)$ (1)$ 436$(403)$ 5$ (568)$ 804$(547)$ 1,558$ (117)
Equity securities 235 (17) — 44 (11) — (4) 78 (49) 276 (22)
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 556 47 (44) 13 (57) — (30) 117 (137) 465 48
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other
MBS 1,498 148 3 585 (910) — (158) 705 (236) 1,635 97
Total trading account assets 4,153 146 (42) 1,078(1,381) 5 (760) 1,704 (969) 3,934 6
Net derivative assets (liabilities) (4) (1,714) 106 — 531(1,179) — 778 39 504 (935) (116)
AFS debt securities:            
Non-agency residential MBS — 27 (33) — (71) — (25) 774 (75) 597 —
Non-U.S. securities 25 — (1) — (10) — (15) 3 — 2 —
Other taxable securities 509 1 (3) — (23) — (11) 60 (526) 7 —
Tax-exempt securities 469 — — — — — (1) 1 (469) — —
Total AFS debt securities (8) 1,003 28 (37) — (104) — (52) 838 (1,070) 606 —
Other debt securities carried at fair value –
Non-agency residential MBS — (18) — — (8) — (34) 365 (133) 172 (18)
Loans and leases (6,7) 571 (16) — — (134) — (83) — — 338 (9)
Loans held-for-sale (6) 690 44 (26) 71 — 1 (201) 23 (60) 542 31
Other assets (7,8) 2,425 414 (38) 2 (69) 96 (792) 929 (35) 2,932 149
Trading account liabilities – Corporate
securities
   and other (24) 11 — 9 (12) (2) — — — (18) (7)
Accrued expenses and other liabilities (6) (8) — — — — — 8 — — — —
Long-term debt (6) (1,863) 103 4 9 — (141) 486 (262) 847 (817) 95
(1) Assets (liabilities). For assets, increase (decrease) to Level 3 and for liabilities, (increase) decrease to Level 3.
(2) Includes gains (losses) reported in earnings in the following income statement line items: Trading account assets/liabilities - predominantly market making and similar activities; Net derivative
assets (liabilities) - market making and similar activities and other income; Other debt securities carried at fair value - other income; Loans and leases - predominantly other income; Loans held-for-
sale - other income; Other assets - primarily other income related to MSRs; Long-term debt - primarily market making and similar activities.
(3) Includes unrealized gains (losses) in OCI on AFS debt securities, foreign currency translation adjustments and the impact of changes in the Corporation’ s credit spreads on long-term debt
accounted for under the fair value option. Amounts include net unrealized gains (losses) of $3 million  and $(105) million  related to financial instruments still held at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(4) Net derivative assets (liabilities) include derivative assets of $2.2 billion  and $3.5 billion  and derivative liabilities of $4.8 billion  and $4.4 billion  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(5) Transfers into long-term debt include  a $1.4 billion transfer in of Level 3 derivative assets to reflect the Corporation's change to present bifurcated embedded derivatives with their respective host
instruments.
(6) Amounts represent instruments that are accounted for under the fair value option.
(7) Issuances represent loan originations and MSRs recognized following securitizations or whole-loan sales.
(8) Transfers out of AFS debt securities and into other assets primarily relate to the reclassification of certain securities.
149     Bank of America
 
Level 3 – Fair Value Measurements (1)     
(Dollars in millions)Balance
January 1Total
Realized/Unrealized
Gains/(Losses) in
Net Income (2)Gains/
(Losses)
in OCI (3)Gross
Gross
Transfers
into
Level 3 Gross
Transfers
out of
Level 3 Balance
December 31Change in
Unrealized
Gains/(Losses)
in Net Income
Related to
Financial
Instruments
Still Held (2) Purchases Sales Issuances Settlements
Year Ended December 31, 2017        
Trading account assets:         
Corporate securities, trading loans
and other $2,777$ 229$ —$ 547$(702)$ 5$ (666)$728$(1,054)$ 1,864$ 2
Equity securities 281 18 — 55 (70) — (10) 146 (185) 235 (1)
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 510 74 (8) 53 (59) — (73) 72 (13) 556 70
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and
other MBS 1,211 165 (2) 1,210 (990) — (233) 218 (81) 1,498 72
Total trading account assets 4,779 486 (10) 1,865(1,821) 5 (982) 1,164 (1,333) 4,153 143
Net derivative assets (liabilities) (4) (1,313) (984) — 664 (979) — 949 48 (99) (1,714) (409)
AFS debt securities:          
Non-U.S. securities 229 2 16 49 — — (271) — — 25 —
Other taxable securities 594 4 8 5 — — (42) 34 (94) 509 —
Tax-exempt securities 542 1 3 14 (70) — (11) 35 (45) 469 —
Total AFS debt securities 1,365 7 27 68 (70) — (324) 69 (139) 1,003 —
Other debt securities carried at fair
value – Non-agency residential MBS 25 (1) — — (21) — (3) — — — —
Loans and leases (5) 720 15 — 3 (34) — (126) — (7) 571 11
Loans held-for-sale (5,6) 656 100 (3) 3 (189) — (346) 501 (32) 690 14
Other assets (6) 2,986 144 (57) 2 (214) 258 (758) 64 — 2,425 (226)
Federal funds purchased and
securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase (5) (359) (5) — — — (12) 171 (58) 263 — —
Trading account liabilities – Corporate
securities and other (27) 14 — 8 (17) (2) — — — (24) 2
Accrued expenses and other liabilities
(5) (9) — — — — — 1 — — (8) —
Long-term debt (5) (1,514) (135) (31) 84 — (288) 514 (711) 218 (1,863) (196)
(1) Assets (liabilities). For assets, increase (decrease) to Level 3 and for liabilities, (increase) decrease to Level 3.
(2) Includes gains (losses) reported in earnings in the following income statement line items: Trading account assets/liabilities - market making and similar activities; Net derivative assets (liabilities) -
primarily market making and similar activities and other income; Other debt securities carried at fair value - other income; Loans and leases - other income; Loans held-for-sale - other income;
Other assets - primarily other income related to MSRs; Long-term debt - predominantly market making and similar activities.   
(3) Includes unrealized gains (losses) in OCI on AFS debt securities, foreign currency translation adjustments and the impact of changes in the Corporation’ s credit spreads on long-term debt
accounted for under the fair value option.
(4) Net derivative assets (liabilities) include derivative assets of $4.1 billion  and derivative liabilities of $5.8 billion .
(5) Amounts represent instruments that are accounted for under the fair value option.
(6) Issuances represent loan originations and MSRs recognized following securitizations or whole-loan sales.
  Bank of America    150
The followin g tables present information about significant unobservable inputs related to the Corporation’ s material categories of
Level 3 financial assets and liabilities at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Quantitative Information about Level 3 Fair V alue Measurements at December 31, 2019  
(Dollars in millions) Inputs
Financial InstrumentFair
ValueValuation
TechniqueSignificant Unobservable
InputsRanges of
InputsWeighted
Average (1)
Loans and Securities (2)   
Instruments backed by residential real estate assets $1,407
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield 0% to 25% 6%
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS 332 Prepayment speed 1% to 27% CPR 17% CPR
Loans and leases 281 Default rate 0% to 3% CDR 1% CDR
Loans held-for-sale 4 Loss severity 0% to 47% 14%
AFS debt securities, primarily non-agency residential 491 Price $0 to $160 $94
Other debt securities carried at fair value - Non-agency residential 299
Instruments backed by commercial real estate assets $ 303
Discounted cash flowYield 0% to 30% 14%
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 201 Price $0 to $100 $55
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS 85
Loans held-for-sale 17  
Commercial loans, debt securities and other $3,798
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield 1% to 20% 6%
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 1,306 Prepayment speed 10% to 20% 13%
Trading account assets – Non-U.S. sovereign debt 482 Default rate 3% to 4% 4%
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS 1,136 Loss severity 35% to 40% 38%
AFS debt securities – Other taxable securities 108 Price $0 to $142 $72
Loans and leases 412 Long-dated equity volatilities 35% n/a
Loans held-for-sale 354
Other assets, primarily auction rate securities $ 815
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesPrice$10 to $100 $96
 
 
MSRs $1,545
Discounted cash flowWeighted-average life, fixed rate (5) 0 to 14 years 5 years
  Weighted-average life, variable rate
(5) 0 to 9 years 3 years
  Option-adjusted spread, fixed rate 7% to 14% 9%
  Option-adjusted spread, variable rate 9% to 15% 11%
Structured liabilities   
Long-term debt $(1,149 )
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparables,
Industry standard
derivative pricing (3)Yield 2% to 6% 5%
  Equity correlation 9% to 100% 63%
  Long-dated equity volatilities 4% to 101% 32%
  Price $0 to $116 $74
  Natural gas forward price $1/MMBtu to $5/MMBtu $3/MMBtu
Net derivative assets (liabilities)   
Credit derivatives $ 13
Discounted cash flow ,
Stochastic recovery
correlation modelYield 5% n/a
  Upfront points 0 to 100 points 63 points
  Prepayment speed 15% to 100% CPR 22% CPR
  Default rate 1% to 4% CDR 2% CDR
  Loss severity 35% n/a
  Price $0 to $104 $73
Equity derivatives $(1,081 )Industry standard
derivative pricing (3)Equity correlation 9% to 100% 63%
  Long-dated equity volatilities 4% to 101% 32%
Commodity derivatives $(1,357 )
Discounted cash flow ,
Industry standard
derivative pricing (3)Natural gas forward price $1/MMBtu to $5/MMBtu $3/MMBtu
  Correlation 30% to 69% 68%
  Volatilities 14% to 54% 27%
Interest rate derivatives $ (113)
Industry standard
derivative pricing (4)Correlation (IR/IR) 15% to 94% 52%
  Correlation (FX/IR) 0% to 46% 2%
  Long-dated inflation rates -23% to 56% 16%
  Long-dated inflation volatilities 0% to 1% 1%
Total net derivative assets (liabilities) $(2,538 )   
(1) For loans and securities, structured liabilities and net derivative assets (liabilities), the weighted average is calculated based upon the absolute fair value of the instruments.
(2) The categories are aggregated base d upon product type which differs from financial statement classification. The following is a reconciliation to the line items in the table on page 147: Trading
account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other of $1.5 billion, Trading account assets – Non-U.S . sovereign debt of $482 milli on, Trading account assets – Mortgage  trading loans,
ABS and other MBS of $1.6 billion , AFS debt securit ies of $599 million , Other debt secur ities carried at fair value - Non-agency residential of $299 million , Other assets, including MSRs, of $2.4
billion , Loans and leases of $693 million  and LHFS of $375 million .
(3) Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation and Black-Scholes.
(4) Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation, Black-Scholes and other methods that model the joint dynamics of interest, inflation and foreign exchange rates.
(5) The weighted-average life is a product of changes in market rates of interest, prepayment rates and other model and cash flow assumptions.
CPR = Constant Prepayment Rate
CDR = Constant Default Rate
MMBtu = Million British thermal units
IR = Interest Rate
FX = Foreign Exchange
n/a = not applicable
151     Bank of America
 
Quantitative Information about Level 3 Fair V alue Measurements at December 31, 2018
(Dollars in millions) Inputs
Financial InstrumentFair
ValueValuation
TechniqueSignificant Unobservable
InputsRanges of
InputsWeighted
Average (1)
Loans and Securities (2)   
Instruments backed by residential real estate assets $1,536
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield 0% to 25% 8%
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS 419 Prepayment speed 0% to 21% CPR 12% CPR
Loans and leases 338 Default rate 0% to 3% CDR 1% CDR
Loans held-for-sale 1 Loss severity 0% to 51% 17%
AFS debt securities, primarily non-agency residential 606 Price $0 to $128 $72
Other debt securities carried at fair value - Non-agency residential 172
Instruments backed by commercial real estate assets $ 291
Discounted cash flowYield 0% to 25% 7%
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 200 Price $0 to $100 $79
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS 91
Commercial loans, debt securities and other $3,489
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield 1% to 18% 13%
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 1,358 Prepayment speed 10% to 20% 15%
Trading account assets – Non-U.S. sovereign debt 465 Default rate 3% to 4% 4%
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS 1,125 Loss severity 35% to 40% 38%
Loans held-for-sale 541 Price $0 to $141 $68
Other assets, primarily auction rate securities $ 890
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesPrice$10 to $100 $95
  
  
MSRs $2,042
Discounted cash flowWeighted-average life, fixed rate (5) 0 to 14 years 5 years
  Weighted-average life, variable rate
(5) 0 to 10 years 3 years
  Option-adjusted spread, fixed rate 7% to 14% 9%
  Option-adjusted spread, variable rate 9% to 15% 12%
Structured liabilities   
Long-term debt $ (817)
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparables,
Industry standard
derivative pricing (3)Equity correlation 11% to 100% 67%
  Long-dated equity volatilities 4% to 84% 32%
  Yield 7% to 18% 16%
  Price $0 to $100 $72
Net derivative assets (liabilities)   
Credit derivatives $ (565)
Discounted cash flow ,
Stochastic recovery
correlation modelYield 0% to 5% 4%
  Upfront points 0 points to 100 points 70 points
  Credit correlation 70% n/a
  Prepayment speed 15% to 20% CPR 15% CPR
  Default rate 1% to 4% CDR 2% CDR
  Loss severity 35% n/a
  Price $0 to $138 $93
Equity derivatives $ (348)Industry standard
derivative pricing (3)Equity correlation 11% to 100% 67%
  Long-dated equity volatilities 4% to 84% 32%
Commodity derivatives $ 10
Discounted cash flow ,
Industry standard
derivative pricing (3)Natural gas forward price $1/MMBtu to $12/MMBtu $3/MMBtu
  Correlation 38% to 87% 71%
  Volatilities 15% to 132% 38%
Interest rate derivatives $ (32)
Industry standard
derivative pricing  (4)Correlation (IR/IR) 15% to 70% 61%
  Correlation (FX/IR) 0% to 46% 1%
  Long-dated inflation rates -20% to 38% 2%
  Long-dated inflation volatilities 0% to 1% 1%
Total net derivative assets (liabilities)$ (935)   
(1) For loans and securities, structured liabilities and net derivative assets (liabilities), the weighted average is calculated based upon the absolute fair value of the instruments.
(2) The categories are aggregated base d upon product type which differs from financial statement classification. The following is a reconciliation to the line items in the table on page 148: Trading
account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other of $1.6 billion, Trading account assets – Non-U.S . sovereign debt of $465 milli on, Trading account assets – Mortgage  trading loans,
ABS and other MBS of $1.6 billion , AFS debt securit ies of $606 million , Other debt secur ities carried at fair value - Non-agency residential of $172 million , Other assets, including MSRs, of $2.9
billion , Loans and leases of $338 million  and LHFS of $542 million .
(3) Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation and Black-Scholes.
(4) Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation, Black-Scholes and other methods that model the joint dynamics of interest, inflation and foreign exchange rates.
(5) The weighted-average life is a product of changes in market rates of interest, prepayment rates and other model and cash flow assumptions.
CPR = Constant Prepayment Rate
CDR = Constant Default Rate
MMBtu = Million British thermal units
IR = Interest Rate
FX = Foreign Exchange
n/a = not applicable
  Bank of America    152
In the previous tables, instruments backed by residential and
commercial real estate assets include RMBS, commercial MBS,
whole loans and mortgage CDOs. Commercial loans, debt
securities and other include corporate CLOs and CDOs,
commercial loans and bonds, and securities backed by non-real
estate asset s. Structured  liabilities primarily include equity-linked
notes that are accounted for under the fair value option.
The Corporation uses multiple market approaches in valuing
certain of its Level 3 financial instruments. For example, market
comparables and discounted cash flows are used together . For a
given produ ct, such as corporate debt securities, market
comparables may be used to estimate some of the unobservable
inputs and then these inputs are incorporated into a discounted
cash flow model. Therefore, the balances disclosed encompass
both of these techniques.
The level of aggregation and diversity within the products
disclosed in the tables result in certain ranges of inputs being
wide and unevenly distributed across asset and liability
categories.
Uncertainty of Fair Value Measurements from
Unobservable Inputs
Loans and Securities
A significant increase in market yields, default rates, loss
severities or duration would have resulted in a significantly lower
fair value for long positions. Short positions would have been
impacted in a directionally opposite way. The impact of changes
in prepayment speeds would have resulted in differing impacts
depending on the seniority of the instrument and, in the case of
CLOs, whether prepayments can be reinveste d. A significant
increase in price would have resulted in a significantly higher fair
value for long positions, and short positions would have been
impacted in a directionally opposite way .
Structured Liabilities and Derivatives
For credit derivatives, a significant increase in market yield,
upfront points (i.e., a single upfront payment made by a
protection buyer at inception), credit spreads, default rates or
loss severities would have resulted in a significantly lower fair value for protection
sellers and higher fair value for protection buyer s. The impact of
changes in prepayment speeds would have resulted in differing
impacts depending on the seniority of the instrument.
Structured credit derivatives are impacted  by credit
correlation. Default correlation is a parameter that describes the
degree of dependence among credit default rates within a credit
portfolio that underlies a credit derivative instrument. The
sensitivity of this input on the fair value varies depending on the
level of subordination of the tranche. For senior tranches that are
net purchases of protection, a significant increase in default
correlation would have resulted in a significantly higher fair
value. Net short protection positions would have been impacted
in a directionally opposite way .
For equity derivatives, commodity derivatives, interest rate
derivatives and structured liabilities, a significant change in long-
dated rates and volatilitie s and correlation inputs (i.e., the degree
of correlation  between an equity security and an index, between
two different  commoditie s, between two different interest rates,
or between interest rates and foreign exchange rates) would
have resulte d in a significant impact to the fair value; however ,
the magnitu de and direction of the impact depend on whether
the Corporation is long or short the exposure. For structured
liabilities, a significant increase in yield or decrease in price
would have resulted in a significantly lower fair value.
Nonrecurring Fair Value
The Corpora tion holds certain assets that are measured at fair
value only in certain situations (e.g., the impairm ent of an asset),
and these measurements are referred to herein as nonrecurring.
The amounts below represent assets still held as of the reporting
date for which a nonrecurring fair value adjustme nt was recorded
during 2019 , 2018  and 2017 . In the tables below , other assets
includes the measurement of the Corporation's merchant
services equity method investment on which the Corporation
recorded an impairment  charge of $2.1 billion during  2019 . For
more information, see Note 13 – Commit ments and
Contingencies .
Assets Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
(Dollars in millions)
 Level 2 Level 3 Level 2 Level 3
Assets     
Loans held-for-sale $ 53 $ 102$ 274 $ —
Loans and leases (1) — 257 — 474
Foreclosed properties (2, 3) — 17 — 42
Other assets 178 646 331 14
     
  Gains (Losses)
  2019 2018 2017
Assets     
Loans held-for-sale  $ (14)$ (18)$ (6)
Loans and leases (1)  (81) (202) (336)
Foreclosed properties  (9) (24) (41)
Other assets  (2,145) (64) (124)
(1) Includes $36 million , $83 million  and $135 million  of losses on loans that were written down to a collateral value of zero during 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
(2) Amounts are included in other assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet and represent the carrying value of foreclosed properties that were written down subsequent to their initial classification as
foreclosed properties. Losses on foreclosed properties include losses recorded during the first 90 days after transfer of a loan to foreclosed properties.
(3) Excludes $260 million  and $488 million  of properties acquired upon foreclosure of certain government-guaranteed loans (principally FHA-insured loans) at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
153     Bank of America
 
The table below presents information about significant unobservable inputs at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Quantitative Information about Nonrecurring Level 3 Fair Value Measurements
   Inputs
Financial InstrumentFair
ValueValuation
TechniqueSignificant
Unobservable
InputsRanges of
InputsWeighted
Average (1)
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Loans held-for-sale $102Discounted cash flowPrice $85 to $97 $88
Loans and leases (2) 257Market comparablesOREO discount 13% to 59% 24%
   Costs to sell 8% to 26% 9%
Other assets (3) 640Discounted cash flowCustomer attrition 0% to 19% 5%
   Costs to service 11% to 19% 15%
 December 31, 2018
Loans and leases (2) $474Market comparablesOREO discount 13% to 59% 25%
   Costs to sell 8% to 26%9%
(1) The weighted average is calculated based upon the fair value of the loans.
(2) Represents residential mortgages where the loan has been written down to the fair value of the underlying collateral.
(3) The fair value of the merchant services joint venture was measured using a discounted cash flow method in which the two primary drivers of fair value were the customer attrition rate and certain
costs to service the customers. The weighted averages are calculated based on variations of the attrition rates and costs to service the customers.
NOTE 22  Fair V alue Option
Loans and Loan Commitments
The Corpora tion elects to account for certain loans and loan
commitments that exceed the Corporation’ s single-name credit
risk concentration guidelines under the fair value option. Lending
commitments are actively managed and, as appropriate, credit
risk for these lending relationships may be mitigated through the
use of credit derivatives,  with the Corporation’ s public side credit
view and market perspe ctives determining the size and timing of
the hedging activity . These credit derivatives do not meet the
requirements for designation as accountin g hedges and
therefore are carried at fair value. The fair value option allows
the Corporation to carry  these loans and loan commitments at
fair value, which is more  consistent with management’ s view of
the underlying economics and the manner in which they are
managed. In addition, the fair value option allows the
Corporation to reduce the accounting volatility that would
otherwise result from the asymmetry created by accounting for
the financial instruments at historical cost and the credit
derivatives at fair value.
Loans Held-for-sale
The Corpor ation elects to account for residential mortgage
LHFS, commercial mortgage LHFS and certain other LHFS
under the fair value option. These loans are actively managed
and monitored and, as appropriate, certain market risks of the
loans may be mitigated through the use of derivatives. The
Corporation has elected not to designate the derivatives as
qualifying accounting hedges, and therefore, they are carried at
fair value. The changes in fair value of the loans are largely
offset by changes in the fair value of the derivatives. The fair
value option allows the Corporation to reduce the accounting
volatility that would otherwise result from the asymmetry created
by accountin g for the financial instruments at the lower of cost or
fair value and the derivatives at fair value. The Corporation has
not elected to account for certain other LHFS under the fair value
option primarily because these loans are floating-rate loans that
are not hedged using derivative instruments.
Loans Reported as Trading Account Assets
The Corpora tion elects to account for certain loans that are held
for the purpose of trading and are risk-managed on a fair value
basis under the fair value option. Other Assets
The Corporation elects to account for certain long-term fixed-rate
margin loans that are hedged with derivatives  under the fair
value option. Election of the fair value option allows the
Corporation to reduce the accounting volatility that would
otherwise result from the asymmetry created by accounting for
the financial instruments at historical cost and the derivatives at
fair value.
Securities Financing Agreements
The Corporation elects to account for certain securities financing
agreements, including resale and repurchase agreements, under
the fair value option base d on the tenor of the agreements, which
reflects the magnitude of the interest rate risk. The majority of
securities financing agreements collateral ized by U.S.
government securities are not accounted for under the fair value
option as these contracts are generally short-dated and therefore
the interest rate risk is not significant.
Long-term Deposits
The Corporation elects to account for certain long-term fixed-rate
and rate-linked deposits that are hedged with derivatives that do
not qualify for hedge accounting under the fair value option.
Election of the fair value  option allows the Corporation to reduce
the accounting volatility that would otherwise result from the
asymmetry created by accounting for the financial instruments at
historical cost and the derivatives at fair value. The Corporation
has not elected to carry  other long-term depos its at fair value
because they are not hedged using derivatives.
Short-term Borrowings
The Corporation elects to account for certain short-term
borrowings, primarily short-term structured liabilities, under the
fair value option becau se this debt is risk-managed on a fair
value basis.
The Corporation elects to account for certain asset-backed
secured financings, which are also classified in short-term
borrowings, under the fair value option. Election of the fair value
option allows the Corporation to reduce the accounting volatility
that would otherwise result from the asymmetry created by
accounting for the asset-backed secured financ ings at historical
cost and the correspo nding mortgage LHFS securing these
financings at fair value.
  Bank of America    154
Long-term Debt
The Corporation elects to account for certain long-term debt,
primarily structured liabilities, under the fair value option. This
long-term debt is either risk-managed on a fair value basis or the
related hedges do not qualify for hedge accounting.
Fair Value Option Elections
The following tables provide information about the fair value
carrying amount and the contractual principal outstanding of assets and liabilities accounted for under the fair value option at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 , and information about where
changes in the fair value of assets and liabilities accounted for
under the fair value option are included in the Consolidated
Statement of Income for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 .
Fair Value Option Elections
 December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
(Dollars in millions)Fair Value
Carrying
AmountContractual
Principal
Outstanding Fair Value
Carrying
Amount Less
Unpaid Principal Fair Value
Carrying
Amount  Contractual
Principal
Outstanding Fair Value
Carrying
Amount Less
Unpaid Principal
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell $ 50,364 $ 50,318 $ 46 $ 56,399 $ 56,376 $ 23
Loans reported as trading account assets (1) 6,989 14,703 (7,714) 6,195 13,088 (6,893)
Trading inventory – other 19,574 n/a n/a 13,778 n/a n/a
Consumer and commercial loans 8,335 8,372 (37) 4,349 4,399 (50)
Loans held-for-sale (1) 3,709 4,879 (1,170) 2,942 4,749 (1,807)
Other assets 4 n/a n/a 3 n/a n/a
Long-term deposits 508 496 12 492 454 38
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned
or sold under agreements to repurchase 16,008 16,029 (21) 28,875 28,881 (6)
Short-term borrowings 3,941 3,930 11 1,648 1,648 —
Unfunded loan commitments 90 n/a n/a 169 n/a n/a
Long-term debt (2) 34,975 35,730 (755) 27,689 29,198 (1,509)
(1) A significant portion of the loans reported as trading account assets and LHFS are distressed loans that were purchased at a deep discount to par, and the remainder are loans with a fair value
near contractual principal outstanding.
(2) Includes structured liabilities with a fair value of $34.6 billion  and $27.3 billion , and contractual principal outstanding of $35.3 billion  and $28.8 billion  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
n/a = not applicable
Gains (Losses) Relating to Assets and Liabilities Accounted for Under the Fair Value Option
 Market making and
similar activities Other
Income Total
(Dollars in millions) 2019
Loans reported as trading account assets $ 203 $ — $ 203
Trading inventory – other (1) 5,795 — 5,795
Consumer and commercial loans 92 12 104
Loans held-for-sale (2) — 98 98
Long-term debt (3) (1,098) (78) (1,176)
Other (4) (15) 52 37
Total (5) $ 4,977 $ 84 $ 5,061
 2018
Loans reported as trading account assets $ 8 $ — $ 8
Trading inventory – other (1) 1,750 — 1,750
Consumer and commercial loans (422) (53) (475)
Loans held-for-sale (2) 1 24 25
Long-term debt (3) 2,157 (93) 2,064
Other (4) 8 (31) (23)
Total (5) $ 3,502 $ (153)$ 3,349
 2017
Loans reported as trading account assets $ 318 $ — $ 318
Trading inventory – other (1) 3,821 — 3,821
Consumer and commercial loans (9) 35 26
Loans held-for-sale (2) — 298 298
Long-term debt (3) (1,044) (146) (1,190)
Other (4) (93) 49 (44)
Total (5) $ 2,993 $ 236 $ 3,229
(1) The gains in market making and similar activities are primarily of fset by losses on trading liabilities that hedge these assets.
(2) Includes the value of IRLCs on funded loans, including those sold during the period.
(3) The net gains (losses) in market making and similar activities relate to the embedded derivatives in structured liabilities and are typically offset by (losses) gains on derivatives and securities that
hedge these liabilities. For the cumulative impact of changes in the Corporation’ s own credit spreads and the amount recognized in accu mulated OCI, see Note 15 – Accum ulated Other
Comprehensive Income (Loss) . For more information on how the Corporation’ s own credit spread is determined, see Note 21 – Fair V alue Measurements .
(4) Includes gains (losses) on federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell, long-term deposits, federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase, short-term borrowings and unfunded loan commitments.
(5) Gains (losses) related to borrower-specific credit risk were $194 million , $(148) million  and $38 million  in 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , respectively .
155     Bank of America
 
NOTE 23  Fair V alue of Financial Instruments
Financial instruments are classified within the fair value hierarchy
using the methodologies described in Note 21 – Fair Value
Measurements . Certain loans, deposits, long-term debt and
unfunded lending commitments are accounted for under the fair
value option. For more information, see Note 22 – Fair Value
Option . The following disclosures include financial instruments
that are not carried at fair value or only a portion of the ending
balance is carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance
Sheet.
Short-term Financial Instruments
The carrying value of short-term financial instruments, including
cash and cash equivalents, certain time deposits placed and
other short-term investments, federal funds sold and purchased,
certain resale and repurchase agreements and short-term
borrowings, approximates the fair value of these instruments.
These financ ial instruments generally expose the Corporation to
limited credit risk and have no stated maturities or have short-
term maturities and carry interest rates that approximate market.
The Corpor ation accou nts for certain resale and repurchase
agreements under the fair value option.
Under the fair value hierarchy , cash and cash equivalents are
classified as Level 1. Time deposits placed and other short-term
investments, such as U.S. government securities and short-term
commercial paper , are classified as Level 1 or Level 2. Federal
funds sold and purchase d are classified as Level 2. Resale and
repurchase agreements are classified as Level 2 because they
are generally short-dated and/or variable-rate instruments
collateralized by U.S. government or agency securities. Short-
term borrowings are classified as Level 2.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
The carrying values and fair values by fair value hierarchy of
certain financial instruments where only a portion of the ending
balance was carried at fair value at December 31, 2019 and
2018  are presented in the following table.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
  Fair Value
 Carrying
Value Level 2 Level 3 Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2019
Financial assets   
Loans $950,093$ 63,633 $914,597 $978,230
Loans held-for-
sale 9,158 8,439 719 9,158
Financial
liabilities    
Deposits (1) 1,434,803 1,434,809 — 1,434,809
Long-term debt 240,856 247,376 1,149 248,525
Commercial
unfunded
lending
commitments
(2) 903 90 4,777 4,867
 December 31, 2018
Financial assets   
Loans $911,520$ 58,228 $859,160 $917,388
Loans held-for-
sale 10,367 9,592 775 10,367
Financial
liabilities    
Deposits (1) 1,381,476 1,381,239 — 1,381,239
Long-term debt 229,392 230,019 817 230,836
Commercial
unfunded
lending
commitments
(2) 966 169 5,558 5,727 NOTE 24  Business Segment Information
The Corporation reports its results of operations through the
following four business segments: Consumer Banking , GWIM ,
Global Banking  and Global Markets , with the remaining
operations recorded in All Other .
Consumer Banking
Consumer Banking offers a diversified range of credit, banking
and investment products and services to consumers and small
businesses. Consumer Banking  product offerings include
traditional savings accounts, money market savings accounts,
CDs and IRAs,  checking accounts,  and investment accounts and
products , as well as credit and debit cards, residential mortgages
and home equity loans, and direct and indirect loans  to
consumers and small businesses in the U.S. Consumer  Banking
includes the impact of servicing residential mortgages and home
equity loans in the core portfolio .
Global Wealth & Investment Management
GWIM  provides a high-touch client experience through a network
of financial advisors focused on clients with over $250,000 in
total investa ble assets, including tailored solutions to meet
clients’  needs through a full set of investment management,
brokerage, banking and retirement product s. GWIM  also
provides comprehensive wealth management solutions targeted
to high net worth and ultra high net worth clients, as well as
customized solutions to meet clients’  wealth structuring,
investment management, trust and banking needs, including
specialty asset management services.
Global Banking
Global Banking  provides a wide range of lending-related
products and services, integrated working capital management
and treasury  solutions, and underwriting and advisory services
through the Corporation’ s network of offices and client
relationship teams. Global Bank ing also provides investme nt
banking products to clients. The economics of certain investment
banking and underwriting activities are shared primarily between
Global Banking and Global Markets  under an internal revenue-
sharing arrangement. Global Bank ing clients generally include
middle-market companie s, commercial real estate firms, not-for-
profit companies, large global corporations, financial institutions,
leasing clients, and mid-sized U.S.-based businesses requiring
customized and integrated financial advice and solutions.
Global Markets
Global Markets  offers sales and trading services and research
services to institutional clients across fixed-income, credit,
currency , commodity and equity businesses. Global Markets
provides market-making, financing, securities clearing,
settlement and custody services globally to institutional investor
clients in support of their investing and trading activities. Global
Markets  product coverage includes securities and derivative
products in both the primary and secondary markets. Global
Markets  also works with commercial and corporate clients to
provide risk management products. As a result of market-making
activities, Global Mark ets may be required to manage risk in a
broad range  of financial products. In addition, the economics of
certain inves tment banki ng and underwriting activities are shared
primarily between Global Markets and Global Banking  under an
internal revenue-sharing arrangement.
(1) Includes demand deposits of $545.5  billion  and $531.9  billion  with no stated maturities at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
(2) The carry ing value of commercial unfunded lending commitments is included in accrued
expenses and other liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. The Corporation does not
estimate the fair value of consumer unfunded lending commitments because, in many
instances, the Corporation can reduce or cancel these commitments by providing notice to the
borrower . For more information on commitments, see Note 13 – Com mitments and
Contingencies .  Bank of America    156
All Other
All Other  consists of ALM activities, equity investments, non-core
mortgage loans and servicing activities, liquidating businesses
and certain expenses not otherwise allocat ed to business
segments. ALM activities encompass certain residential
mortgages, debt securities, interest rate and foreign currency risk
management activities. Substantially all of the results of ALM
activities are allocated to the business segments. Equity
investments include the merchant services joint venture as well
as a portfolio of equity , real estate and other alternative
investments.
Basis of Presentation
The management accounting and reporting process derives
segment and business results by utilizing allocation
methodologies for revenue and expense. The net income
derived for the businesses is dependent upon revenue and cost
allocations using an activity-based costing model, funds transfer
pricing, and other methodologies and assumptions management
believes are appropriate to reflect the results of the business.
Total revenue, net of interest expense, includes net interest
income on an FTE basis and noninterest income. The
adjustment of net interest income to an FTE basis results in a
corresponding increase in income tax expens e. The segment
results also reflect certain revenue and expense methodologies
that are utilized to determine net income. The net interest income
of the busine sses includ es the results of a funds transfer pricing
process that matches assets and liabilities with similar interest
rate sensitivity and maturity characteristics. In segments where the total of
liabilities and equity exceeds assets, which  are generally
deposit-taking segments, the Corporation allocates assets to
match liabilities. Net interest income of the business segments
also includes an allocat ion of net interest income generated by
certain of the Corporation’ s ALM activities.
The Corporation’ s ALM activities include an overall interest
rate risk management strategy that incorporates the use of
various deriv atives and cash instruments to manage fluctuations
in earnings and capital that are caused by interest rate volatility .
The Corporation’ s goal is to manage interest rate sensitivity so
that movements in interest rates do not significantly adversely
affect earnings and capital. The results of substantially all of the
Corporation’ s ALM activities are allocated to the business
segments and fluctuate based on the performance of the ALM
activities. ALM activiti es include external product pricing
decisions including deposit pricing strategies, the effects of the
Corporation’ s internal funds transfer pricing process and the net
effects of other ALM activities.
Certain expenses not directly attributable to a specific
business segment are allocated to the segmen ts. The costs of
certain centralized or shared functions are allocated based on
methodologies that reflect utilization.
The following table presents net income (loss) and the
components thereto (with net interest income on an FTE basis
for the business segments, All Other and the total Corporation)
for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , and total assets at December 31, 2019
and 2018  for each business segment, as well as All Other .
Results of Business Segments and All
Other       
At and for the year ended December 31 Total Corporation (1)  Consumer Banking
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017  2019  2018  2017
Net interest income $ 49,486 $ 48,772 $46,164 $ 28,158 $ 27,025 $24,203
Noninterest income 42,353 42,858 41,887 10,429 10,593 10,101
Total revenue, net of interest expense 91,839 91,630 88,051 38,587 37,618 34,304
Provision for credit losses 3,590 3,282 3,396 3,772 3,664 3,525
Noninterest expense 54,900 53,154 54,517 17,618 17,672 17,847
Income before income taxes 33,349 35,194 30,138 17,197 16,282 12,932
Income tax expense 5,919 7,047 11,906 4,213 4,150 4,897
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $18,232 $ 12,984 $ 12,132 $ 8,035
Period-end total assets $ 2,434,079 $ 2,354,507  $ 804,019 $ 768,881  
 Global Wealth &
Investment Management  Global Banking
 2019 2018 2017  2019  2018  2017
Net interest income $ 6,504 $ 6,265 $ 6,152 $ 10,675 $ 10,993 $10,615
Noninterest income 13,033 13,188 12,447 9,808 9,008 9,510
Total revenue, net of interest expense 19,537 19,453 18,599 20,483 20,001 20,125
Provision for credit losses 82 86 56 414 8 212
Noninterest expense 13,823 14,015 13,770 9,017 8,745 8,811
Income before income taxes 5,632 5,352 4,773 11,052 11,248 11,102
Income tax expense 1,380 1,364 1,807 2,984 2,923 4,204
Net income $ 4,252 $ 3,988 $ 2,966 $ 8,068 $ 8,325 $ 6,898
Period-end total assets $ 299,756 $ 305,907   $ 464,032 $ 442,330  
       
 Global Markets  All Other
 2019 2018 2017  2019  2018  2017
Net interest income $ 3,915 $ 3,857 $ 4,264 $ 234 $ 632 $ 930
Noninterest income 11,699 12,326 11,698 (2,616) (2,257) (1,869)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 15,614 16,183 15,962 (2,382) (1,625) (939)
Provision for credit losses (9) — 164 (669) (476) (561)
Noninterest expense 10,722 10,835 10,997 3,720 1,887 3,092
Income (loss) before income taxes 4,901 5,348 4,801 (5,433) (3,036) (3,470)
Income tax expense (benefit) 1,397 1,390 1,666 (4,055) (2,780) (668)
Net income (loss) $ 3,504 $ 3,958 $ 3,135 $ (1,378) $ (256) $ (2,802)
Period-end total assets $ 641,806 $ 641,923  $ 224,466 $ 195,466  
(1) There were no material intersegment revenues.
157     Bank of America
 
The table below present s noninterest income and the components thereto for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  for each business segment,
All Other and the total Corporation. For more information, see Note 2 – Net Interest Income and Noninterest Income .
Noninterest Income by Business Segment and All Other       
 Total Corporation Consumer BankingGlobal Wealth &
Investment Management
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Fees and commissions:       
Card income       
Interchange fees $3,834 $3,866 $3,777 $3,174 $3,196 $3,038 $ 60 $ 81 $ 109
Other card income 1,963 1,958 1,899 1,910 1,906 1,846 41 46 44
Total card income 5,797 5,824 5,676 5,084 5,102 4,884 101 127 153
Service charges       
Deposit-related fees 6,588 6,667 6,708 4,219 4,300 4,266 68 73 77
Lending-related fees 1,086 1,100 1,110 — — — — — —
Total service charges 7,674 7,767 7,818 4,219 4,300 4,266 68 73 77
Investment and brokerage services       
Asset management fees 10,241 10,189 9,310 144 147 133 10,130 10,042 9,177
Brokerage fees 3,661 3,971 4,526 149 172 184 1,740 1,917 2,217
Total investment and brokerage
services 13,902 14,160 13,836 293 319 317 11,870 11,959 11,394
Investment banking fees       
Underwriting income 2,998 2,722 2,821 — (1) — 401 335 316
Syndication fees 1,184 1,347 1,499 — — — — — —
Financial advisory services 1,460 1,258 1,691 — — — — 2 2
Total investment banking fees 5,642 5,327 6,011 — (1) — 401 337 318
Total fees and commissions 33,015 33,078 33,341 9,596 9,720 9,467 12,440 12,496 11,942
Market making and similar activities 9,034 9,008 7,102 6 8 3 113 112 144
Other income 304 772 1,444 827 865 631 480 580 361
Total noninterest income $42,353 $42,858 $41,887 $10,429 $10,593 $10,101 $13,033 $13,188 $12,447
 Global Banking Global Markets All Other (1)
 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Fees and commissions:       
Card income       
Interchange fees $ 519 $ 503 $ 478 $ 81 $ 86 $ 86 $ — $ — $ 66
Other card income 13 8 12 (1) (2) (2) — — (1)
Total card income 532 511 490 80 84 84 — — 65
Service charges      
Deposit-related fees 2,121 2,111 2,197 156 161 147 24 22 21
Lending-related fees 894 916 928 192 184 182 — — —
Total service charges 3,015 3,027 3,125 348 345 329 24 22 21
Investment and brokerage services      
Asset management fees — — — — — — (33) — —
Brokerage fees 34 94 97 1,738 1,780 2,049 — 8 (21)
Total investment and brokerage
services 34 94 97 1,738 1,780 2,049 (33) 8 (21)
Investment banking fees      
Underwriting income 1,227 1,090 1,172 1,555 1,495 1,588 (185) (197) (255)
Syndication fees 574 648 742 610 698 756 — 1 1
Financial advisory services 1,336 1,153 1,557 123 103 133 1 — (1)
Total investment banking fees 3,137 2,891 3,471 2,288 2,296 2,477 (184) (196) (255)
Total fees and commissions 6,718 6,523 7,183 4,454 4,505 4,939 (193) (166) (190)
Market making and similar activities 235 260 134 7,065 7,260 6,203 1,615 1,368 618
Other income 2,855 2,225 2,193 180 561 556 (4,038) (3,459) (2,297)
Total noninterest income $9,808 $9,008 $9,510 $11,699 $12,326 $11,698 $(2,616) $(2,257) $(1,869)
(1) All Other  includes eliminations of intercompany transactions.
  Bank of America    158
Business Segment Reconciliations    
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Segments’ total revenue, net of interest expense $ 94,221 $ 93,255 $ 88,990
Adjustments (1):    
ALM activities 241 (325) 161
Liquidating businesses, eliminations and other (2,623) (1,300) (1,100)
FTE basis adjustment (595) (610) (925)
Consolidated revenue, net of interest expense $ 91,244 $ 91,020 $ 87,126
Segments’ total net income 28,808 28,403 21,034
Adjustments, net-of-tax (1):    
ALM activities 202 (222) 154
Liquidating businesses, eliminations and other (1,580) (34) (2,956)
Consolidated net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
  December 31
  2019 2018
Segments’ total assets  $ 2,209,613 $ 2,159,041
Adjustments (1):    
ALM activities, including securities portfolio  721,806 669,204
Elimination of segment asset allocations to match liabilities  (565,346) (540,798)
Other  68,006 67,060
Consolidated total assets  $ 2,434,079 $ 2,354,507
(1) Adjustments include consolidated income, expense and asset amounts not specifically allocated to individual business segments.
NOTE 25  Parent Company Information
The following tables present the Parent Company-only financial information.
Condensed Statement of Income    
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Income    
Dividends from subsidiaries:    
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries $ 27,820 $ 28,575 $ 12,088
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries — 91 202
Interest from subsidiaries 9,502 8,425 7,043
Other income (loss) 74 (1,025) 28
Total income 37,396 36,066 19,361
Expense    
Interest on borrowed funds from related subsidiaries 451 235 189
Other interest expense 5,899 6,425 5,555
Noninterest expense 1,641 1,600 1,672
Total expense 7,991 8,260 7,416
Income before income taxes and equity in undistributed earnings of subsidiaries 29,405 27,806 11,945
Income tax expense (benefit) 341 (281) 950
Income before equity in undistributed earnings of subsidiaries 29,064 28,087 10,995
Equity in undistributed earnings (losses) of subsidiaries:    
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries (1,717) 306 8,725
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 83 (246) (1,488)
Total equity in undistributed earnings of subsidiaries (1,634) 60 7,237
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
159     Bank of America
 
Condensed Balance Sheet   
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018
Assets   
Cash held at bank subsidiaries (1) $ 5,695 $ 5,141
Securities 656 628
Receivables from subsidiaries:   
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries 173,301 152,905
Banks and related subsidiaries 51 195
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 391 969
Investments in subsidiaries:   
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries 297,465 293,045
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 3,663 3,432
Other assets 9,438 14,696
Total assets $ 490,660 $ 471,011
Liabilities and shareholders’ equity   
Accrued expenses and other liabilities $ 13,381 $ 8,828
Payables to subsidiaries:   
Banks and related subsidiaries 458 349
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 12,102 13,301
Long-term debt 199,909 183,208
Total liabilities 225,850 205,686
Shareholders’ equity 264,810 265,325
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 490,660 $ 471,011
(1) Balance includes third-party cash held of $4 million  and $389 million  at December 31, 2019 and 2018 .
Condensed Statement of Cash Flows    
(Dollars in millions) 2019 2018 2017
Operating activities    
Net income $ 27,430 $ 28,147 $ 18,232
Reconciliation of net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:    
Equity in undistributed (earnings) losses of subsidiaries 1,634 (60) (7,237)
Other operating activities, net 16,973 (3,706) (2,593)
Net cash provided by operating activities 46,037 24,381 8,402
Investing activities    
Net sales (purchases) of securities (17) 51 312
Net payments to subsidiaries (19,121) (2,262) (7,087)
Other investing activities, net 7 48 (1)
Net cash used in investing activities (19,131) (2,163) (6,776)
Financing activities    
Net increase (decrease) in other advances (1,625) 3,867 (6,672)
Proceeds from issuance of long-term debt 29,315 30,708 37,704
Retirement of long-term debt (21,039) (29,413) (29,645)
Proceeds from issuance of preferred stock 3,643 4,515 —
Redemption of preferred stock (2,568) (4,512) —
Common stock repurchased (28,144) (20,094) (12,814)
Cash dividends paid (5,934) (6,895) (5,700)
Net cash used in financing activities (26,352) (21,824) (17,127)
Net increase (decrease) in cash held at bank subsidiaries 554 394 (15,501)
Cash held at bank subsidiaries at January 1 5,141 4,747 20,248
Cash held at bank subsidiaries at December 31 $ 5,695 $ 5,141 $ 4,747
  Bank of America    160
NOTE 26  Performance by Geographical Area
The Corporation’ s operations are highly integrated with
operations in both U.S. and non-U.S. markets. The non-U.S.
business activities are largely conducted in Europe, the Middle
East and Africa and in Asia. The Corporation identifies its
geographic performance based on the busines s unit structure
used to manage the capital or expense deployed in the region as
applicable. This requires certain judgments related to the allocation of revenue so
that revenue can be appropriately matched with the related
capital or expense deplo yed in the region. Certain asset, liability ,
income and expense amounts have been allocated to arrive at
total assets, total revenue, net of interest expense, income
before income taxes and net income by geographic area as
presented below .
(Dollars in millions)  Total Assets at
Year End (1)Total Revenue,
Net of Interest
Expense (2) Income Before
Income Taxes Net Income
U.S. (3) 2019 $ 2,122,734 $ 81,236 $ 30,699 $ 25,937
 2018 2,051,182 80,777 31,904 26,407
 2017  74,604 25,108 15,550
Asia 2019 102,440 3,491 765 570
 2018 94,865 3,507 865 520
 2017  3,405 676 464
Europe, Middle East and Africa 2019 178,889 5,310 921 672
 2018 185,285 5,632 1,543 1,126
 2017  7,907 2,990 1,926
Latin America and the Caribbean 2019 30,016 1,207 369 251
 2018 23,175 1,104 272 94
 2017  1,210 439 292
Total Non-U.S. 2019 311,345 10,008 2,055 1,493
 2018 303,325 10,243 2,680 1,740
 2017  12,522 4,105 2,682
Total Consolidated 2019 $ 2,434,079 $ 91,244 $ 32,754 $ 27,430
 2018 2,354,507 91,020 34,584 28,147
 2017  87,126 29,213 18,232
(1) Total assets include long-lived assets, which are primarily located in the U.S.
(2) There were no material intercompany revenues between geographic regions for any of the periods presented.
(3) Substantially reflects the U.S.
161     Bank of America
 
Glossary
Alt-A  Mortg age – A type of U.S. mortgage that is considered
riskier than A-paper , or “prime,” and less risky than “subprime,”
the riskiest category . Typically , Alt-A  mortgages are characterized
by borrowers with less than full documentation, lower credit
scores and higher L TVs.
Assets Under Management (AUM) – The total market value of
assets under the investment advisory and/or discretion of GWIM
which generate asset management fees based on a percentage
of the assets’  market values. AUM reflects assets that are
generally managed for institutional, high net worth and retail
clients, and are distributed through various investment products
including mutual funds, other commingled vehicles and separate
accounts.
Banking Book  – All on- and off-balance sheet financial
instruments of the Corpo ration except for those positions that are
held for trading purposes.
Brokerage and Other Assets  – Non-discretionary client assets
which are held in brokerage accounts or held for safekeeping.
Committed Credit Exposure  – Any funded portion of a facility
plus the unfunded portion of a facility on which the lender is
legally boun d to advance funds during a specified period under
prescribed conditions.
Credit Derivatives – Contractual agreements that provide
protection against a specified credit event on one or more
referenced obligations.
Credit Valuation Adjustment (CVA) – A portfolio adjustment
required to properly reflect the counterparty credit risk exposure
as part of the fair value of derivative instruments.
Debit Valuation Adjustment (DVA) – A portfolio adjustmen t
required to properly reflect the Corporation’ s own credit risk
exposure as part of the fair value of derivative instruments and/or
structured liabilities.
Funding Valuation Adjustment (FVA) – A portfolio adjustment
required to include funding costs on uncollatera lized derivatives
and derivatives where the Corporation is not permitted to use the
collateral it receives.
Interest Rate Lock Commitment (IRLC)  – Commitment with a
loan applicant in which  the loan terms are guaranteed for a
designated period of time subject to credit approval.
Letter of Credit  – A document issued on behalf of a customer to
a third party promising to pay the third party upon presentation of
specified documents. A letter of credit effectively substitutes the
issuer ’s credit for that of the customer .
Loan-to-value (LTV) – A commonly used credit quality metric.
LTV is calculated as the outstanding carrying value of the loan
divided by the estimated value of the property securing the loan. Margin Receivable  – An extension of credit secured by eligible
securities in certain brokerage accounts.
Matched Book  – Repurc hase and resale agreements or
securities borrowed and loaned transactions where the overall
asset and liability position is similar in size and/or maturity .
Generally , these are entered into to accommodate customers
where the Corporation earns the interest rate spread.
Mortgage Servicing Rights (MSR) – The right to service a
mortgage loan when the underlying loan is sold or securitized.
Servicing includes collections for principal, interest and escrow
payments from borrowers and accounting for and remitting
principal and interest payments to investors.
Net Interest  Yield – Net interest income divided by average total
interest-earning assets.
Nonperforming Loans and Leases  – Includes loans and leases
that have been placed on nonaccrual status, including
nonaccruing loans whose contractual terms have been
restructured in a manne r that grants a concession to a borrower
experiencing financial dif ficulties.
Operating Margin  – Income before income taxes divided by
total revenue, net of interest expense.
Prompt Corrective Action (PCA)  – A framework established by
the U.S. banking regulators requiring banks to maintain certain
levels of regulatory capital ratios, comprised of five categories of
capitalization: “well capitalized,” “adequately capitalized,”
“undercapitalized,” “significantly undercapitalized” and “critically
undercapitalized.” Insure d depository institutions that fail to meet
certain of these capital levels are subject to increasingly strict
limits on their activities , including their ability to make capital
distributions, pay management compensation, grow assets and
take other actions.
Subprime Loans  – Although a standard industry definition for
subprime loans (including subprime mortgage loans) does not
exist, the Corporation defines subprime loans as specific product
offerings for higher risk borrowers.
Troubled Debt Restr ucturings (TDRs)  – Loans whose
contractual terms have been restructured in a manner that grants
a concessio n to a borrower experiencing financial difficulties.
Certain consumer loans for which a binding offer to restructure
has been extended are also classified as TDRs.
Value-at-Risk (V aR) – VaR is a model that simulates the value of
a portfolio under a range of hypothetical scenarios in order to
generate a distribution of potential gains and losses. VaR
represents the loss the portfolio is expected to experience with a
given confidence level based on historical data. A VaR model is
an effective tool in estimating ranges of potential gains and
losses on our trading portfolios.
  Bank of America    162
Acronyms
ABS Asset-backed securities
AFS Available-for-sale
ALM Asset and liability management
ARR Alternative reference rates
AUM Assets under management
AVM Automated valuation model
BANA Bank of America, National Association
BHC Bank holding company
BofAS BofA  Securities, Inc.
BofASE BofA  Securities Europe SA
bps basis points
CAE Chief Audit Executive
CAO Chief Administrative Of ficer
CCAR Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
CDO Collateralized debt obligation
CDS Credit default swap
CET1 Common equity tier 1
CFPB Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
CLO Collateralized loan obligation
CFTC Commodity Futures Trading Commission
CLTV Combined loan-to-value
CRO Chief Risk Of ficer
CVA Credit valuation adjustment
DIF Deposit Insurance Fund
DVA Debit valuation adjustment
EAD Exposure at default
EMRC Enterprise Model Risk Committee
EPS Earnings per common share
ERC Enterprise Risk Committee
EU European Union
FCA Financial Conduct Authority
FDIC Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
FDICIA Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Improvement Act of 1991
FHA Federal Housing Administration
FHFA Federal Housing Finance Agency
FHLB Federal Home Loan Bank
FHLMC Freddie Mac
FICC Fixed-income, currencies and commodities
FICO Fair Isaac Corporation (credit score)
FLUs Front line units
FNMA Fannie Mae
FTE Fully taxable-equivalent
FVA Funding valuation adjustment
GAAP Accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America
GDPR General Data Protection Regulation
GLS Global Liquidity Sources
GNMA Government National Mortgage Association 
GSE Government-sponsored enterprise
G-SIB Global systemically important bank
GWIM Global W ealth & Investment Management
HELOC Home equity line of credit
HQLA High Quality Liquid Assets
HTM Held-to-maturity
ICAAP Internal Capital Adequacy Assessment Process
IRM Independent Risk Management
IBOR Interbank Of fered Rates
IRLC Interest rate lock commitment
ISDA International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
LCR Liquidity Coverage Ratio
LGD Loss given default
LHFS Loans held-for-sale
LIBOR London Interbank Of fered Rate
LTV Loan-to-value
MBS Mortgage-backed securities
MD&A Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations
MLGWM Merrill L ynch Global W ealth Management
MLI Merrill L ynch International
MLPCC Merrill L ynch Professional Clearing Corp
MLPF&S Merrill L ynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
MRC Management Risk Committee
MSA Metropolitan Statistical Area
MSR Mortgage servicing right
NOL Net operating loss
NSFR Net Stable Funding Ratio
OCC Office of the Comptroller of the Currency
OCI Other comprehensive income
OREO Other real estate owned
OTC Over-the-counter
OTTI Other-than-temporary impairment
PCA Prompt Corrective Action
RMBS Residential mortgage-backed securities
RSU Restricted stock unit
SBLC Standby letter of credit
SCCL Single-counterparty credit limits
SBSDs Security-based swap dealers
SEC Securities and Exchange Commission
SLR Supplementary leverage ratio
SOFR Secured Overnight Financing Rate
TDR Troubled debt restructurings
TLAC Total loss-absorbing capacity
VA U.S. Department of V eterans Affairs
VaR Value-at-Risk
VIE Variable interest entity
163     Bank of America
 
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with
Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure
None
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of the end of the period covered by this report and pursuant
to Rule 13a-15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended (Exchange Act), Bank of America’ s management,
including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness and design of our
disclosure controls and procedures (as that term is defined in
Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act). Based upon that
evaluation, Bank of America’ s Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer concluded that Bank of America’ s disclosure
controls and procedures were effective, as of the end of the
period covered by this report.
Report of Management on Internal Control Over
Financial Reporting
The Report of Management on Internal Control over Financial
Reporting  is set forth on page 86 and incorporated herein by
reference. The Report of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm with respect to the Corporation’ s internal control
over financial reporting is set forth on pages 87 and 88 and
incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have been no changes in our internal control over financial
reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange Act)
during the quarter ended December 31, 2019 , that materially
affected, or are reasona bly likely to materially affect, our internal
control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information
None
Part III
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and
Corporate Governance
Information about our Executive Officers
The name, age, position and office, and business experience
during the last five years of our current executive of ficers are:
Dean C. Athanasia (53) President, Retail and Preferred &
Small Business Banking since January 2019 ; Co-Head --
Consumer Banking from September 2014 to January 2019; and
Preferred and Small Business Banking Executive from April 2011
to September 2014.
Catherine P. Bessant (59) Chief Operations and
Technology Officer since July 2015; Global Technology &
Operations Executive from March 2010 to July 2015.
Sheri Bronstein (51) Chief Human Resources Officer since
January 2019; Global Human Resources Executive from July
2015 to January 2019; and HR Executive for Global Banking &
Markets from March 2010 to July 2015.
Paul M. Donofrio (59) Chief Financial Officer since August
2015; Strategic Finance Executive from April 2015 to August
2015; and Head of Global Corporate Credit and Transaction
Banking from January 2012 to April 2015.
Geoffrey S. Greener (55) Chief Risk Officer  since April
2014; Head of Enterprise Capital Management from April 2011 to
April 2014.
Kathleen A. Knox (56) President, Private Bank since
November 2017; Head of Business Banking from October 2014
to November 2017; and Retail Banking & Distribution Executive
from June 2011 to October 2014.
David G. Leitch (59) Global General Counsel since January
2016; Gener al Counsel of Ford Motor Company from April 2005
to December 2015.
Thomas K. Montag (63) Chief Operating Officer  since
September 2014; Co-Chief Operating Officer from September
2011  to September 2014.
Brian T. Moynihan (60) Chairman of the Board  since
October 2014, and President, and Chief Executive Officer and
member of the Board of Directors since January 2010.
Thong M. Nguyen (61) Vice Chairman, Bank of America
Corporation  since January 2019; Co-Head -- Consumer
Banking from September 2014 to January 2019; Retail Banking
Executive from April 2014 to September 2014; and Retail
Strategy , and Operations & Digital Banking Executive from
September 2012 to April 2014.
Andrew M. Sieg (52) President, Merrill Lynch Wealth
Management since January 2017; and Head of Global Wealth  &
Retirement Solutions with Merrill Lynch from October 2011 to
January 2017.
Andrea B. Smith (52) Chief Administrative Officer since
August 2015; Global Head of Human Resources from January
2010 to August 2015.
Information included under the following captions in the
Corporation’ s proxy statement relating to its 2020  annual
meeting of stockholde rs (the 2020  Proxy Statement) is
incorporated herein by reference:
●“Proposal 1: Electing Directors – Our Director Nominees;”
●“Corporate Governance  – Additional Corporate Governance
Information;” and
●“Corporate Governance – Board Meetings, Committee
Membership, and Attendance.”
Item 11. Executive Compensation
Information included under the following captions in the 2020
Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●“Compensation Discussion and Analysis;”
●“Compensation and Human Capital Committee Report;”
●“Executive Compensation;”
●“Corporate Governance;” and
●“Director Compensation.”
  Bank of America    164
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
Information included under the following caption in the 2020  Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●“Stock Ownership of Directors, Executive Of ficers, and Certain Beneficial Owners.”
The table below presents information on equity compensation plans at December 31, 2019 :
Plan Category (1)(a) Number of Shares to
be Issued Under
Outstanding Options,
Warrants and Rights (2) (b) Weighted-average
Exercise Price of
Outstanding Options,
Warrants and Rights (3)(c) Number of Shares
Remaining for Future
Issuance Under Equity
Compensation Plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column (a)) (4)
Plans approved by shareholders 158,954,915 — 304,904,984
Plans not approved by shareholders — — —
Total 158,954,915 — 304,904,984
(1) This table does not include 783,282 vested restricted stock units and stock option gain deferrals at December 31, 2019 that were assumed by the Corporation in connection with prior acquisit ions
under whose plans the awards were originally granted.
(2) Consists of outstanding restricted stock units. Includes 1,115,166 vested restricted stock units subject to a required twelve-month holding period.
(3) Restricted stock units do not have an exercise price and are delivered without any payment or consideration.
(4) Amount represents shares of common stock available for future issuance under the Bank of America Corporation Key Employee Equity Plan.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related
Transactions, and Director Independence
Information included under the following captions in the 2020
Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●“Related Person and Certain Other Transactions;” and
●“Corporate Governance – Director Independence.” Item 14.  Principal Accounting Fees and
Services
Information included under the following caption in the 2020
Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●“Proposal 3: Ratifying the Appointment of our Independent
Registered Public Accounting Firm for 2020.”
165     Bank of America
 
Part IV
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules     
The following documents are filed as part of this report:
(1) Financial Statements:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Consolidated Statement of Income for the years ended December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2019  and 2018
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Shareholders’  Equity for the years ended December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2019 , 2018  and 2017
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(2) Schedules:
None
(3) Index to Exhibits
With the exception of the information expressly incorporated herein by reference, the 2020  Proxy Statement shall not be deemed
filed as part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
No. Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
3.1 Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended and in effect on the date hereof 1  
3.2 Amended Bylaws of the Corporation as in effect on the date hereof 10-Q 3(b) 10/28/19 1-6523
4.1 Indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 between registrant (successor to NationsBank Corporation)
and BankAmerica National Trust CompanyS-3 4.1 2/1/95 33-57533
4.2 First Supplemental Indenture dated as of September 18, 1998 between registrant and U.S. Bank
Trust National Association (successor to BankAmerica National Trust Company) to the indenture
dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.3 11/18/98 1-6523
4.3 Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 7, 2001 between registrant, U.S. Bank
Trust National Association, as Prior Trustee, and The Bank of New York, as Successor Trustee to
the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.4 6/14/01 1-6523
4.4 Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of July 28, 2004 between registrant and The Bank of New
York to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.2 8/27/04 1-6523
4.5 Fourth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 28, 2006 between the registrant and The Bank of
New York to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)S-3 4.6 5/5/06 333-133852
4.6 Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 1, 2008 between registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (successor to The Bank of New York) to the indenture
dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.1 12/5/08 1-6523
4.7 Sixth Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2011 between registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit
4.1)10-K 4(ee) 2/25/11 1-6523
4.8 Seventh Supplemental Indenture dated as of January 13, 2017 between registrant and The Bank
of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See
Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.1 1/13/17 1-6523
4.9 Eighth Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2017 between registrant and the Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit
4.1)10-K 4(a) 2/23/17 1-6523
4.10 Successor Trustee Agreement effective December 15, 1995 between registrant (successor to
NationsBank Corporation) and First Trust of New York, National Association, as successor trustee
to BankAmerica National Trust CompanyS-3 4.2 6/28/96 333-07229
4.11 Agreement of Appointment and Acceptance dated as of December 29, 2006 between registrant
and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.10-K4(aaa) 2/28/07 1-6523
4.12 Form of Senior Registered Note S-3 4.12 5/1/15 333-202354
4.13 Form of Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series L S-3 4.13 5/1/15 333-202354
4.14 Form of Master Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series L S-3 4.14 5/1/15 333-202354
4.15 Form of Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series M 8-K 4.2 1/13/17 1-6523
4.16 Form of Master Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series M 8-K 4.3 1/13/17 1-6523
4.17 Indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 between registrant (successor to NationsBank Corporation)
and The Bank of New YorkS-3 4.5 2/1/95 33-57533
4.18 First Supplemental Indenture dated as of August 28, 1998 between registrant and The Bank of
New York to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.17)8-K 4.8 11/18/98 1-6523
  Bank of America    166
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
No. Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
4.19 Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of January 25, 2007 between registrant and The Bank
of New York Trust Company, N.A. (successor to The Bank of New York) to the indenture dated as
of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.17)S-4 4.3 3/16/07 333-141361
4.20 Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2011 between registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (formerly The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.) to
the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.17)10-K 4(ff) 2/25/11 1-6523
4.21 Fourth Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2017 between registrant and The Bank
of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See
Exhibit 4.17)10-K 4(i) 2/23/17 1-6523
4.22 Indenture dated as of June 27, 2018 between the registrant and The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A.S-3 4.3 6/27/18 333-224523
4.23 Form of Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series N S-3 4.4 6/27/18 333-224523
4.24 Form of Master Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series N S-3 4.5 6/27/18 333-224523
4.25 Indenture dated as of June 27, 2018 between the registrant and The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A.S-3 4.6 6/27/18 333-224523
4.26 Form of Global Subordinated Medium-Term Note, Series N S-3 4.7 6/27/18 333-224523
 Registrant and its subsidiaries have other long-term debt agreements, but these are omitted
pursuant to Item 601(b)(4)(iii) of Regulation S-K. Copies of these agreements will be furnished to
the Commission on request   
4.27 Description of the Corporation's Securities 1  
10.1 Bank of America Pension Restoration Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2009
(Pension Restoration Plan)2 10-K 10(c) 2/27/09 1-6523
10.2 First Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated December 18, 2009 2 10-K 10(c) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.3 Second Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated June 29, 2012 2 10-K 10(a) 2/28/13 1-6523
10.4 Third Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated March 26, 2013 1,2  
10.5 Fourth Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated August 22, 2013 1,2  
10.6 Fifth Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated December 5, 2014 1,2  
10.7 Sixth Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated December 15, 2016 1,2  
10.8 NationsBank Corporation Benefit Security Trust dated as of June 27, 1990 2 10-K 10(t) 3/27/91 1-6523
10.9 First Supplement to NationsBank Corporation Benefit Security Trust dated as of
November 30, 19922 10-K 10(v) 3/24/93 1-6523
10.10 NationsBank Corporation Benefit Security Trust Trustee Removal/Appointment Agreement dated
as of December 19, 19952 10-K 10(o) 3/29/96 1-6523
10.11 Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the Bank of America 401(k)
Restoration Plan) as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 10-K 10(c) 2/25/15 1-6523
10.12 First Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly know as the Bank
of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 10-K10(vv) 2/24/16 1-6523
10.13 Second Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the
Bank of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 S-8 4(c) 11/19/19 333-234780
10.14 Third Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the
Bank of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20151,2  
10.15 Bank of America Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective
December 10, 20022 10-K 10(g) 3/3/03 1-6523
10.16 Amendment to Bank of America Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, dated January 23, 2013 2 10-K 10(d) 2/28/13 1-6523
10.17 Bank of America Director Deferral Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2005 2 10-K 10(g) 2/28/07 1-6523
10.18 Bank of America Director Deferral Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2019 2 10-K 10(f) 2/26/19 1-6523
10.19 Bank of America Corporation Directors’ Stock Plan as amended and restated effective April 26,
2006 (2006 Directors’ Stock Plan)2 8-K 10.2 12/14/05 1-6523
10.20 Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement to the 2006 Directors' Stock Plan 2 10-K 10(h) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.21 Form of Directors’ Stock Plan Conditional Restricted Stock Award Agreement for Non-U.S.
Director to the 2006 Directors’ Stock Plan2 10-Q 10(a) 8/4/11 1-6523
10.22 Bank of America Corporation Key Associate Stock Plan, as amended and restated effective
April 28, 2010 (2010 KASP)2 8-K 10.2 5/3/10 1-6523
10.23 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2014 and subsequent
grants), including grants to named executive officers to the 2010 KASP2 10-Q 10(a) 5/1/14 1-6523
10.24 Bank of America Corporation Key Employee Equity Plan (formerly known as the Key Associate
Stock Plan), as amended and restated effective May 6, 2015 (2015 KEEP)2 8-K 10.2 5/7/15 1-6523
167     Bank of America
 
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
No. Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
10.25 Form of Cash-settled Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2016 and subsequent
grants) to the 2015 KEEP2 10-Q 10(a) 5/2/16 1-6523
10.26 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2016) to the 2015 KEEP 2 10-Q 10(c) 5/2/16 1-6523
10.27 Form of Time-based Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2017 and February 2018)
to the 2015 KEEP2 10-Q 10(a) 5/2/17 1-6523
10.28 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2017) to the 2015 KEEP 2 10-Q 10(b) 5/2/17 1-6523
10.29 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2018) to the 2015 KEEP 2 10-Q 10 4/30/18 1-6523
10.30 Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement for Non-Employee Directors to the 2015 KEEP 2 10-K 10(h) 2/26/19 1-6523
10.31 Form of Time-based Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2019) between the
Corporation and certain executive officers of the Corporation, including certain Named Executive
Officers to the 2015 KEEP2 10-Q 10(a) 4/26/19 1-6523
10.32 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2019) between the
Corporation and certain executive officers of the Corporation, including certain Named Executive
Officers to the 2015 KEEP2 10-Q 10(b) 4/26/19 1-6523
10.33 ESA Retention Agreement dated March 15, 2004 between the Corporation and Dean C. Athanasia 2 10-Q 10(c) 4/26/19 1-6523
10.34 Amendment to various plans in connection with FleetBoston Financial Corporation merger dated
October 27, 20032 10-K 10(v) 3/1/04 1-6523
10.35 FleetBoston Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan effective December 31, 2004 2 10-K 10(r) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.36 FleetBoston Executive Deferred Compensation Plan No. 2 effective December 16, 2003 2 10-K 10(u) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.37 FleetBoston Executive Supplemental Plan effective December 31, 2004 2 10-K 10(v) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.38 Retirement Income Assurance Plan for Legacy Fleet, as amended and restated effective
January 1, 20092 10-K 10(p) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.39 Amendment thereto dated December 16, 2010, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(c) of the
2010 10-K2 10-K 10(c) 2/25/11 1-6523
10.40 Amendment thereto dated June 29, 2012, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(l) of the 2012
10-K2 10-K 10(l) 2/28/13 1-6523
10.41 Trust Agreement for the FleetBoston Executive Deferred Compensation Plans No. 1 and 2 dated
December 17, 19972 10-K 10(x) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.42 Trust Agreement for the FleetBoston Executive Supplemental Plan dated June 19, 1996 2 10-K 10(y) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.43 Trust Agreement for the FleetBoston Retirement Income Assurance Plan and the FleetBoston
Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan dated June 19, 19962 10-K 10(z) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.44 FleetBoston Directors Deferred Compensation and Stock Unit Plan effective January 1, 2004 2 10-K10(aa) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.45 BankBoston Corporation and its Subsidiaries Deferred Compensation Plan dated December 24,
20012 10-K10(cc) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.46 BankBoston Director Stock Award Plan effective July 1, 1998 2 10-K10(hh) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.47 BankBoston Corporation Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan effective March 1, 1988 2 10-K 10(ii) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.48 BankBoston, N.A. Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan effective March 1, 1988 2 10-K 10(jj) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.49 Description of BankBoston Director Retirement Benefits Exchange Program 2 10-K 10(ll) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.50 Global amendment to definition of “change in control” or “change of control,” together with a list of
plans affected by such amendment2 10-K10(oo) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.51 Employment Agreement dated October 27, 2003 between registrant and Brian T. Moynihan 2 S-4 10(d) 12/4/03 333-110924
10.52 Cancellation Agreement dated October 26, 2005 between registrant and Brian T. Moynihan 2 8-K 10.1 10/26/05 1-6523
10.53 Agreement Regarding Participation in the Fleet Boston Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan
dated October 26, 2005 between registrant and Brian T. Moynihan2 8-K 10.2 10/26/05 1-6523
10.54 Bank of America Corporation Equity Incentive Plan amended and restated effective as of
January 1, 20082 10-K10(zz) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.55 Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan amended as of January 1, 2009
and 2008 Restricted Units/Stock Option Grant Document for Thomas K. Montag2 10-K10(aaa) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.56 Employment Letter dated May 1, 2008 between Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. and Thomas K. Montag
and Summary of Agreement with respect to Post-Employment Medical Coverage2 10-K10(bbb) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.57 Securities Purchase Agreement dated August 25, 2011 between registrant and Berkshire
Hathaway Inc. (including forms of the Certificate of Designations, Warrant and Registration Rights
Agreement)8-K 1.1 8/25/11 1-6523
10.58 Form of Waiver of Certain Incremental Payouts from Performance Restricted Stock Units 10-K 10(rr) 2/23/17 1-6523
10.59 Amended and Restated Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement (Multiple Aircraft) dated June 26, 2018
between Bank of America, N.A. and Brian T. Moynihan2 10-Q 10 7/30/18 1-6523
10.60 Form of Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement (Multiple Aircraft) between Bank of America, N.A. and
certain executive officers of the Corporation, including certain Named Executive Officers2 10-Q 10(b) 6/30/19 1-6523
  Bank of America    168
  Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
No. Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
10.61 First Amendment to the 2015 KEEP dated December 19, 2018 2 10-K10(mm) 2/26/19 1-6523
10.62 Second Amendment to the 2015 KEEP dated April 24, 2019 2 8-K 10.1 4/24/19 1-6523
21 Direct and Indirect Subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation As of December 31, 2019 1  
23 Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP 1  
24 Power of Attorney 1  
31.1 Certification of the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
20021  
31.2 Certification of the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
20021  
32.1 Certification of the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 20021  
32.2 Certification of the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 20021  
101.INSInline XBRL Instance Document 3  
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document 1  
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document 1  
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document 1  
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document 1  
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definitions Linkbase Document 1  
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)  
(1) Filed Herewith.
(2) Exhibit is a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
(3) The instance document does not appear in the interactive data file because its XBRL  tags are embedded within the inline XBRL  document.
169     Bank of America
 
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
Not applicable.
Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registra nt has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 19, 2020
Bank of America Corporation
  
By: /s/ Brian T. Moynihan
 Brian T. Moynihan
 Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons
on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 Signature  Title Date
    
 /s/ Brian T. Moynihan  Chief Executive Officer, Chairman and Director
(Principal Executive Officer)February 19, 2020
 Brian T. Moynihan  
     
 */s/ Paul M. Donofrio  Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 19, 2020
 Paul M. Donofrio  
     
 */s/ Rudolf A. Bless  Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)February 19, 2020
 Rudolf A. Bless  
     
 */s/ Sharon L. Allen  
Director February 19, 2020
 Sharon L. Allen  
    
 */s/ Susan S. Bies  
Director February 19, 2020
 Susan S. Bies  
    
 */s/ Jack O. Bovender, Jr.  
Director February 19, 2020
 Jack O. Bovender, Jr.  
     
 */s/ Frank P. Bramble, Sr.  
Director February 19, 2020
 Frank P. Bramble, Sr.  
     
 */s/ Pierre de Weck  
Director February 19, 2020
 Pierre de Weck  
     
 */s/ Arnold W. Donald  
Director February 19, 2020
 Arnold W. Donald  
    
 */s/ Linda P. Hudson  
Director February 19, 2020
 Linda P. Hudson  
    
 */s/ Monica C. Lozano  
Director February 19, 2020
 Monica C. Lozano  
  Bank of America    170
 Signature  Title Date
     
    
 */s/ Thomas J. May  
Director February 19, 2020
 Thomas J. May  
    
 */s/ Lionel L. Nowell, III  
Director February 19, 2020
 Lionel L. Nowell, III  
    
 */s/ Denise L. Ramos  
Director February 19, 2020
 Denise L. Ramos  
    
 */s/ Clayton S. Rose  
Director February 19, 2020
 Clayton S. Rose  
    
 */s/ Michael D. White  
Director February 19, 2020
 Michael D. White  
    
 */s/ Thomas D. Woods  
Director February 19, 2020
 Thomas D. Woods  
    
 */s/ R. David Yost  
Director February 19, 2020
 R. David Yost  
     
 */s/ Maria T. Zuber  
Director February 19, 2020
 Maria T. Zuber  
    
*By /s/ Ross E. Jeffries, Jr.    
 Ross E. Jeffries, Jr.
Attorney-in-Fact   
171     Bank of America
 
